Huzzah. Better late than never. Three weeks on, the NY Times finally follows up our story on the Brexit boys’ Russian gold deal. Looks like you’re going to have to report them to the police too, @arron_banks.  
We first reported on Trump-Brexit-Russia, 14 months ago. Cambridge Analytica, Farage, Wikileaks - the UK, is a focal point at centre of this -  as recognised by Mueller last Oct. Slowly, slowly, US press catching on. Could the UK govt be next??  
BOOM from @ddknyt + @AllMattNYT. British Brexit businessman's Russia contacts and potential deals are much wider than previously reported--they included investments in at least one other gold mine and the Russian diamond giant Alrosa.  
Christina Applegate unwillingly plays an annoying game in a grocery store parking lot.  
If you want to know, though, this little adventure started for me when no one even gave a fuck. In July 2016. Two weeks after the Brexit vote:  
Good to see this significant UK news on Russia / Brexit is now being built on and hitting national news here in the States. @nytimes 
The SNP are on a dangerous tack at the moment, What they are doing is trying to build up a situation in Scotland where the NHS staff are paid manifestly better than south of the Border and they are doing it deliberately! | #GeorgeFoulkes #Scotref #NHS #Indyref2 #Brexit 
Expats denied say in referendum by missing postal votes demand re-run  
The majority of Tory members support Brexit.The majority of Labour members support Remain.Labour Leavers are a minority dictating Labour policy.We are not attacking Labour as a whole, we are attacking the Labour Leavers who are destroying both the UK and their own party.#FBPE 
Great news that the @nytimes are following up our scoop in the the Observer @carolecadwalla FINALLY the US is waking up to the fact Trump Brexit Russia is all connected  
Tories: We want cake and unicorns.EU: No.Labour: You're ruining Brexit we'll do it much better.Tories: Ok, have a go.Labour: We want unicorns and cake.EU: No.(fade out to the sound of cultists chanting "He has a plan") 
Read my comments in - Russians Offered Business Deals to Brexit’s Biggest Backer  
Looks a bit like it.I fail to see how positive thinking solves a nuclear physics exam, however.‘Remoaners’ have had no opportunity to ‘spoil’ Brexit. They were cut out from the start. Even if they flag-waved realky hard, the impact on David Davis’ IQ would be minimal. 
Or put another way - I’m tired of people’s solutions being “if everyone just rallied around my opinion”.The vote was for Brexit, but the country was divided.A solution to rally around would be a compromise.But JHB is one of those ‘leave everything’ & ‘walk away’ Brexiters. 
Seriously ScotlandLet's get out of this stinking cesspit of lies and fraudThat would hold memorials for fake chemical attacksLet's leave them to itHave a nice BrexitByeee!  
Brexit exists because of human weaknesses - hate, anger, greed, immorality, resentment, envy, arrogance, selfishness, isolation, intolerance. The EU exists because of human strengths - love, acceptance, generosity, resilience, unity, tolerance, ambition, humility, empathy, hope 
Done in 60 seconds: EU leaders swiftly confirm Brexit stance as they demand clarity from PM - Sky News  
Not really. I wrote post-Brexit plans for UK-EU science. That’s acceptance. I’ve also maintained that public shld have final say.The notion that everthing would be hunky-dory if we all just cheer political viewpoints we disagree with is weird.Flag-waving doesn’t bend reality.  
In their warmup for #TrumpRussia, the Russians offered no-lose "investments" in diamond & gold mines to Aaron Banks & others who bankrolled #Brexit.ZERO "coincidence" that #Russia offered proceeds of the #Rosneft spinout to TeamTrump. 
One of my local group has had an angry reaction to his letter in @ShropshireStar. I find it incredible that they believe we wield such power. If it were down to the amount of remoaning we've done, we'd have stopped Brexit by now!#StopBrexit @mrjamesob 
EXCLUSIVE: The @nytimes on previously unreported emails from Brexit-financier Aaron Banks, who appears far more engaged with Russian diplomats than acknowledged, & whose biz partner took up a lucrative deal offered by the Russians @ddknyt @AllMattNYT  
Now that really would be a Brexit dividend... #StopBrexit 
Well,well, well... is @theresa_may ever going to do anything about Russian involvement in Brexit? Russians Offered Business Deals to Brexit’s Biggest Backer  
Time to call for a UK police Mueller style inquiry into Brexit and Russian influence in UK politics. 
Absolutely. I voted Remain in 1975 and straight after the vote there were already right and left wing nutters plotting away for another Referendum. They certainly didn't respect my will then to remain. 
Fantastic that we now have the opportunity to help Australia create 4000 jobs. That’ll show EU we don’t need them.Tories are so desperate for a positive Brexit story they are pushing this garbage 
Wtf. You couldn’t make this up.  It’s do as #conservatives say, not as they do - unless you can afford to relocate your business out of the U.K. to cushion the negative impact of #Brexit  
Russians Offered Business Deals to Brexit’s Biggest Backer   via @NYTimes  
NEWSFLASH: ministers with a track record of colossal misjudgements surprisingly make another colossal misjudgement. Our future rests with Michael 'the day after we vote to leave we hold all the cards' Gove and David 'there will be no downside to Brexit' Davis. God help us all. 
BREXIT & RUSSIA EXCLUSIVE: Previously unreported emails suggest Brexit moneyman Arron Banks was more engaged with Russian diplomats than acknowledged -- and his biz partner took up a lucrative deal offered by Russia weeks after the vote @ddknyt @AllMattNYT  
The scandal over Russia’s involvement with Brexit continues to grow:  
this, from @JohnnyPixels,  was (again) retweeted by @davidallengreen. UK Govt is in total denial. #Brexit  
We’re producing a 12-page special in @TheNewEuropean on Brexit’s damage to the NHS. Please chip in to the crowdfunder so that we can produce it and send it to MPs!  
Lord Adonis, arch-Remoaner and Blair’s representative on earth, has called Bercow the greatest Speaker ever. Remainers see him as last means of blocking Brexit. He has to go! 
David Charbonneau chats with former #newzealand PM Helen Clark and finds a lot of similarities between their experience with #prorep and the upcoming referendum in #bc.#bcpoli #bc4pr #kamloops #britishcolumbia #bc 
I'll defend Corbyn too. Brexit was a democratic vote and although many of us don't like it that vote has to be honoured. Trying to overturn it would be like adding gasoline to a bonfire. The far right would have more fuel for their campaign of dividing and hatred. 
It is hard to describe Peter Bone as anything but a traitor & a criminal. A no-deal would produce a devastating recession. The only people who would profit are disaster capitalists, Putin and rich Tories gaining from the UK becoming a #BrexitTaxHaven in order to survive.#Brexit  
I wanted to add this on @BBCNewsnight as to the bigger global context re Merkel, Trump, Brexit  - but no time. But we should start  connecting the dots. 
He wants a new customs union, a requirement of us leaving. He wants a meaningful vote on the final deal which the Tories voted down - a people's vote would be as open to corruption as we've seen in the original referendum. Back his play & attack the Tories instead.  
We've had plenty who've already spoken for Scotland.We've already "blown the lid on Brexit". We've been ignored. And, frankly, we're sick of it.It's time for independence. 
If Brexit were a business it would be required by law to consider the best interests of its shareholders. It would therefore be bound to conclude that it should remodel and rebrand as Remain plc. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - “The benefits we get from #Brexit is making the UK a genuine free market, which the EU is not. The EU is a failing economic model."Look at what is going on in the conference right now, the troubles it has got on migration, the failures of the euro."  
TOMORROW: Yeah, listen, if we tell you any kind of news about Brexit, business concerns, medical profession warnings, negotiation progress, shifting EU migration policies or Danny Dyer then you’ll probably shit a brick - so we’re going to lead with this instead... #MailFrontPages pic.twitter.com/a4qRur4Sco 
Theresa May is one terrible, weak leader. She leads possibly the most right wing Tory party ever. We have Brexit coming up & there are no trade agreements or anything. We have all the better together lies unfolding in front of our eyes. So why the feck is YES not at 70% the now? 
Danny Dyer's rant about Brexit and David Cameron in full  
Could an argument be made that @jeremycorbyn & his close colleagues in the @UKLabour leadership are the least intellectually compent group of politicians the #LabourParty has ever had in the most senior positions of the party?I can't think of any worse.#Brexit #Labour #Corbyn 
Be on the alert Scotland.Mundell is moving into his new Edinburgh offices in charge of 5,000 civil servants. UK want Holyrood gone and they'll take over after a no deal Brexit.A state of emergency will see Westminster control us and Holyrood possibly closed.Indy now.  
George Osborne got his post-#Brexit forecasts spectacularly wrong. Now the Standard which has become an anti-#Brexit propaganda rag under his editorship is floundering. Another nail in Gideon's reputation. 
BOOM! When all is said and Done Brexit and Trump/Russia just may be part of the same conspiracy. 
My pharmacist’s experiencing a delay in getting a regular medication I need from Sweden. I joked, I hope it’s not going to get worse after #Brexit . He thinks there’s going to be *big problems* - quotas, different pricing, and many other factors. What an absolute mess! 
40 PLUS FUCKING YRS BITCHING MOANING & FUCKING WHINING ABOUT THE EU. 2 FUCKING ARSEHOLING YRS SINCE WINNING A CRAPPY, SHITTY FUCKING LEAVE CAMPAIGN. 9 BASTARD FUCKING MTHS TO GO AND MRS MAY IS HAVING A SODDING AWAY DAY TO AGREE A PLAN FOR FUCKING #Brexit. A FUCKING DAY! 
Being ideologically obsessed by #Brexit is an illness. Listen to Land Rover, Jaguar, Honda, Nissan, BMW, Airbus, Siemens, Lloyds, Morgan Stanley, CBI, BMA, Ireland etc and accept its a political project gone wrong. Get over it.  
If Brexit was a business, it would have moved its operations to the EU27 to avoid itself.  
Much as I like many Labour policies, ANY kind of Brexit leaves them and our economy and society dead in the water.Time to call BS on all this “keeping power dry” / “playing the long game” nonsense. The damage is already being done. 
I’d wager that if there had been a Brexit plan (as there was an Indy  plan - Scotland’s Future), Britain wouldn’t have voted for Brexit. Because it’d have been harder for Brexiters to make their have cake and eat it arguments.  
You really think Jeremy doesn’t want Brexit? Really? And you’re a Villa supporter? So many crazy dreams, and they all end in ashes.  
“BBC Spotlight: Brexit, Dark Money and the DUP”‘A BBC Spotlight investigation into the man behind the DUP's record £435,000 donation during the EU referendum has uncovered a trail of illegal activity and foreign money.’ 
Too many cooks as they say. Or maybe some of them can start advising and preparing for a No-Deal. #Brexit  
Excl: Fresh Cabinet split opens up over Theresa’s May new Brexit compromises – as it also emerges irate Michael Gove literally tore up her customs plan; 
So we import CO2 from Europe what do these Brexiteers think is going to happen when we are out of the Customs Union and the Single Market. This isn’t just about fizzy drinks it’s about keeping vaccines cool and other medical uses. This is why we are fighting Brexit. 
Most staff and many customers wearing bollocks to Brexit stickersI ran out of them againWe will #StopBrexit @JNM1000 @BremainInSpain @albawhitewolf @EUflagmafia @spaceangel1964 @BrexitBin 
Brexit be like...  
'Boris Johnson might finally resign as Theresa May prepares Brexit compromise'  
Theresa May urged to DUMP Remainer Greg Clark from Cabinet in major BREXIT CLEAR-OUT  
JC campaigning yet again in an SNP constituency, cos let's face it neither the Tories or Brexit registers on his radar such is the need for Labour to always be the opposition in Scotland  
Clive Lewis stuns Question Time audience with a brilliant takedown of the government over Brexit By @OsoSabioUK #BBCQT 
People who voted for #Brexit must be delighted. They've been in the news every single day for 2 years! Unfortunately the news is #shambles #racism #totaldisaster #ididntknowirelandhadaborder #350millionyourarse 
There we were, doing okay, and all of a sudden we’re playing a game of Russian roulette (yes, yes, I know) with an impending government collapse and a roll of the dice as to whether we get far right, far left, hard Brexit, or miracle of common sense. How I yearn for 2015. 
I voted Remain. I think #Brexit will be a disaster. But after having been called a "liar/troll/shill" by vitriolic #FBPE ranters for expressing my honest opinion, I can vouch for the truth of this  
Less than 2 years after former top Number 10 aide Nick Timothy steered Britain to worst possible Brexit, we get a headline:"Former top Number 10 aide Nick Timothy says Britain heading for worst possible Brexit".Proof that Govt *can* make things happen....  
I've now been here in Sicily for 6 days and I can't find anyone who thinks1. #Brexit is anything other than insane2. Italy should leave the EU3. Migrants should be banished or punished.And nor have I found anyone as rude as a British Brexiteer. 
Think we have an off-shore culture now? Wait 'til after Brexit. Every Tory will be keeping their money off-shore. 
Put your cards on the table, EU makes last Brexit call to Britain  
After a marathon negotiation on migration, E.U. leaders dispensed with Brexit, in less than 60 seconds. Get "realistic," they tell Britain.  
.'Labour's lack of Opposition on Brexit ridiculous, says the rest of the country (and majority of Labour voters)'. 
Sometimes, if I want to give myself nightmares, I think of what would happen if the 1995 Quebec Referendum happened today in an era of social media and Trump as President. #cdnpoli  
You can't be PRO Corbyn & ANTI Brexit. However much Corbynites try to insist you can. He's on the same side as Farage, Rees Mogg, Boris, UKIP, BNP, KatieFeckingHopkins, TommyFeckingRobinson, EDL, Britain 1st, DUP. He's fighting for them.  
1st Minister says Corbyn & May are indistinguishable on Brexit Divided party - checkDelusional Brexit wish list - checkNot listening to public - check Out of touch with majority of own party - check  
The referendum was advisory.But more, it was gerrymandered. It was fraudulent. Electoral rules were broken. Deceit was used, huge Lies were told.And again, the public was not informed of the complexities. The question lacked all specificity.But hey, #RespectTheResult 
Not so simple.1. Organizing a referendum is NOT illegal in Spain.2. They are not imprisoned for organizing a referendum, but for rebellion.3. Rebellion never happened. Says who? Says Belgium, Switzerland, Germany, Finland,...Not simple, but the truth. 
The NHS must be delighted. And the British economy must be too. Brexit means masses of people don’t want to come and work in the UK anymore. How exciting. Congratulations.  
David Davis, Britain’s Brexit negotiator, has held only 4 hours of talks with his Brussels opposite number Barnier this year - & at £100 000 in flight expenses that's £25k an hour.Not a great deal for the British people but par for the course for Tory MPs 
'Danny Dyer calling David Cameron a 't**t' was the most honest and coherent analysis of Brexit we’ve heard since the referendum'  pic.twitter.com/cExGucVz1Y 
Danny Dyer cuts through Brexit bluster with TV tirade  
Fires from above in Wicklow. Just back from Brussels on EU&Brexit business. Heatwave continues and Govt monitoring situation closely. Enjoy the good weather but please do heed the advice. Be careful, look out for elderly neighbours and vulnerable people and do conserve water.  
We don’t need you to campaign for our SNHS as ours is the best performing in the UK. Maybe you should concentrate on the shambles that is Brexit!  
Come on @BBCNews. You gave hours of airtime to Boris’s big red bus of lies.But now doctors are saying that Brexit is putting our NHS and risk. And they’re calling for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit.Unacceptable to ignore that.#BrexitBroadcastingCorporation 
"Brexit could threaten peace in Northern Ireland—and America is ignoring it"  
100% - I always vote with my conscience and I would rather be on the losing side than "get behind Brexit and make it work". Brexit is morally wrong just as getting behind Hitler in 1930's was wrong.  I need my kids to know I tried to do what is right and best for them.  
Danny Dyer spoke for millions when he said #Brexit is like a riddle no-one knows the answer to. N°10 is not amused. It can issue as many denials as it likes: May's govt doesn't know its #Brexit arse from its #Brexit elbow. It's why many #Leave voters are #RemainerNow #PeoplesVote 
Revamped HMRC revamped customs system, set to be ready for "no deal" #Brexit. Quite - must be ready for "no deal".  
The UK media presents the Euro summit today derisively stating: “Brexit is a side show for the EU”. Yeah, coz they’re busy talking about a renewed migrant crisis and Euro crisis. Two of the KEY REASONS Britain voted to leave. Morons. 
Worth pointing out that the entire "negotiation" with the EU over Brexit is flawed. They do not seek a deal. They seek to humiliate us in order to stop other Nations leaving.We must walk. No deal. No UK cash. Watch them squeal. It's how Trump would deal with it. 
The areas where #TeamTreason and #TeamTreasonUK intersect are numerous, and well documented by SIGINT. “Bad boys of Brexit” would be wise to tell the truth to investigators, or risk being charged with the underlying crime(s) + perjury. Cc @andywigmore 
This is basically how Alistair Campbell and Andrew Adonis see themselves in stopping Brexit isn't it.  
The truth is, many brexiters dont care about the consequences of brexit because they believe they will never happen to them or effect them. Big business leave.. doesnt affect me! Lose rights to live and work in EU.. I never wanted to do that anyway! 
Leading right-wing Brexiters don't want to give more funding to the #NHS, they want to destroy it. Tory MEP Daniel Hannan said "The NHS is a relic which I wouldn't wish on anyone".#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
They said Brexit would provide another £350m for the NHS. They were lying.John Major told the truth. He said the NHS is about as safe with the Tory Brexiters "as a pet hamster would be with a hungry python" #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit #NHS 
Jeremy: we’re with you on this. But your very stupid stance on Brexit means that you or anyone else won’t be able to do a damn thing about it. Stop hiding from the Brexit issue which, among all these other horrors of austerity, is THE single biggest issue of the day.  
Brexit killing London as financial hub? Not just yet  
Clive Lewis stuns Question Time audience with a brilliant takedown of the government over BrexitBy @OsoSabioUK #BBCQT 
People who are clearly not racist or homophobic are automatically labelled as far-right racist, homophobic because they voted to leave the EU in the referendum whilst people of colour who support @realDonaldTrump are called appallingly racist names by rich white Liberals. 8/9 
Translation: "Hello, my name is Femi & I have a massive problem with democracy. I dislike a particular result so have organised widespread temper tantrums in response. Can I ask how these antidemocratic tactics have damaged my countries chances of negotiating a good Brexit deal?"  
"The British continue to negotiate with the British, and not with the EU," Belgium's PM says of Brexit  
BREXIT BOOM! UK economy continues to grow as exports SOAR – Project Fear debunked AGAIN  
#brexitshambles To be fair, David Davis did have a lot of select committee grilling. Or #pmqs where he had to spontaneously, conveniently, get up and leave "for another meeting" the moment questioning became tough. What a  #liarliar over #brexit impact papers existence  
I want my grandchildren to know I did as much as I could to fight the destruction that is Brexit. Standing up to be counted!  
If Brexit were a business, it’d be filing for bankruptcy 
That's why I've always said that the only people rioting over brexit will be those that voted leave and realised they were lied to and conned. They will be far angrier than those who voted remain. 
Tweeps, I'm going on holiday and not taking Twitter. See you in a few weeks. And here's a last plug for my essay on why Brexit was a long time coming  
CrikeyAppointing Gideon Osborne as editor to churn out anti-Brexit, pro-Brussels propaganda is not proving a commercial success.Who'd have guessed? 
Irresistible force is preparing to meet immoveable object. Failure to resolve #NorthernIreland border issue in #Brexit talks means something will break. US should help Europe protect hard-earned peace. My take in @TIME - 
“Speak for England, Danny Dyer. You’ve blown the lid on Brexit:” brilliant as always by ⁦@MarinaHyde⁩ 
I already said, I don't care about party politics. Brexit is about our nation and it's future. You either stand by and let it happen or you step up and do something positive.I can't trust either party to represent me.#WeAreTheOppositionNow#PeoplesVote 
Where the hell is David Cameron? Remember it was him that called the referendum, not Corbyn. #IAmDannyDyer 
Ffs behave. France get their ships built there. British money going to Australia limited jobs in UK. Do you buggers understand anything about trade or economics. Conservatives scrapping the barrel.. Brexit is a disaster  
Evidently the relentlessly negative anti Brexit drumbeat isn’t going down a storm with the punters......  
Most UK media (and politicians) still think Brexit is a negotiation. It’s not. It’s a process. And longer UK tells itself it’s in a negotiation (play chicken, etc) worse this will get  
Europe's leaders united over a tough "Brexit" message - and it took them just a minute  
4 HOURS IN A YEAR!!!!   are the Tories really trying for a deal...or are they going for a hard Brexit & then blame the EU????David Davis has spent just 4 hours in talks with Michel Barnier this year  via @financialtimes 
EXCLUSIVE: Brexit 'bad boy' Richard Tice puts himself forward to be Tory candidate for London mayor  
David Davis, Britain’s chief Brexit negotiator, has held only four hours of talks with his Brussels opposite number Barnier this year — The lack of political engagement was cited by EU leaders on Friday as they rebuked the UK for slow progress on Brexit.   
Images have power, but so do you. Help us represent beauty as it really is — unretouched. Show your support. Share your  selfie. 
.@icbabc seeks court injunction to halt unfair prop rep referendum process. News release & BC Supreme Court filing at 
A businessman discusses Brexit for his business...worth a read...  
This is absolutely not a #Brexit dividend. It's simply business as usual --- with UK in THE EU. 
Here is a little article I did for @pmpmagtoday about the #remainernow campaign.I look forward to working with them over the coming weeks and months to help get more #bregretter stories out there.  #brexit #peoplesvote #finalsay #itsoktochangeyourmind 
Brexit: Theresa May has been unable to say much new at this summit - the last one before October - because she has yet to get her cabinet to agree on a blueprint for the UK's future relationship with the EU: It would be funny if it wasn’t so tragic...  
#Brexit ruins small talk >>  
Number One is GIN STOP BREXIT NOW...this minute...are you crazy?   
As I was walking to #PeoplesVoteMarch meet-up last Sat, a woman came over to ask if I’m Tanja. She knew me from Twitter she said, tears beginning to appear in her eyes. I gave her a hug. She was physically shaking. Contrast that impact of Brexit on just one person with this   
In a years time when Brexit is dead where will all these people who sold their soul to it for a bit of publicity be?I almost feel sorr... no I don’t, it’s your bed lie in it. Enjoy the harvest that you have sowed. 
UK is having a water shortage because of Brexit. Imagine what will happen when they leave. The deserts of Yorkshire and Lancashire are already creating a refugee crisis. Those in the south cannot shower. I bet you want to use your freedom of movement now! 
In Limbo Too: Brexit testimonies from UK citizens in the EU: Volume 2 I have just ordered it. My French maman wants to read it because she feels bad for the British couple in our petit village. #inlimbo  
Bookmark this tweet for the next time Brexit being a fuck up is blamed on Remain voters not getting behind Brexit. Four fucking hours, our chief negotiator has spent negotiating. FFS.  
Our exports to major non-EU countries are growing at a faster rate than are our exports to the EU - And in the latter case we are paying the EU billions for the privilege of membership of a declining market. #Brexit cannot come soon enough.  
Trump appears to have offered Macron a special trade deal if he took France out of the EU. It might make him popular. After all Macron did tell Andrew Marr that if the French were given a referendum most would vote to leave the EU. 
Turns out you get a very different answer on the costs of Brexit if you ask someone who actually runs a business, rather than people who've sat behind desks in Whitehall their entire careers. Who'd have thunk it?  
On @LBC talking to @toryboypierce about #EUCO and Brexit at about 19:30 BST. Should be fun! 
I think odds for Brexit no-deal are rising. 60/40. July is looking like reckoning time 
Don't worry, everyone... I know we have 3 months to finish the Brexit negotiations, but a "Full English Brexit" is one of those dishes you can just have even if it's not fully cooked yet... you know... like cake or chicken. 
Quite so, Mr Dyer. Brexit is just like a mad riddle... and our mad government are still no closer to solving it. 
Brexit: From gin to cheese, the food and drink staples at risk of shortages - The Independent  
Maybe... The 'Full English Brexit' might not be ready by March...  
Barnier wants May to "reverse" Brexit. Proof that the EU has NO regard for democracy. 17.4 million Britons vote for  Brexit. The EU and Barnier are arrogant Nazi's that make Hitler look like a saint! 
Busy week in Brussels fighting for Ireland on #Brexit.  
Both sides in the Brexit talks are set for a four-month dash to a deadline nobody believes in  
"Apparently you spent ten hours talking about migration and five minutes about Brexit. Is that a good sign or a bad sign?".@mattfrei asks Angela Merkel about Brexit and Sergey Lavrov's claim that "Britain influences European politics on Russia in a very special way".  
Cambridge Analytica manipulated elections in 32 countries, along the way helping Trump take the presidency and helping Brexit pass in the U.K.FOR PROFIT.Brexit was a financial heist by hedge fund managers who used inside information to make money: 
Share this video - This #Brexit-supporting economist is spot on in saying that the EU is DOOMED in its "effort to abolish the nation state" and in predicting the bloc will not have "a particularly prosperous and calm future either". 
Speak for England, Danny Dyer. You’ve blown the lid on Brexit | Marina Hyde  
Theresa May has failed as PM. She has no Brexit plan, has achieved nothing in Brexit talks & is trying to force soft Brexit on the UK which violates our Brexit vote. May has let the EU walk all over her & disgraced the office of PM. We need a new PM!              #fo2eu 
Hey @UKLabour I cancelled my membership today because of your stance on Brexit. Thanks @jeremycorbyn for finally clarifying.I urge others to do the same, we cannot let Brexit happen #FBPE Labour will be on the wrong side of history. 
Spanish nationalists thinks they can lie as easily as they do in Spain. Here in Catalonia there’s a complexe situation, a accepted referendum would be the best solution, but is bloqued by spanish government. 
Iranians are trending #با_پهلوی_تا_رفراندوم to say they stand with @PahlaviReza, the exiled Crown Prince and the son of the former Shah of Iran, to overthrow the regime of Mullahs and hold a referendum on the form of the next government of Iran.  
Why are the newspapers & politicians going on about Brexit & completely ignoring the real problem?ɢᴏʙʟɪɴs x 
FT Exclusive: The UK's chief Brexit negotiator has held just four hours of talks with the EU's chief negotiator this year  
A list of the types of criminal offence with which people involved in the #TrumpRussia investigation have so far been charged.There's strong evidence that many of the same types of offence were committed by people involved in the #Brexit campaign.Where's our Mueller?  
They are not being built in Britain, they are to be built by ASC Shipbuilding at Osborne Shipyard in Adelaide, Australia.  The #Brexit dividends seem to benefit everyone but the United Kingdom 
Why is it that every time I read a tweet by @LowTaxChloe I want to swear? 16M people="A bunch of middle class Londoners"? Stop fomenting hatred towards Remainers, who BTW have also worked hard all their lives, paid their taxes&now see the future of their children ruined by Brexit  
Instead of pointless Land Hearings that Parliament could have just called for a Referendum on Land Expropriation without compensation and the people would make their wishes known and the results would be binding on the State. 
Those of us opposed to Brexit do blame the Conservatives and we are exasperated at Corbyn’s inertia. He is leader of the opposition. We need him to ‘lead’ and ‘oppose’. He cannot be a casual bystander - and Milne’s comment is sinister and revealing. 
.@Telegraph cartoon#eusummit #co2Shortage #TheresaMay #Brexit  
 Former government officials have two days to pay €2.13m to compensate for the estimated cost of the independence referendum . 
Who better to state how people feel about #BREXIT than @MrDDyer. Spot on Mr Dyer. #DavidCameronIsATwat 
The moment when it dawns on myopic Leavers that Danny Dyer changing his mind on Brexit after voting for it shows what a disaster it is... and the will of the people has now changed#Brexitshambles 
We’re a whisker away from claims that the sun coming up tomorrow is proof that ‘Brexit Britain’ is booming. 
Put your cards on the table, EU makes last Brexit call to Britain  
Brexit, I would respectfully remind you, was conceived as Tory, carried as Tory and birthed as Tory, so stop trying to pass the buck. You are so blocked. FBPE twat.  
Danny Dyer cuts through Brexit bluster with TV tirade  
Leo Varadkar rejects 'goods only' Brexit deal  
The most sensible solution so far PM !!..Listen carefully....Then go back and tell the idiots in your cabinet that is what you are going to do !!..OR ARE YOU REALLY SO WEAK YOU CANNOT DO THE SENSIBLE THING AND STOP BREXIT !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
#Brexit, by ⁦@IanDunt⁩: “We continue to speed toward the cliff edge, like drug-addled lemmings who learned to use a car.” To be fair, Theresa May’s ever-escalating level of incompetence gives us Remainers reason to hope that #Brexit will never happen  
NEW: Right-wing British politician Nigel Farage and Brexit campaign funder Aaron Banks were in close communication with a Russian ambassador and members of Trump's campaign in the months leading up to Brexit and the 2016 election.  
Sadly you don't have to do anything in America to get jailed. But any US state can choose to put any sort of referendum on the ballot (states write the rules for that). The results may or may not be accepted by the federal government, but they are most certainly NOT illegal. 
Iranians announce their support for HIM #RezaPahlavi to have a free and fair election, a referendum to choose their governmental system after overthrowing mullahs terrorist regime #با_پهلوی_تا_رفراندوم 
As #IranProtests continues we hear more and more slogans about Pahlavis. Our unity is the most important factor in toppling the regime of Ayatollahs. I support and stand with @PahlaviReza until we achieve a fair and free referendum. #با_پهلوی_تا_رفراندوم 
What bits don't you understand of 1) Corbyn cannot stop brexit 2) may has damaged the whole UK in so many other ways she needs to go...try supporting him 
When the Tories are busy saying "F*ck business" and Labour are busy sacrificing the working classes on the altar of Brexit, you know British politics has gone 100% tits up! 
And, by the way, the referendum in Catalonia was NOT illegal. Not even in Spain. And it is sad that an educated person like you is falling for that, José. Very sad. 
His point is that people who've been here for years, people who have kids, relationships, jobs here were denied a vote and have since the vote been denied any certainty about their future and are told to be grateful when they have been 'dehumanised' by Brexit.  That's his point. 
Exclusive: Sergey Lavrov, Foreign Minister of Russia, speaks to @CathyNewman about the Skripals, the OPCW, Brexit, Trump 'kompromat' claims and says US Democrats are “losers who don’t have guts to accept that they lost”.Watch the extended interview: 
No, it's a perfect illustration of a desperate Government claiming something supports Brexit when it doesn't.  The UK being in the EU didn't stop BAe winning the contract and none of these ships will be built in the UK #BrexitShambles 
Because changing nothing can change everything. Look for our Beauty Mark on photos of models that have not been thinned, smoothed or digitally altered.    
Why EU Brexit warnings mean little to Theresa May  
Walk away Only way .....    EU leaders demand deal on GIBRALTAR as they give UK NEW Brexit hurdle  
RATINGS: More than 3 million people watched one-off #GoodEveningBritain - with 5 million+ at its peak. It's got everybody talking honestly about Brexit - thanks to Danny Dyer. And I didn't have to apologise for language post-watershed #Result 
So Donald Tusk says it’s last call for a BREXIT deal That’s interesting! If he carries on in that vein he’ll get a NO DEAL scenario and that could be catastrophic for both parties! Tone the rhetoric down! It’s unhelpful. M Barnier has brought nothing to the party to date! 
Brexit effect is working with 43 % decline in economic migrants coming to Brtain. Another Brexit dividend 
What is Labour's position on Brexit?  
Swiss Govt Considers Making Forced Veiling a Crime as Referendum on Burqa, Niqab Ban Looms   
2014: “Banks will leave Scotland if it votes Yes!”2018: “Banks will move to Scotland if Brexit proceeds!”  
Let's get down to business. I don't give a tuppenny which party you support. If you oppose the insanity of brexit, we are friends. If you support it,  You are a threat to my country and my children's future. Clear? #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Quitters rejoice as shipbuilding jobs move to Adelaide, South Australia instead of Scotstoun, Scotland.  Whoop whoop for Global Britain after #Brexit.   
A law approved in a parliament is never illegal, by definition. The referendum was legal upon the catalan laws, and wasn't declared illegal by Spain until 3 weeks later 
I'm saying the austerity was down to the Tories, not the EU. In fact without the extensive EU subsidies it would have been much worse. And if we Brexit it will be MUCH worse as the EU support will be gone. Simples. 
Perspective: Airbus: 117,400 Jobs £7,800M which might be lost because of Brexit.JCB: 200 Jobs (0.17%) and £50M (0.64%) Investment.It’s a kind of parable for Brexit isn't it? The losses far outweigh the gains. 
Anthony's essay is long but well worth the read. It explains how the UK benefits from being in a regulatory union. Post-Brexit it can either stay in as much as possible, and suffer moderate economic damage, or leave altogether and face dire economic consequences.  
If people spent as long scrutinising Brexit as they have Danny Dyer, we might know what’s actually going on | @tompeck 
Great initiative by colleagues at @mylifemysay calling on MPs to pledge to engage in discussions with young people on Brexit. Young people are often ignored with their voices not heard but their futures are at stake with Brexit! #ListenUp 
The majority of British businesses do not see Brexit as a major cause for concern, according to the latest Bank of England report  
I think #FBPE or whatever group is now in control of overall tactics & strategy @ remain or 2nd ref, need to have an urgent rethink on what people they allow to speak up against #Brexit .This gang of alleged war criminals seriously put me off. They seriously tarnish remain.  
Only 37 percent of firms think Brexit is cause for  concern says Bank of England. So why all the handwringing from EU funded  CBI 
Worth remembering that internationalist #Edinburgh North and #Leith voted 78% to #Remain in 2016 - overwhelmingly against Jeremy Corbyn’s hard #Brexit position. @theSNP, @DeidreBrock and I are standing up for Scotland’s place in Europe - Labour aren’t. 
Danny Dyer actually deserves a knighthood. Unbelievable opinion on brexit, 10/10 acting abilities and father to the entire nation's sweetheart who he named after himself to say the least. top top geeza  
Reminder: Tory donor and leading Brexiter Lord Ashcroft used an offshore trust to shelter wealth. Ashcroft was a tax exile in Belize which is a favourite haunt of Arron Banks' sidekick Andy Wigmore.#BrexitTaxHaven. #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Ipsos Mori have released a new survey revealing that more than 67% of the country lack confidence in the government's ability to negotiate a good Brexit deal - the lowest since polling began. Join our call for a #PeoplesVote here:  Please share 
Amazing detailed timeline for those interested in Trump Russia Brexit  
David Davis cancels committee grilling - fuelling concern Brexit plan publication will be delayed 
Danny Dyer calling David Cameron a 't**t' was the most honest and coherent analysis of Brexit we’ve heard since the referendum | @ShappiKhorsandi  
#TheresaMay tries to blame #EU for "danger" to citizens caused by #Brexit. No-one with half a brain is buying it.  Time for more #DavidDavisSchooldays! 
Lots of good news about British business this week - more evidence that the Remain-supporting big business lobby is scaremongering about Brexit #GlobalBritain (links in thread ) 
Just to clarify JCBs amazing investment in Brexit Britain- most of their sales don’t depend on the EU and £50m is tiny for a company with £2.75bn sales. My company has sales of £48m and invests £2m a year. That’s equivalent to JCB investing £175m PER YEAR. £50m is just #Brexit PR 
EXCL Ministers warned there will be no sleeping at next week's Chequers Brexit summit - because there aren't enough beds for them all. No one leaves till there's an agreement, so it'll be an endurance test as much as anything. 
If the likes of Owen Smith & Chuka Umuna are so desperate for a second referendum, why don’t they resign from the Labour Party & actively campaign for it as Independents, along with other idiots, before time runs out? Labour’s position is clear.Brexit is happening. 
The cost of Brexit to the pockets of people in the U.K. is becoming more apparent everyday and it is ordinary men and women who will suffer the most.Let us not stand by idly – demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
Although I voted for #Brexit, I have always accepted there are tangible benefits to the EU Single Market. This is one of them. Over £4,000 of UK tobacco tax successfully avoided thanks to shopping on holiday in Majorca. #winning 
Donald Tusk tells Theresa May: “This is the last call to lay the cards on the table.” #brexit #euco 
Don’t vote Corbyn get Brexit. These people really are stupid, aren’t they? Brexit is happening. What do they not understand?  
So Brexit has managed give both the governments and peoples of Europe false reasons to distrust each other.And no. I'm not saying WW3. I'm just saying this is not the way to achieve stability on a continent. 
Facism alive & well & rising under the guise of ‘free speech’ & ‘democracy.’ Here my theory that UKIP goes further to the alt-right rather than debanding due to #Brexit.  
So have I got this straight? JC's plan for Brexit is exactly the same as TM's - except whereas hers is never ending disaster, his will be great. Because... erm ... you know ... socialism... 
So he voted for Brexit without knowing what is was - dullard.Danny Dyer's rant about Brexit and David Cameron in full  
Washing your hair the entire run up to the referendum too by the sounds of every tweet you ever compose 
Thanks to the Brexit fall in the value of the pound, a summer holiday in Spain this year is £137 per person more expensive. This is why so many people are calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
This is a great initiative from our friends over @mylifemysay in trying to make sure that young people's voices are heard in the Brexit debate:  
It's now just over two years since I decided to vote Remain after assuming I'd end up going Leave for most of the run-up to the EU Referendum. So far, I think I was basically right on all counts.  
Funder of the Brexit campaign Aaron Banks and far-right British politician Nigel Farage maintained regular contact with a Russian ambassador and Team Trump during both campaigns. Banks gave intel to the Russian who offered business opportunities in return.  
WATCH: Our latest edition of '2 Weeks in 2 Minutes', where @JamesMcGrory thanks all those who went on the #PeoplesVoteMarch, highlights the Brexit risks that big businesses like BMW are issuing & the latest endorsements for the campaign. Please RT:  
In less than a minute, the EU27 reaffirm their Brexit position & tell UK that it must give up its red lines on single market, freedom of movement, customs union & ECJ to get a deal. Balls in your court Treeza.@Bremaininspain 
Reminder: The execrable Priti Patel calls for May to slash public spending and regulations after #Brexit. They didn't tell us that on the side of a bus! #PeoplesVote #Brexit #StopBrexit 
IDS: The EU "have acted so far like a strutting school bully. As with all bullies, they are hiding a weakness – they are terrified that Brexit is going to be a huge success for us.”  
Swedish MEP Peter Lundgren - "As in any club, it is possible to leave if you don’t like it anymore. The Brits have now become the beacon of light for us critics of Brussels." #Brexit #Swexit 
What fucking mad Brexit Little England shite have I woke up to!?!?Seriously, it's a psychotic brexit breakdown lotto for the terminally rose tinted stupid pic.twitter.com/WnQUtlcs1n 
Theresa’s bluff has been called, what happens in the next few months is inevitable and will not be pretty.Only options left are No deal and No Brexit. Pick your side and be prepared to fight for it.  
It looks like we're even starting to see some good sense from the House of Lords, with former Brexit minister Lord Bridges calling for proper No Deal preparation. Time for May to wake up and get ready!Read at Support us at  
As always on #Brexit Dyson is right.   He didn’t become one of our most successful businessmen by being a tepid, limp wristed defeatist like #TeresaMay 
Michel Barnier: “On Brexit we have made progress, but huge and serious divergence remains, particularly on Ireland and Northern Ireland."  
The Government looks disorganised and chaotic while Ministers can't even agree what they want from the next stages of the Brexit negotiation. May only has herself to blame for her trouble in Brussels.  
To all the Brexit supporters saying "aah ... but Danny Dyer voted leave"  that's the whole point ... he voted leave and has now realised that he's been mugged off ... you were all mugged off ... Brexit is going to damage everyone apart from the billionaires and bankers. 
Can Brexit just die now? I miss tweeting about cats, cute things and making terrible jokes. There's no point making terrible jokes any more, not when the current Tories are in power, they have the market sewn up. 
£350mil; I foolishly believed that we sent out this money to EU; so why not use it at home. Also never considered the impact on business and economy.. TBH it was a momentous decision. Now that the true impact of brexit is becoming apparent, it is clear that we voted for suicide. 
Spot on Alena. The real aim of #Brexit is to finish what Thatcher started. We can't let that happen. Join @Remain_Labour and the vast majority of #Labour members calling for a change in party policy and a #PeoplesVote 
BRIDGES: Make No Deal Brexit realistic alternative, take complete control of borders. “If you cannot walk away, the EU will always have the advantage.”That’s a Remainer saying it - time for the government to deliver!   
Good . Glad we’ve got that clear . Corbyn Labour is following conservative ERG desire for hard brexit. So no more tweets about austerity because brexit is austerity on steroids - and Corbyn Labour are running to it willingly.#Brexit  
The more you realise how much Russia benefits from Trump's presidency and #Brexit the more certain you become of its involvement in making both happen. #RussiaCollusion #Impeach #Remain #NATOSummit #PutinsPuppet 
 We’re proud to launch our “Listen Up!” campaign with @UKYouth calling on politicians to pledge to speak to 20 of their young constituents before voting on the final Brexit deal  Read our exclusive with @BuzzFeedNews  
Peanuts/Danny Dyer Brexit rant remix...#dannydyer 
The moment that it dawns on Iain Dale that the whole point of Dyer's rant was what a huge mess Brexit is.  
The EU economy won't lose out much because of Brexit. We'll still want to buy German cars. And if we want Japanese or American cars instead, they'll also be assembled in the EU post Brexit. As for our food, perishables will still need to be imported from Europe, coz it's closer. 
The moment when it dawns on Iain Dale that he’s just made an argument for a second referendum  
The sheer and immoral irresponsibility of Brexit propaganda laid bare right here.... Yet another divisive Daily Mail piece, prompted by Brexit hemlock himself. Where does this end Jacob?  
I find it stunning Brexiteers are STILL attacking EU for acting with transparency and consistency for 2 years.  Meantime, our lot are getting ready for their summer break.  These Tories need jailing over Brexit. 
French President @EmmanuelMacron on #Brexit: Message is simple: we cannot wait anymore. Irish border question must be solved and withdrawal agreement needs to be finalised by the autumn. #EUCO 
I didn't vote for any of those now in Govt cos they bribed the DUP & who've abused their power in imposing a deeply flawed non-Binding #Brexit process backed by only 51.8% of those voting, 37% of voters & 26.5% of the Ppl removing rights w/o allowing a #FinalSay. You tell me? 
WATCH: a £40bn Brexit divorce bill. No Brexit dividend. Brexit as it was promised cannot be delivered. This is exactly why we need a #PeoplesVote says @ChukaUmunna. Please RT: 
It looks like the Brexit witch hunt has gone transatlantic with this huge feature on the Bad Boys of Brexit in today's edition of the famous @washingtonpost!Support us at  
As in America, so in Britain. Simon Wren-Lewis notes that business is getting more vocal about Brexit's costs because "They have lost all faith that the government knows what it is doing,"  
Catalan Parliament voted to hold a referendum, following people’s MANDATE—and now Spanish judge wants to economically crucify Catalan elected leaders because of it. Horrific. Democracy is dead in Spain. Politicians jailed, fined for doing will of people.  
The moment when it dawns on Brexiters that Danny Dyer voted Brexit and then came to his senses and now supports Remain.  
“There are people who are going to lose their jobs - businesses are going to fold” : @labourlewis calls out Tory Brexit incompetence and their  millionaire ideologues on #bbcqt 
I would say by far the biggest threat to women is the unfettered immigration of people who have absolutely zero respect for women and our laws and cultures, which as we were constantly told before the referendum we had absolutely no control over while in the EU 
Confidence in May to get a good deal for Britain on Brexit is falling -  though Brits would blame both sides if no deal was reached @IpsosMORI  
Would it be fair to say you’re out of touch with Leave voters like Danny Dyer?  Stuck in a Brexit elite bubble perhaps? 
So Swansea Bay Tidal Lagoon has disappeared 'neath the quicksands. Will this bring an end to the Panglossian assertions that Brexit means regional rebalancing? 
All the bile I'm getting in response to collective responsible concerns of loss of rights after Brexit - reminded me of this @SirPatStew sketch: What has the ECHR ever done for us?  via @YouTube 
We have not won a contract like this in over a decade. Time to embrace trade with the Commonwealth countries which the EU has for so long prevented us from doing. #Jobs #opportunity #Brexit  
Might as well rename Football Manager 'Work Permit Application Rejected' after Brexit. Nightmare 
Donald Tusk on #Brexit - There is a great deal of work ahead & the most difficult tasks are still unresolved. If you want to reach a deal in October we need quick progress... this is the last call to lay your cards on the table.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Putin is loving this. And Trump, and Brexit, and far-right racist/xenophobic parties across Europe. The ‘West’ doesn’t work without the US & Britain committed to the rules-based order.  
"We need quick progress" on #Brexit @eucopresident says  #eusummit 
The moment when it dawns on Remainers that Danny Dyer actually voted Brexit...  
Brexit threatens the competitiveness of the UK car industry which contributes over £200 billion to our economy. Waiting times at borders will cost more than £1 million an hour & delays in the production line will put more than 800,000 British jobs at risk  
Donald Tusk's 2-sentence warning to Theresa May on Brexit: "The EU27 has taken note of what has been achieved however there is a great deal of work ahead and the most difficult issues still need to be resolved. "This is the last call to lay the cards on the table." 
On Brexit Tusk says ‘the most difficult things are still unresolved - this is the last call to put cards on the table’ 
‘Danny Dyer’s Brexit Rant’ definitely sounds like one of Jez’s Peep Show band names 
How the ‘Bad Boys of Brexit’ forged ties with Russia and the Trump campaign — and came under investigators’ scrutiny @washingtonpost 
This is so moving. Farmer in his 70s travelled the 166 miles to London for the very first time so he could march for a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal.  
Will never top the first two pars of this story:Downing Street has rejected claims by Danny Dyer that Brexit is a "mad riddle so no one knows what it is".However, a spokesman for Theresa May did defend the actor's right to call David Cameron a "t**t" 
Give us 'workable' Brexit proposals, EU tells British PM May  
This from the Vice President of @CBItweets today is worth taking note of - practical impact on jobs and business of this #Brexit chaos  
EU-UK divide poses serious threat to Brexit talks, says BarnierTime for May to issue a time limited, 'take it or leave it' offer. It's the only way to get the individual EU countries to wake up and smell the job losses. 
More important quality journalism from the ⁦@washingtonpost⁩ on the Kremlin, Trump, Brexit nexus.   
Summary:1. Our People’s Vote March got 100,000 people on the streets to protest against Brexit.2. Next time it'll be a million.3. And yet Leavers claim that "Remainers are now so desperate, they're just making these figures up"!4. Talk about Hate Speech!5. That's all, folks!  
"Far from losing votes, it is much more likely that a change in Labour policy on Brexit, such as supporting a people’s vote on the final deal, would lead to a surge of support." - from our own Mary Kaldor.  
#liveline George Lee, and Tony Connolly get nearly 20 minutes to waffle about the weather, and Brexit, while the #DisclosuresTribunal merits less than 2 minutes on the lunchtime " News" and they wonder why they have trouble collecting the licence fee.? #rtebias 
1) This blog by @FraserNelson contains the argument that @David_Cameron should have got civil servants to prepare for Brexit - and because he didn’t, we are now paying a price. It’s a massive red herring and here’s why...  
Well Scotland didn't vote for Brexit. And he's  correct, Cameron is a twat.  
Corbynistas pose as radical yet they are terrified of the one truly radical thing that has happened in British politics in recent decades — ordinary people’s revolt against the EU and our demand for Brexit.@Tom_Slater_ on Corbynistas’ Brexit blind spot  
I would like to see .@libdems adopt  different tactics in opposition to Brexit, Corbyn and ToriesTime for unconventional, less playing safe. We need to protest loudly and be seen to be doing so .A start would be members tweets being shared widely#FaintHeartNeverWonFairLady 
Bye bye Boris? Foreign Sec ‘poised to walk out’ over May’s Brexit compromise  
‘It’s like this mad riddle’ - a frustrated Danny Dyer lets rip to @piersmorgan and @susannareid100 about #Brexit   #GEB 
The whole internet hates Milkshake Duck, the vile racist duck who does awful things! *5 seconds later* Actually the duck has OK opinions on Brexit 
'It's embarrassing - this government has brought shame on this country' - Labour MP @ChukaUmunna is frustrated by the lack of clarity on the government's #Brexit stanceMore on this here:  
The working class has had its jobs, wages and quality of life decimated by Tony Blair's reckless maximum-immigration policy, coupled with EU Freedom of Movement - which Labour are hell bent on stoking. Brexit will restore the dignity and lifestyle of "Working Class Britain".  
Some of the pushback to Danny Dyer on Brexit is undoubtably linked to class and language. But I think there’s also an element of a professional media class uncomfortable with challenging responses which have real feeling, which are not dispassionate and cynical. 
Something that is given very little thought: the combination of 20% Trump tariffs and a Brexit no deal is a House of Horrors for the German car industry already reeling from diesel scandal and threat of EVs. 
David Cameron refuses to rise to the bait after Danny Dyer calls him a 't***' who 'scuttled off' after Brexit live on TV @GMB 
We had a leadership election to decide what vision of the party we wanted.You offered a ‘stay in the EU’ platform - not ruling out Schengen and the Euro.Corbyn wanted to respect the referendum result but aimed to get the best Brexit deal.You lost by an overwhelming margin.  
Friday poll: which of the DD's is talking the most sense on #Brexit @MrDDyer or @DavidDavisMP? 
Have you experienced #britsplaining in past few months regarding Ireland and #brexit?? Check this out below. Sound familiar?  Typically the most crucial qualification for a #britsplainer when explaining Ireland to Irish people is never having been to Ireland in the first place!  
Millions of immigrants had no say in Brexit, despite it affecting them the most, so it appears not. You are not a person but a 'migrant'. We've 'got our country back' you should be 'grateful'.Your services as foreign liar are not needed. That's #brexit for you. #PeoplesVote 
Same here Bri. At the last election I almost voted Labour, but I just couldn't bring myself to vote for myself with that brexit supporting buffoon in charge. So the Tories got my vote. Yuck! 
Danny Dyer announces his broader political manifesto:David Cameron – twatTrump – fackin nutterBrexit – proper naughtyUniversal Credit – leave it outTories – shut it, you mugsAusterity – Do you want to make something of it?NHS – pucker pic.twitter.com/nNh2ZgswIR 
20million metric tons of freight are transported through the Channel Tunnel each year - the EU is working on an emergency plan in case the UK ends up with a “hard #Brexit” - but what is the UK doing? 
If only all TV/radio journalists were as clued-up and forensic on Brexit as @faisalislam. *cough* BBC, ITV etc. *cough* 
All this blaming JC for Brexit isn't helping the Libdems...Only giving the Tories an easy ride...Vote Lib Dem get Tory...  
#Ireland to get two extra seats in @Europarl_EN following #Brexit according to new #EUCO decision. This will bring Ireland's number of MEPs to 13. Read more:  
Arch Brexiter and Sun's former political editor, Trevor Cavanagh, says on Daily Politics that referendum on Irish unity would have to have a 60% super majority. 52% was fine for him in EU vote, but not for the Irish. The smell of slippery eel is strong. 
.@theresa_may You are only focused on #Brexit you could care less about Nazanin's health or her case. It's 2.5 years & you have called 3 times to raise concerns. Send a team to Iran to secure the release of your citizens. #FreeNazanin. @BorisJohnson .@AlistairBurtUK 
A senior #HMRC official from Customs division told me he feels like kicking the tv when he hears laughable remarks about long truck queues at Dover after #Brexit.@GuidoFawkes @EuroGuido 
Brexit is a coup & it has been launched at the only time in history when it was possible, 10 yrs of banker recession, 7 yrs of Tory austerity = pain converted into anger against anyone the coup pointed at = EU/immigrants.  Brexit will not solve any problems but will create many 
IDS: “If the EU won’t talk trade, we must leave the table. They have acted so far like a strutting school bully. As with all bullies, they are hiding a weakness – they are terrified that #Brexit is going to be a huge success for us.”  
Imagine working hard your whole life, paying taxes, then having your right to live and work in the UK being part of a bargaining chip, all decided on the basis of an advisory referendum, based on lies on the side of a bus, funded illegally by Russians  
An idiot who admits he knows nothing about Brexit getting angry about Brexit. Thanks for that stunningly insightful contribution.  
True! In a meeting I had with #HMRC they said:~ 94% of goods cleared in 5 secs> 96% of the rest cleared < 2 hrs~ 3% of imports (from outside the EU) are subject to documentary checks prior to clearance~95% of documentary checks cleared within 2-3 hrs#HMRC ready for #Brexit  
The Brexit politicians are celebrating with a commemorative copy of the EU Withdrawal Bill - but today we hear there is no progress for the Irish border or Gibraltar. How can they treat the Good Friday Agreement with such flagrant disregard?  
Why Danny Dyer was right to call David Cameron a twat over Brexit #DannyDyer #Brexit 
Bizzare that the US Congress is only now apparently following up on the clear links btw Brexit & 2016 elxn. So much of the triangulating btw these two campaigns & the Kremlin took place in the open; the same individuals, money & strategies were deployed, again, openly. C’mon.  
It’s only “good” in that, whatever side of the Brexit argument you’re on, it’s the closest anyone has come in uniting the country since the referendum! 
I give you the only gif you will ever need in a #brexit argument.  
We Get A Lobotomy In A Bid To Understand Theresa May’s Brexit Strategy  
Things we’ve realised overnight:1 - Corbyn doesn’t understand the basics of EU membership or the benefits of EU membership2 - Corbyn wants a hard Brexit3 - Corbyn doesn’t believe in party democracy4 - Corbyn believes in the policy of cakeism5 - Corbyn is practically a Tory 
Good Evening Britain causes shockwaves after passionate Brexit speech by the leader of the opposition. (Also pictured: Jeremy Corbyn)  
There’s absolutely nothing that Jeremy Corbyn says here on Brexit that Theresa May wouldn’t say.  
I can’t abide Piers Morgan, but he’s not Labour Leader. With regard to Corbyn, just listening to him here makes me cringe. He is full of contradictions and downright lies on so many things. On Brexit, he talks nonsense time after time. Simply an inept man unfit to lead Labour.  
If even Queen Brexiter @JuliaHB1 thinks the British people should be able to make a choice on the Brexit deal, sure we MUST get a #PeoplesVote 
The House Intel Cmte recently received docs detailing British billionaire and Brexit backer Arron Banks’s interactions with Russia's Amb. to the UK.Members now question whether Brexit leaders served as a conduit between the Kremlin and Trump’s operation. 
Brexiters don't seem to understand that even after #Brexit the UK will have follow all #EU regulations in order to be compliant in goods and services. A much bigger loss of sovereignty because we no longer make the rules. Madness! 
Christian Adams on England’s defeat to Belgium and Michel Barnier warning “Huge and serious" differences remain between the UK and EU in Brexit talks - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Both sides want zero tariffs and when we leave we'll be the single biggest market for the EU, says Brexit Minister @SuellaBraverman 
The compelling Tory case for a second Brexit vote. We agree, time for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
A second Brexit vote is the Tories’ best hope of survival - and also, ironically, Labour’s  
These England fans spelling Colombia with a U are definitely the ones that voted for Brexit. #Columbia 
My life style could be better it's 's just blindingly obvious to anyone with a brain that leaving the EU will make things much,much worse for much, much longer.All of Corbyn's good intentions will come to nothing with Brexit. 
Little public support in Northern Ireland for a No Deal outcome on #Brexit - research by @UniKentPolitics @fecochrane1 @nloizide @laurasud @EdMorganJones - just discussed live on @SkyNews with @adamboultonSKY  
As I said when the new PM of Spain @sanchezcastejon arrived - might be Gibraltar Brexit Impact ... now mentioned in first para of EU27 Council statement that territorial application of withdrawal agreement, incl transition “notably as regards Gibraltar” still need to be agreed:  
Just in case you think the threatening of journalists is just a Trump thing. No, it's a favourite of our Brexit Trumpsters - Banks, Wigmore and Kassam. On threats to journalists: "About time they got it back"  
People responding negatively to our letter re loss of Women's rights post Brexit know more than the  top women signatories? Inc -  Jessica Simor QC, Caroline Criado Perez Feminist Activist, Cherie Blair QC, Helena Kennedy QC, Schona Jolly QC, Susie Courtault Rights Campaigner  
No deal by the look of it... so what was the point of David Davis’s Brexit dept and can we please have a refund for services not rendered? 
Can we clear up something?David Cameron isn’t a twat, he’s a reckless chancer who has fucked us all over infighting in his own Party.Danny Dyer is a twat. An actor who has made a living out of playing hard men.But Brexit was a democratic vote. #Awkward 
Well, the potential is there, but it will only happen if we let it, and we’re not going to let it. Wilders is a nobody. Trump does not represent his great country. And Britain is better than Brexit. We all need to take a stand until the danger goes away. ¡No pasarán!  
Women from all political parties, campaigners, the business world, journalism, law, academia, the arts all agree – Brexit puts women’s rights at risk. Our letter in today’s Guardian:  
Shouldn't we be talking more about how all the major Brexit players fall under the scope of the Mueller enquiry and are associated with Russia and its asset, Donald Trump, or is everything too sad now 
'Something is stirring in Scotland... everything the UK Government has done since the EU referendum vote has proven what they think of us. The people of Scotland are watching. Let’s not do anything to discourage them.'@AlynSmith, via @ScotNational. 
Immigration at the EU summit gives this morning’s Le Figaro its front page lead plus three full pages of reportage and analysis plus a poll showing French anxiety about immigration. Reminds me of Britain before the referendum. 
Great letter in the FT: "Assuming we do business with the EU on terms no worse than the rest of the world, the cost will be around £3,700, or 0.04 per cent of our £10m turnover...a negligible figure, so Brexit on any terms will not change our business." 
The famous group of conspiracy theorists (who denied genocide in Bosnia) have now come up with another conspiracy theory --That the provable influence of Putin, cheating, dark money and data on the #Brexit vote is made up.  
Danny Dyer is a national treasure. His appearance on Who Do You Think You Are?, discovery that he is related to royalty and notion he should treat himself to "a ruff" took him close but I think the second "twat" in his Brexit rant against David Cameron sealed the deal. 
Brexit: Barnier warns 'huge' differences remain in talks  
Enjoyed Danny Dyer’s Cameron-Brexit rant? Here’s the ringtone (bleeped/unbleeped)  
Danny Dyer showed more opposition to Cameron and May's Brexit in this 36 second clip than Jeremy Corbyn's managed in two fucking years.  
If I’m not mistaken the Sun revealed two *years* ago that *the Sun* was insisting Britain be treated as a ‘third party’ after Brexit, by repeatedly calling for us to leave the European Union  
The reason we are not making progress in the Brexit talks is very simple.If you rule out FoM, SM, CU, ECJ and a hard border for Ireland there is not much progress you can make until you give up at least one of your red lines.The EU are waiting for us to tell them our decision 
6/ The basic analytical point is: when May caves to the EU on Brexit, Trumpism will launch itself properly in Britain. It will combine Infowars style fake news, DFLA-style violence + fronted by Milo, Watson + co. That will be the Tory ERG's "army" as they fight for no-deal Brexit 
From the Financial Times #brexit #EUnegotiations  
You know what I couldn't care less what Corbynistas say about #FBPE they can have their dodgy hard Brexit leader. I would rather be on the side of the people, those that want a better UK and real social equality and see Brexit for what is crap. #PeoplesVote 
Boris Johnson blames the Treasury. Nigel Farage blames Theresa May. David Davis blames something new every week.All these prominent Brexiteers think Brexit is going badly, so surely it's fair that the people have a final say?@Conorpope speaking on this week's review show 
1. It's never been a partnership2. It's always been an imperium with Scotland an exploited asset-rich colony3. Now May's declared vision is a post #brexit Greater English Reich within which Scotland, stripped of its identity will be wholly subsumed#DissolveTheUnion #SNP 
So Corbyn is finally unequivocal: No CU, No SM, No #PeoplesVote. He has decided to chase Hard Brexit and the Kipper vote and ignore - as May has done - the 16 m+ Remain voters. pic.twitter.com/tQvWHHxjN8 
Like a frenzied supremacist lynch mob the Scottish press goes after a female MSP while totally ignoring a huge story about #RichardCook #Tory who appears with #DUP #VoteLeave to have broken several laws & undermined democracy #BrexitVia @spotlightni ‘Scotland, Dark Money, DUP’ 
Today’s ⁦@EveningStandard⁩: ex-Brexit Minister George Bridges pens open letter to Cabinet, warns Brexit negotiations could become a ‘rout’ and says that if they can’t agree ‘the game will be up’ + @IpsosMORI⁩ poll: only 30pc think May will get good deal + Murray latest 
The revenue is for intellectual property (designs); the jobs are in Australia; the only beneficiaries are BAE shareholders; there's no "#Brexit bonus" element; it'd have happened if we didn't leave the EU.#Lies #Lies #Lies@acgrayling @abcpoppins @JolyonMaugham @BrexitBin 
Brexit Minister @SuellaBraverman says @labourlewis  admitted on Facebook that he wanted to stop Brexit with another referendum  
After a long successful night on #MigrationEU,  #EUCO Day 2 with EU27 on #Brexit and Inclusive Eurozone Summit on #EMU reform. ⁦⁦A common thread: solidarity and responsibility. 
No idea why this guy claims to lead a European Research Group. No research group worth its salt would give him the basis for such a mendacious and propagandistic view of the EU. But, hey, #Brexit is all about lying, isn't it? This guy is a poor ad for an Eton education.  
Business has nothing to fear from Brexit in spite of the lobbying by vested interests.  
Everyone is praising Dyer for saying twat a lot, which was indeed very funny. There is nowhere near enough praise for his definition of Brexit: "This mad wiggle." 
'Where is the geezer?' Danny Dyer rages at David Cameron over Brexit  
Someone tell this troll that: 1. “The people of Ireland” didn’t have a vote on Brexit and 2. The people of the UK did and we’re leaving!   
If Brexit happens the tragic thing is:When the UK starts copying the details of EU laws, to help with EU-UK trade, nobody will notice.We didn't pay attention to what the EU was doing for us before, you think Brexit will help that?Nobody will realise we pissed away our control. 
"Theresa May arrived at the EU summit today saying she wanted to ‘speed up’ the #Brexit talks and was ‘disappointed’ at progress – yet it is the UK government, not the EU-27, that has left us stuck in the slow lane" 
Sorry everyone, can we just agree that the only people who are allowed to talk about Brexit are those who don’t know what #loveisland is, don’t know who Danny Dyer is, speak the Queen’s English and write impenetrable columns about customs options? Thanks. 
’Theresa May tells EU leaders: you are putting lives at risk over Brexit’‘People’s vote campaigners tell Theresa May: you are putting lives at risk over Brexit’ 
So. Lord Ashcroft is advising UK  companies to move to Malta. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg's firm has set up offices in Dublin. @johnredwood advised clients to not look at the UK to invest. I have to ask Leavers ... has the penny dropped yet that you've been properly stiched up? #Brexit 
Bernard Jenkin MP: “The Prime Minister has been perfectly clear.We are Leaving the Customs Union.We are Leaving the Single Market.We are NOT going to be in the EEA.The United Kingdom & that includes Northern Ireland, is leaving the EU"#WTO #Brexit #EU 
Yet another casualty of Brexit - women’s rights! Here’s our letter in the @guardian  - @NinaParker @JMPSimor @schooltruth @thatginamiller @CCriadoPerez @Bonn1eGreer 
What do the 'bad boys' of Brexit have to do with Russia and Trump?  
Following yesterday's @Nigel_Farage hair dye scandal, it seems he isn't the only Bad Boy of Brexit who has been inspired by Trump's forthcoming UK visit Support us at  
.@MrDDyer has won the hearts of the nation as he stole the show on #GoodEveningBritain with some straight talking on Brexit and some strong words for David Cameron  
Well done to the Liverpool School of Tropical Medicine for offering to pay its 52 EU27 staff their settlement fees caused by #Brexit - a supportive gesture, but which should be totally unnecessary for people who have made their lives here... @The3Million 
Call Barnier’s Bluff & pull out of negotiations: No Deal!What would Barnier do then? He would be out of a job!You can’t have a chief negotiator if there are no negotiations!What EU fears most: a ­European Singapore moored 20miles off Calais!#Brexit #EU 
“Brexit? No one knows what it’s about where is that TWAT David Cameron?? He’s in Nice with his trotters up.... TWAT!!!!” Danny Dyer savages Cameron  pic.twitter.com/qhuCtzzTzW 
We’re flooded with unaltered selfies  But we  WANT  MORE Love your look?  Reply with a selfie Support women?  Reply with a selfie Feeling ?  Reply with a selfie. Use  and look for yourself on our live Times Square billboard! 
Migration: 10 hours. #Brexit: 5 minutes #EUCO 
It is said May is set to “persuade” her cabinet colleagues to compromise with the EU to avoid a “hard Brexit”. Since a “hard Brexit” is Remainer code for the delivery of what we voted for - her compromise means betrayal. Remember this next week. 
I see Barclays Bank are looking to relocate to Scotland if there's a hard Brexit and we can gain Indy within the EUThere are huge incentives for us to campaign on 
May is kicking up a fuss about security, blaming EU intransigence for the lack of progress in Brexit talks. The real story? We're not making progress because the government can't decide what it wants.  
Friends! Astute!Literally no-one knows what Brexit is!Except, of course, Our Experts, who shrewdly predicted an economic meltdown in the immediate aftermath of a vote to Leave!And yet voters disobeyed Our Experts' clear orders, and voted Leave anyway!Talk about ignorant!  
The Brexit rant by @MrDDyer goes remarkably well with this classic page from Batman: Year One 
Almost 9 hours to approve #MigrationEU conclusions, not even 1 minute to approve #Brexit conclusions. #EU can still work together -JM #EUCO 
I welcome it too and am a good friend of Australia but this has nothing to do with Brexit. France also does similar defence related business with Australia and has no intention of leaving EU thankfully.  
When will Labour Remainers get it? Corbyn is a hard line Brexiter. His idea of Brexit would be around 3/4 as bad as a Tory hard Brexit. It would wreck Labour's plans, and harm the poorest. He opposes a #PeoplesVote. If you oppose #Brexit you have to have to oppose Corbyn.  
EU27 conclusions on #Brexit adopted. 
If you voted for Brexit, you must have thought it would go well.If you don't think it's going well. If you think we're getting a bad deal.Speak now or your children will forever pay the price. 
Why is @UKLabour letting a minority of its supporters dominate #Brexit policy. We will win more support today if we campaign for #PeoplesVote. We will also win a GE. Our membership must be listened to. 
Police chiefs have told England fans not to fly the St George’s flag. FIFA has told fans not to sing Brexit songs... During the World Cup so far, the elite’s loathing of the people has been on full show, writes Mick Hume 
And it could have been so different. Had be backed Brexit when it was clear the EU would not change, and properly planned for it, he’d be up there with Thatcher and Churchill. Now he’s a punchline. 
At last, Dyer says what most commentators refuse to: Brexit is a calamitous mess, nobody could’ve known what they were voting for because even gov remains clueless, and the arrogant scion of unchallenged entitlement who delivered us into this hole, Cameron, has got away scot free  
WATCH | "The EU is a failing economic model. Look at the troubles on migration, the failures of the Euro... The sooner we're out, the better!" @Jacob_Rees_Mogg with the true Brexit vision we need! Read at Support us at  
The People’s Vote March got 100,000 people on the streets to protest Brexit. Next time it will be a million | @Femi_Sorry 
Images from Brexit Protest in Dundalk town square. Well done Boris. NO 2 BREXIT.  
The takeaway here is Danny voted Leave and if he's now realised, "no one knows what Brexit is, it's a mad riddle" aren't millions more thinking exactly the same?  
Political Editor @Peston takes a look at why Danny Dyer probably spoke for millions when asking whether anyone has a clue about Brexit  
Cameron used a referendum for personal gain to win an election. It backfired & we got Brexit.May called an early election for personal gain to solidify her shaky position. It backfired & we got a minority Tory government shored up by a £1Billion-bribed DUP & a weak PM. 
Everyone knows . Just a case of tying up the evidence now. No wonder Arron was desperately trying to divert attention yesterday. #BrexitFraud#BrexitTreason#Brexit  
EU negotiators have already rejected Theresa May's Brexit plan for a single market for goods @adampayne26 tells Sky News in Brussels.  
Danny Dyer attacks David Cameron over Brexit - video  
Today #EU27 meet to discuss the state of play of #Brexit negotiations. Here's a quick summary of where we stand on our Brexit timeline  
Ironically @MrDDyer has brought us the only positive thing about #Brexit. Class.  
How is it that the first Brexit and trump petitions hit 4 million in few days and yet this one is hardly making waves?Everywhere you go, everyone you speak to - get them to sign, it’s very simple system. We need it to get to millions! #Makeithappen!#PeoplesVote 
EU leaders strike deal on migration. But the summit also marks another Brexit milestone being missed  
Rees-Mogg - Ireland. Farage - Germany. Lawson - France. Ashcroft - Malta. Rats. Sinking ship, anyone?They're coming home. They're coming home. #Brexit lies are coming home. 
Scones. Jam first? No!  Cream first?  Yes!  At last we’ve found an issue that’s more contentious than Brexit. And much more interesting. 
US embassy political adviser sums up options for a Brexit deal facing the UK: 'There’s less good, and then there's very, very bad'  
Michel Barnier hopes to receive "workable and realistic proposals" on Brexit from Theresa May but "time is very short"  
Never felt this scared for our country, our democracy & the inminent loss of Rights...this truly is a far Right #Brexit coup sadly aided & abetted by many on the Far Left...  
Whatever the good intentions of many within Labour, the sad fact is that this man wants a hard Brexit. For those pro-Europeans who haven't left Labour in despair over the last year, the cognitive dissonance must be unbearable.  
The European Union's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says progress has been made but big divergences are still present in Brexit talks 
READY: HMRC ramping up preparations for No Deal Brexit, new customs system to be ready. The message must be clear: UK doesn’t have to accept the EU deal!   
One of the fantastic things about #Brexit is the number of us that own second homes in France we never ever knew about  
I'd rather someone explained why a major political story about a vice chairman of the Scottish Tories using dark money to illegally influence the Brexit vote & boost Tory MPs/ MSPs election funds doesn't warrant any coverage on the TV news & only bare minimal on other BBC mediums 
Why would Lord Ashcroft recommend Malta - a country noted for corruption and money laundering - as a base for "ambitious" British businesses post-#Brexit?This may shed some light on Aschroft's approach to business. 
Everyone has fallen in love with Danny Dyer after his epic Brexit rant  
From "f*ck business" and "forget the experts" to accusations of collaboration with the Nazis - read how Tories are queuing up to trash British business as Brexit stalls.  
A lot of people are praising Danny Dyer's succinct, sweary Brexit summery on last night's debut of #GoodEveningBritain. 
May & Corbyn both want the UK out of the EU. Same. Two cheeks etc. Scotland voted 62% Remain but are to be dragged out against our national will. #Brexit is the key, and turned the lock. Scotland can now #DissolveTheUnion and make our own way in the world. 
* * * FRIDAY POLL * * *There is a general election tomorrow. For the first time, you get to vote directly for the Prime Minister. Who do you vote for out of the following candidates?Retweet for a bigger sample. Poll ends at 9am Saturday.#Brexit #GoodEveningBritain #politics 
Yes. Imagine if Corbyn as a PM had directly triggered the current Brexit chaos by calling a referendum to save his own party. He would have been doorstepped for the next two years. Which media have pursued Cameron for answers and accountability? 
Arch-Brexiter & major Tory Party Donor Michael Ashcroft has urged “ambitious” UK firms to move to Malta after Brexit to take advantage of the Eurozone. He denies "selling the UK down the river", despite promoting a Brexit that will destroy UK jobs... #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Many remain voters will turn away from Labour now Corbyn has confirmed his position. It’s his fault if we get another Tory term.  I’m not voting for Brexit whatever colour rosette they wear.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Someone out there’s monitoring the timing of information released about (lack of) progress in Brexit negotiations and the timing of movement of money by hedge funders shorting the pound, right? @MollyMEP @J_amesp @carolecadwalla 
The Gov is shambolic and divided over Brexit however Labour is briefing this week that it is the Gov at fault and not Brexit.Fact is if they are asking for the same things then they will get the same response from the EU.NO.. 
CAN WE STOP BREXIT? With this Legal Action at the EU Courts starting 5 July we can! The EU Courts will consider - WAS THE EU REF ILLEGAL?PLEASE DONATE & RT TODAY & let’s stop this injustice Action for Expat Votes  #EUsaveUK #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
Women’s rights at risk after Brexit | Letters  
That second twat is the best thing to come out of Brexit so far. The real Brexit dividend. 
Or to put it less provocatively, what is actually dividing the cabinet ahead of next Friday’s supposedly historic meeting at Chequers convened to settle once-and-for-all what Brexit means?  
Where is David Cameron?  Where is the geezer?    In Europe, in Nice, with his trotters up ...   Danny Dyer tells it how it is on #Brexit @piersmorgan 
David Cameron forced an unnecessary referendum on the EU. He turned a backbench disciplinary matter into a national economic and constitutional crisis. And then, having made the mess, he left the stage.Danny Dyer has a point. 
Your regular reminder that on the essential institutional question of where Corbyn wants UK to be in relation to EU, there is no significant Brexit difference with T May.  
Does anyone have a Scooby Doo about Brexit?  
Still the hysterical FBPE mob go on. Brexit. It belongs entirely to the @CONservatives. From then until now they have had some kind of majority. .@David_Cameron is the “twat” who got us in this mess. .@theresa_may is making it a million times worse. Go after the Tories. 
The vessels will be built in an Australian government-owned shipyard in Adelaide. Presumably, the Brexit cheerleaders haven't noticed this yet.Delusion level: stratospheric.  
Theresa May's Associate Chief Whip Mr Jeremy Corbyn MP on TV this morning confirmed support for all the key planks of Govt Brexit Policy and no support for The #PeoplesVote#FBPE 
Good deal for UK jobs, and good for Britain’s global brand.BAE deal to build Australian warships raises Brexit hopes 
My @FT colleagues have had enough, it seems. Here's Martin Wolf on "The Irredeemable Folly Of A No Deal Brexit" - which sounds like a Milan Kundera novel, and is a very good piece:  
I knew J Corbyn in the late 70s and early 80s. He was, and is, a Leaver. His position was always the Tony Benn line that the EEC/EU was just a capitalist club. He only “changed” when he ran for Leader but the day after the Referendum he called for immediate triggering of A50. 
It's finally here..!  @rtenews launches its brand new Brexit Republic podcast, a weekly look at the unfolding negotiations, the poltics in London, the politics in Ireland, and where Brexit is already hitting home. Join me and @colmomongain each week.  
This is the #Brexit moment. The closer we get to leaving the EU the more opportunities will come our way from around the world. This is what the other EU countries fear and oppose so strongly. We aren’t a socialist country, the world can do business with us.  
Philip Stephens: The UK is headed towards a Brexit that satisfies no one. But there's another way – a second Brexit vote  
Brexit is a big deal, not a done deal. And it is too big to be ignored by the people - can we get to 200,000 signatures on the #PeoplesVote petition by the end of the weekend? Help us make it happen by signing and sharing! 
And there we have it. Out of #SingleMarket & #CustomsUnion despite his admission that MAJORITY of @UKLabour voted remain & doesn’t want #Brexit.And no support for #PeoplesVote before leading us into catastrophe.@jeremycorbyn is no different to @theresa_may @tony_nog 
That moment when you remember the price of Belgian beers will double thanks to #brexit but you don't give a toss as you'll be drawing a massive EU pension anyway#FridayFeeling #Farage 
It’s Brexit doing this, not the EU. I loathe this dishonesty by May & the Brexiters. “Theresa May tells EU leaders: you are putting lives at risk over Brexit  
My main Brexit concern is impact on investment; conversation last night with Finance Director - ‘we have just switched a £250m investment circa 2000 jobs to Europe - uncertainty over future EU relationship left no choice’ - how many other decisions just like that? Project Reality 
A lot of Brexiteers bragging about the £20bn BAE contract to build some ships for Australia and hailing it a "Brexit success." Problem with that is that France currently has a £28 billion deal with Australia to build their submarines. 
I’v never in my political life met so many MPs who tell me they are voting against their profound convictions as Tory MPs over Brexit. ‘And to think we are doing it because of Boris who hasn’t got any at all,’ says one 
Danny Dyer speaks for the nation with his magnificent, sweary takedown of David Cameron and Brexit 
Those who can escape the effects of Brexit have played the biggest role in conning those who can't - maintaining the control the elite have always had.  
Re Danny Dyer’s brilliant Brexit-Cameron speech, it’s the final “twat” that gets me. Camera pulls away, Piers Moragan tries to move on and Danny sits back, folds his arms and says “twat”. Almost to himself 
Whatever your views on Brexit, it’s difficult to disagree with this analysis.  
2. At no point was loss of Rights raised, no Consent for that, no one understood the implications nor the final version. All a #PeoplesVote does is Confirm if a maj of Ppl still want #Brexit or now to #StopBrexit. If a maj for #Remain what right do #Brexiters have to deny it? 
Can’t believe it’s been 12 hours since that slag Danny Dyer crashed into Brexit it still freaks my nut out to this day 
This is an excellent article on case for a #peoplesvote “Democracy confers on the people the right to change their minds. That is the point. If it were otherwise, there would have been no referendum in 2016. The matter would have been settled in 1975.” 
Idea that brilliant visionary minds must stay in ‘their own lane’ is exactly the myopic, foolish, unimaginative, witless, dark-age empire guff that brought us #Brexit We don’t need anymore dumbing down but wise words, imagination; people that see A Universe not an English Flag. 
Cameron's weakness, his idiocy brought about Brexit. It has divided Britain, it threatens the peace and security of Europe, and it will impoverish our great nation and its people. Corbyn is arguably the enemy of the people for his support of Brexit. Twats both. pic.twitter.com/m7qf8u3ds4 
1. This was not an election but an existential issue with generational implications..it was non-Binding, Cameron's promise deemed invalid, & only 51.8% of those voting, 37% voters 26.5% of the Ppl voted for a no. of unrealistic versionsof #Brexit based on a deeply flawed process.  
Only person I know who's joined Labour since Referendum was previously card-carrying UKIP.  That's Corbyn's Labour. 
So we’re backing Brexit, which will make the country poorer and more unequal, because a minority of Labour leave voters were sending us a message about poverty and inequality. Cognitive dissonance, Corbyn-style.  
Superb. Danny Dyer slams Brexit & asks how come “twat” Cameron can “scuttle off” to France and relax  “with his trotters up”.  
So fellow @UKLabour supporters and Remainers, Corbyn has confirmed everything. No more long game or Six Tests, all bullshit. Out of the Customs Union, out of the Single Market. No People’s Vote. What now? #Brexit I propose  exodus to @TheGreenParty 
The same luvvies who have derided and mocked Danny Dyer for years have now annointed him as a great sage for saying something profanely anti-Brexit on telly last night.  
"It’s so toxic. They go into the room, clash, storm out, go back again, clash again. With no end in sight" "It's pure politics"All to get to the point, which the UK have been recommending for years - taking action in countries of origin #EUCO #Brexit 
The EU sends a clear message - plan for the worst - plus Friday's Brexit other headlines  
.@JamesCleverly on #Brexit negotiations with the #EU"If we don’t get a deal it will be really bad news for the EU because they don’t get their divorce payments.” 
More good news for manufacturing in #Brexit Britain: BAE Systems wins a huge £20 billion contract to build frigates for Australia.  
That Conservative brexit strategy:Lord Ashford - move your UK business -> MaltaJohn Redwood - move your UK investments -> EurozoneMogg - move your hedge fund -> DublinLord Lawson - move yourself -> Gascony 
On the Brexit white paper, expected on the week beginning July 9, the EU will be "very, very p***** off" if it doesn't contain sufficient detail, a source close to the negotiating team told me. More from Brussels in here.  
This is indeed a disgrace Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn. But you know things will surely get much much worse after you get your #Brexit. Still, you deny the people the right to a #PeoplesVote. What comes next will be on you as much as Mrs May @theresa_may 
Exclusive: The EU will reject any UK proposal to stay in the single market for goods, a source close to Michel Barnier told me. With just 6 weeks of Cabinet negotiating left, the Brexit proposal May has reportedly been considering is dead prior to arrival.  
If we'd had a strong opposition we would  not be in this #brexit mess right now. This is why I and many others are angry at Labour. An absolute dereliction of duty. Totally failed to hold the government to account.#FBPE #StopBrexit 
Now Irish PM Varadkar says he will not prepare for hard border ahead of #Brexit - The UK has already ruled out erecting one. So the finger of blame will rest with the EU if a hard border is imposed on the island of Ireland.  
Exclusive: EU will reject Theresa May's single market for goods Brexit proposal  
Uh-oh. 'Someone in the @FT actually knows what the hell they are talking about' klaxon. *Businessman as opposed to journalist, obviously.#Brexit #FreeTrade 
“The will of the patients” - seriously??? Brexit means fewer doctors, fewer nurses, increased rota gaps, decreased patient safety. So, yes, I support a democratic vote on the final Brexit deal. And that, Daily Mail, makes me a good doctor.  
Main reason why the Brexit debate has gone round in circles for the last 2 years & why U.K.’s negotiations with EU have been almost completely stalled for months—is that much of the British political class have never fully understood what the EU is or how it works. @Simon_Nixon 
WE are the ones LEAVING Theresa, so WE ARE the ones putting citizens at risk. More blame shifting.... BBC News - Brexit: May urges EU leaders to put citizens' safety first  
BAE wins massive $35bn Australian frigate contract.Go Britannia!Go Brexit#DespiteBrexit... 
Could Ireland really refuse to build a border after Brexit?  
Danny Dyer summed up #Brexit as a 'mad riddle' on last night's Good Evening Britain. @HarrietHarman is in agreement with @MrDDyer 
Why don't I write about Brexit, Trump and the rise of incipient fascism? Only because there's something else going on that is just as frightening, but much less discussed. Here's this week's column:  
So this is fun. -Tory mogul funds Brexit campaign.-Said Tory now looks to Malta-Malta is a tax haven-Malta is also under the microscope for the murder of a journalist who investigated finance.Is this really the will of the people?  
Brexit Britain’s dash for growth will be a disaster for the environment  
NI sees 26% drop in EU workers since Brexit vote - with the negative implications of Brexit, surely the people deserve a vote on the final Brexit deal  
Danny Dyer #GMB. #Brexit is not a "mad riddle" you plumb, that is just what the media want you to beleive, It's simply leaving the anti democratic EU and their systems of controlling our affairs.  
Brexit: May urges EU leaders to put citizens' safety first. No, UK makes citizens less safe by leaving EU. Stop blaming others for your failures.   
With respect Mr Starmer @Keir_Starmer, I do not believe your Leader has any desire to fight for anything that will not result in a hard border. I have no reason to believe he wants anything but a hard Brexit. Why is he not supporting a #PeoplesVote ? 
This is peak Danny Dyer.He gets a big hammer and hits the nail right on the head on Brexit and also David Cameron. 
It is impossible to read some of the stuff you tweet and not think you really are stupid, but in reality you are just continuing your campaign of lies and deceit. Business knows Brexit is bad for the UK so do you, but you just don’t care.  
If Brexit were a business, the disloyal MPs would be fired, says @andreajenkyns on this week’s #ChoppersBrexitPodcast  
U do realise it was a Tory decision to hold the referendum and a Tory gov responsible for brexit?And it's the Tories accepting Russian bungs, but u have FBPE in your title so of course, it's all labour's fault.Labour r not in power. 
Nigel Farage doesn't own a cigarette paper thin enough to pass between his views on Brexit and Corbyn's.Labour voters, members and those who rely on Labour in power are getting royally shafted.  
Ridiculous. An order won while Britain is still a full member of the EU. Membership of the EU enhances our trade with the world. Brexit dimishes us and threatens trade with the largest and richest trading block in the world.  
I specialized in researching Euro #Fascists #neonazis & #AltRight personalities like Mensch who was such a low level laughing stock in #Brexit we had no reason to include her name in the book or acknowledgements. We appreciate her $27.00 contribution to Malcolm’s wallet. Enjoy !  
Economic Migration To UK Plummets After Brexit Vote  
Of course he did.Mississippi’s Republican governor is ensnared in post-Brexit lawsuitA new lawsuit shines light on how Brexiteers developed a strange partnership at Ole Miss. 
Oh stop pushing this bollocks. Your beloved leader is enabling Brexit every chance he gets and rather than accept that turns people off Labour you somehow blame us whilst acting sanctimonious yourself.Want us to vote Labour? Stop it emulating BlueKIP already!! 
My article on @BrexitCentral Brexit is ultimately about sovereignty and the UK having the ability to do what it pleases without interference. Partial membership of the European Union cannot be an option; we voted to Leave so let’s do just that.  
This report on the Russia-Brexit-Trump nexus puts a new light on Trump's latest attacks on the EU, and his attempt to persuade Macron to leave it.  
You should read this as Putin's proxy is trying to destabilize the EU. Putin already backed Brexit (see excellent reporting by @carolecadwalla). He also wants to destroy NATO and Trump obeys. 
They call this technique “The Brexit”  
What amazes me is the dominant narrative at the time was that Brexit was born out of a pedestrian lunch at not-Frontera in ORD. Turns out it was a boozed up plan for banana plantations.  
Must read reporting on Brexit's @Arron_banks & @Nigel_Farage's ties to the Trump campaign and whole lot of Russians  by @RoigFranzia @PostRoz @BoothWilliam @thamburger 
How the ‘Bad Boys of Brexit’ forged ties with Russia and the Trump campaign — and came under investigators’ scrutiny  
“Fascism doesn’t suddenly appear on your doorstep, goose stepping with a little moustache saying “I’m fascism and I’m here to stay”, it begins with appeals to nationalistic sentiment”Brexit has undoubtedly released the most heinous ‘f word’.We cannot give in to fascism - ever  
According to the FT, Brussels is quietly stepping up work on emergency plans for a hard Brexit. Not surprising really. All its actions seem to suggest that that is precisely what it wants. Me too! 
Which got the Brexit impact studies released. Labour literally busted a gut trying to get parliament a meaningful vote on the final deal but was let down by the so'called Tory rebels. And that's just on Brexit. Labour has been so successful at battering the Tories on the NHS 
The facts speak for themselves. Labour has made more amendments to Brexit legislation than any other party. Corbyn has voted against the government more times than any of the Tory rebels and has owned May on Brexit at the last three PMQs. Starmer came up with the humble address 
The venom against Brexit is still rich 2yrs on. Just check out the tweets to this man saying that leaving the EU is the best thing to happen to the UK.  
Indeed we do. So how about Corbyn and the Labour party acts like an effective opposition? Labour should be at least 30 points ahead of this monstrous government. Every open goal missed. And it's the poorest people who will suffer the most, if Corbyn doesn't start to oppose Brexit 
Britain’s economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of Brexit  
This title is real. It intertwines Russia with Brexit and the Trump campaign. It's all starting to come together now: How the ‘Bad Boys of Brexit’ forged ties with Russia and the Trump campaign—and came under investigators’ scrutiny. #TrumpResign 
So it’s basically a Tory Brexit, well done Jeremy, he’s not a remainer and never was.BONKERS!#FBPE 
Next leader of UKIP, there. Instead of dissipating after Brexit, I predict UKIP moves even harder to the facist alt-right.  
no second referendum = no corbyn government. i'd reconsider that not so cunning plan @jeremycorbyn, you can't win without us, and we can't vote for you if you let Brexit happen. 
"People talk about Brexit as if it is a poker game... these are people's lives we are are talking about. There are people who are gonna lose their jobs. Businesses will fold... Working people will pay for [Tory] incompetence and your ideological purity", says @LabourLewis #bbcqt 
Quality from Danny Dyer on Brexit: “David Cameron should be held accountable. He’s in Nice with his trotters up. Twat!”  
Says the woman who spent a year droning that ‘Brexit means Brexit’ and who told @SophyRidgeSky ‘we won’t keep bits of membership’ after we left. That includes EU’s security apparatus. The only thing making us less safe is the PM’s cowardice, zealotry and myopic red lines 
Why am I not surprised.How the ‘Bad Boys of Brexit’ forged ties with Russia and the Trump campaign — and came under investigators’   
“Revelations about Banks’ Russian contacts triggered scrutiny of whether Russians sought to bolster Brexit. In the US, Democrats who have Banks’ communications are exploring a different question:Were Brexit leaders a conduit between the Kremlin and Trump?”  
First, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg said tonight on This Week there's a Brexit dividend of £10 Billion. Then, he said 'There is zero divorce bill if we leave without deal.' This guy wants the UK to crash out of the EU with no deal. Who on Earth voted for that? No-one. Nobody voted for that. 
Message to people who've only recently started to feel worried/sad about Brexit:We need you. Together we can #StopBrexit by putting up a heat like hell.Add #FBPE to your Twitter name & follow others that have it. Join our diverse cross-party movement, like & retweet.Thanks! 
And now Trump isn’t even hiding it - meeting with Putin in July with no public agenda. “Bad Boys of Brexit.”Their efforts to simultaneously cultivate ties to Russian officials & Trump’s campaign have captured the interest  of UK investigators and Mueller  
Wow what a gaff!! Corbyn gets told he has left people with "not a clue" on Brexit and then his mob tweets this .. His own team are trolling Corbyn!!!!!! :)) #geeZ 
Brexit associates grew chummy with Russian ambassador over year that included UK and US votes. Met twice with him within days of meeting with Trump.  
6. Suddenly, two years later - in June 2018, Brexit’s been exposed exposed as a big investment fraud that no one is investigating at a state level and my country is going down the toilet. Well, firstly: I fucking told you so. 
1. Okay, so here’s a story from July 2016, when I wasn’t a journalist, and none of you followed me, but I reported Brexit’s massive stockmarket Fraud to the NCA as a retired police whistleblower living bankrupt in a bedsit and suffering malnutrition...  
There really isn't much point in lecturing Brussels or the Council of Ministers on Brexit when a) you're the one who's leaving and b) you can't even tell them what you want because your own team is engaged in a civil war. 
Just watched BBC’s Brexit, Dark Money and the DUP. The fact that Mrs May and Corbyn are not shouting for an inquiry, means even the outcome suits them or they knew of the connection with Vote Leave. Neither values fairness or democracy. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Theresa May (football pundit):"My knowledge of football is only surpassed by my Brexit negotiating skills, so I'm absolutely confident they'll bring home The Ashes and our boys did well considering they didn't convert any tries". "There were fewer games won under Labour". 
This man does not care AT ALL that the referendum was completely dishonest. He doesn't care that by enabling May, he is destroying our country. If Labour can't get rid of him, they are as doomed as the Tories. 
.@MrDDyer ladies and gents, the man who has so far best summed up #Brexit #FFS#PeoplesVote 
So now that U know he’s rejecting the people’s vote & wants another set of Brexit unicorns that the EU has rejected, your options, Labour, if you really want 2 have a chance 2 win a GE: Corbyn must go & replaced by a remainer with the same other policies. Jeremy cult time is over  
The UK's future should be bright after #Brexit.  We are leaving the #EU, remainers please note. 
#bbcqt Siemens is a global company. HQ in Germany, present in the UK for 170+ years and heavily invested here with 15000 employees and supporting a further 57000 jobs indirectly. As for #Brexit I don't need anyone telling me what to say, this is my opinion 
If Danny Dyer overturns Brexit then every satirist in the UK will be rendered unemployed overnight. 
Blair's comments about #Brexit this week were disgraceful.We will take no lectures from the man who destroyed our country.Please RT as widely as possible if you agree.#Brexit #EU #engbel #bbcdp #bbcqt 
#bbcqt #brexit #brexitshambles Yup. Simply the best... 
Anyone who has recently driven down the A470 near Merthyr and seen the monstrosity of the building which houses this plonker's shop will know all about "visual clutter" ! A tacky poundshop Disneyland run by a Brexit supporting Welsh hating boss ..we deserve better  
How the Brexit negotiations should end!    
"Working people in this country will pay the price for your incompetence''@labourlewis says the government's handling of Brexit will cause significant damage to the lives of working people #bbcqt 
BLOODY BRILLIANT!!!Should've put Me on there with him!!! #DannyDyer says it as it is #Brexit & #JoeBloggs 
Brexit weakens Britain twice, by cutting bonds with the EU27 and by raising doubts about NATO solidarity when that is exactly what the Putin-Trump axis desire most. Brexit is more than stupidity, it's treachery.  
Johan Eliasch says Theresa May should be given the tools to negotiate a successful Brexit deal #bbcqt 
What a despicable person Suella Braverman is, "I'm not scared of a no deal#Brexit", of course she's not, rich tory ministers don't care about jobs/businesses/living standards, they're protected by their wealth, unlike the many who will suffer b/c of ppl like Braverman #bbcqt 
Be warned, kids.Brexit may seem like a bit of harmless right-wing experimentation...But it’s a dangerous gateway drug to full-on rabid lunacy disorder.Here we present case IDS. Once just a “quiet man”,  he now finds himself fully immersed in wild WWII hallucinations.  
Can't stop watching this.Danny Dyer nailing Brexit   
Wait, so we're just going to ignore the audience pointing out that No-Deal Brexit means planes can't fly?(The recognition of pilot licenses and the right to fly in European airspace and US airspace is part of the Open Skies agreement.)#BBCQT 
Brexit is kinda like a Dad whose kids bugged him to go Alton Towers, so now he's driving there, at 11pm, knowing it'll be closed, with his kids screaming in excitement but his wife going c'mon Colin turn the car around but he's like NO YOUVE MADE YOUR CHOICE WE'RE FUCKING GOING 
Now for some incredibly odd reason, you’ve labeled the results of this referendum “inconclusive”. Not only is that disingenuous and inconsistent with your previous statements, but it’s politics at its worst. Respect the will of the people - as you were elected to do. 
The ERG are willing to inflict immense hardship on the British people and risk a resumption of violence in Northern Ireland to get their #BrexitTaxHaven. These people are not patriots. They deserve to be treated as traitors and criminals.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
I don't (alas) have a commemorative copy of the EU (Withdrawal) Act 2018 signed by the PM and the Brexit Secretary. But I have written a blogpost attempting to explain how the Act works, and the constitutional issues it raises, in (roughly) 1,000 words:  
Pound tumbles to new seven-month low as Brexit deal prospects worsen  
I never knew we needed Danny Dyer’s take on Brexit and David Cameron, but holy moly we really did.  
“Most of Labour is pro-Corbyn and anti-Brexit – we must be heard”By Alena Ivanova 
“Brexit? No one knows what it’s about where is that TWAT David Cameron?? He’s in Nice with his trotters up.... TWAT!!!!” Danny Dyer   pic.twitter.com/EEbSU08DML 
Jeremy Corbyn on #Brexit - giving clarity to Piers Morgan on #GoodEveningBritain 
Danny Dyer (am on +1) calling David Cameron a twat for calling the referendum. Beautiful 
It's come to something when Danny Dyer can speak more sense on Brexit in 30 seconds than the entire Cabinet has in the last 18 months.  
I really cannot comprehend why everyone continues to be so complacent about all of this. This, combined with the fact that no deal would basically make *five million* people illegal overnight, should be enough to stop Brexit. There needs to be a big march *every weekend* now.  
Best break down of Brexit so far. @MrDDyer you legend.  
Danny Dyer: "No one knows about Brexit, so what happened to that 'Twat' David Cameron who called it?""He called all this on, and how come he can scuttle off?""He should be held to account for it!"#GoodEveningBritain #ENGBEL #EnglandvBelgium pic.twitter.com/R3zy3wAfJH 
#BAE wins multi-million pound Australian warship contract.Because of #Brexit...  
Taking Project Fear to new levels of ridiculousness. How is leaving an organisation run by unelected men to go to being run by an elected woman going to diminish rights? @thatginamiller talking  utter rubbish here. UK laws exceed EU rights for women in many ways. #bbcqt #Brexit  
Danny Dyer on Brexit: You watch Question Time, it's a comedy... "So what's happened to that twat David Cameron?" #bbcqt pic.twitter.com/s2xRHYTsR7 
Danny saying "TWAT" at the end there is the real Brexit Dividend 
Piers Morgan asks Jeremy Corbyn about Labour's position on Brexit:#GoodEveningBritain #ENGBEL #EnglandvBelgium 
Oh good, just before we all find out the Brexit talks are off and we are out with no deal (it’s coming, don’t worry) May has decided to basically threaten the lives of citizens in our 27 allied neighbouring countries by saying we won’t share critical information on even terrorism 
What is the morality of people who say that we must listen to war criminals, who took us to an illegal war that killed over 1 million people, broke the Middle East, made us all less safe and as we now learn turned a blind eye to torture just because of their views on #Brexit?  
Hi @CarolineLucas - do you really think #Brexit will threaten peace in Ireland? Do you really think the only thing stopping us mad paddys killing each other is a deal made by Bertie and Blair? Or are you just incredibly prejudiced and ignorant about Irish people?  
Lord Ashcroft criticised after urging 'ambitious' British firms to move to Malta after Brexit  
The timing on that final “twat“ was glorious. That moment will always be the best thing to come from Brexit. 
#Women's rights at risk after Brexit - Female parliamentarians, businesswomen, campaigners & others sign a letter in the Guardian highlighting real risk of losing hard-won rights after Britain leaves the EU  
Why was @BBC silent when doctors (@BMA) called for people’s vote on the actual #brexit deal? @InFactsOrg 
"What you watching, Richard?""Ah not much... Danny Dyer giving it large on Brexit to Pamela Anderson and Jeremy Corbyn." 
And this is Danny Dyer, "double-twatting" David Cameron over Brexit in that shark-jumping TV show with @piersmorgan. And actually - who could really disagree?  
You're the Leader of the Labour Party @jeremycorbyn, not the dictator of it. If @UKLabour members want a #PeoplesVote we'll earn one at Conference. Brexit means further inequality, injustice, poor quality employment and poverty. We, the majority within our Party, reject it.  
The question is becoming more, will the EU last long enough to face Brexit.  
I’m calling it ‘Theresa’s Brexit’...#bbcqt 
BREXIT ULTIMATUM: May told to WALK AWAY from EU if Brussels keeps REFUSING trade talks  
When Danny Dyer is the sanest political commentator on Brexit....  
Holy shit the only person left talking sense on Brexit is *squints* Danny fucking Dyer 
Whatever your thoughts are on Danny Dyer @MrDDyer, he certainly does come up with a very succinct and direct summary of our collective thoughts on #Brexit.Are they still looking for a new presenter for #bbcqt @bbcquestiontime??  
Pound tanking again thanks to the government prevaricating over #Brexit. Are they trying to bankrupt the country as well as overseas UK pensioners on fixed incomes?It's like May's has the very opposite of the Midas touch, but no doubt her husband is making rich pickings from it. 
Danny Dyer discussing Brexit and calling David Cameron a twat twice is the best thing I've seen in a while. #GoodEveningBritain 
Jeremy Corbyn on Brexit: Out of the Single Market, the Customs Union and no second referendum.  
Federation Small Business #FSB just published their confidence index - say it is highest since 2015. Obviously never heard of @NicolaSturgeon speeches about #Brexit disaster to come. 
Corbyn confirming now leaving single market, leaving customs union, no #PeoplesVote. That "is not in our plans at all". We have to respect the result of the referendum. Never thought we would say thank you Piers for clarifying. P.S. That's "Fuck Democacy" in Boris speak. 
Jeremy Corbyn is clueless. Admits the majority of labour voters voted remain. Knows Brexit will damage the country and not allow him to do half of the things he'd want but still he won't accept a #peoplesvote is the right thing. #jeremyout #GoodEveningBritain 
Arguing that Brexit is the solution to people’s concerns about migration is like saying that the only way to avoid your roof leaking is to burn your house down. 
Absolutely correct line from @jeremycorbyn on #GoodEveningBritain The 2016 referendum was the largest democratic exercise in British history. The electorate was clearly told it would be binding and final.I voted remain but respect the final result. 
Brexit:  
I cringe every time I hear Corbyn saying he campaigned for Remain in the EU referendum. He's historically anti-EU and, funnily enough, Labour's Remain campaign wasn't exactly inspiring. #GoodEveningBritain #GEB 
FYI for Boston/Mass folks. On the ballot in November will be a decision on whether or not to repeal the 2016 "Massachusetts Gender Identity Anti-Discrimination Veto Referendum."  
Maybe that's what May is counting on !Parliament may not have time to approve Brexit deal, MPs warn  
Or better still have a relationship with the EU post Brexit that doesn’t ‘f business’ or force these extra costs on them.   
The year is 2018. Brexit beckons, Trump in the White House. The sun scorches the ground, 30 degrees at 9.30pm. ITV. Primetime. Piers Morgan directs football talk with Danny Dyer, Pamela Anderson, Amir Khan and - via a problematic Skype feed - Robbie from Arsenal TV. The rapture. 
So Brexit just played Brussels, and lost.Twice.#EnglandvBelgium#eusummit 
In the Face of Brexit, Relations between Ireland and Scotland Are Only Strengthening #scotref 
The Spanish prime minister and the Catalan president will meet in Madrid on July 9 to discuss another independence referendum  
England are fucked by Brussels again. Next step, leave the world cup, create alternative competition. Play against Tonga, Antarctica, Moon Base 4 and Somaliland. Still as goodScotland and NI forced to play in new competition against their will. Wales has no clue. #brexit 
Brexit negotiations going like #ENGBEL 
UKIP's Lord Pearson Exclusive: Tackling Radical Islam Next 'Big One' for Party After Brexit | Breitbart  
We waited 40 years to vote Leave. Maastricht Treaty and John Major’s antics at pushing this anti sovereignty convinced us. I voted ‘remain’ in 1975 but we now know Heath lied to the electorate. EEC was never about trade 
BREXIT'S OFF, LADS  
Well, actually, we could knock #Brexit on its head in a couple of days, if our MPs would earn the huge salary we give them, and just do their job.  
BREXIT COUP: The ships will be built in Australia creating 4000 jobs there...  @jeremycorbyn @KimSJ @kmqkatie @nickreeves9876 @TheRynheart @EuropeanPenguin @VeroVero777 @MrRemain @wittertalk @Hil67 @jcm247 @atatimelikethis 
“This is a crisis happening for everyone, restaurants are suffering because the fall in the value of the pound since the Brexit vote has made ingredients more expensive while staff costs have risen." 
Coming second best to people from Brussels is something the English will have to get used to.#ENGBEL #Brexit 
Former Conservative leader Iain Duncan Smith has linked the UK's biggest business lobby group to Nazi appeasement #Brexit  
Belgian player showing England what #Brexit looks like.#ENGvBEL 
We now go live to #Brexit  
100 million to reinvent the wheel...or the satellite system in this case. Imagine what we could use 100 million for in our society.Brexit is a waste of time and money.  
Brexit Select Committee accused of publishing Remain “propaganda”  
I've often wondered what it would be like to live in a society with a corrupt government satiating their own needs and those of the wealthy. Well now I know.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
The £15bn pa cost of Brexit means more and more attacks on public services. But attacking the NHS as both too poorly funded to provide decent care and too bureaucratic to be efficient? Pure ideology.  
Steve Bell on Theresa May’s Brexit plans - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
The EU is preparing for a no deal #Brexit which for most Europeans will be inconvenient at most. The Tories are bluffing in a poker game where they hold no good cards. Only the hedge funds will gain from chaos in the UK next March. Wake up and smell the coffee ppl 
Also: Brexit in visual form  
There ARE #Brexit benefitsBut none for you,You aren't the fewThere IS a Brexit dividendBut not for you,You aren't the fewYou voted for itThey love you for itThey are the fewIt was never about youYou fell for itYou took the baitYou're on the hookNow we're all fooked 
GOOD: Nigel Farage booed by football fans as he watched the England match  /#EU #Brexit #WorldCup #PeoplesVote 
Right folks....don't laughWe all know it99% of BREXIT voters voted on the issue of immigration onlyYip....the only thing that's guaranteed with BREXIT is...Free movement to remainNow, I told you not to laugh 
"That's right, we want to leave the EU but retain all the benefits of membership and now we want the shirts off your backs too! Haw haw haw!" #brexit #BELENGTheresa May receives @hazardeden10 Belgian shirt 
With whole industries looking to exit from the UK, no solutions for the Irish border and nothing planned for customs infrastructure - Brexit is not going to go well. Tories like Suella Braverman will try to defend the incompetence on full display... #BBCQT 
Another stellar speech by @EdwardGLuce at the Northern Lights. Two years ago he warned, 4 days after the Brexit vote, that Trump might get elected. This time he predicted that England would win the World Cup on July 15th. You heard it here first. 
An increase in crime & gang violence has led to a surge in support for nationalists in #Sweden ahead of an election in September. Sweden Democrats, who are campaigning to halt immigration & to hold a referendum on Sweden’s membership of the EU, are now polling at 20% #svpol 
This is going to be BIG!! Community group It's Our City will launch a petition to trigger a referendum to change the way Sheffield City Council operates. Here's to the power of the people to make democracy real and representatives accountable  Such an exciting project.  
Nissan to sue Vote Leave campaign over EU referendum flyer  
Brexit dividend: from March 29 UK merchants can go back to charging credit card surcharges - illegal in the EU from today. 
Brexit Britain Wins $35 Billion Contract to Build Aussie Warships  
Not just the EU many thousands calling for a #PeoplesVotePRESSURE is piling on Theresa May to produce a clear Brexit plan as Ireland’s Leo Varadkar suggested Britain should have come up with one two years ago – before the EU referendum.  
Aww look at @ChukaUmunna getting excited about 160,000 anti #Brexit signatures.Come back to us when you’ve got 17.4 million,but for now shut up & sit down fella.These actions just make the victory all the sweeter when on 29/03/19 Remain Part 2 will have officially failed   
Just to be clear - it’s more than 37,000 Nissan-related jobs that are at risk thanks to Brexit.Plus all the other manufacturing business and supply chains that are heavily reliant on the EU market in the NE. This region will be utterly screwed. Take note @jeremycorbyn 
To modern Conservatives, power alone matters. As Trump and Brexit have shown the "principles" they hold are merely window-dressing. This is why they won't dump Trump or stop Brexit.Which means the only way to get them to change is by denying them power. Elect Democrats, Labour. 
2 essential North Carolina elections to stop GOP plan to expand size of state Supreme Court & flip majority from 4D-3R to 5R-4D:1. Anita Earls's bid for the Supreme Court,2. GOP-initiated referendum that wld switch judicial appointment power to the gerrymandered legislature.  
The EU is not a state. Brexit is no longer relevant to them. They’re assuming we’re crashing out & they’re making their own arrangements. The U.K. is not the centre of the world.  
George Soros was 3 when Hitler became chancellor. His family had to escape Nazi-occupied Hungary. @Arron_banks is devious little shit who's trying to distract the world from his crooked #brexit dealings. Don't let him. pic.twitter.com/m1A7Y2fR3O 
96-year-old WW2 veteran Harry Shindler is taking the British Government to court because they denied him a vote on #Brexit. What spirit! But he needs our help. Can you chip in? There's still £3,168 to raise in just 9 days.  
For those of you not following this rather surreal government Facebook feed, Road to Brexit, here’s another entry that will have historians puzzling.  
The Government needs to be a more enthusiastic cheerleader for the benefits of Brexit  
And they want us to trust them with Brexit, with our food & drink industry, with shared frameworks, with our PGIs/PFNs, with the standards so critical to our brand value, with trade deals, with the EU and the rest of the world? Actions speak louder than words! #betrayal #notrust 
Amsterdam is about to get its first female mayor, who'll need to oversee the city's Brexit influx  
Despite pressure from Conservative hardliners, Theresa May's approach to Brexit looks to be softening  
Proud to be signatory of this letter to the Guardian on Women’s rights at risk after Brexit coordinated by the brilliant @ninaparker 
Women’s rights at risk after Brexit | Letters  
May’s Ex-Chief of Staff Savages Failing Brexit Strategy: ‘Time for Playing Nice and Being Exploited Is Over’   
Those few months when Leave dominated Remain coincide precisely with the mendacious propaganda for the Referendum and its aftermath.  At no other time since we joined the EU have the people wanted to leave.  #FBPE#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Time to face facts.That "crushing #Brexit victory" was a small blip in our otherwise continuous wish to #RemainInTheEU, and it only happened because of gerrymandering, Russian and American interference, illegal spending by the leave mob, and ALL THOSE LEAVE LIES.#StopBrexit! 
With all these dirty tricks emerging over Brexit I think GB now needs credible election observers to ensure honesty. That's how low we have sunk. 
Dave Brown on Theresa May, Brexit and the World Cup - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Guess who helps the rise of Europe’s mini-Trumps? Brexit-poisoned Britain.Determined to keep the likes of Hungary and Poland sweet in an attempt to split EU for the purposes of Brexit, UK govt is being complicit in the decline of democracy there 
'We must use every opportunity ... to make it absolutely clear that we are committed to the continued full participation of the UK in European science' – Richard Catlow, @royalsociety foreign secretary and vice-president on #Brexit & #Science 
Open Britain has had Soros funds Lammy has had  Soros monies David Miliband employee of Soros - we voted Brexit and Remain spent far more £9m leaflet to every house media pushing EU and you still lost get over it we are leaving the political bullying union 
So, obviously there’s nothing else on telly tonight so tune into @SkyNews at 19.30 to see me discuss the #EUCO; the total lack of progress on Brexit; and the failure of the government to fess up about the choices we face.What else would you watch this evening?! #ENG 
FANTASTIC NEWS! Brexit Britain Wins $35 Billion Contract to Build Aussie Warships @BrexitCentral @ChangeBritain @Conservatives  via @GuidoFawkes 
A UK college is to pay the settlement fees for its European staff and their families after Brexit, in a move that could be followed by other employers  
If we win the world cup we'll stop needing to feel superior over our European counterparts and forget about all this Brexit nonsense. Surely? 
Lucy Harris of Leavers of London speaks about treating EU Referendum voters with respect regardless of how they voted. Register at  for Your FREE Priority View of the Final Movie! @Lugey6 @LondonLeavers #Brexit #BrexitWhyLeave #RT - Please retweet! 
Brexit Britain: UK Firm Wins £20 Billion Australian Warships Contract   
Huge warship order from Australia shows British industry will survive and thrive post #BREXIT  
Looking forward to constructive meeting with @theresa_may and @HMcEntee on #Brexit. Good to meet up again and lots to discuss  
Would your Brexit vote be different if you knew of the impact on Nissan? Some leavers still not getting it.  
First thing May should do after Brexit day is to apologise to Australia for abandoning them (& the rest of the Commonwealth) in favour of the EU 40yrs ago. 
You still don’t get it, do you?Lots of people voted Brexit because British politics had already been poisoned by the EU with its political correctness, incompetence, interference & contempt for British votersBrexit is the antidote 
UKIP’s Lord Pearson Exclusive: Tackling Radical Islam Next ‘Big One’ for Party After Brexit  
Britain beats off Italian and Spanish rivals to win new £20bn Australian warship contract after #Brexit  
I’m getting quite cross with the REMAIN campaign. Their statements warning of the damage that Brexit would do to the UK now look completely watered down and pathetic compared to the ACTUAL damage Brexit will do that is now filling the news agenda  
Remainers are quite simply people trying to save the UK from the insanity of Brexit. We're not funded by Soros or anyone. Unlike Farage and the Brexiters,  who're funded by Putin. 
Brexit is a self-inflicted national disaster. A global humiliation. Nobody forced us to take this path. But who do Brexiters blame...? Remainers, of course!Welcome to your #Brexit future.  
Big Brexit news tomorrow AM 
Anyone heard a benefit of Brexit yet? Asking for a friend. 
Finally oh finally @FT has something positive to say on Brexit after award of large Australian defence contract to @BAESystemsplc: ‘There is also a lot of emotion around Brexit, which may have played a role given the potential for a deeper partnership with the UK into the future’ 
Brexit supporter Lord Ashcroft suggests firms move to Malta  
President Torra had said that holding an agreed, binding referendum was the first thing he wants to discuss with Sánchez. If the request is turned down, #Catalonia “will continue along the road towards the Republic” 
If the last 2yrs have taught us anything it's this:- UK's problems are due to failings of successive UK govts, not the EU- no deal will come anywhere near being as good as what we have now, so we should #Remain- our govt is disrespecting us by non-stop #Brexit lying & spin 
If we called an Ireland-style referendum on abortion we would win with a similar percentage. But we'd have to, you know, talk about abortion.  
As Theresa May negotiates #Brexit downtown, #Brussels reminds me of my European citizenship & right to vote! #EUCO 
Napping May scores own goal in face of Belgium Brexit striker | John Crace  
Irish PM will not prepare for hard border ahead of Brexit, he trusts UK and EU assurances that there will not be a hard border in any circumstance, and said that there were contingency plans for Irish airports and seaports in event of a no deal Brexit. 
Strong leader model means majority of Labour councillors in #Sheffield have no say. Many Labour supporters will surely back referendum that can ensure a meaningful role for every elected person. #itsOurCity 
It's the Remoaners funded by Soros not accepting our Brexit vote that is causing division @JuliaHB1 
Nissan to sue Vote Leave campaign over EU referendum flyer  
Theresa May signs commemorative copies of the EU (Withdrawal) Act for ministers who worked on this *crucial piece of Brexit legislation*. Photos of historic events don't always age well. Note May's & Davis's heads appear chopped off in the mirrored desk. Then there's Chamberlain  
This is where pro-EU fanaticism is driving some people. A Labour MEP, one of the most stridently anti-Brexit voices in public life, openly says he will be cheering for Belgium over England. It's his right, of course. But just completely wibble.  
"Britain could stop and think again" - this is why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal  Sign the petition here: 
"The British political class increasingly resembles a British tourist asking a foreigner for directions" -  @Simon_Nixon nails it on why Brexit going around in circles  
The £Pound has tumbled against the Dollar & Euro as fears mount that Brexit negotiations are going nowhere & household debt is too high. Time is running out and there is no momentum going into the last few weeks. Tory Cabinet splits are sinking the UK #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
First you came for refugeesThen you came for immigrantsThen you came for EU citizens Then you came for UK citizens Then you came for judgesThen you came for lawmakers Then you came for businessmen  Next....If you’re not terrified you’re not paying attention.#Brexit  
Forget the polls, a #peoplevote would have a 70:30 split for Remain.Brexit is not the Will of the People 
My column this week: the myth that “Corbyn could stop Brexit” is a comforting distraction from the more difficult question of how you get Brits to love the free movement of people:  
Well, she is doing the Russian's bidding on Brexit... 
Nothing more farcical than living in a country that has had a decade almost of brutal austerity, a brexit that'll destroy thousands of jobs then a government that'll give a Queen £87m pay rise... 
Huge announcement It's Our City #Sheffield: "we are giving notice we are going to end the strong leader model ... we will force a city-wide referendum in which @SheffCouncil will be legally barred from taking a view". Needs 5% of electors to sign petition. 
Sobering to reflect that when #Brexit is discussed today at #EUCO Ireland’s concerns will be centre stage for #EU whereas for #UK Scotland won’t get a mention because for them we don’t matter #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope 
‘The main reason why the Brexit debate has gone round in circles for the last two years.... is that much of the British political class have never fully understood what the EU is or how it works.’  
Math not your strong point Julia - the number is big but the % diff smallIs Govs duty to govern for the whole electorate. A small margin = very soft #brexit to accurately represent the mood of the whole nationIf Gov had taken this rational route maybe it could have been done 
Tories & business:BoJo - f**k businessRedwood - invest in Eurozone not UKRedwood - firms that don't back Brexit should be punishedAshcroft - get an EU baseRe:Smog - must move my base to Dublin.Yep. The Party of Business. CONservatives.  
All 33.5m people voted for Remain or for a campaign that never stopped talking about "Norway" & shouted "Project Fear" at any suggestion that full access to the Single Market was at risk... So everyone should unite around your extreme Brexit then?  
Good luck this evening to Brexit playing Belgium in the World Cup football competition. 
There's a huge and obvious attempt to undermine Brexit with Project Fear 2.0. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg is so right - sore losers in the cabinet just can't accept that they lost, and now they're telling firms to talk down Britain. It's disgraceful!Support us at  
I'm sure headlines referring to judges as "Enemies of the People" and branding people who dare criticise Brexit as "traitors" had absolutely nothing to do with it.  
Five times millionaire Brexiteers advised businesses on how to get round Brexit  
No, it was the Remoaner minority’s refusal to accept Brexit which has poisoned British political life. If everyone had accepted the result of the democratic vote, the country could have united around Brexit.  
VIDEO: European leaders are meeting in Brussels for an important summit, mostly focused on the #migration issue but also on Brexit and eurozone reforms  
A British lawmaker is calling for an inquiry into how some of the world’s biggest hedge funds placed bets around the Brexit referendum  
£20bn Australian frigate contract, #despitebrexit.One of many reasons the government proposal to tie the UK to EU defence rules, directives and structures post-Brexit makes no sense.  
Femi just summed up Brexit from a young person's perspective, in one tweet.  
I’m 28. I need cheap stuff & job options.Making it harder to trade with Europe makes things in my High Street more expensive. So does having to buy from further away. The EU has a big market. Brexit takes us out of it. So jobs will go there, not here, and Brexit traps us here. 
two years of asking PM only to be told brexit means brexit means breakfast etc etc and watch clock tick down to leaving date without any clarity about what means for future of walthamstow. Seems that sense of #brexithaos not just in UK parliament but from all concerned…  
Nissan to sue Vote Leave campaign over EU referendum flyer  
Guess who helped the rise of Europe’s mini-Trumps? Brexit-poisoned Britain | Guy Verhofstadt  
“Hello @NAkufoAddo aka Neezy, what’s the point of Spending Ghc932Million on referendum to create extra regions when our hospitals don’t have enough beds?”  
Here’s BBC presenter Dara O’Briain, whose BBC salary is over £300k, talking about Brexit and those funny Brits with their “weird” penchant for autonomous democracy.What a weird thing eh!!He’ll definitely get a new BBC series with comments like this. pic.twitter.com/tM1U69z3fD 
Ukrainian workers could replace EU nationals after #Brexit Gove suggests. Just as some of us forecast, the Tory Brextremists want to use Brexit not to cut immigration, but to bring in workers who can be exploited more easily than EU nationals. #StopBrexit 
#Brexit Britain Wins £20 Billion Contract to Build Aussie Warships.Possibly biggest #DespiteBrexit yet!BAE Systems won tender to design & manage construction of 9 anti-submarine warships in biggest peacetime building program in Australian naval history. 
biggest military contract in Australian peacetime has gone to BAE systems. £20 billion. and augurs well for post-Brexit trade deal with Oz. Eat your heart out Remoaners 
My job is stopping #Brexit  and there's still a hell of a lot of work to do!!!   
Jeremy's spokesman either hasn't read the impact assessments which show ANY Brexit as detrimental or is being deliberately misleading in saying a Labour Brexit wouldn't impact jobs. Neither is satisfactory.Guess "a Labour Brexit means fewer job losses" had less of a ring to it.  
Every non UK citizen I speak to says the same thing- "Why are you not fighting back? If the government was trying to push something like Brexit, we'd be out day and night!"And I have to agree. Right now we can't even hit a petition target. Are we that weak willed? 
Boom! #DespiteBrexit  : Brexit Britain Wins $35 Billion Contract to Build Aussie Warships  via @GuidoFawkes 
That wouldn’t be a bad thing. The return to nation state democracy and pride in ones country and self is the way forward. #Brexit  
I can only apologise for the dark fruit, I need a sweet taste with my meal then we’re back to hard brexit   
Great news for Brexit Britain!  
Fantastic news for our shipbuilding industry for post brexit. 1000s of jobs await. The rest of the world will be lining up for British expertise, just like the Australian Government are doing here. 
Guess who helped the rise of Europe’s mini-Trumps? Brexit-poisoned Britain | Guy Verhofstadt  
PM @Theresa_May and Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP today signed commemorative copies of the EU (Withdrawal) Act for each of the ministers who worked on this crucial piece of Brexit legislation.  
Football fever hits the #EUSummit?Belgium PM gives @thersea_may Eden Hazard's number 10 shirt.  (You make the jokes...) #Worldcup #ENGBEL #Brexit #LOLs 
The referendum was won by people like me plodding up and down streets knocking on doors for hundreds of hours and a general public who refused to be browbeaten by the establishment.  
Brexit Britain Wins $35 Billion Contract to Build Aussie Warships  via @GuidoFawkes 
Mandrake: Michael Gove fears for his wife’s £200k ‘Brexit dividend’  
Theresa May's former chief of staff and architect of the 2017 election, Nick Timothy, predicts that we may end up with the "very worst" form of Brexit.Day by day it becomes clearer that Brexit will deliver for nobody. That's why we must have a #PeoplesVote - please share 
Lords Committee told #Brexit is afecting start ups. Ellenor McIntosh, Twipes lost an investor & they told her "your business is dead as you're going to have to charge your customers a lot more... & they're not going to pay & that's why I'm leaving" #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Today EU leaders are assembling in Brussels & it's time they agreed a new Brexit strategy. Tough talk won't force the UK to stay within the bloc's rules & structures. Instead, they must match our ambition & pragmatism to reach a deal that works for all of us.  #EUCO 
A very interesting documentary about Robert Mercer here, founder of Cambridge Analytica and Breitbart, and biggest funder of Trump, Bannon and potentially Brexit leave campaign ...worth watching all of it...then watch it again,,   
WATCH: unlike the England team at this year's #WorldCup, it doesn't look like our Brexit negotiating team is going to get out of the group stage.  It's time to show Brexiters the red card & demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
I thought today might be a good opportunity to resurrect this #theneweuropean one of Michael Ashcroft from last year #brexit  
VARADKAR: “Any relationship in future between EU & UK isn’t going to be one of absolute equals - we’re 27 states, the UK is 1. We’re 500m ppl, the UK is 60m. That basic fact has to be realised.”On UK Brexit white paper: “would have been helpful if they had that 2 yrs ago.”2/3 
Sunderland voted overwhelmingly in favour of Brexit. A shot in the foot if ever there was one.   Indicates the level of public understanding of Brexit's implications prior to the referendum.  
What a liar - Blair says it is a 'huge myth' that he allowed uncontrolled immigration into Britain as he says Brexit should be delayed to stop disastrous 'no deal'  
An Eye to Brexit:  
Irish PM will not prepare for hard border ahead of Brexit  
Last moments for mr. @sanchezcastejon to understand, that agreed referendum would be for the best. Millions of catalans want to be free and political problems are not solved by hiding behind constitution. UN will condemn #Spain for this. #Catalonia 
... nice touch from Belgian PM - they have moved the PM update on Brexit from the early hours post dinner coffee to the start - which is pretty much during the England-Belgium match  
Quite telling. To Remainers it's 'our deal or no deal'. To Leavers it's 'our deal or no Brexit'.  
""Two years after the Brexit referendum vote the Government has not managed to agree in Cabinet some of the key issues on Brexit." @thomasbrake says YOU deserve the final say on the Brexit deal, with the chance to #ExitfromBrexit. Agree? Add your name:  
We’ve done all the running so far, to appease you & your Remoaner mates. It’s time you changed the target of your demands. Oh, & btw, if you have another Referendum then presumably the loser can have another one after that!! 
It's quite astonishing that we've made it to the June summit with nothing to show on Brexit since December. And even more astonishing that this is treated like a given. 
File under “you couldn’t make it up”:  BBC Global News looking at possibility of relocating regulatory HQ to an EU country, Brexit oblige 
Tory Brexit enthusiast @LordAshcroft writes heart-warmingly about how British companies might like to locate jobs in Malta after Brexit. Includes advice to those "looking to employ thousands or even tens of thousands of people in a EU base"  
It will take decades to purge the British body politic of the fascist poison Dacre has injected into it. We should aim to put this enemy of democracy behind prison bars. And we must never again allow a fascist to hold such power over public opinion.#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Catalan secessionist bid. The transfer of data of 5.3 million voters for the ilegal referendum on 1-O in breach of Data Protection Act @nytimes @washingtonpost @cnnbrk @BBCWorld @thetimes @daily @guardian @heraldscotland @EU_Commission @DIEZEIT @lemondefr 
Brexit day can't come soon enough. 
This is why, Friday the 13th of July, at the Anti Trump demo at 2pm in town we must all bring EU FLAGS Brexit =  TrumpIt is the same nationalist/isolationist agenda.  
FREEDOM: Catalonia will ask Spanish government for second independence referendum, new President says.They're demanding the right to 'self-determination'. 
"Doctors are accused of ignoring the will of their patients by calling for a vote on the final Brexit deal" says the @DailyMailUK "Will of their patients"? Britain in 2019 - you couldn't make it up. Silence the doctors on matters of the NHS!! 
UK PM @theresa_may tells @bbclaurak she's committed to "faster pace" of #Brexit talks 
The Brexit negotiations may have distracted everyone in the UK, but the big picture is that the EU's deep structural flaws have not gone away - in fact they are looming larger than ever.As Juncker himself said: "the cracks are growing." They are starting to look like chasms.  
1) Your illegal foray into Iraq (against the will of the British people) caused far more damage than Brexit will ever do. 2) You assured me if Britain didn't enter the Euro, it would be a disaster for this country. You were completely wrong. Why should I think you're right now?  
Irish PM Leo Varadkar on PM's hotly anticipated Brexit white paper: "It would have been helpful if they’d had that white paper two years ago." #EUCO 
I also think the only good solution is for the U.K. to remain in the EU with its current status. I wrote that well before the referendum. I also think that it is legally possible for the U.K. to wiwthraw its intention to leave the EU. I hope this is still politically possible!  
It's official, we're through the looking glass. 
Ireland's prime minister Leo Varadkar says he will not prepare for a hard Irish border after Brexit and Ireland is making preparations for the unlikely scenario of the UK crashing out of the EU without a deal 
it continually amazes me that the brexit boys got away with this "men of the people" act  
You're confusing Brexiters, ie. those voters who, since the ref, have been effectively sidelined, with those in Parliament treating them and Brexit with contempt.Voters, who trusted MPs to deliver on their promises, have been betrayed wholesale.  
Hannan is being sort of honest. This is what we weren't told during the referendum. The Tory right see #Brexit as a Trojan horse to smuggle in massive tax cuts for business & the rich and to slash health, safety & environmental regulations & workplace rights. #StopBrexit #FBPE  
Brussels is only cutting Britain from a major satellite project ‘out of spite’ for Brexit says Former Prime Minister of Australia  
Let’s start with certain journalists shall we making threats to a vulnerable individual for their own warped anti Trump/Brexit prejudices - integrity and respect should start with the 17.4 million who voted Brexit there was and is no corruption. @Arron_banks @LordAshcroft 
If you don't believe that Nigel Farage was involved in perhaps the most cynical manipulation of financial markets in history, then ask yourself why a British politician would point at a graph of £ sterling falling off a cliff at 3.45am on the morning of the referendum, and smile.  
Business is crying out for an end to this chaotic Brexit. This is why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal  
WTO rules not okay for Brexit Britain. Me in Prospect on Why Brexiters are either seriously ignorant or are not telling the truth about how the world trade system works.  
Burn, burn, burn the Transatlantic Alliance. What a world for Brexit Britiain to graduate into.  
Dear friends and #leavers. This of course is a lie to provide cover for the true purpose of #brexit to establish a capitalist fundamentalist authoritarian regime post a no deal exit.  Nothing to do with benefitting you or the country. He's a remorseless liar this one #30/03. 
Blair hasn’t yet twigged: he's as popular as a rattlesnake in a lucky dip!'Tony Blair will never accept that British people voted to take back control.Enough delays already.The public just want politicians to get on with delivering a clean #Brexit'#EU 
Brexit funder Arron Banks set up a charity he said did work around the world, including in Lesotho and Belize.But its published accounts showed no income or expenditure. So how much money came in and where did it go?  
MAJOR BREAKING: Spanish Prime Minister Pedro Sánchez says he will not accept a referendum on independence in Catalonia and maintains the same position as former PM Rajoy. 
And there you have it. Brexit loony calls @TomSwarbrick1 to say we need the army at the border to "shoot refugees".Why are these fascist morons always given a platform on @LBC? 
A "successful Brexit" sounds suspiciously like the wet dream of a rich yet excessively mediocre white guy born into a family, land and time that consistently overestimates him because he went to the right fancy school 40 years ago  
Only a pathological xenophobe, a psychopathic vandal, an idiot or someone who is set to gain financially would argue for a no deal Brexit above extending the negotiating period so that we can truly get to grips with this incredibly complex situation 
Is the EU punishing the UK? @BBCkatyaadler looks at whether it's in the EU's interest to stick the boot in on the UK in #Brexit negotiations  
I can understand why people voted Brexit and (just about) why those who were aware of them believed Lord Ashcroft or Arron Banks were patriots who believed in a better Britain. But seriously anyone who believes that now is just stupid. 
Let’s give control of Brexit back to the people as we will the railways & lay the track for a Labour Government. Great ⁦@Manuel_TSSA⁩ article 
Anyone want to get some EU flags and placards to this? #OurNHS or Brexit, you can't have both. #OurNHS70 
Sterling skids to fresh lows against euro and dollar as Brexit pressures grow This will affect pensioners on low incomes all across EU & Brits who work in the UK but live elsewhere. Not to mention the effect on the cost of living in UK. Brexit 'dividend'  
The government could be set to spend more than £100m on a feasibility study for a British satellite system post-Brexit.This is money that could be spent on schools, hospitals or life-saving medicines. It's time we re-evaluated our priorities. Please RT 
Am loving Brexiteers advice on how to survive Brexit. Malta. (Lord Ashcroft). Ireland. (Mogg.) French residency. (Lawson). Anyone got any suggestions for these gentlemen?  
I simply do not understand why the police *and* the Electoral Commission are not all over the referendum campaigns. What more do they need before they examine the evidence?  
Wanna know why Brexit is at the bottom of the EU's priorities?  
FARAGE: If Britain doesn't leave the EU on March 29th, 2019, it will be a betrayal, says @Nigel_Farage.'This referendum was about whether we become an independent country. That’s what people voted for.'  
Former Prime Minister John Howard urged the UK to take advantage of trade opportunities with Australia. “I hope the Brexit arrangement is as absolute and clean and unambiguous as it possibly can be."  #CANZUK 
Not surprisingly the EU will discuss its failures, rather than Brexit, especially the Euro and migration. It is a failing state which we need to escape from as soon as possible.  
If @theresa_may and her government are so confident that they can negotiate a good #Brexit deal for the country, then why not trust the people to have the final say? What is she afraid of? #PeoplesVote 
They know that #Brexit is an absolute shambles, and they’ve got the money to avoid the damage. The rest of us need a #PeoplesVote. 
Here's tomorrow's leaked letter by Theresa May to her colleagues.If it's fake, it's at least brilliant. Have fun watching Brexit explode. Please for now, be kind to anyone in power engaged to #StopBrexit. The madness MUST STOP first, before we go on with our own agendas. 
About as reliable as the UBS Brexit forecasts.  
Belizean billionaire Brexiteer gives free advice to UK companies for a bright post Brexit future. Quit the failing United Kingdom project and er...  move to the EU....  
As Theresa May prepares to face EU leaders at Brussels summit, there are calls for her to rotate squad and rest entire Brexit team. 
Trump:"The European Union was set-up to take advantage of the United States"I like the US, I like the people I've met there over the years, but how they managed to elect such a thick piece of ignorant shit and allow him to stay in office is beyond me. God Help America! pic.twitter.com/Y9KZaWZmfp 
We are living through the culmination of 30 years of Russian foreign policy goals: split the Western alliance, destabilise Europe, neuter the USA. Brexit is a key weapon in Putin’s arsenal. Any other take is obfuscation and sophistry.   
Ahead of Chequers, influential Leavers are being urged by those close to May to remember that if Britain can’t get a deal with the EU, the whole Brexit process could collapse. This is the inverse of May’s old ‘no deal is better than a bad deal’ line  
UK population growth slows as EU jobseekers stay away after Brexit  
Doctors leaders have passed motion calling for 2nd referendum. Shouldnt the BMA  be concentrating on why so few surgeries open in evenings and at weekends 
Thanks for the clarification but could you clear up one more thing: do you still say that “absolutely no one is talking about leaving the Single Market” like you were saying during the referendum. It’s kind of a bid deal point.  
Nigel Farage posing for photos as the value of the British pound tumbled due to Brexit. So patriotic.  
"The debate over #Brexit has started to turn into an assault on the institutions and values that have made liberal democracy work, the former Tory minister, EU Commissioner and Governor of Hong Kong, Chris Patten has said." 
The chaotic handling of Brexit is the only reason anyone is contemplating a public vote, writes Lord Mandelson  
“Not even in the top three issues” says @adamfleming on the importance of Brexit at Thursday's meeting of EU leaders in Brussels #bbcdp 
Please read this about the attempts to tie up brexit criminal proceedings in red tape. The last line is the killer. What matters to the brexit elite is getting over that line on 29/3/2019. After that they're laughing all the way to the bank.  
My cartoon Thursday @TheTimes. Theresa May at #eusummit....well, that's #Brexit sorted.  
With warnings just this week from BMW, Rolls-Royce, the SMMT & Nissan, Britain's motor industry is at risk of a Brexit car crash.This is why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. SIGN & SHARE our petition:  
We ARE governed by idiots. First they should have debated the outcome of the referendum. They didn't. Had the consensus been to leave, Article 50 should have been triggered only when the deal was readyand after checking the the 'will of the people' had not changed - which it has! 
Only the blind cannot see that a no-deal Brexit, with the UK crashing out of the EU, will cause massive queues at ports, food and medical shortages, maybe even power cuts... We've had a stable economy for so long people can't imagine it will end. Doesn't mean it won't, though. 
WATCH | "If Brexit gets delayed, that will be betrayal - no other word for it!" @Nigel_Farage responds to the latest Remoaner demands to push our exit back even further. No way!Support us at  
Tory #Brexit civil war deepens as MPs slam Remainer ministers for colluding with businesses to plot 'Project Fear Mark II'  
If every business threatening to pull out of the UK because of Brexit does so, we'll be plunged into a recession not seen since the Great Depression.As was predicted, way back before the referendum. Not so far-fetched now, is it? 
Add to that slashing workers rights and protections, healthcare, education, hike taxes in the biggest Brexit supporters for the NHS and slash them for their rich mates... I wonder if the penny will ever drop for the leavers... 
It's almost funny how spiteful Brexit has made some Remainers - Labour's leader in Brussels says he'll be cheering on Belgium tonight against England  
Note to self / warning: If you are a German woman in the UK who happens to be against Brexit, don’t tweet about football. Even the simple act of just *quoting* today’s headlines has confirm everything I have ever said about how hardline Brexiters react ...  
Brussels is only cutting Britain from a major satellite project ‘out of spite’ for Brexit says ex-Aussie PM who says EU ‘badly damaged’ his country  
I fully intend to call it BREXIT FINAL BOSS FIGHT. You can't stop me. 
Think I'm going to write a blog about Brexit tossers who have wrecked our country and are now seeking to profit from the carnage.  
Two big days ahead. Just arrived at @EPP summit in #Brussels with @HMcEntee to meet with fellow leaders from across Europe on #Brexit and other big issues. Then on to first day of @EuropeanCouncil where we’ll also discuss economic growth, migration, the US & Russia 
Agree w. @DanielJHannan that Brexit logic is cut taxes / regulation to mitigate macroeconomic shock. But politically naive surely? Majority of leave voters want increased spending (e.g. 350M / week) more restrictions (e.g. on freedom of movement) and protectionism, and they won!  
It's impressive how government readily finds funds to hold a referendum and has assured the six new regions won't cause further strain on our already meagre resources. But expansion of hospitals to add more beds is overlooked and citizens are dying daily because 'no beds.' 
Great to see Britain’s doctors joining our nurses & midwives to warn of the damage to our #NHS from #Brexit & demand a #PeoplesVote on any deal. 
Malta's second independence referendum was a YES votePrior to that they were told the ususal British Nationalist guff like:"you're too wee... too poor"  
Doctors  call for a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit Deal because it will damage our NHS  
Did you know: It is possible to hold binding referendums in the UK. An amendment to the Scottish Devolution Referendum of 1979 made the ref binding, though only if certain thresholds wre met.They wre not met, and so the plans for devolution were cancelled.#PeoplesVote 
Totally agree. That’s why this year Brexit shouldn’t be stage managed off the agenda. We can’t argue for a meaningful vote in Parliament, but not give one to our own members.  
EMMANUEL Macron has issued a warning to Theresa May on the first day of the EU Summit telling the prime minister she faces a “serious and grave” rebuke over the insufficient progress made in Brexit negotiations. 
Telling ⁦@markrutte⁩ about the #PeoplesVoteMarch and the momentum to stop Brexit ⁦@thomasbrake⁩ 
Farage trotting out the tired old dishonest line about Brexit making the UK an "independent" country. We are now FFS 
The Tories have a serious dislike of the Rule of Law when it applies to government. Consider their furious responses to the Article 50 court case starting with Theresa May describing it as "trying to subvert" democracy. No wonder they hate the ECJ and ECHR.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
#BreakingNews: A report from the #DExEU select committee says Parliament must be able to express its view clearly & advise the government on how to proceed in the event of a no deal brexit or rejection of the deal. Report: #FBPE 
.@bphillipsonMP – Nissan workers “will not forgive us” if Brexit costs their jobs  
you couldn't make it up - leading Brexiteer calling on UK companies to set up inside the EU post #Brexit - even Brexiteers now admitting that UK will not get same market access to largest trading partner - time for a #peoplesvote @peoplesvote_uk 
Fifa has warned England fans not to sing about Brexit. So there's only one thing to do, says Brendan O'Neill... #ENGBEL 
Brexit Britain’s dash for growth will be a disaster for the environment  
In Brussels on eve of European Council, chatting to politicos, it's clear Brexit has receded to a fringe annoyance, far down the list of priorities for most member states.It's strikingly different from the UK news bubble, which is kind of sad and ironic. 
One by one the leading brexiteers are setting up based in EU to profit despite #brexit.What makes Lord Ashcroft a bit different to Rees-Mogg, Nigel Lawson & others is that he is even loudly advertising the fact. Unbelievable.  
Ashcroft, Farage, Rees-Mogg, Lawson ... the Fill Yer Boots Boys of Brexit. Those who voted Leave were swindled good and proper.  
May insists Brexit talks still on track ahead of key EU summit ON TRACK TO WHERE THERESA ! ISN'T IT TIME YOU *CAME CLEAN* ?YOU REALLY DON'T HAVE A CLUE DO YOU ? 
By me for @TheNewEuropean: On Brexit, Farage, and hedge funds – and how the law is broken  
Want to know how the Brexit negotiations are actually going?  Read this:  
No-deal Brexit would plunge us into “chaos” - says John Lewis boss 
So now Lord Ashcroft, key architect of Brexit, is recommending UK companies move to Malta post Brexit  
I'm not sure any of the survey-based analysis of Brexit I have seen can really tell us "what people voted *for*". Most is associational/predictive. Maybe political scientists should avoid this sort of language and projection. 
"This is Project Fear with a vengeance, a renewed attempt to scare the British people into embracing an emasculated version of Brexit, complete with the continued supremacy of the EU courts and single market regulations," writes IDS  
Move operations from the UK to a tax haven, says tax avoiding Brexiter. It's the Brexit way.  
The government needs to be a more enthusiastic cheerleader for the benefits of Brexit:  
Aww, damn it.   Project Fear #2 is falling flat on it's face..  Has anyone got any suggestion on how to try to stop Brexit now?Russians?  We haven't used the Russians for a while. Brilliant - that'll work!  
The UK readership still rely on print for the news. @TheNewEuropean is  a great example of  one way that the nation responds to the  big questions of the day: start a paper.And the Big Question of our day & the one history will deem to have been: is #Brexit#ThursdayThoughts  
Yesterday, we reported that the BMA had joined the Royal College of Nursing and the Royal College of Midwives in calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Read why they believe Brexit will be bad for patients here. Please share. 
As Winston Churchill, reiterating Burke, made absolutely clear, an MP's first duty is to the welfare of the nation, not to party or voters. All the MPs hiding behind the excuse that they are only following voters' instructions need to be reminded of this. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
So .. the customs union was supposed to be at the top of the crunch summit today - instead brexit isn’t even mentioned !!  
.@JLongworthLML said in a pre-summit statement: “This is a crunch meeting – time is running out in the Brexit negotiations due to the EU’s intransigence. This week the EU must decide once and for all whether it wants a free trade deal with the UK."  
In today's Mail, Iain Duncan Smith urges people to listen less to the CBI on Brexit and more to small businesses. Good idea - let's perhaps ask the Federation of Small Businesses what they think.  
After being spat at, ppl doing Nazi salute & screaming TWO WORLD WARS & ONE WORLD CUP! at me & even nice ppl saying that as if it were funny, w GER out of World Cup now I'm clearly in with the right bunch on Twitter. Not all UK tiresome racists. Brexit vote helped me find u.  
I thought #Brexit was going to make the U.K prosperous? Why on earth would anyone want to leave? Or did your lot just lie to everyone and know it’s going to be a disaster? 
"Brexit will definitely be brilliant, but when it turns out it isn't, and you have to move your company away from the UK, here is my recommendation on the best EU location."  
Hang on a minute. Weren't we told that UK companies wouldn't need to go anywhere after #Brexit? That the sunlit uplands were here, in Blighty, rather than in Malta? Funny how things have changed since 2016. The will of the people may have changed too. #PeoplesVote 
The compelling Tory case for a second Brexit vote via @FT 
The choices are, as they have always been, between debilitating stupid Brexit, catastrophic Brexit and No Brexit.And not one of the brexit options was ever put to the people for their permission.  This is an illegitimate con 
what happened to global Britain? what happened to the brexit dividend. and why do companies need a EU base. aren't British companies meant to be trading with the rest of the world 
Brexit is going to be so good for the country that you need to get your money out of the UK, and into an EU jurisdiction.  
Waitrose is closing down in Camden to be replaced by Aldi if you're wondering how Brexit is going. 
This tweet typifies the idiocy of Brexit and many Brexiters. Airbus generates £7.8bn for UK economy each year and directly/indirectly employs 114,000 people, but Brexiters’ lack of business and economic acumen, coupled with their hatred of EU, blinds them to the consequences.  
There are now thousands of those who regret voting Leave in the Referendum, or didn't/couldn't vote, so are #RemainerNow Those who speak out about this are highly influential, so please share this to encourage more to 'go public'@MrsEmmaJK @SkyNews #ThursdayThoughts #StopBrexit 
Pretty sure Blair wasn’t in charge at last year’s Labour conference when Momentum (owner J Lansman) made sure there wasn’t a vote on the party’s Brexit policy.  
This brexit is insidiously harming our democracy. It has a a growing whiff of corruption. It is being factionally and incompetently pursued. It is making Britain poorer and less respected. It is dividing our people. It is harming our institutions.And it’s a bit shit  
This morning on @SkyNews the EU are  "frustrated" over Brexit negotiations. Frustrated? The EU have been frustrating negotiations right from the start. All they want is concession after concession from the UK. It's time to walk away from negotiations now & go our own way. 
Nissan is putting all UK investment plans on hold until there is more certainty over Brexit. They're deferring all long-term business decisions while they remain "in the dark" about UK's future relationship with the EU. This on top of Airbus & BMW...#BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
He’s just won the referendum Bell end!  
What business is saying about Brexit, and why. My latest Brexit blog post:  
Important meeting of the EU Council of Ministers today. With only a few months to reach a Brexit deal, it’s not even a main agenda item. #BrexitChaos 
One of the alleged benefits of #Brexit is, that once the UK leaves the EU, it will no longer be shackled and will be free to sign trade deals. So how come, whilst the UK is still in the EU, has it signed a deal to supply 50 million in beef to China.Asking for a friend Moggy 
EXC So Spain got their paragraph on Gibraltar #brexit veto.... as we reported yesterday on the row here.  
And here we have it in black and white . . the real reason why the Tories want Brexit. And Scotland’s choice is plain: independence and our won choices, or a market-driven UK with no respect for workers or their rights.  
'The regulator found “serious flaw” in how 'Love Saves the Day Foundation' was managed and administered, with trustees including Banks and Liz Bilney, failing to properly account for all charitable funds.'Without paywall c/o @FerretScot 
Arron Banks' "charity" said it it had made more than £700,000 of donations.In fact it had made none.Misleading the public again? Seems to be a pattern here...#Brexit 
Rees-Mogg says Treasury 'coordinating business attacks on Brexit'  
Of course I worry about the economic effects of Brexit. What really scares me though is the erosion of human rights likely to happen when we’re “free” of EU oversight. We’re seeing in the US how quickly things can change, after all. 
Tony Blair has said that "catastrophic" Brexit must be halted. @NickFerrariLBC asks: Should we be listening to his concerns? 
Theresa May’s former right hand man has had enough of watching the EU run rings round us over Brexit   He’s right, we MUST change tack and show some steel.  The public will back the PM if she stands up for Britain - not if she keeps capitulating.   
I'd like to say something.As you read about massive Brexit job losses, business failures and company losses, don't start to normalise them.Every single one is no food for a family and a lost home.This is not normal. No politician has ever betrayed us so badly. 
So brilliant to see these placards held high at last Saturday's march - no #Conservative who cares about this country and its prosperity should be supporting the #Brexit the #Tories are currently dragging us all into. #stopbrexit #fbpe #PeoplesVote 
Now #patriotic Lord Ashcroft @Conservatives offers sound #brexit advice... for British companies looking to re-locate to #EU27     to avoid the disastrous effects of the #BrexitShambles !#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Leaving the EU presents new business & investment opportunities for the U.K. In the first 6 months after the Referendum Britain attracted over £15bn of new foreign direct investment    
Brexit is bad for Britains health, doctors sayBrexit is bad for Britains car industry, car industry sayBrexit is bad for Britains wealth, BoE sayBrexit is bad for Britains business, CBI sayBrexit is bad for Britains shops, retailers sayBrexit is bad for Britain and itspeople 
The costs of Brexit keep piling up as we pay billions to pull down the house we helped to build, & insist on building a new inferior one. Anyone remember the costs of constructing a new satellite system equivalent to Galileo on the side of a bus? #BrexitReality 
May's already betrayed Brexit & pushed the Tories to the left of New Labour. She's lost the plot, abandoned the Tory core vote & Brexiters. Now just desperately pandering to the EU & anyone left who can still stomach her.  
Nissan is halting UK investment plans while it remains in the dark about #Brexit plans. Come on Sunderland it's time to be a #RemainerNow! #StopBrexit #Brexit 
But Brexit is going to be great for business, no? 
The fact #Brexit isn’t a main agenda item at the EU Council summit starting today underlines the lamentable lack of progress that has been made.This is not the EU’s fault but a UK cabinet having its own summit next week to resolve its differences and to agree a position #shambles 
#Brexit is bad for Britain’s #health, our doctors say. The @TheBMA calls for a #PeoplesVote #referendum on final deal 
If May - who has already failed to keep a pledge to cut migration for EIGHT years - presides over a Brexit that does not prioritise reducing immigration then that will create the conditions in Britain for a rise in "populism" far bigger than during the 2012-16 UKIP insurgency. 
“You’re going to have to think about the plane that takes off at 11pm in London on the eve of the cut-off date and lands after midnight in Paris,” said one senior French official. “Will it be allowed to land?”The reality of no-deal Brexit  
Must be Brexit  
The British political class still hasn’t grasped EU basics, which is why the Brexit negotiations keep going round in circles. My latest.  
In today's news: - UK 'heading for worst possible Brexit' warns Theresa May's former aide - Rees-Mogg accuses Hammond of coordinating business attacks on Brexit- May to meet EU27 at Brussels summit today- Growing German anxiety over ‘no deal’ 
Theresa May urged to clarify Brexit environment policy as over 1,400 British industrial sites face cliff-edge  via @BIUK_Politics 
Growing speculation as per @KateEMcCann this am that PM could allow unfettered access to EU migrants who have a job post Brexit. That’s not even an emergency brake 
Nissan 'halts investment plans' while it remains 'in the dark' over Brexit plans, according to reports  
Me, crying: You....you can’t just make everything about elite reactions to Brexit.Spiked: that bird? Elite reactions to Brexit. The weather? Elite reactions to Brexit. Your hair loss? Elite reactions to Brexit.  
Apparently the #HedgeFund, a nature project, warrants the attention of Brexit and MAGA trolls. Which goes to show how little those who direct them want any of us to find community and positivity. Well, I draw a line. They are not having this too. 
ALL MPs should cancel their summer recess this year and sort out the brexit mess - by the time they are back we’re sleepwalking out of the EU with no deal while business spend the summer planning to move . 
NEW: MPs, MEPs & the UK energy sector urge Theresa May to clarify a key Brexit environmental policy amid fears over 1,4000 industrial sites face cliff-edge  
Do you mean, like, members having a say on Brexit...?  
A motion opposing Brexit, supporting membership of the European single market and calling for the public to have a final say on the terms of the deal was passed at the British Medical Association annual meeting in Brighton on Wednesday #PeoplesVote 
How carrying a Brexit bag led to Lucy Harris falling foul of a fellow commuter:  
A £1.7bn Brexit bonus for Scottish fisherman.A Brexit bonus that the SNP don't want our fishermen to have.  
“Business always gets it wrong,” eh ? Unlike IDS whose flagship Universal Credit scheme ( he flounced off the job, Brexit style) which the NAO denounced last week as a costly failure ( so far) !!  
so, in summary, Brexit= these guys make a killing while the rest of us sleep in tents outside warehouses & shit in carrier bags bc legislation around rights at work has been fucked off. this is what it's always been about, always. Always.  
Eight months until Brexit day, the U.K.'s two main political parties remain officially committed to policies the EU could never agree to 
Imagine being born in the UK, you & your parents move to Germany when you are 3, just after you turn 18 the Brexit referendum happens and you are not allowed because you've not lived in the UK for 15 yearsFuture in doubt#PeoplesVotePetition #FinalSayForAll #OptionToRemain 
Look forward to welcoming @thomasbrake to Brussels today for discussions with Liberal PMs. We will press the urgent need to guarantee Brits living in the EU their rights to live, move and work after Brexit @ALDEgroup @BritishInEurope 
When you see Montgomerie and the like go into paroxysms of delight at the prospect of reversing change in the US their vision of post Brexit Britain seems pretty clear, with Milne and his puppets naive but willing midwives 
Some things never changeFans blamed for HillsboroughMiners blamed for OrgrieveFirefighters blamed for GrenfellPatients blamed for NHS crisisCorbyn blamed for Brexit.Tories know when people are too angry to think straight they can blame whoever they want and get away with it 
Ironically Germany played football like the UK is negotiating Brexit: without a plan, without conviction and with a divided team that looks uncomfortable to be there. 
This is what #Brexit is about. Don't be under any illusions. Removing all worker rights, pollution and food controls etc so the rich can make themselves richer WITH NO HINDRANCE  
Constitutional law students in UK and US at time of Brexit and Trump - you do not know how lucky you are.For decades constitutional law has been dull.  And unlucky the rest of us, when constitutional law is this "exciting".For constitutional law should be dull. 
From the same people who forecast a post-Brexit economic crash for the UK.  
#Brexit 'dark money' was 'channelled through #DUP' 
This might seem obvious but why would companies seek to locate to Malta when #Brexit provides so many wonderful opportunities?  
The Tory party cracks are now cavenous. How much longer can May hang on?How much longer can this rag tag Tory party stay in govt.Brexit is killing them   
Good morning, Europe. (oh, just one more thing: we will either unify or go bust. Because this guy isn‘t even our biggest challenge. And neither is Brexit.)  
My blog on why Malta offers a superb location for UK companies needing an EU base after Brexit  
Theresa May to explain lack of Brexit progress to EU leaders over dinner in Brussels What excuses this time? EU are bound to have heard the one about the dog eating the homework before. 
Boris Johnson’s Brexit explosion ruins Tory business credentials Even business is saying the Tories are anti business now. Destroying jobs.Destroying the economy.Destroying business.Wake up Tory voters. Tories are bad for business.Bad for YOU. 
Nick Timothy: ‘Brexit Department officials complain that the Cabinet Office is stopping them from dealing directly with member states because “it upsets the Commission”. ‘Britain repeatedly says we want the EU to prosper; they repeatedly say they want us to fail.’ @Facts4euOrg 
Unbelievable.  The hard red lines set out in the Lancaster House speech & the 2017 manifesto which left us with no majority (both overseen by N Timothy) have nothing to do with making it more complicated than it needed to be to secure a good Brexit deal?  
The party that has broken the NHS, Schools, Welfare, Police, Fire, Defence etc, promises you a better, brighter Brexit Britain.Are you SERIOUSLY that fucking gullible?#PeoplesVote or are you too chicken shit scared? 
Disgusted by the LibDems making Kudos out of Jeremy Corbyn not being on the people's vote march,because he was on a PRE-PLANNED trip to visit refugees. The same Party who supported the referendum and the Austerity policies we have now,are Con merchants;never to be trusted  
“Yeah, listen to me, eh?I lied to start an illegal war in Iraq, killing countless innocent peopleI intentionally opened the doors into BritainI undermined the fabric of UK & trashed the economyNow? I want YOU to listen to ME on BrexitI want it stopped”Fuck off, Tony pic.twitter.com/vtoXtMlQWu 
Theresa May will find today Europe doesn’t revolve around Brexit and our neighbours focus on other issues. Just as well when she has little to say. Her 27 fellow leaders will at least ignore her politely, unlike the Cabinet 
To secure this investment, Greg Clark went to Japan twice within a week to offer post-referendum ‘reassurance’. He has now lost the battle within Cabinet re the SM & CU. Sunderland will lose the investment and the UK all credibility #stopbrexit 
Nissan chairman and chief executive, Carlos Goshn, is said to have announced the Japanese firm is deferring all long-term business decisions while it remains "in the dark" about Britain's future relationship with the EU.Another #Brexit casualty. #ProjectReality 
If May and her government have made so little progress on the Brexit agreement in two years, what are the chances of them suddenly solving it in the next 6 weeks?Virtually nil. Which means it's No Deal or No Brexit. 
Remember Sunderland? Their delight about their strong vote for #Brexit? How could they not have know they were destroying their own futures and the prosperity of their communities?#BrexitLies 
“Terry Crews is weak.”-A man fragile enough that he’d throw his career and possibly his freedom in jeopardy because he views sexual assault as a referendum on his manhood. 
The Government needs to be a more enthusiastic cheerleader for the benefits of Brexit, says Lord Stoddart  
'If any country has a cultural problem with racism it's England – a problem that has only been exacerbated by #Brexit, rooted as it is in anti-migrant hostility, xenophobia, nativism & British colonial tropes' (Op-Ed by @JohnWight1) 
Why did we go? What happened when we got there? The story of ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ on the Irish border. He thinks May should call Dublin’s bluff. Many think it’s not that simple #irishborder #brexit  
There's no Brexit dividend. Leavers don't care  via @bopinion 
Remain campaigners reveal the 'final deal' question:Shall we:A. Be a proud democratic independent nation standing tall in the Big Wide World?orB. Crawl back to the EU on bended knees begging forgiveness. To cringe as Brussels' eternal cashcow and plaything?Viva Brexit!  
All dressed up and nothing to say - Theresa May has agreed to speak to the 27 EU leaders about Brexit plans at summit dinner on Thursday 28 June. 
Brexit Britain’s dash for growth will be a disaster for the environment | Owen Jones  
Nissan 'halts investment plans' while it remains 'in the dark' over Brexit plans, according to reports  
The Russians were behind Trump’s win, Marine Le Pen’s non-win, Brexit, and my middle school ice cream committee election?What haven’t we been blamed for? There’s the Turkish election.But the Pakistani elections are coming up. We must all be vigilant.Nutcases—the lot of you!  
Wake up @uklabour @Conservatives there is bad brexit or horrible brexit. Those are your choices. Faced with this choice the only option is to Remain in EU. If you don't the backlash in this country will be severe and we hold you each individually responsible. Do your job 
"Nissan made about 500,000 cars last year, and 80 per cent of them were exported, we represent one third of the total car production of the UK in our plant in Sunderland," 
The compelling Tory case for a second Brexit vote  
In a single move, Senate Democrats could end the conservative SCOTUS majority, make the midterms a referendum on the past half century of progressive reforms, and transform Mitch McConnell’s skullduggery into the greatest self-inflicted wound in the history of the Senate. 
If you want to know what US Embassy London really thinks of #brexit, watch fascinating clip of diplomats discussing political & economic implications in documentary they allowed Channel 4 to film.  
Rhetorical question but why did @jeremycorbyn call for the immediate trigger of #Article50 at 7.29am on the 24.06.16 if he didn't want #Brexit?Nobody had a plan to implement Brexit. Not Government, nor opposition or Civil Service.#Bonkers #Lexit #Labour #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Blue state America, change is being forced upon you. Join Canada. Imagine a Brexit that is a genuinely good idea. All your wealth, all our free health care and taxes that are just slightly higher, inexpensive universities, no fascism, handsome young leader. Think about it. 
May can pass all the legislation she wants; Brexit is impossible to deliver, especially in less than 9 months. she can't suddenly pull out a magic wand and create a Brexit deal out of thin air; people are demanding answers, and she & Brexit will crumble. 
Brexit: services without a smile - there is often no difference in regulation between goods and services in the Single Market. In business, provision of both is increasingly intertwined. The idea of a "goods only" market is a chimera...  #Brexinfo. 
Read the Judgement from the Royal Court of Justice, 12/06/18Advisory Referendum can't decide that we leave the EUParliament wasn't asked to vote to leave the EUJudge stated @theresa_may decided!Not a Constitutional Decision (A50(1))Judgement: >  
They were banking on the pound's decline then, be sure they'll do it again, just when we need that collective wealth we've all worked so hard for to be worth something. There is a depth of treachery here - a sick, sorry, sewer-depth. Welcome to the real #Brexit 
another example: if you care about voting rights & collective bargaining (which SCOTUS will continue assailing), doesn't get bigger than MO's August veto referendum on "right to work" & FL's popular initiative on rights restoration. Both took tremendous organizing, & more needed. 
The majority now wants to #Remain in the EU, polls show - and by a bigger and bigger margin all the time.Brexit is not the will of the people.Hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
If EU is offering Scotland a lifeline against hard Brexit (which is now the most likely outcome), I'd say grab it. I'm English and wish you Scots all the best. You'll get fuck all of nothing from Westminster.  
EU has 'divided and ruled' UK politicians into accepting WORSE possible Brexit deal  
It was is will be a referendum on people who support Trump versus those who don’t.  
We can't #Brexit. The government has no capacity to organise it. "The chief constable revealed he had yet to submit a business case ... because he was “trying to find a  mechanism and an audience” for doing so." #StopBrexit 
It isn't the deadlock which is stoking fascism, Keir. It's Brexit. Brexit is inherently fascist, racist and xenophobic. So.when will the Labour front bench wake up?Brexit deadlock is stoking European fascism, warns Keir Starmer  
Brexit obvious point #293: FoMSay I'm a contract programmer. To bid for work in Milan, Dublin, or Paris on an equal basis with locals, I must be able to go there to do the work.     A single market for services automatically means I have to be free to relocate.Simples! 
Brexit leaders prove that the campaign to leave the EU was entirely driven by self-interests  
Now Nissan’s suspending long-term investment decisions. What a Brexit car crash 
Peter Brookes on Theresa May and Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Theresa May's cancelled Cabinet sleepover suggests she's plotting a soft Brexit - Business Insider Sleep on it. The people want Brexit. That means Brexit.   
Quite - the Bank of England calculates #brexit now costing us £400 m/week. Not quite the extra £350 m/week we were promised for the #NHS... 
‘Serious flaw’ in management of #Brexit donor Arron Banks’s charity  
'Slashing regulations'. In other words, getting rid of any protection for working people. Let the gig economy run wild in the European offshore tax haven that Brexit will create. Insane  
Jacob Rees-Mogg accused others of "terminological inexactitude" when claiming his company relocated 'hedge funds' to the EU.Careful with his words, they've actually moved assets & an office to the EU - not hedge funds...still demonstrates how disingenuous he is on Brexit!#r4today 
“Where’s the Brexit people voted for? One that starves public services and the NHS of more funds, destroys workers rights, allows even bigger bonuses for bosses and makes other Grenfells more likely”  
Proud to be part of this book ! My copy finally arrived this morning. Brexit is more then poltics.. It is ruining people's lives... Whilst destorying a country. @InLimboBrexit 
Sorry, JC’s spokesperson, you are talking nonsense. Until you let go of the myth that ‘Labour could produce a good Brexit’, you are letting the country down. Badly.  
 because even the @BBCNews and every other sensible journalist can see there is NO evidence - it’s not a Story it’s a fantasy to try and undermine Brexit - stop sniffing that glue  
The question is no longer is the referendum result valid, it isn’t. The question now is what are we going to do about it?#fbpe 
I get the surprise and enjoyment at Germany’s (rare) failure. But some of the pundits and media coverage has Brexit far right racist overtones.Germany as a country is boss.Their football is boss. Yay, They tripped up. That’s all. 
"Democracy is not something that happens at fixed time, it's an ongoing process," she argued, the Brexit vote was "based on conjecture, misinformation and outright lies."When you have new information you make a new choice, That's what democracy is about." 
Today, the British Medical Association (BMA) voted to support a #PeoplesVote & to “oppose Brexit”  
If you are geoblocked but would still like to see the BBC Spotlight from last night (Brexit Dark Money & the DUP), learn what a magnet link is & take a hint: .(a little birdie told me BBC would not actively object to this)(if they do, I'll take this down) 
Britain 'heading for worst possible Brexit' over freedom of movement, warns Theresa May's former top aide  
Of six top topics for EU Council tomorrow - none of them are Brexit 
Brexit idiot @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on @SkyNews telling the people of Northern Ireland that they don’t need a border.  Didn’t he campaign to “take back control of our borders” (which we have always had by the way) ??? 
This insane idea that the Brexit vote was an expression of some ultra-libertarian vision for the UK is such utter, utter bullshit.  
In the next few weeks many EU nations may close borders to the tidal wave of immigrants/refugees and asylum seekers threatening to drown their economies. This was the reason so many people voted for Brexit. Why can't Remainers understand this? There are none so blind as ... 
You're right. Timing is everything when you bet against the system. It's wonderful that he and his hedge fund mates made millions off the back of #Brexit. Such an honourable group of people. 
As my colleague @PamelaFalk points out: In 2017, 97% of votes in a referendum were for Statehood (23% voted) 
It's a concrete illustration of what I was talking about when trying to explain why estimated costs of Brexit look comparable to a trade war that would reduce trade much more: it's because these are real trade costs, not revenue-generating tariffs 2/  
Nick Timothy,responsible for losing a general election deemed unloseable in 2017,lashes out at Ireland for daring to defend its interests in Brexit talks &suggests the extraordinarily positive UK-Irish relationship be casually tossed away on altar of pure Brexit. No thanks Nick.  
Wales voted to Brexit. We’re poorer & can’t afford this. Had we stayed in the EU this is exactly the sort of scheme that would have attracted EU regional/ infrastructure funding. With Airbus a double whammy for Wales.  
This is a really illuminating article: about how Brexit will raise Honda's costs by making just-in-time production impossible 1/  
*** #StopBrexit action ***We, the undersigned, demand a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal.150,000 of us have already signed.Let’s make it 200,000+.Tag in some friends to spread the word.And please RT, sign and share.  
BREXIT: Nissan 'halts investment plans' while it remains 'in the dark' over #Brexit plans, according to reports /  
Despite Remainer hysteria, voters are worrying less about a 'no deal' Brexit, writes @asabenn 
#Brexit will leave two dangerous political legacies:1. The idea of the "Will of the People" which portrays political opponents as enemies of the people, and opposition as anti-democratic.2. The idea that MPs should be obedient delegates of the voters.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
November is going to be a referendum on Trump, writes Errol Louis for @CNNOpinion  
@DanielJHannan drops the mask: this is what Brexit is all about: slashing the state, pushing up prices through corporate monopolies, greater inequality. In short: making his sort richer & making the poorer 99% pay for it.  
Tomorrow, @AlexSalmondShow will feature the first in a three part series on Gibraltar, as the territory comes to terms with #Brexit. Huge thanks to all the team @SunbornGib and in particular Grainne Underwood, for providing us with such excellent filming locations on board. 
My quote in the @Daily_Express about Tony Blair trying to delay Brexit.  "There have been enough delays already. The public just want politicians to get on with delivering a clean Brexit... 
The time for playing nice with the EU is over:  #Brexit 
It's almost as if we should have decided what we wanted Brexit to look like before the referendum, rather than still squabbling about it 2 years after.  
I'm going to give up fighting #BrexitWell basically, never.#PeoplesVote 
Brexitnoun (from the English): Despair derived from a completely avoidable act of self-harm.  
This Corbyn excuse sounds eerily familiar: “it’s not Communism as an abstract itself that is putting jobs at risk but the Government’s shambolic approach to Communism”Brexit would be a shining success if only the right people is in charge—namely, Corbyn himself.  
It is ironic that Leavers believing #Brexit will restore sovereignty and return control are backing the project of an elite faction whose aim is to reduce democracy to a shell, leaving us in the hands of a global kleptocracy bearing no loyalty to any nation. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Now even Nissan - largest car plant in UK - warning about risk to jobs from #Brexit uncertainty. While politicians fiddle around with soundbites, business is struggling to keep plans for jobs in UK 
Thursday's Express: "Fury at Blair bid to wreck #Brexit" (via @MsHelicat) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
37% (not enough for a public sector strike) of a rigged electorate in an advisory referendum mis-sold as mandatory for a catch-all 4 word slogan, narrowly won by electoral chicanery and a torrent of tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press hate & lies.We need a #PeoplesVote!#FBPE 
"It is time for a reckoning"An unflinching, bold piece of writing about #Brexit, British-Irish, & the #Border by @drdawnmiranda. Completely different from anything I've read on the topic, inc. powerful extracts & analysis of @PoetrySiobhan's poetry.  
No doubt about it, our financial sector needs reform and better regulation, and we need to distribute the resulting wealth more fairly, BUT we CANNOT afford to lose this sort of money Brexit: bank contracts worth trillions at risk, says finance watchdog  
No surprise that coal seam gas operator SANTOS has been testing the water usage rules as they prepare for fracking operations in NSWSANTOS is working with the government to “clarify some administrative issues”This #NSWvotes is a referendum on fracking in NSW#NSWpol #CSG 
Congratulations Sunderland Leave voters! You won!“Nissan halts Investment plans while it remains in the dark about Brexit plans” 
The face of a brutally hard Brexit.Our priority needs to be making a success of Britain. That means staying in the EU, supporting workers and increasing equality.  
Brexit is so 2016. Dorset is turning against Brexit, says campaigner AC Grayling #dorset 
Now hopefully the chickens have finally come home to roost for this evil @EastwoodTories member. One would assume that @PM4EastRen will be biting his fingernails as will everyone in @ScotTories BBC Spotlight: Brexit, Dark Money and the DUP  
Anyone having problems watching the Spotlight investigation into the DUP on BBC NI - you can watch here.... 
French government to impose chilling pro-EU indocrination programme at primary schools to ward off Euroscepticism:  #Brexit 
Ministers have been told that after the European summit at the end of this week there will effectively be only six weeks’ negotiating time left to finalise the Brexit deal. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteBremain #FBPE 
In the last 24 hours, the midterms have changed from a referendum on Maxine Waters to a referendum on Ocasio-Cortez’s immigration stance to a referendum on SCOTUS.BE SMART: It’s gonna come down to turnout. 
Brilliant! Pic from the British Medical Association conference today... ...where the BMA voted overwhelmingly for a #PeoplesVote, to let the public know that Brexit is bad for the NHS, and to “oppose Brexit as a whole”.#ThereIsNoBrexitDividend 
To be fair, this is right. This is Brexit Britain. This is what Brexit *is*. This is its point, its purpose. That and an angry, nostalgic yearning for a happy land of no pushy foreigners like in the made-up old days.  
Unless he changes his tune on Brexit, Corbyn will lose the support of young voters. My advice to him is that he should back a public vote on the deal, a position that isn't anti-Brexit because we can always vote yes to that deal if it is good enough.  
I’m delighted that my podcast guest this week is @matteorenzi - Italy’s youngest ever prime minister discusses what has happened to Italian politics, how populism can be defeated, his thoughts on Brexit, and what has gone wrong for Italian football...  
"To make a success of Brexit we should, by coincidence, be doing all the things I've been advocating for 30 years."  
A mistake in my view. Brexit will mean full disenfranchisement for some British citizens abroad. It’s time to rethink the 15 yr rule as other countries have done: Labour 'betraying' British citizens abroad who cannot vote  #votesforlife @BritishInEurope 
We can argue forever about the unborn and what they are and your motivations. Donald Trump doesn’t give a shit about them and no US state that’s tried a referendum to take on Roe v Wade has succeeded. Even SD baulked at the absolute life stance: no rape, incest clause. 
This is one of the main reasons I marched on #stopbrexitsaturday.I listened to the medical professionals and workers who have consistently said any form of Brexit shafts the NHS on every level. The bus was a lie. #PeoplesVotePetition#SaveOurNHS 
Brexit with no deal is "unthinkable because we are completely unprepared for it," says the chairman of John Lewis."The chaos that would ensue is something that no rational person would want."  
Which should surely give pause for thought? If Brexit were the great opportunity for Britain that Brexiters say, wouldn't there be loads of firms lining up to say that now we're getting out of the EU they want to make investments that they wouldn't otherwise have made? 2/2 
Numerous firms saying they're not investing because of Brexit. Others (cheered by Brexiters) are doing so despite Brexit. But *no* major investment has been announced *because* of Brexit i.e. we wouldn't have done this, but now we are 1/2 
AND FINALLY Arron Banks Insurance Empire ISN'T: his companies are screwed - so WHOSE MONEY BANKROLLED #BREXIT?  
"The pesky Jocks are getting all uppity about the Brexit again, seems more of them than ever before are questioning the logic of remaining in the union" "Call that boy Gary at the BBC. Get him to hit them with the fish patter, make up some pish up about millions of fish pounds"  
Spanish conglomerate that owns 25% of Heathrow to relocate to Amsterdam because of Brexit  
I remember you @vincecable between 2010 & 2015 laughing & joking with the Tory front bench as you inflicted horrific austerity on us all whilst cutting tax for the rich & corporations. YOU & the Tories created Brexit & stood with Cameron as he introduced the referendum.   
Brexit: of the corrupt, by the corrupt, for the corrupt.  
1. #Brexiters & #Lexiters U probably think U just need to pass 29/03/19 & U'll be home & dry & #Remain just disappears. Well if U get away with with this tainted #Brexit coup know this, we may not have stopped the #BrexitShambles but by God the next task will be stopping you. 
At least, for once, @BorisJohnson is being honest about the probable outcome. #Brexit #FuckBusiness pic.twitter.com/pPkB2tJz6w 
I listened in mounting disbelief as Humphrys read out his D Mail diatribe endlessly interrupting Blair as he tried to correct a Brexit propaganda. Parody of the BBC current affairs radio journalism I began in  
This is a brilliant summary of #brexit Why are we sleep walking to the cliff? Have we learnt nothing from 20th century history? I’m so proud to be a European. We are stronger, better, richer and peaceful together. #StopBrexit #BrexitReality 
Why has #Brexit turned the @Conservatives leadership against business and the @UKLabour leadership against jobs? One is not listening to businesses like Honda & BMW; the other is not listening to the Unions. And neither are hearing the calls for a #PeoplesVote #BrexitShambles 
He was in the Middle East visiting refugee camps you crass wankers. Let’s not forget it was the Lib Dem’s who enabled Brexit in the first place. Never forget. Never forgive.  
I tweet, march & protest the shit out of #Brexit because I need to know that, in the final analysis, I did whatever I could to stop the demise of our country.#PeoplesVote 
It's that feeling of being democratically silenced by the system that meant people felt they weren't being heard and that led to Brexit.My MP is Sajid Javid. My vote has NEVER counted. Most people feel they can't vote for the party that represents them, because there's no point 
Two factors:1) It dramatically raises chances of *confirming* the Justice, since even one red state D defection would be huge2) In theory midterm referendum on judges helps GOP more, but vote now takes over fall conversation instead of health care, maybe lifts morale of base  
A referendum on Irish Unity is a distinct possibility within the next few years.Everyone who supports Irish Unity needs to be on the electoral register.You can now apply online. Please do so and pass this on.This generation will deliver Irish Unity. 
Tony Blair wants to delay Brexit. His EU paymasters are panicking and sending their 'poodles' out to strike fear into ordinary Brits. We don't fucking dance! Roll on our real independence day! 
Doctors today voted to 'oppose #Brexit as a whole' following a vote at the AGM of the @TheBMA. The medics said that leaving the #EU is ‘bad for Britain’s health’ and endorsed a new vote on the final Brexit deal (#PeoplesVote) RT @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
He'd never have asked the public about an intricately complex thing with a yes/no referendum as he clearly realised that this sort of crisis might result. In comparison, Cameron was a political amoeba, and a stupid one at that.@JolyonMaugham @abcpoppins @BrexitBin @MollyMEP 
In the end Brexit is a fiction, an absurd dream, which millions were tricked into believing.What will be real is the economic collapse which results from the cultish obsession & it will damage the lives of the tricked millions. 
Funny how stuff comes around constantly...Here’s my article of June last year on Richard Cook, the DUP, and the Brexit Leave Campaigns...  
Fellow Remainers please don't let your reasonable manner persuade #Brexit politicians that we are just an accepting doormat over which Brexit can be driven. Make it very clear to them that we would regard #Brexit without a #PeoplesVote as a crime. #StopBrexit 
Will of the people sounds SOOOOO much better than 'the will of only 37% of the electorate, not counting all those denied a vote, in a manipulated, advisory referendum', doesn't it?#PeoplesVote, what are you afraid of? 
So wave the flag, chant about Brexit and we proud of being English.   
“Do you think we have a ‘settled Brexit policy’, Diane?”“What’s that? A sultana bread pudding, Jeremy? I love them”“No. A ‘settled Brexit policy’. Do you know what Brexit is, Diane?”“Is it when everyone is racist, Jeremy?”“Yes. That’s it, Diane. Well done”  
For the first time ever I wrote a long (20+) thread with multiple links, but my broadband dropped and the whole thing disappeared (FWIW it was on Brexit and FDI). So, instead, my first ever GIF. But I'll always believe that thread would have changed everything.  
The One Thing Campaign - a platform to give young people a voice to air their views about Brexit One Thing Report with Brexit Taskforce 50 & young people got an opportunity today to express their views with MEPs and protest outside the Parliament in Brussels Proud of them all  
Don’t think this will help our Brexit negotiations  
None of these guys had a say in the 2016 EU Referendum...But they will live with the consequences longer than many that did..Democracy?Please sign and RT and carry on RTing Let them have a say on their future..#peoplesvote#socialpower 
Royal Assent has been graciously granted to the EU (Withdrawal) Act 2018... so I guess I can stick all this paperwork from the Bill stages in the recycle bin.  Along with the Sewel Convention and the devolution settlement  #PowerGrab #Brexit  
… but a year where Democrats are trying to turn Senate confirmation of SCOTUS picks into a referendum. 
Tony Blair has surfaced once again, calling for an extension to the Brexit deadline and a second referendum. He is deluding himself. #FarageOnLBC 
Has Tony Blair become delusional after calling for an extension to the Brexit deadline? @Nigel_Farage is live 
'He's as popular as a rattlesnake in a lucky dip' Fury as Blair orders Brexit POSTPONEMENT  
The BMA's call for a divisive 2nd referendum risks the NHS losing out from the #BrexitDividend 
This is a great speech and summary. Mairi says it as it is. Please RT so that the world and Scotland can see what is going on with Brexit, Mundell and with the so called uk government in regard to Scotland and all of the important issues that are unfolding before our very eyes.  
If you had the wisdom of Solomon and the charm of the devil you could not deliver the fantasy Brexit promised in the referendum. Yes, May has handled it badly but the basic problem is that you can’t have the same benefits outside the EU as you can inside. It’s obvious!  
The British Medical Association is fully against #Brexit.I believe the majority of leave voters are good people that wanted to help the NHS. They now have a real chance to do just that by backing #PeoplesVote. 
EU leaders to give May ‘serious’ warning over Brexit progress  
It happened because two Tory MPs went over to UKIP and Cameron shat a brick that the Tories were gonna lose the racist vote.The plan was to steal UKIP’s thunder by pledging the referendum in the 2015 manifesto, go back into coalition, then drop the ref and blame the Liberals.  
May is going for a soft Brexit with the UK following EU rules and regulations on goods and upholding EU law. This will stop us signing free trade treaties. To ensure she gets her way, the whole cabinet, not the Brexit subcommittee has been invited to Chequers to agree. Pathetic. 
Corbyn wanted to invoke A50 THE DAY AFTER the vote.He whipped his MPs to support the Tories on A50 and FIRED three shadow ministers for calling for a final deal vote.He stated (FALSELY) that it’s impossible to stay in the Customs Union.Voting Labour IS voting for Hard Brexit.  
Standing with Orban and holding hands with Trump ... that is what a Brexit future looks like  Brexit is pushing Theresa May into alliance with Hungary's right-wing populist government  
In the real world, I can't make ends meet, my mother's health is bad, my neighbours are abusive & the housing assoc do nothing, my fridge is 20 yrs old & I can't afford to replace it. Brexit, remain, I don't care as long as Corbyn is PM soon #ToriesOut 
The BMA’s decision to back a final say on the deal shows the extent to which #Brexit threatens our health service.  With an alarming 87% drop in nurses/midwives joining the register from the EU, we're already seeing the disastrous impact of Brexit on our overstretched NHS #fbpe 
Meanwhile, over on BBC Northern Ireland, the curious ties between murky Brexit spending & the Eastwood-based former Deputy Chair of the Scottish Tories  
Rees-Mogg now blaming the treasury for coordinating business attacks on #Brexit. Since meeting Bannon this charlatan has used all sorts of chicanery to dupe the  British people into believing #Brexit won't be harmful. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
."Meanwhile, the Chief Constable of Northern Ireland warned that Brexit has the potential to spark civil disorder in the six counties if it results in certain communities  feeling “less secure & more vulnerable about their own identity”.". 
We asked @HackneyAbbott #HowWillBrexitBenefitMe?She took the time to painstakingly relay to us every word that her boss @jeremycorbyn has said on the subject of #Brexit in the two years since the vote.Every single word.Word for word.#Amazing#SODEMaction#StopBrexit 
Tories actually laughed while Jeremy Corbyn read out a worker’s concerns about the government’s chaotic Brexit. It’s NO laughing matter!!  
What the US embassy in London thinks of Brexit: TLDR, we're fucked:  
‘Brexit is an audacious bid for Thatcherism in one country’, as Mr Hannan says here. Read all about it:   
Brexit: Politicians are not the solution to the Brexit catastrophe, they are the problem. Party interests have taken priority over the national interest Our future is to sacrificed on the altar of Brexit @LordCFalconer @SeumasMilne @acgrayling @JolyonMaugham @Tony_Robinson 
The UK urgently needs to step up #Brexit negotiations.  
Leon CEO John Vincent - "It would be wrong for people to assume that #Brexit, and it is used as an excuse, has impacted our sector. I don’t believe it has."  
Given the shady 2016 Election PAC's & connections to Brexit & Cambridge Analytica Bolton has, this is nothing short of treason out in the open. US IC & UK IC concluded Russia carried out a Chemical Warfare attack on British soilH/t  @MauiMeow00@LouiseMensch@thespybrief 
#sixone Dont forget fg,and ff want to sell OUR water to Private Profiteers.? And with the parasites in #Irishwater still referring to Irish citizens as customers, the Referendum can't come fast enough.! 
BMW's British operations need 150 trucks to arrive from mainland Europe every day. This level of integration is just one example of the auto industry's #Brexit headache.  
Rees-Mogg: Government ‘Cooperating’ with Big Business to Undermine Brexit  
Germany’s World Cup defeat - the Brexit dividend 
Fisherman Marc Gallagher - "If #Brexit is handled correctly for the UK’s fishing industry, they have massive massive potential."They have a huge, huge economic zone to fish from, it’s 33% of the fishing grounds in the north-east Atlantic."  
Just when you thought it couldn't get any crazier: "Ukrainian workers could replace EU nationals post-Brexit, Gove suggests."#LeaversAreLoonies#PeoplesVote  
Dear Lexiteers,Here you go. This is what #Brexit is really all about. Straight from the horses mouth.#SlowHandClap  
EU citizens living in the UK will be able to apply for settled status post-Brexit. @citizen689 sets out some of the problems with this plan and the uncertainties that remain. 
Key point here is that there *is* no 'Brexit as an abstract". It's a concrete institutional change and whilst it can take various forms, *all* of them "put jobs at risk" (and not just at risk, in that some degree of job losses is a certain consequence of any form of Brexit).  
To be brutally frank, I'd trust a soft blue Tory like Anna Soubry over Corbyn. We are sinking into a calamity that is Brexit. Whatever the Tories did to the economy will pale beside what Brexit will do, and that includes Corbyn's Brexit. Tribal hate politics was & is destructive.  
Something many Brexiters ask. Principally, because the world economy has both globalised and regionalised since 1973. Brexit - whatever else it does - won't transport UK back in time to a world that no longer exists.  
If they broke the law, the referendum cannot stand.  
When are @duponline going to explain the detail to industry on how their #Brexit border is going to work. #IrishBorder #BrexitCustoms #Brexit @BrexitIsToxic @mickfealty @EUtopean @PES_PSE 
The European Single Market has free movement of goods, capital, services and people. The Customs Union shares trade rules & common taxes on imports. Find out why staying in the Single Market & Customs Union is the best scenario for Scotland: #Brexit  
And here are the BMA vote results (sent by a friend)...76% for Single Market91% for Free Movement of medical & research staff97% for Euratom94% for Clinical Trials Directive*79% for statement that Brexit poses risk to NHS 74% for #PeoplesVote 62% for oppose Brexit  
At least our Dan is making it crystal clear what he and his hard right mob are looking for out of Brexit. 
.@Arron_banks Insurance Empire ISN'T: his companies are screwed - so WHOSE MONEY BANKROLLED #BREXIT?  
EU Withdrawal Bill officially becomes law - but we are still campaigning for a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal. Join the campaigning by joining our grassroots organisation!  
The British Medical Association (BMA) says leaving the EU poses a major threat to health. UK Banking expects to decimated and car manufacturing will be wiped out. Boris Johnson was being flippant when he said 'F**k Business' - but that is what Brexit will do... #StopBrexit 
“England fans have been told not to chant about Brexit, not to wave the ‘imperialistic’ St George’s flag, not to say ‘we’ when referring to the team... the political elites want everyone to be as full of national shame as they are”, says Brendan O’Neill. 
Brexit has always been a part of the jigsaw. The full picture is slashed public spending, the erosion of our rights and the rolling back of protections for workers and consumers. Everyone for themselves and pitted against each other.Things @UKLabour should resist.#PeoplesVote  
#Brexit becomes easier to understand when you assume there is a group of people who quite simply want to destroy the country and rule it. Astonishingly it was a Prime Minister that gave them the key.  #FBPE 
To make a success of Brexit?Maybe start a tweet without being oxymoronic. It goes better that way. Afterall Dan nobody is talking about leaving the Single Market.... 
I note that @EUCouncil's press backgrounder for tomorrow's Summit says "Prime Minister May is expected to say a few words on Brexit from a UK perspective." Not *the* UK perspective. ;) 
Tories actually laughed while Jeremy Corbyn read out a worker’s concerns about the government’s chaotic BrexitBy @nyejones92 #PMQs 
The left has to realise that Brexit will render all their pledges and aspirations null and void, and that if they REALLY placed the quality of life of the population above their own ideological bonafides they'd be opposing it as an absolute priority.  
Brexit is bad for Britain’s health, doctors say  
Here's an idea.Why doesn't Sturgeon work with May and WM to achieve the best possible outcome of Brexit for UK and Scotland?Could that work? 
LADS. I'M TELLING YOU. IT'S COMING FUCKING HOMEFOOTBALL IS ACTUALLY COMIMG HOME. ALL WE NEEDED TO DO WAS TO TRIGGER BREXIT 
My son is a student & we were discussing the reasons behind #Brexit. I said it was called by the Tories to stem the flow of voters to UKIP. He's just sent me this graph he did to test my theory. I'd say this is pretty conclusive proof. If a 21 year old can see it..! #StopBrexit 
So journalists and activists slowly expose the lies and corruption behind #brexit. @conservatives and @UKLabour leaders' response is to keep backing it, even in the face of business and union fears. @libdems @Greens @theSNP @Andrew_Adonis @spaceangel1964 
IT’S COMING HOME LADS, GET THE BLOODY CARLINGS OUT, IT’S SOUTHGATE’S BREXIT ARMY LIFTING THE TROPHY IN MOSCOW 
A gulf between political and grassroots Remainer opinion. Most grassroots Remainers would regard the removal of Freedom of Movement as a criminal robbery of a basic right. I would want the politicians responsible jailed for life. (@Andrew_Adonis)#Brexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
No deal Brexit unthinkable, says JLP. Any kind of Brexit unthinkable, says @BremaininSpain. 
Bingo. Amazing snapshot into the corrupt behind #Brexit. Dodgy money coming from Ukraine under Putin puppet -> unchecked donations to DUP -> money spent, apparently in illicit collusion with @vote_leave -> at #CambridgeAnalytica spin off AIQ  
Catalan President @QuimTorraiPla will propose to Spanish PM Sanchez an agreed referendum on independence  
In my daughter's class yesterday as part of a politics debate. The teacher asked, "how many of you think Brexit is s bad idea" my daughter said all 32 put their hands up. Four years and they're all voters but she also said teacher said it was the same in older years too. 
Today your reps at #ARM2018 made clear their concerns that #Brexit could seriously undermine the provision of healthcare in the UK and Europe  
READ: Brexit is bad for Britain’s health say British Medical Association, representing over 160k UK doctors:  
A bad or no deal result in Brexit negotiations could lead to “near paralysis of freight” at the Border, the UK’s Freight Transport Association (FTA) has warned.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteBremain #FBPE 
...but TM is a great dancer, she'll do anything to drum up post-Brexit trade.   
So to make Brexit a success we have to dismantle a load of the things that are positive?  Things that successful countries do? Remain is still the best option. You know it. Changing your mind would be a good start. 
Our Foreign Secretary summed up the approach of the Brexit cause in two words: “f*** business”.   AND ITS "MAKING YOUR MIND UP" TIME  
Pls RT: #Brexiters often say that the referendum result is a done deal and can't be changed. But any past vote can be undone by a new vote. We need a new vote on the final details of Brexit when we know what they are. A #PeoplesVote. See all our posters at  
Brexit White Paper takes shape  
DeathDestructionLiesReferendum and election fraudData theftBribed by RussiaTreasonTwo wasted generations because of brexitMega austerityDestruction of NHSDestruction of the UK 
BREAKING: Catalan president announces that he is going to propose an agreed independence referendum in his meeting with the new Spanish PM Pedro Sánchez. 
UKIP + alt-right + Nazi-saluting football "lads" - welcome to the post-Brexit nightmare....  
The mid-terms are shaping up to serve as a referendum on the Trump Administration. In several battleground states, polls show a general preference for Congress to be a check on the president.  
“A BBC Spotlight investigation into the man behind the DUP's record £435,000 donation during the EU referendum has uncovered a trail of illegal activity and foreign money”.#BrexitHeist#BrexitShambles#BrexitCorruption#BrexitScandal#PeoplesVote 
It is hardly confidence-inspiring that those at the heart of Brexit negotiations can see no end in sight. Davis’s current fixation on a rigid exit date is dangerous. We must give the power back to the people with a final #VoteontheDeal and an opportunity to #ExitfromBrexit 
Just through channel tunnel after busy 2 days of Brexit talks with EU27 political colleagues & speeding to Holborn & St Pancras for the Big Debate tonight. Great panel of speakers discussing our future economy.  
Nissan boss says company is 'in the dark' over #Brexit They cannot plan for the future, because the government has not set out what kind of #Brexit it wants two years down the line.Another one of Boris's 'F☆☆k business' companies via @CityAM 
Those who are talking about the election as a referendum on Bernie Sanders are missing the point. Clinton CRUSHED Sanders in NY14. But Ocasio’s victory proves that far from being “rigged” against them, progressive ideas can win, with the right candidates.  
Glad my Commencement Matter in the #Seanad has been accepted for tomorrow morning at 10:45am - I'll be asking Government to update us on preparations for the referendum on extending Presidential Voting Rights to citizens in the North & Diaspora. @SenBillyLawless @sinnfeinireland 
Tony Blair excellent today @ChathamHouse on #globalisation &  #Brexit. Disagreed with him on Iraq, but on these issues he is 100% right. And so refreshing to hear a coherent grown up British politician saying coherent grown up things. 
Quick Brexit facts. Who wants data roaming charges to come back?RT if you don't!  
As it's now official Ministerial language: FUCK the Tories.Your manipulation, lies & contempt for the UK is delivering for nobody except your cronies who are cashing in. And, just to be clear: FUCK your Brexit too.#StopBrexit @UKLabour @PeoplesMomentum @Labour4EU @pplsassembly 
Ian McCafferty, a core member of the MPC, states that Brexit will hold back productivity growth and that the country could face future inflation as a consequence. Living standards are already on the decline. Think families deserve better? Share this  
Thats a beautiful sight.#Brexit#Freedom#Democracy#ThePeopleVoted 
No, @theresa_may, the future of our country voted overwhelmingly to #Remain in the EU. And now an overall majority would do the same.You are robbing people of their future and defending Brexit lies.To build a Britain fit for the future, hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
Regardless of your views on #Brexit, please read these words very slowly and carefully, as they are 100% factually correct, and completely true:@UKLabour is the only credible alternative to yet more Tory austerity and a very hard Brexit.That is all.Thanks for reading.  
Saying Brexit is stupid99%  of academicsAll exporters All inward investorsUSA, Canada, JapanEvery former PM aliveIMFEvery major bankHM TreasurySaying Brexit is great: 
The Bank of England warns there could be an unprecedented financial crunch unless Europe rapidly comes up with a #Brexit fix  
Lucy Harris, 27, was harrassed on the tube by a man claiming to be a lawyer during London's morning rush hour. As shocked bystanders looked on, the man told her she was "thick" because of her support for Brexit  
I actually think the UK's inability to have a position on virtually *anything* is testament to the EU having until now been run in the UK's best interest. There are no real wins for May to demand, just empty rhetoric from the referendum campaign. 
Singing the sash & God save the Queen, won't rescue you from Tory austerity & Brexit. Now that's that clarified. 
Do you support a people’s vote on the Brexit deal? #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
So there we have it, Seamus Milne wants Brexit. Couldn't be clearer. He needs to go & go now. He's poisoning @UKLabour with 70%+ of our voters. He will kill our party. 
I mean, do these people really think anyone believes all this? 'Brexit would be okay if it wasn't Tory Brexit'. 'We'll put more money into the NHS'. 'These tax rises will raise all the money'. 'Here's a different unicorn'. Do they *really* think people will swallow this nonsense? 
Meeting representatives of European airlines to discuss Brexit. When asked what tone of UK Government is, they reply that there’s been nothing on which to judge the tone. They cannot understand why UK’s aviation paper - with no specifics - appeared for first time two *weeks* ago. 
GLOBALIST Billionaire George Soros vows to spend five years fighting for a second EU referendum in bid to overturn Brexit!  What will May do?               #fo2eu  
Enjoyed speaking @CBItweets London summer lunch today - about maintaining London’s global success, the capital’s interest in success of Northern Powerhouse, how we should build Crossrail2 and cross-Pennine HS3, and why the actual experience of business should be heard on Brexit 
fanny tits and brexit  
Actual Brexiter responses to this I’ve seen include things like “people can just have holidays in the UK, then”. Because obviously destroying the entire aviation industry will only affect people’s breaks to Spain.Brexit is madness.  
Whether you voted leave or remain, Brexit is definitely a big deal. But Brexit is not a done deal, which is why more and more leave voters are coming out in support of a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal every day.Sign the petition at . 
I will be asking how much today’s nauseating party in No 10 to ‘celebrate’ Brexit is costing the taxpayer. And who was invited and accepted. Assume no serious business leaders turning up. Or serious anyone. 
Tory panel discussions on Brexit  
1. Young people need cheap stuff. Brexit makes things more expensive (Harder to trade with Europe. More expensive trading further away)2. Young people need jobs. Brexit shifts European business across the channel AND stops us following the jobsYour Brexit isn't fit for Britain! 
Theresa May’s approach to Brexit is putting businesses at risk – and business organisations like @CBItweets agree.Only @UKLabour will protect jobs and the economy. #PMQs 
We appear to be in a period where the UK Gov't is shutting its eyes a little tighter, covering its ears a little more earnestly, and shouting "la la la" a little louder as the #Brexit cliff edge comes clearly into view. Hold on tight. This will be rough. #PeoplesVote #WATON 
Echoing the past; Watergate wasn't about the robbery, it was about the cover-up and corruption in government. 
Spanish Supreme Court confirms rebellion charges against @KRLS Puigdemont and 14 other Catalan Politicians.They risk up to 30 years in prison for having organized a referendum. Governments change in Spain, the deep State remains.  
Brilliant piece from @OFOCBrexit co-founder & Momentum member, Barney, on why Labour must listen to young people on Brexit. Please RT:  
Mary Creagh hits the nail on the head with this superb question at #PMQs.Will the PM join me in congratulating the Foreign Secretary for expressing so pithily what her hard brexit will do to British jobs & businesses?#StopBrexit #FBPE @MaryCreaghMP 
It's our future, our choice - Labour must listen to young people on Brexit, says @OFOCBrexit  
If you want to hear me sing some opera in support of #Brexit - I'll be performing at the @artists4brexit Big Brexit Party next weekend - I can't wait to see you there! Buy Tickets here  
53% think we should get on with Brexit, 21% think Govt should call a new referendum, only 13% would stop Brexit.By 50% to 29% Brits think it would be illegitimate for MPs to vote against Brexit, and by 45% to 37% people oppose a referendum on final deal.  
Keeping this image for the next time some #Brexit bellend claims "the Irish Border is a non-issue" or "the GFA doesn't matter any more".  
By demanding we leave the single market and have a customs union with freedom to make our own trade policy Labour has basically adopted Tory policy on Brexit.  
Followers, EU Withdrawal Bill becoming law isn’t great, but it doesn’t prejudge Parliament’s decision on Mrs May’s exit deal. This can be rejected &/or referred to people’s vote. MPs, not HMG, will decide question for any referendum - ie, most likely, her deal v. staying in EU 
An easy win for Corbyn again. I've got to say that PMQ's has become quite pitiful to watch.Once again Jeremy led on Brexit and once again our weak Tory PM was flailing around like a fish out of Water just flat out refusing to answer any questions.It's quite pathetic. #PMQs 
Famous anti-Brexit obsessives who no-one had heard of before the referendum:Gina MillerAC GraylingCarole CadwalladrHugo DixonMadeleina KayJames ChapmanFemi 
MPs are not delegates who have to obey the voters, whether the vote was an election or referendum. Their duty is to use their judgement in the best interests of the country. It is absolutely vital to stress this point, it is central to our democracy. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Unless you are an economic flat-earther this is demonstrably false. There are really bad Brexits and there are merely bad Brexits but there is no good Brexit.  
UBS survey of 600 companies on the impact of Brexit:- 35% of companies plan to reduce UK investment post-Brexit.- 41% plan to move a large amount of capacity out of UK.- 72% plan to shift capacity to EU member states.So much for ‘taking back control’ and a ‘Brexit dividend’.  
This is terrifying. #Brexit seems to have unleashed & emboldened such factions. It makes it even more important that we fight this - we cannot let such hate hide behind patriotism. The @metpoliceuk are aware of this, btw. #StopBrexitSaveBritain @Harryslaststand @UKLabour @BBCNews 
"BMW has no plans to move production from Brexit Britain"  
His main argument? That UKIP didn't have the brains to organise a conspiracy. Here's how Telegraph correspondent reported it at the time. Now LeaveEU have started threatening me & @peterjukes with jail, I do hope people will start seeing through the "Bad Boys of Brexit" schtick.  
Referendum to have law placed in constitution that if the weather is hotter than 25 degrees, work is cancelled. 
Simple question.Could someone supporting @jeremycorbyn please explain, in simple terms, what a “jobs first Brexit” is?I’ve asked many times, and never once received an answer. 
I've attempted to explain the deeper identity issues around Brexit and the border via the @UlsterGAA final. Might this be the start of a dedicated GAA section in the @FT... 
Labour's idea of a 'Jobs First' Brexit seems to be to snipe at the Government - with no viable policy of their own - as high quality manufacturing jobs flee.  
If Rees-Mogg really believes that these bad Brexit business stories are just propaganda from the treasury, why is his company moving to Dublin?#LeaversAreLiars 
Jeremy Corbyn’s spokesman says “it’s not Brexit as an abstract itself that is putting jobs at risk but the Government’s shambolic approach to Brexit” 
One of key benefits of Brexit is the UK’s ability to regain its own independent seat on many of the global rules making WTO bodies and committees. They set the rules that the EU follows. And here we go...  
Brexit = TrumpThere will be a huge anti brexit element to the anti trump march on Friday the 13th of July. Please bring your EU flags and anti trump banners.  
The EU does not make laws that apply in USA. Yet US goods are on sale in Europe and vice versa.And post-Brexit there is no reason why they should make ANY laws that apply to UK.We voted to Leave EU.Not surrender to them.Viva Brexit!  
Bank’s red light warning for EU on lack of Brexit progress  
The clusterfuck of overspending/co-ordination/dark money/illegal data sharing that is the referendum continues to unravel...  Important new report from BBC NI into the mystery DUP Brexit "donation", that we now find has weird links to Ukraine...1/2  
Tony Blair: I’m bored that people are bored by Brexit  
.@naomi_long calls for Electoral Commission to investigate DUP #Brexit allegations. See more here - 
At the anti-Brexit march last Saturday people chanted #Wheresjeremycorbyn. @Vincecable explains - he was in the Mid East avoiding his own supporters.YOU deserve the final say, with the option to stay in the EU. Join our campaign today:  
Sorry to see @AndrewRTDavies resign. He played a big part in building the pro-#Brexit majority in Wales and I’ll always be grateful for that. 
Best question of #PMQs came from Labour MP Mary Creagh, a reference to Boris Johnson's reported "fuck business" comment on Brexit. Looked to me like David Lidington, next to May, was trying very hard to not smile... pic.twitter.com/EGsLlwm9Oc 
Sorry, but "Cancel #Brexit or the IRA will bomb you" is a shameful campaign strategy. Brexit is a consequence of a democratic decision: all attempts to destroy democracy by threats of terrorism must fail. #PeoplesVote 
BMW has no plans to move production from Brexit Britain  
Brexit is more corrupt then anyone could ever have imagined.How can you possibly continue to support it on ANY level?Our lives are being gamed by hedge funders feeding on Brexit chaos.PLEASE STOP SUPPORTING BREXIT NOW!@Brexit @business @MollyMEP 
 With the clock ticking down to Brexit, this Prime Minister has done nothing but increase uncertainty. #PMQs 
MPs warn that the Brexit divorce bill could rise to £50 billion - and if BMW leave, the EU will get the car too. 
.@CarolineLucas – Brexit threatens the safety of everyone in Northern Ireland and beyond  
"There are different parts of Airbus talking different languages" - EFT Adviser @OwenPaterson busts the myths of Airbus's Brexit scaremongering on #bbcdp pic.twitter.com/HWOTVGvVdF 
Vince Cable - 100,000+ gathered in Parliament Square on Saturday to demand a #PeoplesVote. Since the PM has such confidence she will produce a good #brexit deal... why is she so afraid to allow the public to have the final say on the final deal? #FBPE #PMQs 
La Reyne le veult. Yesterday afternoon, the Queen enacted this into our law. HansardThe practical effect of this is there is now no legal or Parliamentary means of stopping Brexit. We leave the European Union on 29th March next year, at 11pm  
Just asked the PM to congratulate  Foreign Secretary for setting out what her hard Brexit policy will do to British jobs & businesses #PMQs 
The Vince Cable who just called for a second referendum at #pmqs... Is he related to the one who said the idea of a second referendum was "seriously disrespectful and politically utterly counterproductive"? 
Instead of being a target for American tariffs, #Brexit means we will avoid them. Unless we want more expensive whisky, oranges, Harleys, and a great deal else, hurry up and get Brexit done.  
We appear to be so far through the brexit looking glass that Priti Patel is an authority on Ministerial solidarity and discipline.   
Serial Tory enabler Vince Cable attacking Labour not the Tories over Brexit. Same old LibDems #pmqs 
Some tory MPs were hiding in the gallery, so as not to be seen to shout down Mr. Corbyn who was asking seriously important questions about people's livelihoods post #Brexit, this is the mentality of the sneaky shit heaps in power, damn them and their ideology #PMQS 
Months ago the PM dismissed @LaylaMoran over fears of 1000s of job losses in the UK car industry because of Brexit. This week BMW have shared their fears about Brexit.Theresa May is making a mess out of this. Sign up if you want the final say on Brexit:  
Sturgeon is grilled during Berlin visit for focusing more on pushing for a second independence vote when she should be "focusing more on making a success of #Brexit." She is a blinkered obsessive who is driven by an all-consuming hatred of the English.  
Powerful piece from @NickCohen4 on how Corbyn's personality cult is blinding the faithful to his betrayal on Brexit. This line on the anti-immigrant stance Corbyn's labour espouse is especially perceptive and saddening  
I can't help but notice, May is really cocky with Corbyn but becomes a stuttering monkey with Ian Blackford. Give Ian the 15 minutes corbyn gets rather than just two questions and he'll paste the floor with her! | #MonThen #Scotref #Indyref2 #EUWithdrawalBill #PMQs #Brexit 
Tony Blair is to call for another referendum. the man who pledged a referendum on the EU when he was PM and then broke another promise by not staging one 
Theresa May’s approach to Brexit is putting businesses at risk – and business organisations like @CBItweets agree.Only Labour will protect jobs and the economy #PMQs 
Big gaping hole exposed in Labour's Brexit policy at #PMQs. All heat and no light from Corbyn. Easy to attack Tory confusion, divisions and he did that pretty well. But what would Corbyn seek that May isn't? 
Not a good look for Tory MPs when they start laughing as Corbyn speaks about workers writing to him concerned that they will lose their jobs because of Brexit #PMQs 
We are putting jobs first in Brexit says TM. True. Her own and her cabinet’s #PMQs 
Corbyn presses May on Airbus/BMW concerns on Brexit and dismisses the government's threat to walk away from negotiations as "ridiculous"Scolds Tory MPs laughing at public questions on Brexit: "These are real people, with real jobs, and real concerns" Strong #PMQs for Corbyn 
Corbyn quotes Andrew a Honda employee who says he will hold the Government responsible if his job is put at risk by their Brexit negotiations... 
Because @IainDale is still insisting Jaguar Land Rover doesn't have a problem with Brexit here's a little sample of what Jaguar Land Rover has actually said. 1/2  
Theresa May tells #PMQs: "This party has always been a party that has backed business"Tell that to the CBI, Airbus, BMW, SMMT and numerous other business groups and companies which are totally in the dark over the government's Brexit plans 
Absolutely detest the lack of accountability in politics. Blair, for example, should be relieved of his £60m fortune & exiled to Iraq, not pushed in our faces as he pontificates about Brexit. 
Brilliant to see former PM Tony Blair come out in support of a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
The absolute state of British politics: Jeremy Corbyn attacks Theresa May for not supporting business enough over Brexit #PMQs 
With @TheBMA joining @MidwivesRCM & @theRCN in backing a #PeoplesVote, now health organisations representing 638,000 doctors, nurses & midwives all support a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Summary of every past and future conversation with Leavers:Remainer: "give me 1 quantifiable Brexit benefit"Leaver: "Brexit has lots of benefits:Remainer: "same question again"Leaver: BREXIT HAS LOTS OF BENEFITS"Remainer"Just 1 benefit?"Leaver: "you arsehole/moaner/loser.." 
Why are we getting a bad Brexit deal? Because we've ASKED FOR ONE!The government's own red lines make it our only option.#WednesdayWisdom 
The government's own estimates have the potential gains from future trade deals with the rest of the world at +0.7%. This is against an expected Brexit GDP hit of -1.6% to -7.7% (depending on EU-UK relationship).Excerpt below is just wishful thinking. 
The main point - we've had two years of this Legatum / IEA message that we have to leave the EU regulatory sphere to make Brexit work - but virtually no evidence from the real world of trade politics that this will work. 5/ ends 
Parliament must be given a meaningful vote on all possible outcomes of Brexit. If the Tories are still confident they can get a good Brexit deal, then they should be more than happy to give Parliament this vote. And then the people! 
They used the Brexit vote to short the British economy.Now they're betting the house on a disorderly Brexit.Here's an explainer from @MollyMEP on the Brexit money men  #BrexitBadBoys 
Pleased to co-sign a joint MEP letter expressing concern for business and workers over brexit shambles (and we didn’t use the F-word once, let’s hope the response doesn’t). Thanks @SebDance for organising. 
The British Medical Association,Royal College of Nursing and Royal College of Midwives have all backed a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.If you were in any doubt that Brexit will be disastrous for the NHS, this should confirm it. Sign the petition:  
The Tories won't allow a "disruptive" public sector strike unless at least 40% of union members vote in favour, but they shriek that 37% of a rigged electorate is the "Will of the People". #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Letter from MEPs to Greg Clark over concerns business leaders have over Brexit.  
So the Brexit Deal is now £49bn.... Does that mean we’re going to still be paying it back in the 22nd Century???  
As a point of fact Land Rover production move to Slovakia has nothing to do with Brexit. "A spokesman for JLR said the Slovakian plant had been developed over several years and the latest move was unconnected to Brexit headwinds..." Guardian 11/6/18  
Here is @BBCNews's report of @CaroleCadwalladr winning the prestigious Orwell journalism prize for her groundbreaking investigations into brexit corruption and illegality. Notice anything ... missing?  
Another excellent suggestion for a song about Brexit that England fans can get away with singing at the match vs Belgium tomorrow  
BOOM: Jaguar Land Rover announce £20 billion investment over coming years. Despite Brexit, of course!  
@BBCr4today is out of touch with popular sentiment on brexit. We care more about our jobs and families than migrants we never even see. The odds are 1:1 on chaos brexit. When it comes, scapegoats will be needed. A simple, betrayal narrative. @BBC fits nicely into that frame. 
I’m v pleased to see talk of addressing the causes of Brexit. Our broken politics cannot be fixed otherwise.But we need *real* answers.It’s not clear to me how leaving a key western alliance - at a time when the lies of the populist right are advancing - is going to help. 
This is great news! Overwhelming support for a #peoplesvote from the nation's doctors. Now we need to get out there and let people know that #Brexit is bad for our NHS. #OurNHS70 
The Public Accounts Committee warns that the Brexit divorce bill  could be significantly higher than Gov's £39 billion estimate.@stellacreasy, comments for the campaign:  
"A BBC Spotlight investigation into the man behind the DUP's record £435,000 donation during the EU referendum has uncovered a trail of illegal activity and foreign money". 
WATCH: @Alison_McGovern is right to highlight the Airbus warnings - with 14,000 directly employed by Airbus, highly skilled manufacturing jobs are at risk with this botched Brexit. Please RT:  
The great injustice of the Brexit vote and why it will only ever be divisive; ‘the govt has decided that rights are going to be taken away from all of us.’For those of us who rely on and appreciate those rights, there can never be acceptance. 
To put this in perspective, Brexit has so far resulted in 128,000 known job losses. See  for full details.Worse is to come. Much worse, unless we stop this lunacy. 
Mogg loses the plot completely, claiming #Leavers in Treasury are coordinating business attacks on #Brexit.If he pulled his head from his own arse he'd realise that businesses like BMW and Airbus don't scaremonger, it could affect their share price. 
Today is a good day. Today I can say @TheBMA backs a people's voteToday I can say @TheBMA opposes BrexitToday my colleagues joined me to say:Brexit is Bad for Britain's health#ARM2018 
Young Brexiteer confronted by a fanatical Remainer lawyer - who allegedly called her a "stupid racist" because she voted Leave:  Hopefully a bonfire of EU red tape will soon put thousands of parasitic lawyers out of work. #Brexit 
The base & the superstructure of this 1914 contraption called Nigeria are fraudulently structured.Referendum is the only panacea. 
 Bank of England is warning about market havoc after Brexit. Mark Carney explains why  
Just remember this when the checks start at the port of entry after Brexit  
If there is an escape from the national self-harm that is Brexit, it will be led by pragmatists Corbyn & Starmer Not by macho, sneering Uber-Remainers like Campbell Those who seek to change public opinion need to understand it. I think Corbyn & Starmer are playing this right  
The BMA is backing a second referendum. Is this revenge for all the time patients have demanded a second opinion? 
Tony Blair doesn't like the way the British people voted on June 23rd. Guess we better cancel Brexit ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ 
Our choices...1. Leave a chunk of the People angry & aggrieved & ruin the Country2. Leave a chunk of the People angry & aggrieved & cease ruining the CountryEither way to validate which course of action a maj of the People must get a #PeoplesVote to decide #Brexit OR #Remain 
Breaking news- BMA votes overwhelmingly to oppose #Brexit and calls for a #PeoplesVote when all the facts are known. So important that we speak up against the damage that #Brexit will do to our patients and the #NHS #ARM2018 
The paedophile mafia in Britain that has influence in politics, media and the world of entertainment was terrified by the decision to leave the EU as it felt very comfortable under the umbrella of Brussels that promoted agendas close to its heart. Hence the resistance to #Brexit 
Trump isn’t an isolated buffoon who can just be voted out.  He is part of a populist movement that seeks to undermine liberal democracy, Putin being its most accomplished actor. Brexit is its manifestation here: unless we resist it will destroy us. 
BREAKING: Remainers unveil plan to delay Brexit by introducing VAR. 
SUPERB!!The British Medical Association (@TheBMA) has just voted to back a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal by a margin of 179-64.That’s thumping! In fact they voted for *all parts* of the below... So very, very strongly against Brexit.  
The media in this country can now be safely considered as dishonest as the MSM in the USA. They all anxiously wait mouth open, slavering, for the next story which proves without doubt that brexit will damage Britain and when it doesn't - they move on to the next BS story. 
BMA votes:* To oppose Brexit* To support staying in single market* To support maintenance of free movement of medical & heathcare staff* Calls for public to have final say on Brexit &* States that Brexit is a major threat to the NHS & the nation’s health#ARM2018 @theBMA 
BREAKING: @TheBMA, representing 160k UK doctors, has just voted to back a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal by a margin of 179-64.Every day, as new facts come to light, more & more people are calling for a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
Should Britain consider delaying the departure of #Brexit?: Date of departure could be delayed, says Blair -  #TonyBlair RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Bollocks. It was a referendum based on lies and manipulation where not all British Citizens were allowed to vote. The economy is being ruined and needs to be put first.  
"Carole Cadwalladr has received one of journalism’s top prizes for her absurd conspiracy theories -- more proof of the post-Brexit demise of good sense among the chattering classes."Brendan O’Neill on the Orwell Prize 
Goebbels after a referendum in 1933: "The will of the people is the will of the government and vice versa. [...] there is no possibility for parliamentary interference, to obliterate and render ineffective the execution of the nation’s will."#Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Boris Johnson's “f**k business” outburst and the non-existent “Brexit dividend” has destroyed any claim to credibility the Tories had left   
new @foodresearchuk paper on Animal Welfare published today in #FoodBrexit series. UK Govt promises a lot on animal welfare from Brexit but no commitments, no targets, all vague. Lawyer Peter Stevenson @CIWF spells out issues and proposes clear actions: 
The BBC reports that Heathrow operator (and owner of Glasgow, Aberdeen and Southampton airports) Ferrovial, now plans to move its international HQ to Amsterdam due to Brexit concerns. Another day of Brexit, another swathe of jobs under threat. Please RT 
The EU keeps prices high by imposing tariffs on more than 12,000 imported products, including rice, coffee, oranges and wine:  #Brexit 
Davies was also the original pioneer in major conference speeches of the word Brexit meaning Breakfast:  
Brexit is putting jobs at risk and hitting investment in the UK.There is no “Brexit dividend”. @theresa_may should stop pretending there is. #StopBrexit. 
Brexit, Dark Money and the DUP. And the strange story of Tory Richard Cook. Big plaudits to @PeterKGeoghegan & @openDemocracy for their role in breaking this story. 
Remember the £39bn Brexit divorce bill the Govt agreed to pay? New report from @CommonsPAC says, "The Treasury estimate doesn't include at least £10bn of costs to govt"So, make that £49bn for the bill.+ £24bn ALREADY in lost growth.+ £66bn/yr hit if 'no deal'.#BrexitDeficit 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg said he didn’t need to visit the Irish border to understand the challenges of Brexit for border communities. So @ShonaSkyNews and I took him. Lots to say on the border and on @PhilipHammondUK in the Treasury too. More on #AOP at 10am. Full report tonight! 
Whatever you think of Blair (Iraq is unforgivable) he talks sense about #Brexit and #populism. #StopBrexitSaveBritain #StopFascists #PeoplesVote   ⁦@OFOCBrexit⁩ ⁦@FFSake_⁩ ⁦@EUCouncil⁩ ⁦@Europarl_EN⁩ ⁦@guyverhofstadt⁩ @FBPE 
 The strange tale of the Scottish Tory, the DUP, Brexit, a mysterious £435,000 donation  
The first casualty of the Tory Brexit Wars?  
 Excellent digging by Jim Fitzpatrick into how the DUP and Vote Leave 'worked together' in the EU referendum.  
The Public Accounts Committee have rubbished Theresa May’s claim that the extra £20bn-a-year for the NHS will be funded by a “Brexit dividend”. They conclude that the divorce bill will be £10bn higher than claimed & any cash boost is many years away... #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Here is Brexit minister pushing back gathering steam around this idea - this is what chequers is going to be v hard  
Since Saturday, over 150k of you have signed the petition calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Next stop is 200,000. Will you SHARE & help us get there?  
One department. SO MANY different Brexit positions. I love DexEU - the most post modern department there ever been, fighting with itself, with its officials , with the rest of government and glorying in its own euthanasia with all that means for incentives and career structures 
The UK is leaving the EU thanks to 17.4m voters...we had a referendum and stuff, you may have missed it  
The Mail also neglects to mention that the exec who gave the 'resounding vote of confidence in Brexit' retires at the end of this week.  
BMW backs Brexit Britain! 
Brexit: Leaving EU will cost £10bn more than government claims, say MPs - Politics live  
Investment in British car factories has nearly halved over the past year. This isn't an opinion, it's just counting SMMT figures. Thankfully, it hasn't dried up completely. Trying to turn these two simple facts into a Brexit positive is more than a little silly.  
READ: the CBI & the TUC are coming together to highlight the mess the Gov is making of the Brexit negotiations.The best way out of this is with a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal:  
Brexit deadlock is stoking European fascism, warns Keir Starmer  
Progressive international co-operation is so important and something @jeremycorbyn is putting into practice. With Prime Minister of Greece @atsipras yesterday.  We discussed anti-austerity, international solidarity, Brexit and Governments working together to support refugees.  
Did you know that the constituents of Islington North voted 78.4% to Remain in the EU but @jeremycorbyn was the First person to call for Article 50 to be triggered the day after the EU Referendum result  
Let me guess: people gonna start slamming Blair for Iraq or being a 'neo-liberal'. How about put that to one side for just one second and open your mind? On Brexit, and the threat of a return to fascism, he is ABSOLUTELY RIGHT.  
I tweeted this 6 days ago & we STILL haven’t found a pro-Brexit tech startup founder or investor who is ALSO willing to speak in public on a panel at  next week. If you think Brexit is actually GOOD for the UK and you’re a founder OR Angel/VC, get in touch  
You could say "fuck Brexit" to a Mail reporter and they would spin it as "James O'Brien want to have sex with Brexit".  
Last nights BBC Spotlight is now on iPlayer if you missed it or simply want to watch it againIt’s available across the UK#Brexit Dark Money & the #DUP 
In a new low, today's Mail describes a BMW exec saying that 'leaving the customs union might mean we 'have to spend more money we don't want to' on warehouses to stockpile parts and in creating new customs systems' - as 'a resounding vote of confidence in Brexit'. Jesus wept. 
BBC Northern Ireland with some interesting revelations about the former vice chair of the Scottish Conservatives and his secretive bankrolling of Brexit.  
Why don’t I believe Keir StarmerBecause we’ve heard this all before. We’ve had promises on the Single Market, we’ve had promises on the Customs Union. We’ve had promises on literally ever aspect of BrexitSimply put, this is all a smoke screen. Labour are a Brexit party.  
Hey guys BBC Northern Ireland did an exposé on dark money going to the DUP during Brexit. If only the BBC in England were so candid... Check it out on iPlayer and share!  
EU citizens' rights and #Brexit: we are working with the @LawCentres and local community organisations across the country to inform EU citizens about their rights. #citizensrights   
Seems like everyone - businesses and unions, Remainers and Leavers - are unhappy with the mess the Government are making of the Brexit negotiations. Only one way out of it - a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal.  
Owen, I used to be quite a fan. I've read your books. But more and more your tweets are "Don't campaign or vote for what you want - that won't work". Your solution is always "Vote Labour". But Labour are a pro-Brexit party. How do oppose Brexit by voting pro-Brexit?  
It seems BMW not fleeing the UK on Brexit after all.  But Project Fear 2 is being ramped up in preparation for Mrs May’s ‘leaving in name only’ deal.   
Many Remainers I am sure are feeling powerless regarding Brexit. But we do have the power of our combined purchasing power. A coordinated boycott of Leave supporters products could be quite effective. Dyson, Wetherspoons, Hargreaves Landsdowne, GoSkippy etc. 
“O wad some po’er the giftie gie us, tae see ourselves as ithers see us.” Sadly we can see their brexit and raise them Trump, but hopefully both are passing dramas.  
Airlines are meeting with a cross-party group of UK MEPs today to discuss open skies and Brexit. Interested to learn what preparations they have made and what message they are getting from UK government. 
Brexit/Lexiteers should all read this piece on the truth that we are already losing our place as the go-to country for FDI into Europe. The best jobs in my patch are in foreign-owned firms - a situation replicated right across GB at the moment. But for how much longer?  
We all know Tony Blair’s opinion on Brexit....he repeats it on his visits to the UK every few months...I’m interested in his opinions on austerity,cuts to public services,food-banks,the state of the NHS and Grenfell but he never seems to mention them....strange that... 
Tony Blair has arrived to say people’s real concern is non-EU immigration, not the EU, and we should all be made to get ID cards to prevent Brexit.  
Massive scoop for R4 Today to persuade Tony Blair to come on and reveal he is against Brexit. The producer who got him clearly a genius. 
PROJECT FEAR: Business Secretary Greg Clark pushing for watered down Brexit.The public voted for radical political change - that includes ending open borders.And if the EU deal isn’t good enough - the country MUST walk away!  
Stinky new Brexit campaign scam uncovered in Northern Ireland. An alleged rubbish fraudster…no really…now embroiled in dark money scheme that may involve US dollars running thru Ukraine for a Leave advert that then seems not quite paid for by UK donors?  
More than 850,000 jobs directly & indirectly employed in sector at risk. 'No Brexit dividend, no credible plan B for frictionless customs arrangements, not realistic to expect new trade deals will replicate immense value of trade with EU'.#BrexitDeficit 
Liz Truss has started her campaigning to be prime minister already - and egomaniac Boris Johnson never stopped. It's a squabble over who holds the wheel as the Titanic hits the iceberg though. Unless the Tories weaken Brexit and reverse austerity they are doomed 
The Brexit divorce bill could £0. Just Stop Brexit. “Brexit divorce bill could be £10bn more than estimated, MPs warn - Evening Standard  
Walk away ... Only way.  BREXIT NIGHTMARE: Divorce bill could cost BILLIONS more than expected - shock MPs warning  
The world's largest aerospace firm, @Boeing, made a huge £40m investment into Sheffield AFTER the EU referendum - they're confident about the future of UK manufacturing.  
It’s NOT the will of the people. It’s the will of 17,410,742 people in a country with a population of just over 65 million. This is bollocks and we need a 2nd referendum.  
You know when a person has final crossed over the borderline between sanity and insanity. Brexit-Referendum-Grenfell  
Oh I don’t know. People saying “if Brexit’s so disastrous how come we were okay before 1973?”There are many answers but this is the easiest one:We used to gad about in boats, nicking stuff from the empire we once had, instead of trading with 27 united neighbours. 
.They are hiding how bad Brexit will be & how much it's going to cost...... 
Oh for GOODNESS's SAKE Tony Blair go get in the sea and stop making it harder to be anti-Brexit because EVERYBODY HATES YOU. 
Boss of Waitrose and John Lewis calls for a sensible #Brexit. Except he is struggling to articulate one that could stand any chance of being even slightly better than actually staying in the EU.  via @MailOnline 
The drip, drip, drip of selective reporting, distortion and blatant #Brexit bias from Humphrys, Smith, O’Connell and Ahmed finally got to me this morning.Farewell #r4today - you are no longer worth listening to. 
BBC Spotlight: Brexit, Dark Money and the DUP  
So. The "Brexit dividend" is a lie & the Tories admit they will tax YOU & the elderly for the NHS. NOT the rich & corporations who have had £Billions in tax cuts. Remember when they increased VAT by 5% to tax the poor?The Tories ALWAYS tax the poor whilst feeding the rich.  
Tony Blair calls for Brexit to be delayed and warns populism could drag Europe back to 1930s  
In treating each other with contempt, as they now are openly and publicly, ministers treat the PM and our entire system of governance with contempt. These people cannot be trusted to meet the challenge of Brexit @peoplesvote_uk on the final ‘deal’ only way 
German foreign office tells Brits in Germany that in the case of "no deal" #Brexit they wouldn't be asked to leave immediately. Immediately? Does the UK Govt understand that they play political games with real people's lives by dragging the negotiations & threatening no deal?  
The British government is divided, incompetent and driven by ideology rather than by an evidence based approach. They would find it difficult to organise a soirée in a brewery. But their fundamental problem is Brexit, it’s fundamentally bad for Britain.  
Is Tony Blair right that we should delay Brexit and hold a second referendum? 
Your periodic reminder that the UK Brexit choice is a border, on the island of Ireland, or the Irish Sea, or an exceptionally close relationship with the EU. The UK Government currently rules out all of these options. 
Brexit divorce bill could be £10bn more than estimated, MPs warn - Evening Standard When did membership become a marriage?   
TUC and CBI issue Brexit warning. That is the full house now of worker and business organisations.There never was a ‘jobs first Brexit’It was a lie.  
That’s Carole Cadwalladr , the sad cat lady , @maitlis is the one who just hates Trump , Brexit , Hungary , Italy and any other election result that didn’t go the way they liked...  
Poor business they can’t win. When they quietly shift production, all the Brexiters point and say ‘ha it’s nothing to do with Brexit’When they tell you they are going to do it due to Brexit they get abuse.Either way the jobs live elsewhere. 
“The Tories have spent over two years botching Brexit by bickering amongst themselves rather than negotiating a sensible deal. The Government must put an end to the deadlock which is paralysing our country and our economy" - @RLong_Bailey  
.@edvaizey spot on @BBCr4today on Cabinet splits & non collective responsibility “Brexit sucks the life out of everything” & in the absence of a credible effective official #Labour Opposition,  Govt has to fill the gap 
I'm just going to translate this as 'vote labour next time around.'No, for me brexit has a direct impact on my life, I'm not prepared to support it.. or any party that wants it. Simple.  
Britain’s most senior banking regulator has hit back at claims by European officials that banks based in London are not ready for a hard #Brexit, saying that this was “considerably wide of the mark”. 
Announcement!I am running for the European Parliament election list of @die_gruenen   My topics: Transport policy (especially rail), Digital, #Brexit, and Transparency & Democracy#EP2019More detail (for now only in German!) here: 
Foreign Secretary checks his watch to say  F**k Business it’s time for Brexit to close them down  
A significant step towards delivering a reduction in democracy and removing the will of Parliament. A dictator’s tool ,the referendum, being used to centralise power to a few ministers. How anyone can think this is a good thing is beyond me.#StopBrexit#FBPE 
Our supposedly biggest ally thinks Brexit is going to be a monumental fuck up.Why the hell are we doing this? oh, so @Nigel_Farage and his disaster economics mates can hollow out and destroy the UK, and their mates in the Tory party want the same as well#PeoplesVotePetition 
“There are EU countries who support #Brexit. But not the big, powerful ones. They will not winGermany will say no, France will say no, Spain will say no”The mask slips! The EU is run by the Franco-German alliance. Bless Spain 4 trying to cadge a ride! 
So Harley Davidson are to set up assembly of motorcycles in the EU to avoid tariffs. Any guesses which gateway to the EU country they were likely to have chosen had the UK not been leaving? Opportunity lost. More #Brexit damage. Who will weather the trade war best UK or EU? 
Scotsman, Englishman and an Irishman walk into a bar. Scotsman puts a chap up, Irishman buys a round. Englishman says he wants to leave. They all have to leave. #Brexit 
Just about everything in @iaindale's tweet is wrong. It's worldwide investment. JLR is expanding plants in India and Slovakia (and moving production from the West Midlands). The figure is £13.5bn. And JLR explicitly says Brexit is a business challenge.  
No Deal Brexit is what the government is pushing for because they don't have the imagination, creativity or competence to negotiate anything else. Bodes well for negotiating new trade deals with the rest of the world doesn't it? They are not up to the tasks ahead.#PeoplesVote 
I thought our politicians would come together, accept the result and get on with implementing an open, liberal Brexit; two years ago I had a rude awakening.I was attacked, told 'uneducated' Brexiteers like me are inexcusable. I was quick to attack their sneering and arrogance.  
One day, there shall be a referendum. The idiots shall have their country and hail their leaders in peace. The sane shall have their nation and rebuild it soul by soul. 
Question now is this: how many jobs are we prepared to reconcile ourselves to sacrificing before we abandon Brexit? 
Carole Codswollop still churning out her usual anti-Brexit conspiracy-theory drivel, dressed up as journalism.  Pitiful.  
Predictions Scotland's fishing industry could double in size when the UK exits the European Union. Analysis conducted by Dr Ian Napier @NAFCShetland suggests the sector could see substantial growth in the post-Brexit period. #bbcgms 0610 
So much happened tonight: I've now updated my cheat sheet with the results of OK's referendum on medical marijuana, 7 statewide primaries, many House primaries, & important county-level races. All here:  
Boris Johnson is in Afghanistan, doing the job of Foreign Secretary, as he is paid to do & the anti Brexit media go after him for not voting on the Heathrow runway. The vote wasn't even close either. It's just the usual media slurs that we have come to expect, on a daily basis. 
Globe editorial: “Baking systematic unfairness into the referendum that claims to be about increasing electoral fairness is not a great look.” BC stacks the deck in its electoral-reform referendum /via @globeandmail  #BCPoli #NoBCProRep 
'Turbocharged future' Liz Truss HAILS Brexit as opportunity to unleash UK economy  
This is the #Brexit chaos created by @GovUK  - the most significant piece of infrastructure that links these islands to their biggest trading partner cannot be readied for the future because the Tories are brawling with each other.... 
This right-wing millionaire is running front page newspaper ads, radio ads, online ads – and now robocalls – attacking British Columbia’s upcoming electoral reform referendum.BC’s wealthy elites are spending big money to protect the status quo. #bcpoli 
Sorry to get your hopes up that VPN would grant access to this BBC DUP dark money brexit cheating special. Luckily, here's a thread of the juicy details for those of us un-graced by her Majesty's broadcasts…  
#BREAKING Spanish owned Heathrow owner moves HQ out of UK because of #brexit 
Going to RT this again for extra effect, cause FUCKING 'ELL gang... get your Union Jack Brexit blinkers off PLEASE!  
Important for everyone to realize that Google and Facebook will forcefully fight privacy and data protection regulations demanded by the people, whether thru their elected representatives or even by referendum. Their surveillance capitalism depends on it.  
Tony Blair calls for Brexit to be delayed and warns populism could drag Europe back to 1930s  
.@Nigel_Farage .@Jacob_Rees_Mogg: Care to comment? Or are you just self-serving traitors? .@theresa_may: Are you really going to force through #Brexit just to make these & their fellow travellers richer? Are you that morally bankrupt?  
The Queen Signs Official EU Withdrawal Bill, Making Brexit 'Irreversible'-GOOD !!  QUEEN SIGNS AN "EDICT" Officially Making "BREXIT IRREVERSIBLE"...#TheBrooksBrown 
This is absolutely brutal on #Brexit, but no more than we've been saying for months.  Its just sobering to hear it in such stark terms  
You don't mention closer to home. May, who uses the phrase *will of the people* much loved by dictators & sham democrats like Erdogen, to turn a narrow result of an advisory referendum tainted by lies, fraud & likely Russian interference to rob Britain of its place in the EU. 
Tories are the party of "Fuck Business". Boris said it. Brexit proves it.#PeoplesVote pic.twitter.com/jzYG0hMiZB 
The people in charge of keeping our links to Europe open in 9 months time say they basically haven’t started to do anything about coping with Brexit because the UK govt has given them no idea what it is they’re supposed to be doing.So no cause for concern then.  
Brexit uncertainty puts 860,000 jobs at risk, warns car industry.The industry is hoping the sounding of alarm bells will force the government to act, with Brexit threatening thousands of jobs in the sector.Our best option is to #StopBrexit. 
.@AdamBoultonSky You will have to get Brexit fan @IainDale who keeps sending you flippantly optimistic tweets about Brexit on to your show so he can explain the failing UK economy since the EU referendum. #AllOutPolitics #SkyNews 
thought the Brexit dividend was paying for the NHS increase not more taxes..  
It’s a sign of the times that I am more surprised that the BBC are doing investigative journalism about Brexit than I am that a major political party appears corrupt to its core.  #SpotlightNI #fbpe 
This will be the Leaver's catch phrase after we've finished with #Brexit!@Femi_Sorry  
Don't forget to thank the CRC and the dark money that funded your involvement in the campaign#SpotlightNI #Brexit #DirtyMoney 
Channel 4 broadcast this last night and it was not on the @BBCNews this morning. Listen. it is incredible. Two US diplomats, knowing C4 were filming,  telling their Ambassador how they assess Brexit is going to work out  
You really haven't looked into this story at all, have you? JLR is overseas production for the first time ever (announced in 2017, now confirmed) and has cited Brexit as a reason for this move and for falling sales. This investment is welcome, but let's not pretend now... 
Great journalism by #SpotlightNI. Jim Fitzpatrick follows the money and discovers extraordinary links between the biggest ever political donation in Northern Ireland (to the DUP) and an interesting cast of characters in Belfast, London, Scotland and Ukraine. #Brexit  
Genuinely, genuinely fuck Brexit 
Drink! Feck! Girls! Brexit!  
This needs reading again, and we need to #Stopbrexit with a #PeoplesVoteBremainBrexit leaders prove that the campaign to leave the EU was entirely driven by self-interests#FBPE 
Gavin Millar, an electoral law expert from @matrixchambers speaks to Jim Fitzpatrick about his view on the #SpotlightNI special investigation into Brexit, Dark Money & the DUP. Available on iPlayer:  
Brilliant journalism from the team at #SpotlightNI Richard Cook - the shadowy director behind the "Constitutional Research Council" which funded DUP/VoteLeave/AggregateIQ activity in the #brexit ref, was involved in worldwide fraud and dodgy contracts. Brexit is tainted... 
From Inside the American Embassy; Channel 4. Filmed roughly Nov '17-Jan '18US Embassy staff discussing Brexit. They know Brexit is a disaster and that the British Govt are not telling the public that 52% voted for something that's likely to be "very very bad".#BrexitReality 
Brexit not settled for Britons in Europe  
Unions join business leaders to demand urgency in Brexit talks First business leaders, now the unions. Increasing number of voices, & volume. 
Then FFS oppose Brexit! The country is going down the drain and you're not stopping it. 
Also worth noting that Huerta stepped down from FAA a few weeks ago - but that film is quite an insight into how the US officials really see Brexit - clearly there will be different views, and POTUS is obviously more of a fan... but no way round the Aviation issue legally 
Hard to believe the DUP deliberately spent a load of money in London to influence Brexit where nobody knew who they were while at the same time spending no money here where polls showed the vote to be tight...#SpotlightNI 
Former Scottish Labour leader Jim Murphy spoke to #SpotlightNI: "The CRC are probably the most secretive organisation in British politics." Jim Fitzpatrick reporting now on @BBCOneNI - Brexit, Dark Money & the DUP.  
Anyway - I think all this must occur on Huerta’s visit to London last December... which fully confirms our #brexitforensics story from a fortnight before then on a crisis on Brexit Aviation talks 
#Brexit Bill becomes law, allowing #UK to leave EU  
#FBPEHer Majesty signed the EU Withdrawal bill which passed into law today. You might not like that but just remember that Brexit will save Britain from the EU and your kids will be grateful we did.  
There was over a million more people who voted Leave. Stop patronising the fuck out of them and actually accept they voted Brexit to shake up a London centric, neoliberal stays quo that's been shitting on them for years.  
Whistleblower Christopher Wylie speaks to Jim Fitzpatrick about his views on the Brexit referendum. #SpotlightNI on @BBCOne NI now. @chrisinsilico 
“Our industry has stopped investing, but it’s not because of Brexit,” argues co-founder and CEO of restaurant chain Leon, John Vincent @JohnV_LEON #newsnight 
"Read my bloodless lips. No new taxes....for the rich" They were ALWAYS the party of high tax. For the 99%. They invented the phrase stealth taxes but THEY introduced the tax. YOU paid for the bank crisis. And you paid in blood. And now YOU'LL pay for this speculator Brexit con. 
I already have HGVs parking outside my house (5 mins from Dover port), I cannot even begin to imagine the horror that will occur after brexit. And our MP voted for it. Cheers Charlie   
It should NEVER have been allowed to happen.Why aren’t @UKLabour jumping up and down about all the corruption associated with the EU Referendum? Why so quiet?!   
Greece never met the criteria 4 joining the EU. & it never could. The EU allowed it in anyway & has since raped its people & economy. So much for helping/protecting the smaller European countries against the larger bullies like Germany. It stinks. Brexit is their only hope too. 
Wednesday's Guardian: "Unions join business leaders to demand urgency in Brexit talks"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
If you voted Brexit because our relationship with the EU turned into something you never signed up for, then surely you should want a #PeoplesVote on the new relationship with the EU? 
Actually Brexit has a lot to do with Greece. When we stop paying and the EU crumbles, places like Greece and Italy and Cyprus and just about everywhere except Germany will be free too; able to rebalance their economies and look to a better future for their young people.  
Most Leavers don't understand that tariffs are not the main obstacle to trade. It's Non-Tariff Barriers. Overcoming them requires interference in domestic policy which is why they are so hard to overcome and why the Single Market is so remarkable.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
From today leaving the EU is enshrined in law. Not so long ago I remember being told by ministers of how the “referendum lock” was enshrined in law. Funny how fast things move once they start to shift 
The BBC should remind viewers that under the 'corporatist' economic model on the continent, big firms often have a close relationship with politicians.  #Brexit 
Embassy economists then tell Huerta that - UK growth slowing down “longer term slower slide” including “inflation from an outside shock - worst kind of inflation”- People tired of austerity .. If Brexit ends up not obviously helping them could have political knock on effects.. 
ok so what does Brexit look like lets hear it 
Encouraging to hear that  @Keir_Starmer has told @UKLabour allies in the EU parliament today that a #PeoplesVote is a live option. Our job over the next 3 months is to make it clear that it is the only option for our party and our country. #Brexit is not inevitable.  
Not much different to what's going on in other departments!People would be shocked at just how much ministers do know.How they & civil servants work to split blame, colude with vested EU interests & how continued sell out of UK happens despite Brexit.Whole swamp needs drained  
US embassy analysts then variously discuss with visiting top Trump official - how UK public hasn’t yet internalised: “the economy is going to tank I better sit on my cash”- “Government not done a lot of for macro analysis almost deliberately” so as not to upset Brexit voters 
The BBC's Brexit coverage is an absolute disgrace: Constant Project Fear from 'crony capitalist' special interests and little or nothing on the huge economic benefits from a bonfire of EU red tape and freer trade with the rest of the world.  
Money or 'party line' - ie keep your mouth shut about what you really think about Brexit.  
Coordinated statements on Brexit by the TUC and the CBI - a significant development  
It was good to meet Greece's Prime Minister Alexis Tsipras today to talk about Brexit, the fight against austerity, and the crucial importance of international solidarity in our time.Governments can and must work together to support refugees fleeing war and devastation.  
So, if you had to, which would you choose  Note no choice to Remain in my Referendum (quiz) 
The Guardian front page, Wednesday 27 June 2018: Unions join business leaders to demand urgency in Brexit talks  
Celebrating Ha Ha Ha the biggest failure in political history no offence Ian you are clueless what exactly is Brexit offering oh yes you dont know. 
Spain’s foreign minister says #EU is "angry" with UK for holding back the evolution of the undemocratic European Federal Superstate project.Then... Please, Release us, Let us go,For we don't love you anymore.Release us & Let us trade #WTO again!#Brexit 
I have to admit that I really LOL'D at this.#EUsupergirl @albawhitewolf catches chief cheat, err I mean #Brexiteer @Nigel_Farage and goes in for a chat.He's like a rabbit caught in the headlights when confronted with his #Brexit lies. #StopBrexit #FBPE #ExitfromBrexit #WATON 
Asking Adam for advice on your relationship is like asking Theresa May how to sort out Brexit. #loveisland 
United Kingdom: 'Queen approves Brexit law that will end membership of EU' 
Seems people haven't seen this one. Brexit is being lost by women turning away from a horrible outcome for our kids.Keep it up leavers. The nasty aggressive messaging is working for Remain.  
Soft Brexiteers are willing to be bound by EU rules and tariffs. A hard Brexit aims to escape them  
Queen signs EU withdrawal bill: @jackbuckby on what must happen next  | #UK #Brexit #tcot 
CBI and TUC join forces to warn govt it is risking jobs, rights and whole sectors of industry with its approach to #Brexit-Tomorrow’s Guardian  
Cancelling Brexit might spark a hard right backlash. But delivering Brexit definitely will, says @JonnElledge 
Remainers you need to watch this on @BBCiPlayer @BBCnireland @duponline and link with @vote_leave Brexit Bung. #FBPEparty 
The argument of we did ok before 1973 is probably one of the worst arguments for Brexit I have ever heard. Yea we were ok before advances in medicine for example, but times change. Just because we did ‘ok’ in a world before heart transplants, doesn’t mean we should go back there 
Here's what #Brexit is really like. The Customs Union & Single Market make goods, services and people flow more efficiently - they're like a transport network. Now imagine undoing most of the improvements to the UK transport network made since 1973. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
V newsworthy Brexit exchange in new C4 fly on wall US embassy documentary - occurs when a very worried head of the Federal Aviation Agency Michael Huerta arrives worried about plane tickets not being valid when UK EU air safety status “evaporates” 
State things in the conditional:"You voted for a Brexit that would make your lives better, your NHS better, your self-determination better. It is Labour's position that any Brexit deal which harms our NHS, loses jobs, and diminishes our say must be ratified by the people." 
Big businesses threatening to pull out of Britain unless Theresa May does what they want while well-off Remainers in London cheer them on... these people have no idea how much this confirms Brexit voters’ belief that political life has been colonised by self-interested elites. 
#OTD 1856 The legendary Irish playwright George Bernard Shaw was born in Dublin."Those who can’t change their minds can’t change anything."For David Davis and other Brexiteers who should change their mind as the folly of Brexit becomes clearer even to them.#PeoplesVote pic.twitter.com/mPqiAOBgkS 
A question for Corbyn tomorrow: “Does the Prime Minister agree with the Foreign Secretary that the government’s Brexit policy is to ‘f*** business’?” #PMQs 
Brexit is pushing Theresa May into alliance with Hungary's right-wing populist government  
#BREXIT has been relegated to fourth on EU summit agenda. This snub shows that the EU is not really interested in negotiating with us in good faith. It also shows that the bloc is being torn apart by the migration crisis and the post-Brexit funding gap.  
EVERYONE must listen to this. It’s what the US thinks of Brexit. And they don’t pull any punches. Utterly brutal indeed. Please, if you want a final say on the deal and the detail you must sign #PeoplesVotePetition#StopBrexitSaveBritain#FBPE 
Theresa May risks slowly suffocating investment in the car industry, according to manufacturers desperate for Brexit clarity  pic.twitter.com/1HYV8emjU0 
The UK government must review visa and immigration policies for university staff and students if efforts to boost research and innovation are to be successful post-Brexit, says @Cambridge_Uni v-c 
Seeking postdoc to work with me and Katharine Tyler on our new @ESRC project “Identity, Belonging & the Role of the Media in Brexit Britain”. Please consider applying! #ECR #PostDoc #RA #ethnography *closing date 2 July* @NCLSociology@UofESPA  
Hungarian Foreign Minister slams EU for trying to punish the UK over Brexit and warns EU could face economic devastation without a post-Brexit trade arrangement with the UK. 
Hip hip hooray.    Tories cheer in the Commons as the Queen gives Brexit royal assent  
Play it out:General election 2022.18 months after the transition period. So the economic damage of Brexit will be feltDue to demographic shift, Labour be answering to a Remain population who begged for help in 2018.Even if Labour wins: Damage blamed on Labour 
The Tories have trashed what’s left of their economic reputation.  Boris Johnson's “fuck business” outburst and the non-existent “Brexit dividend” destroy any claim to credibility.  - New Statesman  
Cardiff council leader says the Government's handling of Brexit is a 'disaster' 
This is the Chief Secretary to the Treasury attacking the Environment Secretary - not over Brexit, but over key planks of Government environmental policy. This really is extraordinary. On top of everything else, collective cabinet responsibility appears to be dead.  
Hopefully I can attend the @StopBrexitMarch in Birmingham on 30 September to fit in with the Conservatives party conference.It would be amazing if we can get a good #remainernow contingent there. We can have a few drinks, a chat & make it clear his #brexit is not in your name!  
It must be galling for those in the Conservatives with sound pragmatic pro-business credentials like @rosaltmann to watch their party sink to happily trashing such an approach, in favour of dogmatic xenophobic right-wing populism over #Brexit  
In same week members of Cabinet telling biz to shut up on Brexit..Shadow Chancellor encouraged City for “honest debate about Brexit, now is the time for other voices to speak more loudly about the imminence of a threat of No Deal to living standards/ jobs” 
Okay, I'm caving in the the constant demands to "get behind Brexit".I'm getting behind it and pushing it off the highest cliff I can find, then watch with satisfaction as it crashes onto the rocks below!#StopBrexit 
It's no wonder only 1 in 7 people think our Brexit policy is clear and only 1 in 50 think it's very clear. The / A Customs Union policy "was" the one clear bit we had.For heavens sake, give the members a say and let us decide policy, we'll be very clear. 
Delighted to hear Kir Starmer say to the #S&D Group in the #EP that #Labour has not ruled out a second Referendum on the final #Brexit deal. 
Positive meeting with ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ in Luxembourg tonight - EU solidarity with Ireland  strong as ever. Looking forward to visiting London next week to discuss need for progress on #Brexit.  
How many more of our parliamentary rules and protocols do we have to surrender to keep #brexit on track and the tories in power. This government is lowering every standard.#FBPE 
Labour has the policies I believe in the strongest. But unless Brexit is put to bed, those policies just won't see the light of day.I do respect what you do. Labour's policies are crucial to fixing the country. I just want to make sure we have the tools to make it happen. 
Pat McFadden - The leadership in this country no longer considers the economic prosperity & well-being of the people as its top priority... they now consider ideology & their red lines over #Brexit as being more important than the welfare of the people they represent.#FBPE 
I imagine we won't be seeing much of #NigelFarage on UK TV for a while. He'll be afraid of being asked about EU referendum night and his possible role in helping hedge funds make a killing on the pound by implying Remain would win. #Brexit #crime 
Can't wait to bring back Stormont so we can headlines like this one again.Don't forget to tune in to BBC Spotlight at 10.50pm for their Brexit money investigation.  
.@KTHopkins put on a brunette wig & dark glasses to infiltrate the anti-#Brexit march through #London over the weekend. The unsuspecting "Remaniacs" she met explained why they wanted a "do-over" referendum. PS: Get updates from Katie at  | #UK #tcot 
I respect Labour members pushing for a 2nd referendum.They care about Labour and want see a debate (though I disagree with them).I don’t respect non-Labour #FBPE/LibDems telling us what to do.Stop using our party (that you don’t care about) as a vehicle for your own cause. 
Predictable but disturbing UBS Brexit survey of 600 companies confirms:- 35% plan to reduce UK investment- 41% moving capacity out of UK- 42% shifting capacity to Eurozone  
Britain has had the courage to vote for change, to abide by the results of that vote, and to get out of the EU. I’d call it democracy. Happy second birthday, Brexit.  
Blairites who post-2015 wagged their finger at the party membership over its “idealism” in opposing austerity.... are now anti austerity because it’s a convenient argument to oppose Brexit . Being in the EU didn’t prevent austerity, leaving the EU doesn’t necessitate it  
Cue another round of bubble dwelling lefties getting excited , frankly if you were all so clever how come you got beat on Brexit & Trump...@maitlis 
Thoroughly depressing. We'll be hearing about "Global Britain" and "Jobs First Brexit" again before we know it. Meanwhile, businesses plan to up sticks and bring a generation of austerity, poverty and misery. These warnings will, once again, go ignored.#PeoplesVote 
OK - so the #EU is planning a €2.1 TRILLION fund, on top of its €500 billion Juncker Fund on top of its €550 billion bank 'loans.'   Oh, and there are funds all spliced in via other mechanisms too.  UK provided 13% #Brexit 
Peter Mandelson endorses a parliamentary enquiry into whether some hedge funds manipulated the #Brexit referendum for their own private gain. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
3. And erm, the PM is in ten days going to try to get them to agree what they want from Brexit so that there is the chance of moving on to talk about the actual final deal 
Canada's @JustinTrudeau has openly stated that #Canada and the #UK can go beyond a #Brexit agreement for “an even larger or more impactful deal”, potentially including visa arrangements & freer movement.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #UKpolitics 
If you don't like Lab's policy on #Brexit,there's no need to worry.There will be another one along shortly.  
An absolutely laughable positionThe EU will allow the UK to join them at the negotiating table in any future trade deals... as what, an equal partner? Or spare wheel?Labour Brexiteers ie Labour supporters outside London. You’ve been betrayed! #Brexit  
 At every turn the Tory government at Westminster has ignored the @scotparl on Brexit. Here's what has happened.  
It’s shocking that Brexit can only objectively discussed by foreign governments and not by our own Government  or Opposition. This must be the low point of any democracy. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
You want proof that Brexit will not happen?Here's your proof.There are no preparations being made for the UK being outside the customs union or single market.Look at actions, not words. If someone isn't packing a suitcase, then they're not bloody going on holiday, are they?  
No, Jeremy Corbyn did not fly to Jordan to avoid a rally.He flew to visit the Za'atari refugee camp, home to 80,000 people, to see the impact of the refugee crisis.How low can the ‘Stop Brexit’ #FBPE crowd go? 
21. There are certainly disadvantages to this system but that is not an argument for having no system at all - and to date the Brexit blob have yet to convincingly outline what we replace that trade with -and they never will simply because it is beyond their ken to understand it. 
Peter Mandelson says he'd back a parliamentary inquiry into Bloomberg's revelations about hedge funds on Brexit referendum night  
.@EmilyThornberry tonight confirmed that @uklabour would have us in the Customs Union after #Brexit & we would be tied to the #EU under for trade deals.When asked if she had party unity, her reply was who knows. #Labour don’t have a clue on #Brexit@Channel4News tonight 
The Queen has given royal assent to the European Union (Withdrawal) Act. A group of Conservative MPs cheered loudly in the House of Commons when Speaker John Bercow announced the key Brexit legislation had been given formal royal approval. One step closer to Brexit. pic.twitter.com/Ys1wIbi9iD 
Twitter is full of 'experts' who know far better about the consequences of #Brexit than the CEOs of major industries who've a lifetime of experience in their sectors. It's a wonder these 'experts' aren't running these major industries, rather than working on their shopfloors. 
Hungary Warns Failure to Negotiate Brexit Trade Deal Will ‘Devastate’ EU Economy   
Cheers as EU Withdrawal Bill Given Royal Assent, Brexit Day Set  
150,000 signatures on the petition for a #PeoplesVote in 3 days.More and more of us – whether we voted Leave or Remain two years ago – realise we’re heading for a botched Brexit. Sign here for a safety net  
The Eurotunnel. The Fucking Eurotunnel. If anyone needed to know the Brexit plan you'd think it would be these guys!  
The greatest goalie in NHL history (statistically) and its first black player are likely making the Hall of Fame today and 99% of the conversation is going to be a referendum on Bettman's career if he's in. I wonder who nominated him? 
Brexit pushes UK govt into alliance with Hungary's far-right populist govt:•Tory MEPs vote against censuring Hungary govt for its crackdown on NGOs, attacks on “Muslim invaders”, antisemitic campaigns•Hungary govt slams EU for its treatment of UK 
must watch video Brexit disaster US view  
"Fuck business" and the imaginary "Brexit dividend": @georgeeaton  on how the Tories trashed what's left of their economic reputation 
E) My case is far from anecdotal. People were terrified about a Tory Brexit and so Labour increased its share.Quite simply, Labour will soon be answering to a Remain voter base. Good 
EU Commission doesn’t have a proper Brexit plan, so UK could actually shape the debate – even at this late stage – if it got act together. Former PMs Blair & Major could be important in this. Sadly they seem more interested in re-running referendum battles  
Just told my Leftist neighbor the Travel Ban was upheld in the SCOTUSThink I will wait till tonight to tell him about the pro-life victory and BREXIT...He took the first news pretty bad   
So depressing. Half the country believes in something that does not exist. What happens when you have a Prime Minister and the Brexit press spreading lies and a spineless broadcast media. No wonder public opinion on Brexit has not moved very much. Who will stand up for truth?  
From the US embassy   If you wanted to design something to disable a country for a few decades you would engineer Brexit. 
'Theresa May’s plan to protect British industry by keeping the UK in a single market for goods without respecting the free movement of people after Brexit will be rejected by an “angry” France and Germany'-- good ! -- 
According to #Leavers, UK job losses are not the result of the #BrexitShambles. They are either the fault of the EU, or the fault of #Remainers for not getting behind #Brexit.Wake up #Leavers, jobs lost will be entirely YOUR fault. Own it, don't try passing the buck. 
BREXIT FIGHT BACK: Ireland set to lose £3BN in EU budget as exit battle lines drawn  
EU's biggest countries will block any attempt by Britain to combine single-market membership with immigration curbs, Spain's foreign minister says  
This is why a no deal Brexit is not an option....  
Cruella tries to repair damaged relations with business leaders after row over Brexit warnings.. Too bad you haven't taken a blind bit of notice of them for two years isn't it @theresa_may. And your idiot Boris has damaged relations further... 
No matter what your thoughts on #Brexit & EU citizens, children must never be victim of bullying because of their background. Researchers call for more training to help teachers, amid reports of growing racism in schools against Eastern European pupils  
1/ Some politicians are starting to point out that Brexit is bad for business. It took car companies to public for them to do that even though these conversations happened behind closed doors but still. The point is, even a soft Brexit is like austerity for businesses.  
19% believe Theresa May's claim a ‘Brexit dividend' will largely fund extra £20bn for NHS, suggests a new Guardian/ICM poll.19%! What sort of people could possibly believe...  
Every donation helps us to go that little bit further in taking the fight to the Brexit blockers in defence of our cause. 
Brexitspotting:Fuck business!Fuck jobs!Fuck paying your mortgage!Fuck buying food!Fuck healthcare!Fuck opportunity!Fuck the country!Choose Brexit: fuck everything! 
BREXIT BONUS UPDATE:Bank of America is moving investment banking operations to Europe.Well done Brexit morons@lbc #bbcpm #newsnight #PeoplesVote #r4today 
Is the fast train to Brexit facing a serious delay?  
Be amazing if we got to the point where we realised the problem isn't 'Trump' or 'Brexit'. Those are symptoms. The problem is that information overload is making us stupid. The news is subjective and tailored to our prejudices. Truth is now whatever people want it to be. 
Spanish foreign minister claims that May's plan for a cake and eat #Brexit with access to the Single Market, would be rejected by Spain, France and Germany, unless FOM continues. This follows the govt being rocked by news that without access to Single Market, 850K jobs at risk. 
The Brexit resistance: ‘It’s getting bigger all the time’ 
Corbyn should suddenly back no brexit?So what happens if he does that?He will alienate 75% of Labour voters & Labour will disappear.The only way to maintain a balance for both leave & remain is to make the deals already set out in the manifesto.But THE TORIES ARE IN GOVT. 
This is brutal, and exactly how the rest of the world now sees the UK and Brexit.H/T @TerryLovesEggs 
Just a thought, but if Greg Clark and Philip Hammond - two ministers immersed in the economic numbers - are calling for a cautious Brexit, maybe people should listen to what they’re saying?  
BREXIT: The Tories have trashed what’s left of their economic reputation /#EU #Brexit #Business #PeoplesVote  
Putting the German car manufacturers being hit by Brexit into context.2017 VW worldwide sales 10.8m2017 VW UK sales 206kSo the UK less than 2% 
Today PM @theresa_may spoke to @Dannythefink and business leaders at @thetimes CEO Summit about getting the best Brexit deal, our modern Industrial Strategy and creating an economy that works for everyone.  
There's not much prescriptive value to this observation, though, because there's a partisan media empire devoted to turning any "small and exaggerated" incident into a national referendum and that isn't going away.  
Two years since #EUref (YouGov)- 67% believe the Tories are doing a poor job with Brexit negotiations- 53% want Brexit to go ahead- 21% want a 2nd referendum- 14% believe government will get the deal they want- 13% think Brexit should be stopped 
I was with Nigel Farage on referendum night – and there was no 'Brexit short' conspiracy  
The boss of CMC Markets and former Tory party treasurer Peter Cruddas has said Britain should “walk away” unless it can get the right EU deal, and attacked the Lords and rebel MPs for frustrating Brexit efforts  
Tonight 10:50PM on @BBCOneNI: Jim Fitzpatrick reveals new information on how the DUP & Vote Leave worked together in the EU referendum. Did they break the law? And he digs deep into the finances behind the DUP’s record referendum donor in a global money trail.#SpotlightNI 
"Hungary last night broke ranks to warn that the EU faces economic devastation if it fails to achieve a post-Brexit trade deal with Britain.Foreign minister Peter Szijjarto demanded Brussels stop trying to punish the British people for voting Leave." 
Listen to people who want to make the best of Brexit, not those agitating to stop it, says @DavidScullion 
Ferrovial to move international HQ out of UK because of Brexit  
Anna Soubry does indeed deserve to be deselected for her prolonged campaign to sabotage the #Brexit process, despite her initial promise to honour the referendum result.  via @MailOnline 
I’m excited and pleased that the #EUWithdrawalBill received Royal Ascent from Her Majesty the Queen today, making it law. This is an important step forward towards delivering on the will of the British people and making #Brexit the great success it can be. 
Labour’s apparent position of being pro-customs union but anti-CETA/EU-Japan FTA only makes sense in a Brexit context if they want the EU to renegotiate its trade deals to address the concerns of a Labour-led UK which is no longer in the EU — i.e cake-ism on steroids 
People seem surprised the Tories are recruiting a £70,000-a-year aviation negotiator for Brexit - who doesn't need any knowledge of aviation. Theresa May has recruited an entire cabinet that doesn’t have any knowledge of government whatsoever, or much else for that matter. 
Brexit: Our country is facing its biggest crisis in generations. The 10s of thousands who attended the #PeoplesVoteMarch showed that there is an appetite for change. It’s time to get involved in a mass movement, to restore an open, progressive Britain. 
Barry ‘Brexit bollocks’ Gardiner consults with his adviser, the jobs first unicorn  
#Corbyn wants to unite the Country whether that be Brexiteers and Remainers for a Brexit that suits us all. Right wingers and Centrists (#FBPE) are doing everything possible to divide us 
ScotGov CabinetSturgeon: FMSwinney: education & DFMMackay: financeFreeman: healthYousaf: justiceMatheson: transportCampbell: communitiesEwing: rural economyRussell: Brexit & constitutionSomerville: social securityHyslop: cultureCunningham: environment 
Brexit is a big deal, not a done deal. And it is too big to be ignored by the people - that's why we have a petition for the #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal - sign and share here:  
Brexit: The barriers are going up. We’re cutting ourselves off from the richest trading block in the world. Do we really want to fall of the cliff?  
Brexit is.... "a pain in the ass", "a past problem”, "a very bad allocation of intelligence, resources and money” says Spain’s foreign minister Josep Borrell, who confidently predicts Theresa May's white paper plan will be rejected via @DanielBoffey 
Carole's work has, by and large, raised some serious issues - but I think comparing the referendum result to the Grenfell Tower tragedy is over the top, tasteless and wrong.  
British Queen approves Brexit law that will end membership of EU  
BMW's Brexit U-turn: German car giant will NOT quit the UK in no deal scenario  BMW no longer leaving U.K. if no dealSurprise,Surprise. 
But one thing has changed since then. We knew then that Farage linked Trump & Bannon & Wikileaks & Mercer & Trump & Brexit & Cambridge Analytica. Now we know he links all those to Russia too. And we know that he still hasn't answered qs on any of this.   
If the Tories are no longer the party of business, then what exactly are they for (apart from serving as a vehicle for the self-promotion of the Foreign Secretary, and a routefinder to a bitter Brexit)? 
This arsehole was at a friend's door, during the 2014 referendum, and told him his pension was unsafe if he voted for independence, luckily I had a copy of the DWP letter to refute Sarwar's lies.Shona stepped down, after running the best NHS in these Isles.  
Much enjoyed this event last night. In a discussion, comparing all post-war PMs and their handling of Europe, who came out worst? Why, it was David Cameron - indicted for both the referendum and for his resignation  
Piers, before 1973 we made & exported things. Thatcher did for manufacturing, so now mostly we export services & skills, particularly successfully to, and because of, the EU Single Market. Brexit is a wrecking ball to these exports. Do you really not know this elementary stuff? 
@PhilipHammondUK @theresa_may It’s time to please stop fuelling the Brexit mindset and thinking how to move the floating voter back for a #peoplesvote that leaves only a small minority of racists and xenophobes on the periphery that nobody identifies with. 
We cannot regain sovereignty and neglect our armed forces - we must take care of our superb military after Brexit. 
Bad day for the NWO Cabal ...Brexit signed into law & Supreme Court rules Potus has the authority to protect citizens from terrorists ! 
Science is a fundamentally collaborative & global enterprise & the UK should seek arrangements that create the lowest possible barriers to practising scientists seeking to move across borders #TogetherScienceCan #Brexit  
The #heatwave in the UK is because of #Brexit. We have sent you our continental weather to punish you for voting the wrong way. It will continue until Nigel Farage admits his Russia connections. 
Tim Martin - "Airbus were very much in favour of us entering the Euro and they were very vociferous about that.“They even wrote to their own employees to say that they should vote Remain in the referendum. They’re very pro the EU." #Brexit  
Every time the BBC news reports outside the Palace of Westminster, they allow remainers brandishing  foreign EU flags & anti Brexit placards to broadcast their anti brexit message freely. More evidence of BBC anti Brexit bias. They should be reported to Ofcom. 
Interesting to note the  #FBPE Remain alliance's strategy, of blaming the Russian 'boogeyman' for the referendum defeat, coopted from U.S democrats. A strategy used in years past for inducing wars that has bled the U.K white.I voted remain, but tire of this nonsense.  
June recap!@nigel_farage's Leave campaign admit lying about r'ship with Russian govt.Revealed to have passed FBI docs to embassy. (About @nigel_farage aide - arrested for money laundering)@nigel_farage exposed at centre of insider trading Brexit scandal 
1994: Erdogan is elected mayor of Istanbul. 2003: Erdogan becomes prime minister.2014: Erdogan becomes president.2017: A referendum gives Erdogan unprecedented presidential powers. 2018: Erdogan is elected to another term with 53 percent of the vote. 
Campaigners from Shropshire in their local paper talking about the #PeoplesVoteMarch and the need for a #peoplesvote on the Brexit deal. 
Christ of all the Tories' Brexit lows, this has to be a new contender.  
Wales were misled to vote in an opinion poll which made no decision. And just as well because polling shows wales don’t want Brexit if it costs them money.Democracy moves love!  
Are all these businesses pointing out the damage that #Brexit is going to do just scaremongering?My gut feel is that the captains of industry have a wealth of experience amongst them; and that, as they are accountable to their shareholders, they have a duty to call out concerns 
Even binding referendum can be ignored. We have a parliamentary system and tories ignored democratic vote of 2015 to give vote to the expats. That was a legal promise in the manifesto of a gov which won a majority. Please get up to speed with reality! 
Britain's Queen Elizabeth on Tuesday granted royal assent to Prime Minister Theresa May's #Brexit law that will formally end the country's EU membership.  
Spot on from @Andrew_Adonis. Explains exactly why we #Remainers are totally ignored by May, Corbyn and most of the MPs on both sides of the house. Sometimes feels like to Tories have a majority of about 500 the way #Brexit is being railroaded through.  
VIDEO: Cheers as EU Withdrawal Bill Given Royal Assent and Brexit Day Set in Law   
In January this year I brought some arty friends together and suggested we start a group called @artists4brexit.Although none of us are paid for our work, with today's news, I'm pleased to have helped create a platform where artists can simply express their support for Brexit.  
The Tories are selling Jews and Muslims down the river for their precious Brexit. God, I'm so ashamed.  
No agreement on Macedonia/Albania. No agreement on migrants. No agreement on eurozone reforms. No agreement on Brexit. Truly a stellar week for the EU  
HEADLINES: Brexit becomes law, allowing UK to leave European UnionTravel Ban upheld by SCOTUS Holy Crap, The Alt Left is getting kicked in the teeth! Ha ha 
Hungary Warns Failure to Negotiate Brexit Trade Deal Will ‘Devastate’ EU Economy   
BMW's Brexit U-turn: BMW will not consider moving investment out of Britain  
Captain Fox's phoney trade deals are no match for being part of Team Europe - the EU-Japan deal will cover a third of global GDP and boost British exports. Yet another reason why we need a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. @peoplesvote_uk 
Boom. Suck in that Miliband  Well said Kevin. I might add that the refugee/migrant and indeed ISIS fuse was lit by labour invading Iraq all those years ago. A million marched ya know. Made no difference. 10k matched the other day & say it warrants another referendum. F.O. 
To the anti-Brexit Twitter mob who genuinely seem to think on the back of my tweet below that I believe The Queen's signature on (every piece of) legislation represents a political viewpoint, I simply hope you rediscover your sense of humour some time soon  
The UK won’t have access to the EU's police databases after Brexit, but crime does not respect international borders. Be it through the loss of the European Arrest Warrant or our membership of Europol, Brexit will hurt the fight against crime. 
Do NOT abandon red lines @theresa_may we want FULL #brexitBREXIT ULTIMATUM: Brussels tells May to soften stance on EU exit for better deal   
Do it, do something today! you’ve all got MPs, so make sure they know how you feel about #Brexit.  
They claimed all these predicted consequences of #Brexit were just #ProjectFear. Now that #BrexitReality begins to emerge, time for a bit of honesty from the government... 
The EU withdrawal bill has today received Royal Assent - thank you, Your Majesty, a wonderful day for the United Kingdom and the British people! #BREXIT #Freedom #GlobalBritain #MrsThatcherWasRight #RuleBritannia #GodSaveTheQueen  
Free movement is amazing: it allows people and families to live, work, and study and retire across the EU. @BritishInEurope are doing a video campaign on what it means to our members. #keepfom #Brexit @GuitarMoog @RobHarrison_EU @fjgodfrey 
I thought I recognised my old sparring partner @ToddDForeman - former @UKLabour councillor in @RBKC and recently a supporter of @AdvanceRBKC in local elections. A bit of an obsessive about the EU, he has had difficulty adjusting to the bright future offered by Brexit. 
Making up the numbers of the anti-Brexit march in London - the BBC seems to be taking lessons in number crunching from the Labour frontbench...#GoBrexit #LetsGetOnWithIt 
Oh: and another point. If Labour policy suddenly shifted to support a second referendum, the parliamentary arithmetic is not there for it to get through the Commons. Some Labour MPs would never ever vote for it, a large majority of Tory MPs certainly wouldn't. 
Last September, @LaylaMoran warned the government about the potential impact of Brexit on the car industry and was immediately dismissed. Now both the SMMT and BMW have echoed her concerns. Think it's time Theresa May took them seriously? Share this post.  
Please RT: Nobody gave ‘informed consent’ for #Brexit. That’s because in the #EUreferendum, the electorate was not sufficiently informed. We were misinformed. That’s why we need a new vote on the final Brexit deal. The #PeoplesVote. See all our posters at  
Brexit uncertainty put thousands of jobs at risk, says car industry — 856,000 jobs, 186,000 of which are on the production lines.It has told govt that it needs “as a minimum” to remain in the customs union and a deal that delivers “single market benefits” 
I voted Remain. I just don’t believe all these apocalyptic predictions of life post Brexit, especially as most of the people making them predicted the same apocalypse if we didn’t join the Euro...  
The lights of democracy,  and sovereignty,  go out in parliament . #Brexit  
Adam Tomkins re-writing history. If the UK government believed Sewel  applied to the EU Withdrawal Bill. Why then did they not remove the sections that did not have the @scotparl's consent? Why go to court to stop the Scottish Continuity Bill? #Brexit 
The best of us are all in it together. The worst of us are out for themselves. Humans haven't evolved this far to end up with Brexit and Trump. We got complacent because we are surrounded by great people with like minds. We didn't see the massive dark shadow that was waiting 
Today Parliament is debating the EU-Japan free trade agreement, which will be the world's largest free trade agreement and cover a third of global GDP.So why do the Tories want us to be locked out of it after Brexit?  
Rejoice! We are on our way now!We call on all artists, arts workers and arts supporters, regardless of how you voted in the referendum, to join us in getting behind Brexit to help us to support the process!We shall soon have a website and membership arrangements etc in place!  
Again, Brexit has not exposed inadequate governance in the EU, but in the UK. 
How many more are going to move out of UK?The Spanish manager of Heathrow airport, Ferrovial, has today revealed plans to move its international holding to Amsterdam from Oxford to keep the business under EU legislation after Brexit 
 Booming Brexit Britain: Retail sales jump 1.3% in May from April, comfortably beating expectations of a 0.5% rise Business activity survey reveal strong rebound for dominant services sector Robust recovery in manufacturing and construction  
The problem is far more than that. These figures should never have arisen in the first place.(a) there should never have been a referendum;(b) the 51.89% were voting for all sorts of different, often mutually exclusive, things. 
BREXIT REALITY-so in a nutshell...... piss on every working man & woman remove their working rights & protections so that you can pay them less & work them more to make people like you more profitable - DID YOU LEAVERS REALLY VOTE FOR THAT.. didnt think so  
Precisely why Brexiteers don't want it investigated. Why were DUP allowed to retain a NI only obsolete security based law from 'troubles' period which prevents publishing of the true donor identity of £400k given to DUP Brexit campaign. Thought NI law 100% same as UK as one state 
From Italy to Poland, the EU’s federalist project is starting to rip apart at the seams:  #Brexit 
UBS survey of 600 companies spells out Brexit “dividend”:– 35% of companies plan to reduce UK investment post-Brexit– 41% plan to move a large amount of capacity out of UK– 42% plan to shift capacity to euro zone#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Tonight on #SpotlightNI Jim Fitzpatrick reports: New information on how the DUP & Vote Leave worked together in the EU referendum. Did they break the law? And he digs deep into the finances behind the DUP’s record referendum donor in a money trail that leads to Ukraine and beyond  
‘The problem with Brexit is that 52 has been rounded up to 100 and 48 rounded down to zero’ (v shrewd remark to me just now) 
Theresa May is not a put-upon moderate. Everything about her political record marks her out as an authoritarian nationalist who regards democracy, human rights and the rule of law as barely tolerable impediments to carrying out government policy. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #StopBrexit 
My thoughts on this issue boiled down; Brexit is just so fucking weird. Like a neurosurgeon asking the public to vote, using instinct alone, on whether or not they should operate.  
Possible illegitimate interference by the Russians in the Leave campaign cannot be allowed to continue without a comprehensive investigation, or the outcome of the referendum itself will be called into question, and with it the whole Brexit process. #VoteontheDeal #ExitfromBrexit 
Can #Brexit supporters reassure me - as a Remain voter who accepts the result of the referendum & would very much like it all to work out - that there’s nothing to worry about all these various businesses that seem to be queuing up to leave Britain? 
The @SMMT have today warned that, unless the Gov rethinks its position on Brexit, 5,000 jobs are at risk in the car industry in London alone.Demand a People's Vote on the Brexit Deal:  
So far everyone we want a trade deal with has wanted to relax visas on their citizens or lower our health and safety standards to accommodate their products.Reality of Brexit... 
I’ve written to @TheFCA to ask them to investigate possible illegal activity surrounding the shorting of the pound on the night of the EU referendum  
It's not just business it's universities, #NHS, TU & citizens rights, the whole of British society to be sacrificed for a Tory #Brexit NOBODY voted for #PeoplesVote @Labour4EU @EK_EuropeanMove 
Honda's supply chain:Within the customs union, 5-24 hours to purchase a part from rest of EUOutside the customs union, 2-9 days due to new import declarations, then 2 sets of customs clearance/border checks at EU & UK ports#Brexit #cars #supplychain 
JUST IN: Brexit bill becomes law in UK  
This is once again extraordinarily blunt for the Japanese.If I was a car worker I would be planning for life after Brexit with no job.  
Spot on from @JonnElledge. “...cancelling Brexit might trigger a hard right backlash. But I can see no way that delivering it won’t do the same. The only difference is, we’ll have less stuff when it happens.”  
Ambassador: “... but Japanese firms are envisaging the possinbility of difficulties, no manufacturing firm that I know, not just Japan, has expanded the capacity since the referendum, because the uncertainty is there. They cannot expect more car sales to Europe...” 
Exciting times for #languages in Ireland: Irish govt identifies building foreign language capacity and enhancement of intercultural awareness as key skills needed for Ireland post-Brexit:  
Everyone but Brexit Conservatives - No deal brexit will be the worst thing everLabour - hold my beer 
#WorldCup England fans warned not to sing  anti Brexit songs. They should sing anti FIFA songs as  organisation rotten to the core 
Join Remainiac Joan 0’Brian  finding out why the first Referendum vote doesn’t count... (why do Remainers taste their own wee?) #Brexit  
“Imagine an independent Scotland. Our own central bank and currency, new financial regulatory setup, new and/or reformed banks, its own stock exchange, national investment bank, full fiscal control, no sodding Brexit. What a great place it would be, eh?”Dick Winchester  
Meanwhile in another universe, Labour MPs have been ordered to abstain on votes approving EU trade deals with Canada and Japan - which presumably a Labour government would want to replicate if it takes power after a Brexit. What is going on? 
EU signals no easing up on financial market access after Brexit  
So the big cabinet away day, called to approve Brexit white paper, is now scheduled for Friday 6 July, minister tells me. It was initially in grid for start of that week. I wonder what changed 
It’s Official and goes into effect next March. “Brexit” becomes law and the UK will no longer be part of the European Union EU.  
The Brexit parallels never stop. Airbus wrote individually to every employee warning them what a Leave vote might mean; this bit of Missouri voted overwhelmingly for Trump. But still...  
This column by @MollyMEP asks some truly disturbing questions about the agenda of @Nigel_Farage and other #Brexit warlords. It could be even worse than we thought:  
NEW! @KTHopkins goes undercover at the big anti-#Brexit march through #London: "Remoaners" explain that everyone who voted "Leave" had been "tricked." BONUS public urination & ill-advised fashion choices! SIGN UP FREE for updates from Katie:  | #UK #tcot 
They followed the rules of the 1975 Referendum Act.  Gerrymandering would have been changing those rules.Remain spent taxpayers money, had foreign interference & MPs voted to trigger Art 50 making it legal.I agree.  It's not about 'regret'.  It's all about being a bad loser.  
So Boris, the Foreign Secretary, tells business to "fxxxxck off"The Defense Secretary tells Russia to "go away and shut up !"And Parliament voted to deny itself any say whatsoever, handing all powers over to this bunch to get a great Brexit deal ! Just saying :) 
Gardas checking for ID near the Armagh/Monaghan border while a bus with an @Ogra_SF delegation heading for Brussels is stopped and ID'd. Brexit is the main topic of our trip to Brussels. #NoHardBorder #NoBorderInIreland 
You tool it didn’t happen and @Nigel_Farage had nothing to do with any of it and by the way what law have the hedge funds broken? Wake up @PeterKGeoghegan this is just another moronic attack on Brexit by morons.  
I'd have been happier to see a direct mention of preparation for a possible early independence referendum in the press release about Keith Brown's new role.  Much emphasis on the 2021 Holyrood election and the Westminster election, but an indyref might (ought to) precede both. 
U.K. government's flagship Brexit legislation officially becomes law.  
BREXIT IS A DONE DEAL!!!!! Queen signs off on Brexit, making it officially law.  #FoxNews 
A soft Brexit aims to keep Britain closely aligned with the EU. A hard Brexit rejects the whole idea  
Brexit is now enshrined in law.European Union (Withdrawal) Bill 2017-19 has been given Royal Assent. 
"“Fuck business.” Never was the Brexit manifesto more succinctly captured than in Boris Johnson’s impromptu aside. As slogans go, it has everything... Hell, it’s even shorter than “take back control”."  
BBC News - Brexit prompts Heathrow operator Ferrovial to move international HQ out of UK  
We've warned that uncertainty would gradually strangle British manufacturing. That's what's happening now. We have a government deliberately harming our economy & our people. That's what traitors do. First they lie to the British people, then they harm them.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
.@Andrew_Adonis citing Churchill on @TheNewEuropean podcast: when faced with a choice between right and wrong you do what’s right - you don’t compromise. Brexit is wrong, a “soft” one wouldn’t make it less wrong. 
The EU (Withdrawal) Bill is now law. After much contention in Westminster, and several determined Remoaners, The 1972 European Communities Act will be repealed. Brexit is happening. 
A hard #Brexitshambles risks 10,000 jobs in the Westcountry. That’s why I’m backing ⁦@laboursinglemkt⁩ #CustomsUnion & #PeoplesVote on any #Brexit deal  
Arguably the greatest tragedy of Brexit is that we're so busy with our own thermonuclear shitshow that we don't get to fully enjoy this one.  
A bad Brexit would mean job losses in the North East. Nobody voted to leave the EU in order to become poorer. We need proper scrutiny over the deal we do with the EU. That's why I'm asking for a #PeoplesVote 
FT Exclusive: Bank of America is moving a chunk of its investment banking operations to Paris in preparation for Brexit  
The rate at which Brexit bad news is currently emerging is terrifying.  
Brexit: Statement from the UK Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders: If you can’t replicate the advantages of EU membership don’t change it!  
My two questions to the Electoral Commission in Brussels. Notice how my second question re President Obama’s interference in the Referendum was not answered.   
Our latest Government #Brexit Update was published today and can be accessed here: This issue includes the recent visit of @JunckerEU & @MichelBarnier to Dublin, as well as important #Brexit research reports on #Trade, #Agrifood, & #SkillsNeeds 
I urge you to read this piece by @fotoole.Babies in cages were no ‘mistake’ by Trump but test-marketing for fascism & barbarism.And the #Brexit referendum was a trial run for Trump's election.Don't think for a moment it couldn't happen here. 
Sharp remark by Japanese Ambassador to Uk - he said they got their Brexit paper to UK Govt within 3 months of referendum because “we worked during the summer” because we thought it was important 
BMW warning that it will leave UK if #Brexit leads to delays at the border. 7000 jobs at risk, plus all suppliers. These are the livelihoods which Boris Johnson doesn't care about #FBPE 
Japanese ambassador on Brexit WTO option:Says it doesn’t cover data, doesn’t cover protection of cross border supply chains, limited intellectual property - “Can’t just rely on rules made 20 years ago”. 
British Queen approves Brexit law that will end membership of EU  
Spanish president says Torra needs to turn the page on the #1Oct referendum and is open to dialogue within the Constitution and the rule of law.So, no change from the last government. Forget your democratic mandate and we'll discuss anything except the thing you want to discuss.  
Hedge funds with advance knowledge of #Brexit polling, made fortunes by short-selling the British pound.  
Brexit  
spokeswoman minister @elsa_artadi: "About PM @sanchezcastejon's statement to forget the #1OCT referendum, we cannot believe he is advising the people who voted to forget they were there, to the people who saw what happened to forgot what happened"  
Japanese ambassador asked if the issues pushed in its September 2016 memo (revealed by @Skynews) have been addressed: “That was close to 2 years ago, and we are waiting”..Also says: “We worked through summer..gave up our holidays” to get that ready 3 months after Brexit vote” 
This doesn't sound like an economy that's going to be able to feed itself after a hard brexit, does it?  
Japanese ambassador says pointedly that Japan was first to express concerns about Brexit in Sept 2016 “because we work through summer”Comes after acceptance U.K./EU negotiations will shut down over summer #SMMTSummit 
#BreakingNews: Nigel Farage has refused an invitation to appear on #bbcdp  He was invited on to talk about the Bloomberg story on hedge funds making millions off the brexit referendum in which he was linked. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
More idle bollocks with no evidence, as usual! Our poll released at 10.01am was 0.1% out on 33m votes, Nigel was negative all evening until the first results started coming. In fact , we wrote about it the bad boys of Brexit @bloomberg 
Forget Brexit, Trump and the World Cup - Slates has found some BIG news!  
Absolute unicorn droppings.  Tory and Labour Brexit are identical thanks to Grandpa Lenin.  
Japanese ambassador says he “hopes” EU-Japan trade deal will be applicable to UK in Brexit transition period 
It's frighteningly obvious now. Our democracy was hacked. We are under siege. Who will be brave enough to push for criminal investigation & put #Brexit on hold?@jeremycorbyn@DavidLammy@Anna_Soubry@vincecable#BrexitMeansTreason#PeoplesVoteMarch 
TFW you find out that Brexit is now law.  
Veto by Dutch French and Danish to start EU accession procedures of FYROM and Albania. Talks will continue, maybe they will start in 2019, long after the referendum on the name issue will be done in Skopje. 
Offshore secrets of Brexit backer Arron Banks revealed in Panama Papers  
One word: Brexit.  
#BREAKING Brexit Bill becomes law, allowing U.K. to leave the EU. 
Hungary warns that the EU faces economic devastation if it fails to achieve a post-Brexit trade deal with Britain:  
JUST IN: Brexit bill becomes law, allowing UK to leave European Union  
Sobering evidence from @SMMT. This is real money *not* being invested for our future because we’re rushing headlong into a #Brexit we don’t yet understand. Let’s stop digging until we do!  @MikeHawesSMMT @bbckamal @Honda_UK #suspendA50 
What difference would the SNP MPs have made? There are 35 of them. Government motion passed by a majority of 296.Meawhile, are you still the same Ross Thomson who's backing a hard Brexit against the wishes of your constituents? 
It's time the Government agrees to give the people a final say on Brexit before we get landed with a duff deal that no one voted for. @peoplesvote_uk #BrexitShambles 
Thank you so much for all the wonderful Birthday messages & kind words of support. It means so much to me. #Brexit is a disaster & we must continue to fight it, but if there’s a silver lining it’s that I’ve met so many fantastic people like you along the way!  
PM now up at #TimesCEOSummit, praising business and telling them: “A Conservative govt will always listen to your voice”. Really? Bit late. Desperate counterweight to Johnson’s ‘F** business’. 59% of CEOs here are actively planning for chaos of no deal Brexit 
Right, Brexit (and Remain) folk, we need a song about Brexit that England fans can get away with singing at the match vs Belgium. Get cracking! Will retweet the best ones.  
“Until the government can demonstrate exactly how a new model for customs & trade with the EU can replicated the benefits we now enjoy, don’t change it. The truth is, there is no Brexit dividend for our industry” @MikeHawesSMMT #SMMTSummit 
With Brexit, we are taking back control of our borders, laws & moneyNow let’s also take back control of the very idea of ourNationhoodNational identityNational valuesfrom both the far-right & the hard-leftFly the flag for England#BeProudBePatriotic 
Watch as the Speaker confirms Royal Assent is given to the EU Withdrawal Act 2018, enshrining Brexit into British statute law:  
Brexit:  
Great news! The Queen has given Royal Assent to the EU Withdrawal Bill. Come on #Brexit.  
The manager of London's Heathrow airport is moving its HQ from Britain to Amsterdam — because of Brexit  
Campaigners have the right to fight for a second referendum. But that does mean being honest about where public opinion currently is, and thinking through very carefully what could happen in another extremely divisive and bitter referendum campaign. 
According to YouGov, even though 67% think the Tories are badly handling Brexit, 53% think Brexit should go ahead, 21% want a second referendum, 13% think Brexit should be halted altogether. 
Whatever you think about Brexit the idea "we are making excellent progress on all fronts" is demonstrably bollocks.  
The EU withdrawal bill has today been given Royal Assent and is now Law. There is now ZERO chance of stopping Brexit. Suck it up Remoaners. #Brexit #TakingBackControl pic.twitter.com/qInzolmOMy 
Brian Cox shows it's possible to make a point about how bad #Brexit is going to be without attacking Corbyn or #Labour. 
Mrs Lagarde shows the narrow arrogance of the European bureaucrat who thinks the world revolves around the EU’s out-dated protectionist model:  #Brexit 
For those who think Remain would walk a second referendum, this graph is instructive. Remain had a big lead - and then a referendum campaign happened. And next time, Remain would have *less* support within the two main political parties.  
#BREAKING Brexit bill becomes law, allowing UK to leave the EU  
"Honda faces the real cost of Brexit in an ex-Spitfire plant""Carmaker’s ‘just-in-time’ production would be hit if UK leaves the EU customs union"Company my father works for makes a lot of parts for Honda#PeoplesVotePetition#FinalSayForAll 
Revealed: two years after Brexit vote, public still supports tough immigration targets - Almost three quarters of British adults still back Theresa May’s tough stance on reducing immigration, a Deltapoll survey for Channel 4 News reveals.  
Hard Brexit = decline in wages, dismantling of public services, global trade "free for all"  Read why we're opposed a hard Brexit →  
It's taken a long time, but the truth is finally out: the quality of ministers is risibly bad. #Brexit  
I won't change my position on Brexit cos I'm called Liberal Elite or Remoaner.Leavers won't change their position cos they're called stupid, ignorant or illiterate. People are more likely to shift when asked questions & common ground is established, not by being lectured! 1/3 
ICYMI: I stood up for @Airbus workers in #Cardiff and #Penarth and across Wales in Parliament yesterday as the risks of a hard #Brexit grow - and condemned the utterly irresponsible comments of the @WelshConserv Leader @AndrewRTDavies - @WalesForEurope @Open_Britain @WelshLabour 
It is now law... The Speaker of the Commons John Bercow has just said the European Union Withdrawal Bill has been given Royal Assent #Brexit 
Rebecca Long-Bailey, shadow biz minister, sets out Labour Brexit policy. Access to single mkt with no free movement but ‘managed migration’. Plus a new customs union arrangement that gives the UK freedom to trade. So, Tory policy clothed in different words, right? #TimesCEOSummit 
The European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2017 - 2019 has been given Royal Assent. Brexit is now enshrined in law. 
BREAKING: The Queen backs Brexit - in that she has given Royal Assent to the European Union (Withdrawal) Act  
Boris arranges to be abducted by aliens when Brexit deal goes through  
“In a way, I'd like to thank the #PeoplesVote marchers. The optics of that middle-class throng demanding an end to something long since democratically decided gave me my strongest conviction yet that a meaningful Brexit has to happen," says @GeoffNorcott 
I find myself VERY conflicted about the *People's Vote* issueI'm a STAUNCH *remainer* & totally *anti brexit*BUT - I'm also a DemocratThe EuRef dangerously DIVIDED the Country 52%/48%Would a Peoples Vote have the same result ?EITHER way - the divisions will be HARD to heal. 
"We are going to leave the EU on March 29th, whether we like it or not. The process cannot be stopped by a second referendum."  
Thanks so much, Tom. It’s now vital that the Electoral Commission, government & opposition acknowledge what has already happened to our democracy. We need a proper police-led investigation of the referendum. This was a vote that was not free. And not fair  
An important piece from ⁦@MollyMEP⁩ on who funded and then profited from the brexit vote. And how they’ll make even more from brexit itself unless we stop it.  
A small number of money men made a packet as the pound fell on the night of the referendum. In this article I explain how that worked - and how they’re now betting on a chaotic Brexit so that they can profit from that too.  
Labour need to listen closely to @carolecadwalla and use that info she has researched so intently about the illegality of the Leave campaign and use it against this government and their Brexit car crash!! Feels like the opposition party oppose nothing when we most need it to!! 
UK, NatCen, What UK Thinks analysis:Polls for EU membership referendum August 2015 until today. #BrexitChart: The Economist  
Heathrow's Spanish owner to move to the Netherlands because of #Brexit  
Tories, 2016: "Brexit Means Brexit"Tories, 2017: "Strong And Stable"Tories, 2018: "Let's settle this with a pillow fight"  
Must read analysis from @MollyMEP here, “A vote for Brexit would make some people very rich – but most voters considerably poorer.” 
I put it to the Business Secretary in Commons yesterday that Airbus and others are doing a great public service, injecting honesty and realism into the Brexit debate.  
I’m sure the people of Wales will be delighted that @AlunCairns will be in Newport on Monday. Supporting our nation in relation to #TidalLagoon #Brexit ? No! Hosting a reception to rename the Severn Bridge. Was there ever a more ineffectual or pointless politician? #priorities 
I know that brexit’s about more than money and I should stick to physics and I’m a member of the elite from Oldham etc. etc. But these statistics from the UBS survey are quite shocking to me. They signal an absolute disaster if government doesn’t get a grip very soon.  
From Heathrow to Brexit, showmen have taken over our politics | Rafael Behr  
Today the @SMMT gives stark warning that the Brexit deal looks bad for British manufacturing. Here's a reminder that the Economist for Brexit has planned for 'the end of manufacturing' all along.  
London was Silo-City on Saturday 23 June.Them Against You Against Us. #TommyRobinson #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit @TheRebelTV WATCH 
I’m offering this to any interested MP.  I’ve brought over Lib Dem MPs in the past and given them meetings with car companies, Brexit negotiators etc. PM me. I’m not joking. 
Some Corbyn supporters claim #FBPE is a Tory/LD conspiracy. I've got a better conspiracy theory, that the Corbynists claiming it is futile for Labour to oppose #Brexit are Tory agents trying to block Labour opposition to Brexit. They're certainly helping the Tories#PeoplesVote 
What would help the Brexit debate in our country is for Westminster to have an away day so MPs can learn how ‘the’ Single Market works, how ‘the’ Customs Union works and what it means to be a third country in terms of security arrangements. Otherwise we’re going around in circles 
If you’re trying to follow the story of the money men who used the Brexit vote to short the British economy I explain it all hereAnd how they are now betting the house on a disorderly Brexit#TheBigShort 
Operation bolt stable doors after horse bolted launched by electoral commission 'UK democracy under threat, says regulator' Possibly most  useless UK regulatory agency,  competitive field ,given it inc water,rail& energy regulators. #Brexit#BrexitDividend 
I have yet to find a prominent brexiter with an honest bone in their body, a hand that's not in the till or an ounce of interest in the good of the nation.'Muh sovereignty' is the brexit equivalent of 'but her emails'.#FinalSayForAll#PeoplesVote  
Two-faced Airbus asked the British government for yet more taxpayers' cash hours before its threat to quit the UK:  #Brexit 
Farage (who was being informed by a very accurate pollster unlikely to get the result wrong) concedes defeat sending the Pound soaring. Next morning Leave donor & hedge fund owner Crispin Odey says "morning has gold in its mouth" after making huge profits. #PeoplesVote #brexit  
We are seeing a percolation of Brexit Ref.. Jobs going, investment declining and nervousness across the industry /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Businesses are starting to speak up about the dangers that Brexit poses Britain's major industries. To protect our jobs and businesses we need a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal.  
They are also the ones @theresa_may said she would put first. Because of the fog of Brexit and the ideology of her party, they are being further left behind.  
When #Brexit frontman [Nigel Farage] ‘conceded’ defeat on TV, he was privy to data that showed the opposite, paving the way for a collapse in sterling, report says  
It's now a legal fact that the PM took the decision to Brexit, not the people, not Parliament. We need to raise this important issue at PMQs; the PM is accountable. @thomasbrake @Wera_Hobhouse @CarolineLucas @BenPBradshaw @RhonddaBryant @DavidLammy @DanielZeichner @ChukaUmunna 
An Intro to this major PRO-BREXIT campaign project. Register for your FREE Priority View of the final movie at Lets set the record straight about why we voted to Leave the EU!#Brexit #BrexitWhyLeave #RT - Please retweet! 
Investment in the UK auto industry has halved because of Brexit  
For Ruto to win 2022 battle, he must resign from DP post, ditch Jubilee and play victimhood card. These he must do before the forthcoming Referendum 
Nope, electrification/ diesel does not explain fall in investment but does help explain sales falls. Electrification should lead to multi billion increase in investment for new generation cars, pretty much right now, but not happening, as car cos assess post Brexit trade/ customs 
Investment in Britain's Auto Industry has fallen by half in a year, as the Society of Motor Manufacturers & Traders (SMMT) warned that Brexit uncertainty was "thwarting" decisions by major car companies to put more money into UK factories. #PeoplesVote 
Summary:1. Most of Labour is pro-Corbyn and anti-Brexit.2. Which is a bit of a problem, as Jeremy is a life-long Leaver.3. But luckily for him, most of his supporters are - like me - too thick and deluded to realise this.4. Talk about squaring the circle!5. That's all folks!  
On the disaster of Brexit I will always stand by my constituents. We didn’t vote for it and we don’t want it.   
Two years on: six of the worst Brexit predictions  
My follow up:"Given the evidence of Russian interference in the EURef, the Electoral Commission's finding that the official Leave campaign broke electoral law on spending, does the PM still believe we shld Brexit based on a two yr old advisory & gerrymandered poll ?" 
Heathrow-owner to move to the Netherlands due to Brexit  
Yet more evidence that Eurosceptic David Davis has been totally sidelined by Remoaner @OllyRobbins in Brexit negotiations. The Irish call Davis 'the tea boy'! Theresa May is humiliating him - when will he find the courage to stand up to her?Support us at  
1. Chequers summit likely to be all day Friday 6th, Cabinet source says, and sounds like it’s full cabinet rather than just Brexit subcttee - that matters because May has Remain tending majority in the wider group, not so in the inner circle 
And.....for the avoidance of any doubt...... 
Arron Banks, Brexit and the Russia connection  
I’m about to give evidence to MPs on #Brexit. The Government’s negotiation priorities are wrong and risking jobs. Watch here: 
I've only just noticed that the list of new EU legislation needed for #Brexit has been published. (This was the source of those "Brits might need a visa to go the EU" stories and previously I'd only seen it as a grainy photo from a meeting.)  
British car manufacturers urge the Prime Minister to rethink her position on the customs union as investment in UK auto industry halves #Brexit  
Turkey is no friend to South Kurdistan. @masoud_barzani can grovel and beg for Turkish scraps but they showed their true colours after the referendum. They joined with Iraq to sabotage the result and isolate you diplomatically.  
UBS survey of 600 companies spells out Brexit "dividend": - 35% of companies plan to reduce UK investment post-Brexit- 41% plan to move a large amount of capacity out of UK- 42% plan to shift capacity to euro zone  
The last days of Brexit. Locked in their bunker, endlessly arguing amongst themselves over two ideas that Europe has already rejected.And all the time the economy going to shit around their ears. 
Brexit being trolled by reality.  
The public mood on Brexit is changing. The pub is my barometer on these things. Leavers are now convincing themselves that there will be a second vote and some of them hope that they have an opportunity not to make the same mistake twice. I feel it. I hear it. 
If you want an image of post #Brexit Britain, imagine a dead high street populated with patriotic but homeless Brits.Or visit Brighton  
Can the PM please give a single concrete example of how Brexit will make the country a better place? #TimesCEOSummit 
The grindingly slow pace of #Brexit negotiations is running at normal #EU speed.Yet another reason why we are better off unshackling ourselves from the ball and chain that impedes our nation.  #GlobalBritain 
Puts paid to idea we can just crash out with no deal to WTO rules. We’re not even on our own WTO schedule -  another Brexit lie busted ⁦@mrjamesob⁩ 
"There is no mandate for hard Brexit" - but you and the rest of the Tory fake rebels have enabled it by repeatedly voting against amendments to the EU Withdrawal Bill which would have curtailed Theresa May's ability to enact it.Your actions speak louder than your words.  
... as interesting companies such as @HondaUKPR opened up Swindon factory to this excellent FT piece - currently only houses 36 hours of parts - would need up to 9 days post Brexit and to build one of the biggest buildings on earth somewhere near Swindon  
SMMT Hawes: "We must retain membership of the Customs Union. We need frictionless trade. We operate in a hostile and protectionist global environment. There is no Brexit dividend for our industry"@SkyNews 
Theresa May to host cabinet sleepover to finalise Brexit white paper  NOT *ANOTHER* ONE  !! OOPS IT'S SLEEPOVER !! WHAT A JOLLY JAPE ! 
We can't all move our businesses to Ireland like Rees-Mogg. We can't all get French citizenship like Nigel Lawson. We can't all live off our EU pension like Farage. British people will suffer from this shambles & be forced to bear the brunt of hard Brexit 
V good from @Guardian Brexit briefing, @chakrabortty (and @adampayne26 )The self-harm of Brexit is starting to really hurt now... and based, as it is, on fantasy, rather than reality, it’s not going to end well for us.‘Far easier to cut back in Britain.’  
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg hits out at IMF chief Lagarde in Brexit row  
The Government’s #Brexit priorities are wrong and risking jobs. 92 per cent of London’s economy is service-based – by focusing on goods in negotiations at the expense of services, the Government could do real damage to London and the UK.  
The same #brexitometer story in every high street in the land - whether it voted Leave or Remain.Jeremy Corbyn. If you respect the will of the people, given them a #PeoplesVote on what Brexit *is*, not the fantasy.@Uklabour @Labour4EU #PeoplesVoteMarch 
UK car industry @SMMT calls on PM to rethink her Brexit red lines at Chequers as investment in production continues post Brexit plummet:2015: £2.5bn2016: £1.6bn2017: £1.1bn2018 H1: £0.347bn   
Does that mean we don’t have to honour the Brexit vote because we made it when David Cameron was prime minister and now it’s Theresa May? #mogglogic 
My old friend and comrade @AndrewGimson on the radio saying the public admire Johnson for his "candour". But he wasn't candid about opposing Heathrow expansion, about Brexit delivering £350m a week for the NHS, about Brexit helping us "tackle the housing crisis... 
MC he didn't actually bother to campaign during the referendum and took a fucking holiday not because he actually wanted leave to win but because it was a long game involving being sidelined and undermined by Blairites  
Airbus, BMW, Honda, Nissan etc are unlikely to be fooled by any "Jobs First Brexit" nonsense. They will have concluded that brexit means brexit. They are not being offered a meaningful alternative, and as such we have made their decision easy for them. They MUST leave. 
Viva Brexit and F... business!  
So that’s Airbus, Siemens and now BMW warning that they may have to quit the UK as a consequence of Brexit. Will it take an actual closure before Brexit/Lexiteers take note? 
“There is no Brexit dividend” sings @albawhitewolf after the #EUMediaPoll presentation 
Most of Labour is pro-Corbyn and anti-Brexit – we must be heard | Alena Ivanova  
IMPORTANT: this is a really big step forward! The UK Electoral Commission has come out agreeing that we need urgent reforms to protect our democracy from evolving threats online. The cheating that happened in the Brexit referendum must never be repeated.  
If you care about the NHS, schools and public services - be aware that #Brexit will lead to cuts and another decade of austerity. Those who shrug and do nothing to salvage the #SingleMarket are facilitating weaker public services. MPs have a choice. 
Apparently @TheFCA Andrew Bailey just told @thetimes conference EU needs Brexit deal as much as UK. In City and business, that is not the consensus though is music to ears of @theresa_may. So won’t have done his chances of becoming next Governor of @bankofengland harm 
Fascinating. A cowardly, childish, reactive Trumpesque show, followed by his disappearance to avoid voting. Not the kind of behaviour any functioning govt would accept from its Foreign Secretary. #Brexit 
Tonight at 10:50PM: Jim Fitzpatrick reveals new information on how the DUP and Vote Leave worked together in the EU referendum. Did they break the law? And he digs deep into the finances behind the DUP’s record referendum donor in a money trail that leads to Ukraine and beyond  
For all of the talk of respecting democracy and the will of the people, it certainly sounds like your end game is to stop Brexit.   
The endgame isn't to stop Brexit. Stopping Brexit simply allows us the time and resources to fix the real problems in the UK: North-South / Wealth inequality, NHS / Housing crisis, FPTP vs PR...especially with everyone who has been politically activated by the Brexit vote. 
Two years after the vote, BMW threatening to move production of Mini and Rolls-Royce out of UK,Car industry  chief warns of 860k jobs at risk due to Brexit. 21 Finance firms moving to DublinTessa’s big idea?A cabinet sleepover FFS ! 
Brexit halves new investment in British car industry, auto industry lobby says  
“Who was responsible for you losing your job Dad?” #Brexit  
I, for one, am delighted that we can look forward not only to a massive Brexit dividend but also to a third runway at Heathrow that will cause no extra noise or pollution.Like Alice, I try to believe six impossible things before breakfast. 
Between that and the date of new EU tax laws coinciding exactly with Brexit Day in 2019, it’s almost possible to believe it’s JUST ABOUT THE MONEY... 
BMW director Ian Robertson on govt Brexit planning: "What we don’t need is headlines which are polarising either way, what we need is truth and facts" 
But you whipped @LabourLordsUK to abstain on #PeoplesVote - it would have passed as an amendment. Airbus warned of this back in 2015. It’s not new information. ANY brexit is damaging. Jobs gone & going already.  
"Never was the Brexit manifesto more succinctly captured than in Boris Johnson’s impromptu aside"  
How did the Scottish people believe that having huge natural resources of Gas and Oil... was a bad thing financially? That was the biggest Lie/con pulled on us by Unionism. The mismanagement of this resource continues. #Scotref #Indyref2 #Brexit  
Heard a lot on BBC News about stuff yet to happen (runways, defence spending) but nothing about this amazing swindle that did apparently happen: Farage, pollsters and hedge funds manipulating the markets with false declarations over Brexit. Why?   
No, Nigel, however bad Brexit is, it is not a threat to the future of human civilisation, this is a really alarming lack of perspective and belittled the seriousness of climate change 
READ: Investment in Britain's car industry has fallen by half, according to figures from the Society of Motor Manufacturers & Traders (SMMT) Brexit uncertainty is "thwarting" decisions by major car companies to put more money into UK factories.  
Even the “ Bury Bad Brexit News” Mail troubled by suspicion that “anti-elitist” Farage’s comments may have helped City pals make money betting against the £.  
This from the Left is just as stupid. You will swap austerity for Brexit poverty. It’s a way to argue that Corbyn is right when he’s wrong. Labour are in more danger of ending up with the blame than the Tories on Brexit.  
Brexit uncertainty putting 860,000 jobs at risk, warns car industry No doubt the Brexiters will call this more scaremongering & stick their fingers in their ears. 
A hard Brexit could cause 75k jobs in the financial industry and a loss of up to £10bn in tax revenue.Did you vote leave? Is this what you voted for? A poorer nation with less money for public services? If no, join many others & become a #Remainernow 
140,000. That's how many people have signed a petition backing a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Can you help us get to 150,000 before lunchtime? Please RT:  
Friends! Sheer modesty forbids me from disclosing who wrote the Hitler biography that @Simplex2014 has just finished!Simply titled "Hitler's Life And Brexit", it reveals some very scary parallels, e.g. Hitler never favoured Our People's Vote on Our EU Deal!Talk about uncanny!  
No #Brexit chants permitted for #WorldCup fans (but 'anti-racist' campaigns are fine, which gives the lie to the 'no politics' excuse). Another example of the spread of liberal totalitarianism. 
The Irish Sea is the practical solution for Brexit, says – John Sheridan, farmer and Ulster Farmers Union representative. ‘Brexit: opinions from the border’ continues after 8:30 on @morningireland @rte @RTERadio1 
"Listening out for the hysterical outpourings of the grieving liberal intelligentsia can be an interesting pastime", says @PaulEmbery, but don't claim Brexit voters were duped by 'fake news'  
The big problem with Brexit is that people decided it sounded like a good Idea, and then tried to find reasons why it would be a good idea. This how a faith or ideology works.Normally in politics, you develop a theory based on observation of the facts, not the other way round. 
Seems EN language media still top the #EUMediaPoll when it comes to influencing MEPs, policy makers, opinion formers etc... wonder if this will continue to be the case after #brexit  
For anyone new, I don’t want to waste your time. Let’s get right to it:No to TrumpNo to BrexitYes to dogsYes to pockets on everythingNo to single use plasticsYes to pics where you have to work out if it’s a dog or food *see reference below*If you’re still here, welcome  
Always worth another watch....@Nigel_Farage appears to have plenty to hide from ORWELL PRIZE winning journalist @carolecadwalla aka Liz You can run Nige but you can't hide...... 
‘No deal would be DEVASTATING for EU’ Hungary rages at Brussels for Brexit punishment  
Earthquakes and floods are not within our control - and certainly not our choice....  Brexit, by contrast...  
Boris Johnson’s Brexit explosion ruins Tory business credentials via @FT 
As ever, @rsylvestertimes nails it. Brexit plans are a shambles and business has finally lost patience. Tories can’t win this battle with business  
Bit outside my comfort zone but presumably this is because they’re backing another massive crash in the pound if Brexit is hard? 
Another major company warns it may quit Britain - plus Tuesday's other Brexit headlines  
‘No deal would be DEVASTATING for EU’ Hungary rages at Brussels for Brexit punishment  
James, do you think there is a chance the toffs and spivs of the Brexit campaign plan to buy up plenty of British assets in the no-deal chaos before we go back in having realised what a bloody disaster for everyone this all is? 
Most Labour members are strongly against Brexit. Most remainers would vote Labour if it became clear about that. We can save the country with ease, the moment Labour affirms a new position and we can work with them. This is key now. Absolutely essential.  @Labour4EU 
"EU SHOWS THERESA THE SIZE OF ITS PROBLEMS" - We reveal EU doc given to @theresa_may ahead of summit, showing surging migrant costs. Great #Brexit summary here:  
In the last two years every single Brexiter I have spoken to here has only had two solutions to Brexit.1. The EU falls apart and they will support any old fascist to help this.2. We threaten to blow our own heads off and hope the EU offer us a great deal. 
Well, well, well. Len McCluskey. Pity really that his Labour Government in Wales supinely gave away all the  cards they had when they caved in over Brexit.  
Financial crisis in 2008 was caused by bankers. Brexit was corrupted by a foreign power and bankers.The superrich hedge funds are making money from uk crashing. Yet people think @Nigel_Farage @johnredwood@Jacob_Rees_Mogg Are looking after them?#FBPE#SpecialKindaStupid 
What Brexit dividend shall we talk about today:- the loss of jobs in the car sector in the UKor- the creation of jobs in the car sector in the EU? 
FULL STORY Brexit uncertainty puts 860,000 jobs at risk, warns car industry  
“It is the end of the business model,” says one senior EU diplomat handling Brexit who has met car executives laying out the dire consequences for their industry. “It is nuts.”  
Wake up read: Honda and the real cost of Brexit because the car industry is one of UK great success stories of past 30 years   via @financialtimes 
As an MEP you would assume Ms. James might have at least a little comprehension about business. It seems not. BMW have issued a statement of fact not a political treatise. The continuing denial by Brexit voters of the damage being done to the UK economy is extraordinary.  
It’s fairly clear that Brexit will cost us hundreds of thousands of manufacturing and supply chain jobs plus enormous amounts of financial services jobs.The loss of tax revenue and the knock on impact on a struggling retail sector will mean huge problems.And for what? 
Following Airbus looking to leave the UK, BMW is now threatening to move production out of the UK if they suffer customs delays after Brexit. They have UK sites for building Minis and Rolls Royce cars, employing 8000 workers... #BrexitDividend #BrexitShambles #r4today 
RETWEET if you are one of the 140,000 plus people that has signed the #PeoplesVotePetition in its first 2 days and think others should sign it too!#brexit is not a done deal! 
Very striking this morning:  One runway at Heathrow: 10 yrs of detailed evidence, nuanced argument, legal process & principled stands (proving that the UK is capable of such things, whatever you think of the outcome). Brexit: one slogan on a bus.  That's ludicrous. 
The outcome of Brexit may please neither side  
.A Must Read by @fotoole.Brexit & Trump in context......"Babies in cages were no ‘mistake’ by Trump but test-marketing for barbarism.".  
#Brexit Theresa May get on with Brexit 17 million voted leave the EU. We’re leaving the Customs Union & The Single Market. Stop pussyfooting around grow a backbone get on with it. Labour stop trying to derail Brexit all the time. In EU out EU in EU out EU. Who knows with LABOUR pic.twitter.com/g6o3ekrctd 
From Heathrow to Brexit, showmen have taken over our politics | Rafael Behr  
Halving of car industry investment the latest posing of the question which will ultimately destroy Brexit: TWO YEARS AGO, DID YOU VOTE TO BE POORER? 
Happy Birthday Steven Bray, who, rain or shine, is outside parliament with the European flag and hat, a ‘STOP BREXIT’ sign, and a crowd of patriots doing the same. Very proud of you. So much so that for the first time I’m using hashtag #FBPE to spread the word! 
I work in Brussels alongside the EU Brexit negotiators and I find it incredible how little the UK government understandsAre we really being serious when we ask the EU to give the UK, the same level of access as a member to sensitive information 
The world’s biggest exporters - by country.#TuesdayThoughts #Brexit  
The Foreign Secretary introduces the F word into Diplomacy, politics, and of course business: Boris Johnson’s Brexit explosion ruins Tory business credentials  via @financialtimes 
BREAKING: car industry calls for  "as a minimum, maintains customs union membership and delivers single market benefits". Warns investment has halved and "there is no Brexit dividend". 
Serious answer: whoever is funding the party. Whoever is pushing for Brexit at any cost. Whoever twisted their arm to cancel the Swansea tidal lagoon. Whoever stands to clean up when Britain is sold in a fire sale.  
Brexit: Car investment slumps as 'uncertainty bites'  
Nigel Farage has been accused of placing bets against the pound during the Brexit referendum. On the night,he twice suggested Remain had won,even though he knew exit polls suggested otherwise - looks like he was trying to affect the markets, he denies it. #BrexitShambles #r4today 
Financial firms will abandon Britain after Brexit, says IMF chief  
And now Honda - employing 4,000 staff - is warning on what Brexit means. What huge damage Brexit is doing to our reputation as a safe place to invest. Even if this turmoil ended tomorrow, it would take generations to recover (). pic.twitter.com/4TQTmyyVTi 
When you piss off 500m people they don't try and convince you to change your mind. They haven't got time to deal with that shit. They simply turn their backs and get on with their lives. They'll find other people to do business with, always lost on #brexit brains.  #FBPE 
Plenty of English folk, strangers to irony, demanding a new EU referendum while opposing a new Scottish one.  
What Brexit *isn't*:*The will of the peopleWhat it *isn't* good for:*union*economy*NHS*business, farming, fishing*socialism*standard of living*reducing prices*freedoms, quality of life*consumer, employment,  environmental protectionsWhat it *is* good for:*Tories 
Carmakers warn of the real cost of Brexit  
Tomorrow: ONE BILLION PEOPLE marched against Brexit! 
ThreadRe the Big Brexit Short: 
Evening on proportional representation in #Vancouver begins with #FirstNations welcome. Event is being live-streamed by @broadbent. My conversation with @garymasonglobe begins in a few minutes. Hot topic in #BritishColumbia w/ referendum on PR in Oct/Nov. @darrenhughesnz 
More black voters have been welcomed into the Republican party than in the last 50 years. Move over Brexit... Make Room for #Blaxit  The plantation is shutting down.Free Thinkers welcome. 
Deluge8The Brexit Short: How Hedge Funds Used Private Polls to Make Millions off the pound’s collapse.Farage plans to speak in Lone Tree, CO in 3 weeks. CO, you don’t say?Where Is Barack Obama? Deutsche Bank AG chalked up its third straight annual loss in 2017. pic.twitter.com/l1jytLkj6T 
Stone connects to pro-Putin behavior linked to:Connie Mack and Dana Rohrabacher in Hungary.Farage with Brexit & Trump.Credico / Cassandra / Sputnik etc and WikiLeaks.Alex Jones / Infowars.Paul Manafort in Ukraine.Cambridge Analytica / Mercer/ Bannon.@GH05t0fStew.+ more 
Yeah, no. He can't do this.Oh, he could hold a referendum for show, but it would be cheaper for the province if he just held rallies and shouted at Ottawa. Probably as effective too. #ableg 
I’ve learnt that the Rolls Royce of scientific publishing, Nature Research, has opened an editorial office in Berlin w/ 30 editors, some fleeing London due to the madness of #brexit. Science is already on the run from a bastion of excellence. The EU’s gain is the UK’s loss. Ugh! 
I used to enjoy having a geeky mooch around Maplins. Saw that the last store finally closed today. Sadly, blamed on Brexit. Wonder how many of the 2300 now unemployed voted for it? Like shooting yourself in the proverbial really.  
Ludicrous. Jason Kenney can't hold a referendum to bind the federal government, which does legislate the equalization formula. Mr. Kenney should know that because he was in Ottawa and at the cabinet table when the last federal legislation extended the formula. #cdnpoli #abpoli 
Look! This is BIG. Electoral Commission says democracy is ‘under threat’. And ‘urgent’ reform is needed. It knows this because referendum is a car crash that it has no chance of policing. And if it acknowledged that we might actually get somewhere.. 
Just saying.... The Home Office wants all EU citizens living in the UK to register with them regarding "settled status".Seeing as nationals of all 28 member states (including the UK) are all EU citizens as and until Brexit occurs, then shouldn't we all be applying? 
Fancy a summer holiday?Got family living abroad?Need to travel for work?No chance, you're gonna be imprisoned within this Little English Brexit Britain, enjoy your Skegness!  
A spokesperson said on Monday that Farage “had no financial interest in currency movements on the night of Brexit”.On the night? Favours done to friends with expectation of later reward? Does anyone believe a word said by the lying shitweasel? 
The British Minister of State for Immigration, Caroline Nokes, has announced that the Poles who have moved to Great Britain before #Brexit comes into force will be allowed to stay in the country.However, moving to the UK after Brexit will become much more difficult.  
The discussions about Brexit continues.....  
Commission to EU27: Prepare airports for a ‘no-deal’ Brexit and no aviation agreement—flights would cease between UK and EU since EU-issued operating aviation licenses wouldn’t be valid, British airlines wouldn’t have the right to fly to EU countries.  
I’m sure this Bloomberg/Farage/Brexit heist story will be all over the front pages of the sun, mail, telegraph, express tomorrow morning! In the interests of British fair play and taking back control etc THEY ARE ALL IN IT TOGETHER, PEOPLE! #Followthemoney 
For Ruth Davidson, Scottish jobs are expendable, just collateral for her persuit of Brexit for England  
"Nigel Farage’s response to Airbus was that 'manufacturing is 10 per cent of the UK economy'"If it comes as any surprise that a lot of working people will lose their jobs following #brexit, you really haven't been paying a lot of attention. #FBPE 
Trump & Brexit . Two sides of the same nationalistic rhetoric that leads to families being ripped apart, trade wars , and businesses - with the jobs of real ppl - leaving . #BrexitBigShort 
Unlike Richard Dawkins I don’t divide people into ‘decent’ or ‘indecent’ depending on how they voted in a referendum. But of course I’m not an Emiritus Fellow of New College, Oxford.  
'More than 50' Tory MPs prepared to defy Theresa May to stop no-deal Brexit Yeah, yeah....heard it all before.....Tory rebels my arse! 
I think @rodrikdani  had it right. You can shout & complain about the elections in the US, Brexit, Italy, Austria, Hungary, Turkey, Russia but if you want to improve things you have to face the issue of why so many people do vote for the "populists". 
Wow. This paper from the Swedish Board of Trade (a quango) on financial services post-Brexit is... surprising. "Mutual recognition has many advantages, not least thatEU and UK regulations would not have to be exactly the same.The important thing is that they meet the same goal"  
But you knew this would be the situation. Labour have backed Brexit from day one, ignored business concerns along with the Tories. At what point did the Tories or Labour tell people these companies wouldn’t be able to exist here after Brexit? 
Leave or remain. I think we can all agree. #Brexit is a fuck up #FBPE 
First Minister Nicola Sturgeon went to Berlin to improve co-operation and trade and promote Scotland in Europe. If Ruth Davidson were First Minister, she'd go to Berlin and explain to a confused audience why she opposes another Scottish independence referendum. 
There are plenty of business people in all directions who have businesses that trade extensively with the EU & are badly impacted by #Brexit. When Brexit is the primary agenda item why would anyone talk to Tim Martin who runs a chain of pubs that trade only in the UK?#Newsnight 
Help him shut up by not inviting him on your programmes so often. Yes We know he’s the only Brexit supporting businessman out there. 
So peddling unverified conspiracy theories in a deliberate attempt to cast doubt on one side of the EU referendum while studiously ignoring irregularities in the other, out of sheer elitist rage against democracy, is now prizeworthy journalism? Orwell would be disgusted.  
There was this referendum with a massive turnout & remain lost (i.e democracy). And in that ref we were told the result would be honoured, not rerun till the 'right result was acheived'. We knew this was JCs position, yet voted for him to be leader in 2016, not anti Brexit Smith  
Perhaps the @BBCNews #newsnight should tell businessman Tim Wetherspoon to shut up about Brexit? No? 
"We need someone in business who is Pro Brexit""Tim Martin?""We get him every time though. Is there noone else?""Everybody else in business voted Remain""Oh ok. Better get him on then."#Newsnight 
"Are the government right to tell businesses to shut up about Brexit? - Yes!" says Wetherspoons founder Tim Martin #newsnight 
I've been in Sicily for 36 hours. I've interrogated everyone everywhere (albeit in terrible Italian) and I have yet to meet anyone who has a problem with immigration. Brexit e pazzo (mad) they tell me.The UK media are feeding us bullshit & lies about Sicilian attitudes. 
Has there been a stupider contributor to the Brexit debate than Tim Martin? I genuinely can’t think of one, even setting the bar as low as possible.  
Is Tim Martin the only business person that broadcasters can ever find to defend #Brexit these days? #Newsnight 
Boris Johnson is thinking "maybe he should try and bring Theresa May down from within government" if she pursues a soft Brexit, reports @nicholaswatt #newsnight 
Instead of demanding unquestioning loyalty from North East businesses to Theresa May, the Tees Valley Mayor should be speaking to his colleagues to ensure our interests are being heard in Brexit negotiations.  
The good news is, having watched the Westworld finale, plotting a course towards stopping Brexit now seems relatively simple. 
A reminder: Farage and the Tory Right weren't going to 'respect' a Remain victory, they were making it clear they would demand a 2nd referendum (a straight replay, not a vote on the final deal),  if Remain won. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #Brexit  
New US ambassador tells the #CBI that he doesn’t “think #Brexit is a major challenge.” Hard to take much that he says seriously after that. #InsideTheAmericanEmbassy 
Spot on @LabPeoplesVote Brexit harms the prospects that would face a socialist Labour government Oppose the Tories’ destructive Brexit Win a Peoples Vote on the deal Unite the country behind a radical and hopeful vision for the future 
Love this picture. Sums up the people who are protesting against Brexit.They're not Far Right, not Looney Left, not Neo-Liberal, not Neo-fascist, not Centrist, not Populist.They're just ordinary people who think it stinks. That whatever else the EU is a force for good not bad.  
The PM will hold a cabinet 'sleepover' at her Chequers country retreat next week to finalise the #Brexit white paper  
The fact that vulture hedgies were able to make £hundreds of millions in 2016 on basis of secret Brexit Referendum polling info - while ordinary people will lose jobs and opportunities - is utterly utterly sickening.What the hell were the regulators doing anyway? 
Farage denies shorting value of sterling on night of Brexit vote  
I couldn’t get out of my local high street shops today for people saying how angry they are with useless Tory MPs betraying their wishes on Brexit with cheap political subservience to another countries’ power grab on their rights. #jogon 
Thanks to all at @IrelandEmbGB this evening for a very stimulating evening & especially to former President Mary McAleese for her barn storming lament about the madness & the tragedy of #Brexit  
COMMENT(S) OF THE DAY: I don’t want to alarm anyone, but reason and logic regarding Brexit has snuck into the Mail comments section... and it’s getting upvoted!  
The referendum result lays firmly on the shoulders of the @Conservatives Anyone that says any different is clearly trying to hide that.Still waiting to talk to a #FBPE account that will criticise the @Conservatives@theresa_may or any of the other morons in the party. 
I was reluctant to watch #InsideTheAmericanEmbassy but that briefing within the embassy on the effects of #brexit was pretty startling. Especially the view that the UK Govt has deliberately not looked at the downside or explained it to the public. Not a view we hear much on TV 
Seeing the American Embassy staff detailing how Brexit will decimate the British economy… well, it doesn’t get more real than that #InsideTheAmericanEmbassy 
Not sure of the link. Brexit is obviously barmy, and plenty of racists voted for it. But even so we are not governed by a man who uses concentration camps for kids 
So this is a government that backs fracking and third runaways at heathrow but not tidle lagoon power - it's as if Brexit wasn't stupid enough....it's like they're trying to win some sort of Stupidest Government Ever award 
Dumbest Brexit tweet of the day. On being told of BMW possibly ceasing production in the UK: “They were able to overcome the 'challenge' that we have right hand drive in the UK and adapted their manufacturing accordingly.  I'm sure they'll manage.” Ooooh boy... #BrexitShambles 
Brexit. Third runway. Mixed messages on freedom of movement. 
Fabulous news about the third runway at Heathrow for all the Chinese investors who’ll be building it when we’re looking for rats in skips after Brexit. 
Did you vote leave because you were told by #brexit campaigners that “we held all the cards” and “Merkel will be forced by car makers to give U.K. a good deal”? Well this  is what BMW are saying about #brexitreality.Not what you voted for? Why not say you are a #remainernow 
‘@GerardBattenMEP fighting against the Brexit Betrayal!#ForTheNation 
So, Germany's BMW is threatening to stop UK production after Brexit. So, stop buying German metal now and start to BUY BRITISH and create jobs for BRITAIN, not Germany!  
Front man Farage lied so people could make money.  It is what Brexit is all about. Taking back control of money making. Breathtaking. But also a shrug. Wrexiteers indeed.  
.@sajidjavid Seriously? The co-founder of Grassroots Out who happily stood with Nigel Farage and urged Tories to "join forces" with Ukip for Brexit, and has consistently voted against securing rights of EU citizens? If you meant to undermine our confidence further: you sure did.  
I am agree my heart sank after the Brexit result as the level of racism now is on par with what I and my family experienced in the 70’s and 80’s really felt that things had improved but gosh it did t take much for it to slide 
A day with @CER_EU in London. Depressing that Brexit issue is as unclear today as two years ago. Cabinet bogged down in negotiating with itself.  
Remember when Nevill Drury wrote a four-page article on witchcraft for the Daily Mail. Us neither... but it happened! Note to Daily Mail: Less Brexit, more naked witches.  
Watching debate on Heathrow expansion.Labour spokesperson says that they set 4 tests to be met, and they haven't been.So, do they oppose?   No, they allow a free vote,but recommend abstention.  HmmmmmSo now we know what might happen if Starmers six Brexit tests aren't met. 
#EU Budget Boss: Pay £39bn or we send the boys round!German eurocrat Gunther Oettinger warns UK it's not 'smart' to refuse to pay £39bn protection money even if No Deal.This threat sounds like despair from an economically & morally bankrupt EU.#Brexit 
If Conservatives want to win future majority it must be able to appeal to the 48% as well as 52. I don't agree with @Anna_Soubry on Brexit & don't think she's where most Conservatives are but the Party must be able to accommodate her views without threats  
You’re going home You’re going home You’re going,Scroungers going home...#Brexit  
Here then is the #Brexit dividend. Read the entire thread, weep and re-tweet.  
Cabinet “sleepover to establish what #Brexit actually means” 2years after people “knew exactly what they were voting for”.  
What a Bozo what a Clown, just days ago dribbling on about, imagine if Trump was in charge of Brexit, we are led by the least amongst us the least visionary the least intelligent the least noble  
Carole Cadwalladr wins the Orwell Prize for Journalism 2018, for exposing the dystopia that is Brexit Britain. The irony is not lost.It is up to all of us to make her great achievement count. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
BMW will shut UK sites if customs delays clog supply post-Brexit  But as Boris Johnson said, 'F**k business' 
....ohhhhh I couldn’t get into Harrods tonight for people coming up to me to say Brexit is a búrach..........  
Body bag Brexit!It was Mr. Johnson, in the parlour, with a hatchet!All that effort to come up with a plan the EU will reject. @Bremaininspain 
The EU is kicking the US's butt right now because of #DotardDonnie's #Tariffs . #PaulRyan is standing down and if the #VichyGOP hold the House, wait 'till you see who follows him. If this country has to depend on #Twitler- UK:  #VassalState.#Brexit  
Discussed with PM @theresa_may the upcoming #EUCO and how to proceed in #Brexit talks.  
Dow closed below its 200DMA for the first time since Brexit  
Both main parties had better take note. Millions who have not moved on got over it & sucked it up & many more joining all the time.#Brexit can't work. We're angry & we have votes & if you want our votes #StopBrexit or let us! #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #ABTV  
Well done @carolecadwalla richly deserved. 
Boris Johnson reportedly said "“F*** business” after asked about the Brexit needs of British employers.But you could argue he's the one we should be swearing at  
"Unfortunately we are dealing with something that is much more difficult the game against Panama."European Council President @DonaldTusk gets a #ThreeLions reference in during Brexit talks with @Theresa_May 
Rejoice!! I have found the Brexit Dividend!!  
Dave likes to hate the good guys, but drools over everything Corbyn says.Dave can’t think for himself, he has Momentum to help him out.Meanwhile nobody controls #FBPE we’re just anti Brexit.Thanks for the laugh Dave.  
What do we do with this contradiction? Spanish government declared Catalonia’s independence referendum illegal, while South Sudan won international recognition flagrantly violating international law and human rights during its struggle for independence.   
This brexit, approached as it has been is illegitimate and unstable.No amount of braying and sneering and demeaning can overcome this simple point. You cannot govern indefinitely beyond due process and democratic mandates. There will be a reckoning for this. 
Can you think of anything that has more efficiently produced the opposite of what it was intended to do than VAR?* *we haven’t actually had Brexit yet. 
Manipulation of public opinion is profitable. This story is about how hedge funds profited from public and private Brexit-polls. Now extrapolate what Facebook and Google can do…  
People travelled to London from all over the UK to attend the #PeoplesVoteMarch on the second anniversary of the EU referendum  
This is incredibly bad news. Now the pathetic, spineless May has got the U.K. into the EU army which we will be paying for post Brexit. Do we want to rely on the EU for our protection?? No.Notice the non-participation of clever countries like Italy, Austria, Hungary, Poland  
The Brexit Short: How hedge funds used private polls to make millions  
Racism has always been there but had been kept in check by responsible Government. This lot are using racism as a cynical tool to achieve Brexit, and that includes Labour. We are SO ready for a new political order. Cancer has set in to current UK politics. 
BMW will shut UK sites if customs delays clog supply post-Brexit  
You can't get clearer than this: "BMW has said it will be forced to close its production sites in the UK if components for Mini and Rolls-Royce cars are caught up in customs delays after Brexit."#PeoplesVote 
Theresa May to host cabinet sleepover to finalise Brexit white paper  
A World War II veteran is fighting Brexit with a case at the European Court of Justice  
Huge congratulations to @carolecadwalla on winning the #OrwellPrize.She's told people the ugly truth they don't want to hear about #Brexit, and for her pains she's been threatened by crooks and rubbished by people who should know better (that's you, @AndrewMarr9). 
This article just about sums it up ! We have a bunch of incapable Tory idiots negotiating major changes to the UK that the majority do NOT NOW WANT..That will destroy our country for generations to come !! BREXIT MUST STOP !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
BMW executive says would shut UK plants if Brexit hits supply chain  
Congratulations @carolecadwalla on winning the Orwell Prize  The judges said: "she invented a new field of reporting and made the politics of technology clear to the public..on the use of big data to shape results of the US Presidential election, the EU referendum and more." 
Brexit looks as though it will make a lovely big premium for hedge fundsWhat was it that Mrs May's husband does again#ToryCorruption 
."His opposition to the idea of a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal puts in doubt his claims to support a truly representative democracy, even in his own party.". 
Can someone please explain to me what is wrong with being a self educated,liberal thinking, working class person who just wants all this shite to end and brexit to fuck off? 
The Corbyn supporters whining that Labour can do nothing to stop Tory #Brexit might as well be Tory agents trying to prevent Labour mounting a coherent attack on the bitterly divided & shambolic Tories and their disastrous, destructive #Brexit obsession. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Guido you’ve spent too long in today’s sun. I’m not threatened with de-selection. We’re the Tory Party not Corbyn’s #Labour #Momentum. My Chairman is driven by ambition not #Brexit. I know it makes good copy but don’t you think it’s time to heal the divisions and move on? #unity 
GDP in ROI growing at 4.9% while in NI it drags along at 1.1%. Really is time to stop Brexit and create an All Ireland Economy. It’s just embarrassing and In 5 yrs the gap between both will just be huge.  
The inside story of Brexit's big short  
Diane the people won’t “decide” over the consequences of a #brexit sold on lies & disinformation. Companies will, markets will, investors will. 
Do it.What a joke, FIFA & the EU.Both as bent as a nine bob note.FIFA warn England they could be punished if fans sing Brexit songs 
Can I just say that sacking @BorisJohnson would be the single most popular and unifying act of Theresa May’s leadership and we would literally concede a load of good shit in the Brexit deal to say thank you? 
The moment when the PM told the one about how she knew exactly what she was doing with Brexit  
While you're there; could you send your strategy document for post brexit Scotland? I've requested this a number of times but you're obviously very busy. Thanks. 
So. An alliance of Big Money is not only spending vast amounts of $$$ to protect First Past the Post, it has given itself a deliberately confusing name: Fair Referendum. The older & much poorer group fighting for #ProportionalRepresentation is @fairvotebc. Devious. #bcpoli #PR4BC 
Hey #Brexit what do you think of this? Man funds Brexit campaign expecting the pound to tank. Pound tanks. Man makes hundreds of millions of pounds. It’s a Brexit fairy tale. Practically Cinderella!#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote#FBPE 
Nearly half of 800 executives surveyed in 6 EU countries say their businesses have reduced investment in Britain since the Brexit vote  
Would YOU love to work for progressive, Green and empathetic causes in the time of Trump, Orban and Brexit? Join our team for a new, exciting and highly ambitious project leading up to the 2019 EU election  #VACANCY 
Cancelling Brexit might spark a hard right backlash. But delivering Brexit definitely will, says @JonnElledge 
Please note that the European Union had already planned to finance this project. But now that we have to pay for #Brexit there is no money for it. 
World Cup outrage: England fans singing Brexit songs during Belgium clash face PUNISHMENT  
If you are concerned about existing or future Scottish jobs, why are you cheer leading for the disastrous, job destroying, @GOVUK #Brexit ?  
Has anyone in the Labour leadership said anything about the hedge fund poundshorting on referendum night or are they barred from saying anything bad about Brexit? What would a TBGBRC team have done with this? Destroyed a government by now 
The non-stop naysayers may have lost on June 23, 2016, but they are writing the story of Brexit. We need to take back control of the narrative about Brexit Britain with some Brexit Pride, says Brendan O'Neill @spikedonline 
The Brexit traitors are being exposed for what they are, criminals. They should be investigated and dealt with appropriately. Before long they will relocate away from this country, leaving devastation behind them. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Discredited IMF chief Christine Lagarde engages on Project Fear mark 2. Remember her criminal conviction over her role in a €400m (£355m) payment to a businessman and her pre-EU referendum threats that a vote to leave the EU would trigger a UK recession 
The Guardian view on the Brexit demo: a boost for Europe | Editorial  
Anyone who thinks that the Customs Union is some sort of benign, stable status quo just hasn’t paid attention.The sooner we are out of the Customs Union, the sooner we won’t have to impose its costly tariffs. #Brexit  
Farage denies shorting value of sterling on night of Brexit vote  
German eurocrat tells the UK we should pay the EU £39bn even if there is no #Brexit deal [The Germans should stick to sorting out the migration & Eurozone messes that they helped to create, not idiotically telling us to pay billions for nothing in return] 
BMW would shut UK plants if Brexit hits supply chain: How many more warnings do we need before we abandon Brexit?  
Without a hint of irony as big business indicates that they are ready to flee the UK due to a calamitous Tory Brexit - Scottish Tories still think we should just ‘get on with it’.  
Oh, me me! I know this one.Is the answer concentrate on attacking May, Fox, Gove, Johnson, Rees-Mogg and all the rest of the Tories who are the real culprits responsible for this Brexit mess?#YesItIs 
1.With what we know now, About who,The what &Why of Brexit being used as a stick to diminish us with.Hands up who still think #DavidCameron was ever an advocate of remain? or 'activated' to do the 'job' (Making EUref reality) when 'MADE' PM? 
When it comes to tactical tricks Dominic Grieve takes the biscuit. He tables amendments to thwart Brexit then votes against his own amendment. UUP don’t understand but applaud anyway because it’s a swipe at the DUP. Meantime @duponline will honour the will of the people. #brexit  
This: US, Canadian, Japanese and Indian businesses to UK: solve Brexit or risk £100bn in trade  
European Banking Authority calls City's Brexit plans 'inadequate'  
An interesting point an official made to me in Berlin last week: businesses post-Brexit concern isn’t that UK will have better/worse/same regulations, but that outside single market and customs union they won’t have what they have now: frictionless trade 
Jim Fitzpatrick reveals new information on how the DUP and Vote Leave worked together in the EU referendum. Did they break the law? And he digs deep into the finances behind the DUP’s record referendum donor in a money trail that leads to Ukraine and beyond#SpotlightNI@BBCOneNI 
FIFA warn England they could be punished if fans sing Brexit songs - THEY’RE GOING HOME, THEY’RE GOING - MIGRANTS ARE GOING HOME !! LOL 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "I think a vote of 17.4million people is more important than a march of about 100,000 people.“Bear in mind that this is not that big of a march. Two million people marched in relation to the Iraq War which was a much more important number." #Brexit  
This is why Alberta must take its destiny into our own hands. We cannot trust in career politicians to defend Alberta, but must hold a referendum to build a constitutional firewall around provincial powers and wealth. #ableg #cdnpoli 
The new banner for @InLimboBrexit in Whitehall during the #PeoplesVoteMarch. It represents both EU citizens in UK & Brits living in the EU27, all in Limbo since the referendum. Read their testimonies in the 2 books, ‘In Limbo’ & ‘In Limbo Too’. #the3million #BritishInEurope #FBPE 
Given precedent  of stopping  Swansea project & that #Brexit is clearly not value for money (on a much bigger scale), Brexit should be stopped forthwith.(link: ) 
Banks lay out plans to move more jobs from UK as prospect of no-deal Brexit looms  
BMW warns Brexit could force UK plant closures  
BREXIT NEWS21 financial services plan to move from Britain to south of IrelandSouth of Ireland economy to grow by 5%BMW warns Brexit forcing them 2 close plantsNorth’s economy will struggle 2 grow 1%North is a cold house 4 rights Brexit bring it down a few degrees  
I had the pleasure of chairing the annual summer Ministerial meeting of #EFTA at #Sauðárkrókur today. Lively and productive talks on #FreeTrade, #Brexit, #EU relations and other topics of common interests with colleagues from #Liechtenstein, #Norway and #Switzerland 
Screenwriter: I’ve finished the “Bad Boys of Brexit” re-re-re-draft to make them look shadier and include the Russia stuff. This thing’s killing me.Producer: About that; did you see the stuff today about insider trading on vote night?Screenwriter: OFFS! 
In 2015 they called it a referendum on GEJ....to be honest, on Chibok alone he deserved the boot....but not to be replaced with Buhari. Now the chickens have come home to roost and the referendum on this guy is clearly justified. Anybody else will do, we must just get him out. 
Let me guess, it’s an establishment smear campaign perpetrated by liberal elites who want to thwart Brexit?  
i keep thinking i should set up a separate twitter account for politics and then realise that means i have to actually engage with the pathological hellscape of rancid conservatism, racism, awful whataboutery and fucking brexit bollocks so i'll just stay in the kitchen for a bit 
I work in Brussels alongside the EU Brexit negotiators and I find it incredible how little the UK government understands | The Independent  
Oh dear. @IsabelOakeshott seems to have shown herself as a liar again. #NigelFarage #Brexit  
Airbus support 100,000 jobs in the UK.BMW support 50,000.Siemens support 56,000.And how do those driving Brexit respond when these companies express concerns about the impact of Brexit? "Completely inappropriate" (Hunt)"Scaremongering" (Farage)"F**k business" (Johnson)  
Faisal Islam - Pessimism over the #brexit part of the EU summit as progress on NI is proving tricky. BMW, today, have made a further statement about how worried they are about border arrangements & how that might mean they can't make their products in the UK.#FBPE #StopBrexit 
In the face of Airbus, BMW, Siemens and others telling the Government their Brexit strategy is a duff and putting jobs and investment at risk, I called on the Government to back a @peoplesvote_uk. WATCH:  #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
Not only does London remain the first financial centre in the world, it is the most popular place in the world to work in according to a poll of 366,000 workers from almost 200 countries. Despite Brexit of course. New York came second. Paris was not in the first five. 
DONATE | The backlash against the Referendum has revealed the establishment's contempt for British values and common sense.  Please help us to fight back. Thank you. 
Farage has probably made millions out of Brexit. It's the will of the people. 
The whole World to @theresa_may :  Your stupid fucking Brexit is going to destroy your country and everyone in it   
The weekend march for a new referendum on the terms of any Brexit deal was rather mis-timed. The Commons has already voted against one by 319-23 and the Lords by 260-202. And the marchers (including Gina Miller) believe passionately in parliamentary sovereignty of course. 
... and never forget that he never wanted the UK to Leave, but merely to be the gallant loser of the Referendum to then assume the Tory Leadership. He has no morals, no principles and no scruples. Hence we need a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit @SODEMAction @Open_Britain @BrexitBin 
Theresa May keeps softening her red lines on Brexit. What might the outcome be?   
Unprecedented. And it bears repeating, business does not like to make statements like this, but Brexit consultation has been handled appallingly. Have decided to use #GlobalBritain for such stories from now on 
Sat in the pub (wetherspoons) with the GF and a guy sits down opposite with a Stop Brexit t-shirt. Come back from the bar and he is talking to the GF about #Brexit at which point he engages me in conversation.Destroyed all his points. Including about trump. Remainer silence. 
In the flawed 2016 referendum they did, yeah, & A50 was triggered. Now let’s have an informed vote for all on the final deal once we know the facts. Let’s make sure that all UK citizens & residents whose lives will be affected have a say. Everyone’s vote will count the same.  
As an Englishman, I have always believed that the UK was greater than the sum of its parts. Since the Brexit vote, I am unable to make a case against Scottish independence. I can understand that Scotland must be sick to the back teeth of Little England. 
UK fisheries actually benefit from EU membership. That leaves as beneficiaries of Real Existing Brexit:HedgiesAsset-strippersTax shelterers and their enablersImmigration lawyers (hard Brexit only)BureaucratsEU lawyers, ironicallyHave I forgotten anyone?  
Two years since the Brits voted for Brexit.  Feels like ten.  
BMW would shut UK plants if Brexit hits supply chain  
I have had my fair share of run-ins with @Anna_Soubry and don't agree with her about the Single Market or a second referendum. But there must be room for her in the modern Conservative Party. We are a broad church and respect independent minds.  
This is phenomenally important . If true, it suggests that there may have been a ‘financial heist’ associated with manipulating markets through polling in advance of the Brexit result. Added to funding allegations associated with Leave campaign, the whole thing reeks!   
Shakoor Dar’s funeral was a referendum of sorts, as is for that matter, every other funeral of a fallen rebel in #Kashmir 
Brighty on Theresa May’s Brexit Britain - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Many Corbyn supporters are saying he can't do anything to oppose #Brexit. If that is the case let him resign and hand the Labour leadership to someone who can take the attack to a bitterly divided and shambolic minority Tory government. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
WATCH: Airbus, BMW & Siemens, supporting 200,000 UK jobs between them, have all issued warnings against Theresa May's botched Brexit.The Gov's response to them? F*** business. This is why we are demanding a #PeoplesVote. SIGN & RT the petition now:  
In other words, we love clean energy but for now we'll just carry on with our plans to expand nuclear instead & let some future generation deal with the toxic waste. We can of course carry on with the financial blackhole of Brexit because, you know, will of the people & all that  
Cancelling Brexit might spark a hard right backlash. But delivering Brexit definitely will Who will the Brexiters blame when it all goes pear-shaped? Anyone else, mostly likely EU & Remainers. @Bremaininspain 
This is yet another example of why Wales can never trust the Tories. And the idea that they would protect jobs and livelihoods with Brexit here is laughable.  
But the point of conceding (when he allegedly knew the correct result) was to allow his City chums to make millions of pounds. Nothing to do with Brexit stall. 
"21 financial services companies have confirmed that they will move some or all of their operations from the UK to Ireland following Brexit"  
Fuck business and other aspects of the Boris Johnson brexit vision  pic.twitter.com/4ij6O7O1vt 
WOW  130,000 of you have signed our petition backing a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal If you haven't already, please SIGN & SHARE now:  
The Swansea Bay tidal lagoon would have given a huge boost to Britain's renewables industry and created thousands of good jobs. Instead, we will be reliant on risky & hugely expensive nuclear technology bought in from France and Japan.So much for @michaelgove's "Green #Brexit".  
The Scottish and German governments meet today on the First Minister's business delegation visit to promote trade against the threat of Brexit. Not only is it the #DayJob but it's competence, both in format and professional style, which has been sorely missing from the UK. 
You're absolutely right. Many people voting Remain also didn't understand what they were voting for. Most British people are woefully ignorant about our relationship with the EU because it is VERY complex. That's why Cameron's reckless referendum was an act of outlandish sabotage  
Boris Johnson’s Brexit explosion ruins Tory business credentials  
My dad worked at Cowley for years. Devastating to hear that it could close, and that working families could lose their livelihoods. This is what a hard Brexit really looks like.  #BMW 
I met a woman while campaigning in the run up to the Referendum who genuinely told me that she was voting leave because she "didn't want us to join the EU." I met several who wanted to stop "immigration from Turkey" so no... I disagree "people were not clear"  
No electrification to Swansea, no Swansea Bay Tidal Lagoon and no respect for the concerns of Airbus on the dangers of a hard Brexit. This shows how little the UK Government cares about Wales. The Conservatives will prioritise South East England over Wales again and again. 
U.K. rejects Swansea tidal lagoon giant renewable energy project on the same day it's set to approve Heathrow Airport expansion. Not a good day for the environment in Brexit Britain. 
If only that instinct to research were more prevalent, perhaps the US might have avoided Trump and the UK might have avoided Brexit. *sigh* 
From a "Labour and Momentum member", one of several curiously defeatist tweets with similar wording sent out at the same time, just after after the hugely successful #PeoplesVote march. What does this tell us? That Labour/Momentum really, REALLY want brexit.  
Remainers, having tried to undermine Brexit by claiming Russian interference, are now actively calling for big business to, er, interfere in Brexit, says Tim Black 
This man's explanation of why young people should stop Brexit is flooring people  
'I work in Brussels alongside the EU Brexit negotiators and what I've seen from the UK government figures is frighteningly naive'  
Over 1000 votes already in couple of  hours and at this point it seems, that #catalans prefer BEER! Please vote! This "referendum" will not be disregarded.  
Strongest statement from any carmaker re Brexit: “if at the end of the day the supply chain will have a stop at the border, then we cannot produce our products in the UK” - via @Petercampbell1 - world away from “BMW will force Merkel to do a great deal”  
don't worry jez, just tell them about your jobs-first Brexit, that'll reassure them as much as it reassured us!  ps. FOR THE LOVE OF GOD WAKE UP AND OPPOSE THIS MADNESS #StopBrexit 
READ: in its starkest statement yet, BMW warns that it will be forced to close its UK plants if the company cannot quickly & reliably import components from mainland Europe after Brexit (£)  
Cancelling Brexit might spark a hard right backlash. But delivering Brexit definitely will, says @JonnElledge 
We're just 1,200 signatures away from 130,000 supporting a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal - if you haven't done so yet, please SIGN & SHARE our petition now:  
If a second referendum would be such a boon to the far right, why are they hell-bent on preventing it?  
let me tell you right now I will not hesitate to flykick brexit in it’s stupid face 
Greg Clarke openly slapping down Boris Johnson, Jeremy Hunt and others who have dismissed warnings from business over the risks of Brexit. 
This is such rubbish. I was with ⁦@Nigel_Farage⁩/ other Brexit campaigners that night. Till the early hours of the morning, he was sure Remain had won. He was very downcast indeed.  
If you want to test out the theory that the #FBPE-er cult is *really* anti Corbyn not anti Brexit, try tweeting a few illogical pointless attacks on Corbyn. They're in there hitting retweet like shit off a stick  
Fruit and veg sector ‘can grow from Brexit’  
WATCH | "A vote of 17.4 MILLION people is more important than a march of about 100,000" More wisdom from @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. The pro-EU media was obsessed with the Remoaner rally, but it paled in comparison to our huge referendum victory!Support us at  
Do you remember this petition? It was for a second referendum back in June 2016. 4 MILLION PEOPLE SIGNED.Please RETWEET the hell out of the #PeoplesVotePetition and lets get some serious numbers behind it. #FBPE #PeoplesVoteMarch #waton 
Upsettingly accurate from @catherinemep. UKGov’s delusions about its position and status post-Brexit fool nobody outside the UK. Third country means third country. 
Of the Ministers and MPs who criticised Airbus, which of them has run a global blue chip company with a complex supply chain? #Brexit #FBPE 
BMW warns Brexit could force UK plant closures  
Just for the record, yes I marched on Saturday, no I'm not middle-class or a liberal elite. I'm a working class northerner who stood up to be counted because I think #Brexit Is bollocks and will ruin the country.#PeoplesVoteMarch#StopBrexitSaveBritain#FinalSayForAll 
This guy literally has no clue.He urges MPs to vote for Heathrow expansion as its vital to Aberdeen, yet ignores that fact that Aberdeen will be the worst hit city due to Brexit so ploughs ahead and votes for Brexit anyway.Ross champions Brexit he couldnt care about Aberdeen  
About the only thing #Brexiteers can agree on “is that if Brexit fails to live up to the promises they made in 2016, it will not be their fault. The ‘stab in the back’ narrative is already being rehearsed”Oh we know that alright.  
Seriously, though: The claim that Brexit isn't working out so far, because we're not optimistic enough about it, is total rubbish. Good policies work, even if everyone hates them. Bad policies fail, even if everyone loves them. 
No Douglas - what business  can see is clarity as to the gravity of their situation - they are doing what any business would do - protect themselves - tell me ....How’s brexit going so far - any tangible benefits yet ?  
Jeremy Hunt says businesses shouldn’t warn about the negative impacts Brexit will have on them, and that people going into cardiac arrest should refrain from calling 999, and just ride it out. 
If there is a second referendum @Andrew_Adonis here's a tip.Don't do events and rallies with politicians and former advisers who okayed war and austerity. You'll lose again. 
"By winter, Labour will be backing a second referendum," said @Manuel_TSSA at @OpenLabour conference 
Boris launches his latest charm offensive to attract business to the uk after a “ full British brexit “ - we can’t get hold of him as he’s flown somewhere  today and we don’t know where  
Pretty remarkable that bits of media confusing London march for overwhelming national sentiment. Between that and pointing to polls feels a bit like, dare I say it, before the last referendum!Do they learn anything? 
Summary.How to win a second referendum:1. Do *not* call it a 'second referendum'.2. Instead, call it 'The People's Vote'.3. Rehash Project Fear.4. Accuse the Leave Camp of 'lying'.5. Tell Leave voters they're thick.6. What could possibly go wrong?7. That's all, folks!  
Would the EU Regulations on market abuse - which came into force only a week later, on 3 July 2016 - have prevented financiers from paying for and then profiting from Brexit?  
If a few thousand middle-class Ultra Remainers get their way and cancel Brexit, that will be a far greater political apocalypse than leaving the EU ever could be. Democracy must be defended.@GeoffNorcott reports from the march for a ‘people’s vote’ 
Financial firms will abandon Britain after Brexit, says IMF chief: Goodbye City of London and the billions it generates for the UK economy. Airbus/BMW etc A price worth paying?   
I work in Brussels alongside the EU Brexit negotiators and I am worried and astounded by how little the UK government figures understand  
Theresa May can't even sack Boris Johnson and Jeremy Corbyn's supposed to stop Brexit... 
What Kirsty really appears to mean is that the SNP should "join" those calling for a repeat of a referendum in which the choice over Scotland's constitutional future was handed to the voters of another country.   
Foreign businesses to UK: solve Brexit issue or risk £100bn in trade  
Imagine the gov't held a referendum on declaring war on Country X because X invaded & occupied Jersey. We vote for war, then discover it was a sham: X had not invaded. Would we feel betrayed if the war were cancelled?If Brexit is stopped, it is not a betrayal; it is sanity. 
There is no Brexit dividend, so where exactly is this NHS money coming from?  
TOO BIG TO IGNORE.Over 120,000 have now signed our petition demanding a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Have you? Please SIGN & RT:  
The identity politics of this daily star writer are something else....  Not allowed to be gay, tory, and back brexit apparently. Having 2 Dalmatians is an issue too apparently. Weird.  
BREAKING: ERG chair and self-confessed 'Gold Bug', Steve Baker, has invested more than £70,000 in gold trader Glint. Gold traditionally performs best in a recession - meaning he will personally profit it Brexit hits the fan - please share  
In reality Remoaners do not care about votes at all - they simply want Brexit to be rejected by any means possible, says Leo McKinstry  
Pleases share this far and wide so we can get a Peoples Vote We need a million at least to sign this and then they will listen to us, The March began it and now we can finish Brexit once and for all' #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Why didn't you vote for a referendum on the final Brexit deal - a 'People's Vote' if you will - in December last year when you had chance, Chuka?  
Here's what I'm told by a senior lawyer at a large law firm re trading on Referendum polling:"advice was that probably okay under election law, but v dangerous from a regulatory/insider trading perspective. The banks we were advising all told their guys to steer clear." 
Johnson is not voting for it *in spirit*, you understand. Happily, in practice he’ll continue to draw his ministerial salary, advocate destruction of economy from Brexit, and use Afghanistan as a great-game decoy to avoid taking responsibility, as he has every day of his career  
(2) And a far cry from Obama’s petulant threats to send us to the back of the queue if we dared vote for Brexit. 
(1) “How can a country with this great a history, this great a language, this great a legal system & this great a presence not be successful?” — US Ambassador in London, showing better leadership on Brexit than most of our politicians.  
Welcome @NicolaSturgeon! The First Minister of Scotland is now in Berlin and talks, among #MichaelMüller other things, about plans for a new Scottish office in Berlin and the @Brexit #ScotGovFM 
With Euroscepticism on the rise in the #EU, is it time for an EU-wide referendum? 
I truly hope that when #ThePeoplesVote takes place and Remain wins, those on the losing side accept the result with the same good grace as us Remainers did when the result of the first referendum came through. 
If you want to know what will happen to UK manufacturing after Brexit, just look at what happened to East Germany after reunification.The few manufacturing companies who don't leave will be bought up and asset stripped by their global competitors.Coz that's what competitors do. 
‘F*** business’ means f*** people’s livelihoods, pensions, mortgages, savings. Brexit is psychopathic  
Glad that today Mrs May is voting the opposite way to her previously expressed, insincere views. Now the same on Brexit please  
Richard Dawkins Brexit moral snobbery got me all annoyed.So i started writing while angry, this is what fell out. 
FIFA, who wanted to fine us for wearing poppies, is now threatening to fine the FA if England fans dare to support Brexit. What an absolute disgrace!Read at Support us at  
Yes why aren't the Brexiters trumpeting the news that billionaires are getting richer from #Brexit....  
"Sack @BorisJohnson.""Why?""The rascal has only gone away on a Foreign Office trip""But he's Foreign Secretary.""Ah, but, we don't like him. We blame him for #Brexit."...  
Hey folks, remember how I said that Brexit was a scam to deliberately crash the UK's GDP so that certain monied interests could make a mint? Well, guess what? *Gustures broadly at this complete fustercluck*  
The organisation that brought you such things as rampant corruption and a World Cup in a country where women are second class citizens has now decided to draw the moral high ground at Brexit chanting. Shine on, FIFA, you bastions of moral goodness. 
So Boris says “fuck business”. I’d rather join @campbellclaret and say “fuck Brexit”Grab yours here and show your support for British business #fuckbrexit pic.twitter.com/kUQJwU4U23 
Looks like @theresa_may has changed her mind on Heathrow expansion. Whether or not I agree with Heathrow issue, I respect her being able to do so, because in a democracy it’s ok to change your mind. Just like many leave voters have on #brexit who are #remainernow!#peoplesvote 
First @murrayf00te's move to Yes. Then @chrisdeerin's acknowledgement of "progressive" SNP. Now Herald's @fidelmacook; "By the end of Brexit debacle England will stand alone, Ireland will be united and Scotland will be a nation again." Things are moving   
Financial firms will relocate en masse to continental Europe after Brexit, according to Christine Lagarde  
@Rachael_Swindon with thanks to @UKDemockery The Tories "the party of business" so what does Boris say when confronted by the fact business has concerns about Brexit "Fuck business" this is THEM. In it for themselves. Brexit at any cost. pic.twitter.com/ROFbKQJR2u 
"@theresa_may​ is totally hopeless" says @UKIP​'s leader @GerardBattenMEP​ as thousands marched on the 2nd anniversary of #Brexit vote.MORE:  
Why don't we have 8 runways at Heathrow? Why don't we have 800? Why don't we just runway-over Britain? Why don't we say f**k CO2 emissions? F**k spreading our runways evenly and sensibly around the country? Let's just go hatstand, Brexit, Whoopeeeeeeee! mad 
All around the world people's understanding of the facts on immigrants are hugely negatively biased  The role of this in #Brexit  
EU has started the legal process to re-write rules for car manufacturing excluding the UK from so-called 'type approval' after #brexit.  
We have reached a sorry state of affairs when experts warning about the dire consequences of a no deal Brexit are insulted and intimidated in this way. It suggests that the govt is refusing to consider the arguments of business leaders because they know they cannot refute them 
MUPPETS: FIFA could punish the FA if England fans chant about Brexit during Thursday’s game against Belgium. Another discredited, bloated organisation that has totally lost touch with reality!  
All Brexiteers should read George Parker FT piece today. May preparing to stay in single market for goods. We are being played. Attempt to marginalise/eliminate Boris is to stop him being able, as a Brexit campaign leader, to nail May's planned deal as the sell-out it really is. 
"No surrender, no surrender, no surrender to a Brexit transition period, customs union, and maintained protections for workers’ rights..."  
Hey Nige @Nigel_Farage ,  shorting the UK on referendum day, well played mate, absolutely blinding scam. Especially the On the Record talking up of Remain win - well clever. How many millions did you make ? 1, 10, 100? 
The Brexit camp has continuously misled the British public since the Leave campaign began in 2015. It is now the Government’s job to ensure we don’t face another 20 years of uncertainty and turmoil. We can prevent this from happening by granting the people a final #VoteontheDeal 
Boris may or may not still be a leader contender. But his profile gives him the power as a Cabinet big-hitter to define May's Brexit deal as either a sell-out or satisfactory. That's why Remainer ultras want him out now, so any criticism he makes can be dismissed as sour grapes. 
Friends! Fake!Our Remain was supposed to win the referendum, but as Our Codswallop has proved, 17,410,742 bigots voted the wrong way due to a fake LYING bus!But when you point this out to Leavers, they say "Remoaners are just a bunch of sore losers!"Talk about a powder keg!  
#FBPE THIS IS THE MOST IMPORTANT BREXIT LEGAL CHALLENGE TO DATEThe EU court will consider these questions:> Was the EU referendum illegal? > Must there be a new vote?> Is Article 50 reversible?Please donate & RT  
Is it time for the UK to attach conditions to the Brexit divorce bill?  via @BrexitCentral 
Polling suggests support for a #referendum on the actual #brexit deal is growing steadily:  
I don't follow football. Get me a ticket to the next game, asap, and I will be leading the singing.  Brexit, what do we want - Brexit, when do we want it - now. Anyone got a spare corporate hospitality ticket? 
Brexit is a big deal - but it is not a done deal. @peterkyle on why he marched for a people's vote: 
And #Brexit and #Brexiteers are  easing into the #nativism camp that is  #ViktorOrban 's  Hungary; #MatteoSalvini’s  Italy and Trump's America.If folks on the Left can't /won't make that analysis , then they're part of the problem. Not the solution. 
I am convinced that #FBPE has become a smoke screen for @Conservatives trolls  to attack #JeremyCorbyn Still have not seen one rational argument against Corbyn regarding #BrexitAll seems very desperate. 
The problem with Brexit is eventually the leaders in favor of it will run out of other people's jobs. 
Remainer media operation against Boris - get him out over Heathrow to clear the way for a total sell-out of Brexit.  
How can UK negotiate a sensible agreement with #EU while Boris (f*** business) remains Foreign Sec and Liam Fox is Trade Sec? Both should be replaced by more sensible figures. Otherwise, both #Brexit and the UK economy are doomed. 
A Bloomberg investigation has learned that U.K. polling firms sold hedge funds critical, advance information, on the day and in the days leading up to the Brexit referendum, putting them in a position to earn fortunes by short selling the British pound. @CamSimpsonNews reports 
Anti-Brexit protest crowd estimates:12,000 — reality‘50,000’ — organisers‘100,000’ — Guy Verhofstadt‘500,000’ — BBC  Do I hear ONE MILLION?Going, going, …gone.  
Everybody's talking about Bloomberg's investigation into Brexit referendum night and the hedge funds that made millions. Read it here:  
Video here with @CamSimpsonNews: on U.K. polling firms sold hedge funds critical, advance information, on the day and in the days leading up to the #Brexit referendum, putting them in a position to earn fortunes by short selling the British pound.  
Organisers: 100,000 anti-Brexit attendeesReality: At most 50,000 anti-Brexit attendeesBBC:  
The Bitter Remainer Soubry Sling:Two parts cry baby ginOne part bitter lemon tearsAdd a pinch of saltTopped by wilting flowersCheers! @Anna_Soubry #Brexit #Britainsbestdaysahead pic.twitter.com/i0GdA8D7de 
People let down will see politicians who knew about the impacts of Brexit but who nonetheless failed to explain the realities and carried on pretending there’d be benefits, when they knew all along.There’s no political gain in a policy of deliberate confusion and distraction. 
Unpopular opinion time!Opposition to stopping Brexit is not because Brexit is a good idea - v few think that now.It’s because people fear more division.But far *more danger* in pushing ahead with communities finding themselves *worse off*.Will collapse trust in politics.  
Played no part you say. You mean apart from whipping the PLP to vote against a soft Brexit. Whipping the PLP to vote for a Tory Brexit. Whipping the PLP to abstain on the EEA amendment. You mean apart from using the language of the hard right in order to demonise EU nationals  
Popular fallacy: Brexit was anti-elitism Real life:  
Huge increase in racism in our schools since Brexit. Hate suffered by children. This is Labour/Tory Brexit poisoning our country and our schools. There is NO justification for failing to oppose. @Women_4_Europe @Femi_Sorry @JMPSimor @WomaninHavana @di_middleton_QC 
Which breach of the law related to Brexit shall we talk about today:- insider trading and market manipulation or- breach of electoral laws? 
Chase this methodology. It isn’t only at play with Brexit. It is a thread of mob fabric that runs across the global tapestry. Market manipulation is an issue that works hand in glove with money laundering. cc @LincolnsBible @ninaandtito @LouiseBagshawe @thespybrief @nadaburger 
The inside story of how pollsters helped hedge funds make millions from the Brexit vote  
Airbus, BMW and other multinationals part-owned by EU govts queue up to criticise the Govt implementing #Brexit Britons voted for.But they don't use similar force to push EU to strike a comprehensive deal with Britain.It's not trade but political submission they want from us?  
Hmm. This nasty woman setting her trolls onto a mother for daring to say she was worried about the consequences of no-deal brexit. But look. The best thing Brewer can say in response is that brexit won't end the *entire* world. Just the UK economy, eh?  
We must ‘respect the referendum result’ must we? Each revelation another nail in the coffin of its credibility.Brexit is the biggest political con of our lifetimes.  
If you have a genuine concerns against #Brexit then share those.DO NOT ATTACK #JeremyCorbyn about what he didn't, should or shouldn't do.It proves to people that you are either fake or very dumb. 
On Thursday, @AdamRamsay and @PeterKGeoghegan revealed that Shanker 'Hard Brexit' Singham was advising Liam Fox too.Today its reported he quit the role. Funny how Liam Fox keeps getting caught up in these 'conflict of interests'  
Despite Brexit, the UK  could still potentially join a pan-European project to develop a new main battle tank with the French  and Germans . My story:  
Another day, another conspiracy. Now, apparently, they reckon Nigel telling a journalist friend of his that “Remain may have nicked it” at 10:01pm after the referendum was a big scandal to make billions for hedge funds. How much did corporations profit from your wars, Al?  
Not since Margaret Thatcher's early years (1980s) have I seen ministers so emboldened, and much more rude, in their utterances. Then the enemy were the unions. Now the enemy  is anybody raising questions about Brexit's consequences. Thatcher was a strong PM, but May so weak. 
The Muppets Christmas Special looks pretty good. #Brexitmarch #Brexit  
62 local Labour parties back a new grassroots campaign calling for Jeremy Corbyn to oppose Brexit and back a second referendum. Supporters include Ann Pettifor, an advisor to Shadow Chancellor John McDonnell.  
I’ve been out the country for the past 10 days. Is Brexit now sorted? 
‘Skyfall’s Rory Kinnear & ‘The Crown’s John Heffernan Join Benedict Cumberbatch’s C4 Drama ‘Brexit’  
It doesn't matter that everybody lied. It doesn't matter that bankers manipulated the market. It doesn't matter that personal data was plundered. It's the will of the people. #Brexit 
The #PeoplesVoteMarch is having an effect! Pro-Corbyn group to launch drive for public vote on Brexit deal 
But these Brexit/Trump closeups are key. This is where you can see the cryptocurrency market was being shorted in the opposite direction of the main market shorting reported explosively by @business today. They were marking a killing both ways by manipulating the electorates: 
Anti-Brexit catastrophists have dominated the debate for too long. It’s time to counter their sneering and fearmongering with a Brexit Pride movement. Say it loud: #Brexit is one of the great acts of democracy of modern times.  
I'm in favour of MPs doing their job, stopping Brexit b/c it's a calamity. It's straightforward, rational: they can withdraw A50 Notice. But they're blindly following the path to UK's downfall. Since they lack the spine, we the ppl fight their phony *will of the ppl* #PeoplesVote 
Some far left Brexiteers I suspect want to see the well known Stalinist principle 'worse is best' develop thus improving chances of a future Corbyn government as the UK economy is damaged by disinvestment and job losses if there's a Brexit bad deal or no deal in the autumn.  
Leading Brexiteer @DanielJHannan jokes about the EU referendum becoming a “best of five. Or maybe a regular test like the cricket”.It comes amid calls for a second referendum from some pro-Remain campaigners.  
‘We won't be silenced over threat to economy, say City chiefs’The voices of opposition to Brexit are getting louder. How much longer can they be dismissed as project fear 2.0? 
The ‘right’ were well devious; they even booked him a holiday during the referendum campaign  
London crowned the world's most popular city for work - despite Brexit  
TOO BIG TO IGNORE.Over 120,000 have now signed our petition demanding a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Have you? Please SIGN & RT:  
Could it be that the whole point of the Brexit referendum was simply one massive heist on the pound - building it up, then selling it off before the crash?  
This is most interesting. An article on the Glint website talks about BrexitAnd poses the question “If brexit does prove to be a mistake...” and says that will push the pound down 
DONT PANIC!But the Brexit “no deal” minister appears to be very interested in gold.... 
Poll after poll after poll says this. Voters of all parties say this. Year after year. Yet nothing is ever done. Apparently the anti-Brexit demo on Saturday was ‘too big to ignore.’ And yet this is.  
#OTD 1903 George Orwell was born in India. "The further a society drifts from truth the more it will hate those who speak it."Brexit went more than drifting from the truth into lies, whether on a red bus or in electoral fraud.#PeoplesVote to show the "will of the people" pic.twitter.com/Fd6MjEnPwR 
Meet the City spinmeister orchestrating the plot to reverse Brexit  
Last week the #EU called on the UK to publish the real owners of trusts, as a key part of its relationship after Brexit:  It is INCREDIBLE to see #AnonymousCompanies and trusts so central to the EU’s position. 
Labour's 'policy' on Brexit is the ultimate self-defeating shitshow. #2876 
This man's explanation of why young people should stop Brexit is flooring people  
If anyone is questioning why business is raising grave concerns about the Govt's handling of Brexit, read this devastating description from @NEEChamber of exasperation, lack of tangible progress & woeful levels of engagement >> 
The truth is out BREXIT IS THE SCAM OF THE CENTURY! Brexit is a means for a few people to make megga millions.The scam starts on referendum night when hedge funds with 'timely' info made hundreds of millions. Now hard Brexit seeking disaster capitalists are moving in. @acgrayling 
Shocking scoop reveals how hedge funds profited significantly from private polling during the EU referendum - with former broker Farage implicated  #Brexit 
EU watchdog tells banks to speed up Brexit preparations  
Brexiters should heed the IMF’s warning.  This is not Project Fear.  #Brexit reality is starting to hit home.  If Airbus is the first to cut back on investment in the UK, will the financial sector be next?  
Heard it all before *sigh *'More than 50' Tory MPs prepared to defy Theresa May to stop no-deal Brexit  
'When a foreign secretary says “f*** business” to diplomats at the Queen’s birthday celebrations...followed by Jeremy Hunt telling business on Marr to shut up about Brexit, saying their concerns are “completely inappropriate” (!!), you see the disastrous effects of Brexit. 
The journalist behind the bombshell report on how Nigel Farage's Brexit concession may have helped hedge funds to make a fortune explains the story to @mrjamesob.  
After 1pm: Half a million people march in London against #Brexit - is that the start of a great awakening; or just the biggest moan-fest in history?  
I hope this is seen by every person struggling to make ends meet who voted for Brexit believing the lies they were told by the Leave campaign that their lives would be better. Because sure, this guy’ll do fine. The rest of us? Let’s see...  
SCANDAL BREWING!! Billions made illegally on referendum polling night. Farage up to his neck (he will of course deny it and has already no doubt covered his tracks) So our security services no nothing? Nonsense. All this is known. You are just being kept in the dark. #Brexitfraud 
Sad to see @OwenJones84 getting beat up by remainers for suggesting another referendum won't be a walk in the park. If the focus of our campaign is to be a re-run, then Owen's points will have to be addressed if we hope to stop Brexit  
Anybody that is Labour and playing Brexit games....Read this and feel really Proud of Yourself !!!!!  
Tens of thousands of Britons opposed to the country’s withdrawal from the European Union marched through the streets of London to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal  
I personally can’t see any deal meeting Labour’s tests. Then they will vote against it.The point is the Tories are showing enough discipline to push Brexit through. If they can’t we’ll have another general election. This strategy makes no sense to me.  
Ministers hit back at 'completely inappropriate' Brexit threats from 'inappropriate' Airbus - as Liam Fox says they should be making their case to the EU  
Brexit has/ will make some people *much* better off.Spoiler: it won’t be the communities with the most to lose.  
A second Brexit piece on the footbrdige at Radley Railway Station (a bridge as a metaphor for connectivity).@artists4brexit @BrexitCentral #brexitart #streetart pic.twitter.com/pU8wrH3njU 
Pro-Corbyn group to launch drive for public vote on Brexit deal - surely they should join the #PeoplesVote campaign! 
"Airbus is a classic multinational business, intrinsically wrapped up in the EU, that is trying to undermine the UK government’s negotiating position, just as it did during the referendum campaign" @JLongworthLML  
One of my Brexit pieces that I've put up down Marston Street, Oxford@artists4brexit @BrexitCentral #brexitart #streetart 
A referendum on whether to have a second referendum on Brexit. I love it. You don't need focus groups when you've got @rejectpetitions to get the best ideas out of the public. 
#Brexit’s Big Short: How Pollsters Helped Hedge Funds Beat the CrashPrivate polls—and a timely ‘concession’ from the face of Leave Nigel Farage — allowed the funds to make millions off the pound’s collapse. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
BREAKING: ‘It’s not my job to help Theresa May’ on Brexit, says Taoiseach Leo Varadkar. ‘My job is wacky socks, selfies and looking like I give a toss.’ 
Franklin Dehousse (@FrDe2059), former judge at the General Court of the ECJ, has an interesting proposal to get Brexit talks moving again: 
Brexit’s Big Short: How Pollsters Helped Hedge Funds Beat the Crash  
The 48% (now 54%) have been ignored for too long by both the government and media. We at last seem to be getting some modicum of coverage. #FBPE #WATON #brexitbias #brexitbroadcastingcorporation Time for a #peoplesvote on the #brexit deal which inevitably will sell Britain short  
Now Sweden is heading towards a brexit type vote. Italy has had enough and will probably follow, Belgium is deeply unsettled, Germany is approaching the point where they can take no more and the French are looking for someone to surrender to. And Remain want to stay in the EU !!! 
British export growth has fallen to its slowest pace since the Brexit referendum while the export performance of the rest of the EU is picking up speed, according to a trade survey  
'Inappropriate': UK Minister Urges Gov't to Ignore BMW, Airbus Brexit Warnings  
Survation polling on a "People's Vote" to "accept or reject the #Brexit deal":48% - would support it 25% - would oppose it 18% - had no opinion9% - were undecided 
Financial firms will relocate en masse to continental Europe after #Brexit, according to Christine Lagarde, head of the International Monetary Fund, who said that EU officials should increase regulatory and supervisory capacity to prepare for the influx  
Brexiteers appear to have profited off the referendum. Stunning kleptocracy- dooming your country's economy while extracting a bit more wealth on the way out. @Nigel_Farage and his boys are such scum. 
SNP  'open ear'/not hostile to 2nd Brexit referendum - very passive; why not join/help lead the 2/3 of Scots, 54% across UK now backing remain before it's too late?  
Everyone needs to read this. We are being had on an epic scale. How many snouts in the trough? How many would be in jail if Brexit overturned? @Devon4Europe @_Britain4Europe @BenPBradshaw @sarahwollaston @MollyMEP @juliegirling @BBCNews @faisalislam @Peston #brexitscam 
Crispin Odey was one of #Brexit's biggest financial backers. He's also chipped into Jacob Rees-Mogg's campaign expenses - Rees-Mogg's Somerset Capital Management initially operated under the wing of Odey's hedge fund.Who said there's no Brexit dividend? 
This weekend, Health secretary Jeremy Hunt said that business warning the public about the impact of Brexit was inappropriate. No Jeremy, a health secretary talking about business when the NHS is haemorrhaging nurses is inappropriate. Agree? Spread the word.  
Ireland must prepare for post-Brexit influx of financial firms, says Lagarde  
You know what’s so frustrating about the brexit farage pound story, that no one cared at the time... I don’t know about you but we are grieving the consequences of not having a political leader ready to call it out. 
My article in @ConversationUK 'Brexit: This Poll Reveals a Sad Truth about Britain and Northern Ireland' is now available in today Independent at @UniKentPolitics @UniKent 
Why I worry a second EU referendum would boost the radical right: and why, no, I'm not Neville Chamberlain.  
Anyone who tells you nobody has changed their mind since referendum direct them to @RemainerNow 
The untold story of Brexit's winners: Hedge funds made in the hundreds of millions as the U.K. pound suffered one of history's worst currency routs. @CamSimpsonNews explains   
BBC News - Brexit: PM urged to speed up no-deal Brexit plans  The lack of understanding of what no deal entails is astonishing 
My speech at the weekend. It's time for the anti-brexit campaign to wake up and win.“We can’t afford to be defenders of the establishment, of some kind of vapid centrism that has failed in the past and will fail again.” #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Wow - it looks like Farage and others had some illegal money to stick in their offshore trust funds on Brexit night.  
2 years on, i think Leavers should get a chance to confirm they still think Brexit's a good idea - like when your computer asks you to confirm delete, only here with a very important file indeed!.  handily, remainers can sign this too! #PeoplesVote 
It's funny how ultra-Remainers say Brexit shows that this country is a nasty, intolerant hellhole when continental Europe is much more racist than we are.  
The UK voted to leave the EU 2 years ago. A further extension of the transition period only risks delaying Brexit indefinitely. The British people want to see the referendum result implemented, not continually postponed 
16 funniest placards from the Brexit protest march  #Brexit #Brexitmarch 
If anyone's still unsure how Boris would react to Brexit going sour, his running away from the Heathrow vote offers some interesting clues 
“Anti-Brexit catastrophists have dominated the debate for too long. It’s time to counter their sneering and fearmongering with a Brexit Pride movement. Say it loud: Brexit is one of the great acts of democracy of modern times.”Brendan O’Neill in the Sun 
It does need to be democratic. So you defeat the govt on a Brexit deal in Parliament, promise 2nd referendum in election manifesto, win election, then win referendum. Unfortunately this requires an opposition which is anti-Brexit, rather than pro-Brexit, which we don't have. 
As a12 year old kid...I had to hide from the rent manWent to school with no dinner moneyPicked peas in the fields to pay for the TV licenceThen I left School at 16So #Corbyn supporters don't talk to me about only Middle class opposing #Brexit#WheresJeremyCorbyn 
 Fantastic guys. Well done. Put pressure on the Labour front bench to listen to their members and back a Peoples Vote. That’s the only way we will get a final say. #FBPE are NOT anti Corbyn, we are Anti Brexit in any form. 
Ambassador Johnson: "It's extremely important Donald Trump visits Britain. No matter what happens with Brexit the relationship between our countries is stronger than ever." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @USAmbUK |  
RT if you agree with @MollyMEP that @sajidjavid should make public the information the Home Office has on Kremlin meddling in EU referendum  
Not only would a customs partnership be unwieldy and impractical, but it would be a betrayal of Brexit! 
This is , even by the “bad boys” standards an extraordinary story.  #Brexit as a tool to enrich the already rich - at the expense of the rest of us.  
Why would a consistent anti-austarity politician like JC share a platform at the #peoplesvote with pro austerity MP @vincecable. A man who passed austerity measures that have killed many thousands of our people. The damage caused by him to our country puts Brexit in the shade! 
Half of EU business leaders cut UK investment over Brexit - survey  
Just a small point. Noise, air and environmental pollution aside, if we get a no-deal-Brexit, you do know that means our pilots won't be licensed to fly in European airspace, right?So the #HeathrowExpansion might end up being just a really cool race track. 
Banks 'not prepared' for no-deal Brexit, EBA says  
Nothing conveys how far the Tories have, thanks to Brexit, lost the plot so much as this self-styled party of business now being so openly sneery and savaging of business 
It was clear at the time that Farage's referendum night words were very premature. The people who benefitted from them were his chums  - the hedge fund managers - and they made billions out of Britain's misfortune. #BrexitPirates 
Rather than Corbyn fans shouting "@UKLabour supporters should get behind the leader!" how about the leader gets behind Labour voters? #Brexit  
Very old news  ....  Now read the part where @Nigel_Farage boosts their profit by claiming "remain" edged it ... despite knowing the polls taken at the time suggesting the opposite. 
The inside story of how pollsters helped hedge funds beat the pound's Brexit crash - and make millions in the process  
How relatable man of the people Nigel Farage made millions with a false concession of defeat on Referendum night. Breathtaking cynicism.  
And still I get replies from blithering idiots who "won't vote for Corbyn because he's with the Tories and he won't stop brexit!" God give me bloody strength, are these people bloody stupid or doing it deliberately? I'll say it slowly and in shouty caps, CORBYN CAN'T STOP BREXIT! pic.twitter.com/sWhuY5NWFu 
But here's the rub - every senior promoter of Brexit is a beneficiary of the offshore trust secrecy system, from Banks, Wigmore and Farage through the media moguls and senior MPs, to the owners of Cambridge Analytica and Putin and his oligarchs. 
Already too hot to broil with rage but that Bloomberg piece is extraordinary. Fake concessions on Brexit night were to manipulate the markets and line hedge funders' pockets. WHAT THE FUCK. And here we are. 
I have just signed this petition which is requesting a public vote on the final Brexit deal. I mean, I don’t expect we’ll get one, but there’s no harm in asking. If you’re worried about Brexit, why not sign and then you’ll feel you’ve done something.  
But there you have the only real beneficiaries of Brexit. Odey was born with a silver spoon in his mouth. Was even married to Prudence Murdoch for a bit. Why are you enabling this @jeremycorbyn 
Anyway that is basically the minister closest to Airbus, a N Wales MP saying 2 Cabinet minister “multimillionaires’ leadership aspirations trump the need to listen to employers and employees” who have made “dismissive, unworthy and inflammatory attitudes” re Airbus Brexit concern 
#WheresBorisJohnson?Johnson was fired as a Daily Telegraph journo. Why?He lied.Johnson was fired as a Tory shadow minister. Why?He lied.Johnson said he'd brave bulldozers to stop Heathrow expansion.He lied.When will Britain realise #Brexit is Johnson's BIGGEST lie yet?  
Again ? This 20% ahead stuff never attempts to explain a) Why they couldn't win in 15 & 16 b) Why Tory support went to 40+% after the referendum RESULT at the same point UKIPs went off a cliff c) collapse of Soc Dem parties across the EU d) what's "radical" about neoliberal lite  
The problem with these tweets is if this is how they talk to someone who campaigned for and voted for Remain, and who doesn't like Brexit but isn't convinced it can be reversed, how are they going to persuade Leave voters?  
FM @NicolaSturgeon heads a @ScotDevInt Scottish business delegation visiting #Germany - seeking to increase trade & investment despite uncertainties of #Brexit. FM also to meet Germany’s Minister of State at the Foreign Office and the Mayor of Berlin.  
Hedge funds made millions from the pound's Brexit crash. @CamSimpsonNews spent 7 months investigating how  
Jacob Rees Mogg has just told @lbc that "the Brexit dividend is real" and "will be £10bn net".What a f*cking tool.#bbcdp #PeoplesVote @BestForBritain @eloisetodd @Open_Britain @ChukaUmunna @PJTheEconomist @TheIFS 
Until March  2019 we will have to put up with endless Remainer stunts from Soros funded pressure groups and EU funded businesses and institutions. It will all be anti-Brexit propaganda and lies of course. Don't expect it to stop until the money taps are turned off. What a bore! 
UK hedge funds shorted this country ahead of eu ref vote . They got  the result before official publication. And they made billions out of the Crash. It's called: the #BrexitBigShort-uncovered by @BloombergTV#Brexit-#TheRichGetPaidAndThePeopleGetPlayed 
Banks’ plans for hard Brexit are ‘inadequate’  
Our petition calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal is at 108,000 - after just 48 hours. The next target is 200,000 - can you sign & share to help us achieve that?  
Chris Grayling says he’s not in charge of the railways. Presumably this is now policy: @DavidDavisMP isn’t in charge of Brexit, @LiamFox isn’t in charge of trade, @BorisJohnson isn’t even in charge of himself and it’s clear @theresa_may isn’t in charge of the government.#R4Today 
Defence minister Guto Bebb, who deals with Airbus directly, criticises “senior Cabinet ministers” [ie Hunt & Johnson] for “dismissive attitudes” to business Brexit concerns as “unworthy and inflammatory”.comes after Hunt said Airbus had made “completely unacceptable threats”  
Another Labour politician, @RLong_Bailey, talks about a Brexit which is good for our economy and protects jobs. Every authoritative study I’ve seen says this is impossible. Why does Labour continue to back something which will make ordinary people poorer?  
Remarkable piece of journalism. How pollsters helped hedge funders make billions on Brexit night. Once again who is key man in middle of the story - Nigel Farage. Funny that. And once again serious questions raised about breaking Uk law.  
Accusation is that Farage had information saying Leave had won, but said he thought they'd lost on the night of the referendum.That comment helped hedge funds make millionsJust another dodgy aspect to #Brexit  
STORY alert.Remember those two apparent concessions Nigel Farage made on the night of the Brexit vote? That sent the pound skywards before it crashed down with a bang hours later?Bloomberg reports that made trader mates of his millions shorting the £   
Remember when Nigel Farage conceded defeat very early on the night of  the referendum? The £ rose but then crashed when it turned out Leave had won. Hedge fund managers made millions. Coincidence? Fascinating insight from Bloomberg. 
This is our #MondayMotivation every day! #digitaltransformation #simplify #designthinking #usability #California 
I want a referendum on whether Nigel Farage should ever be on telly or radio again. I vote No. 
Brexit's big short: How pollsters helped hedge funds beat the pound's crash  
The same @ChukaUmunna who, prior to the 2016 #EURef, insisted that he would respect the referendum result whatever the outcome, & that we would leave the #EU if Leave won "even by one vote".EVEN. BY. ONE. VOTE.The doyen of two-faced, hypocritical political charlatans. 
Yes. Ireland didn’t create this terrible problem, Brexit did: a dangerous & completely unnecessary problem.  
If you missed all the big Brexit news..Liam says basically we are pretending to No Deal to get a good deal.Businesses say they will leave if we No Deal.Boris says Fuck Business..Thousands marchedDigby says it will all be fine in 100 years 
A near-perfect example of the idiocy of #Brexit and #Brexiter arguments  (Times, today):Does Gary really think aeroplane wings can *only* be manufactured in the "U"K?@BrexitBin @MarieAnnUK @abcpoppins @Andrew_Adonis @terrychristian @thomasbrake @acgrayling (RT ad lib ) 
This should be a matter for @CityPolice the @NCA_UK and the @TheFCA. Markets were being manipulated with the data provided (knowingly or otherwise) by pollsters. This would appear to be contrary to law. When will UK law enforcement start investigating Brexit properly? #UKmueller 
More ‘Brexit dividend’: British companies relocating: “Global law firm sets up office in Luxembourg  
The behaviour of Sterling on referendum night was odd, I remember thinking. I couldn’t understand why the private exit polls appeared to have got it so wrong. Maybe they didn’t !  
Remarkable investigation about how private polling – and a timely "concession" allowed hedge funds to make millions on the day of the Brexit vote  
I have feared this all along and Bloomberg (!!) have finally confirmed it: the senior Brexiters are actually all profiteering from Brexit by betting against the UK  . #stopbrexit 
Jings. Pollsters selling hedge funds info - illegal if they gave it to the public - so they could short the pound around the night of the Brexit vote. And what was Farage up to?!  
This story about how the interests of politicians, pollsters, academics and hedge funds became intertwined in the run up to the Brexit referendum is fascinating. Makes you wonder about dynamics shaping so much doom-laden analysis of the Euro 
I am assuming the ⁦@TheFCA⁩ and ⁦@bankofengland⁩ will be reading this impressive expose by ⁦@business⁩ of what looks like market manipulation on the night the UK chose Brexit - and Sterling first rose and then slumped  
‘@LiamFox: No Deal Brexit could still happen, not bluffing. “If there are attempts to hold us inside the Customs Union or the Single Market when the people of Britain decided to vote against it then, we’d have to have No Deal.” 
Hard to imagine @Nigel_Farage did this for free... is there more to come on this extraordinary story in which a bunch of hedge funds made hundreds of millions from Brexit?  
Shocking article. But also interesting that #NigelFarage's favourite pollsters @Survation say public want a #PeoplesVoteon the final options How pollsters helped hedge funds beat the pound's Brexit crash  via @business 
A lot of truth in this article. If you are a ⁦@UKLabour⁩ supporter & want to see them form the next government, it’s vital you get involved with groups like ⁦@Remain_Labour & ⁦@Labour4EU⁩ to shift ⁦⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ #brexit position!  
Scotland is being trolled by the Scottish Tories. This was a party that officially wanted to stay in the EU. Now they are Brexit evangelists because their Westminster bosses pull the strings. They are lapdogs with no integrity."Our vote" - Scotland voted 62% Remain  
WARNING: Insider dealing - why aren't  the #FCA and SEC  investigating #NigelFarage and others'How pollsters helped hedge funds beat the pound's Brexit crash'  via @business 
BREAKING NEWS:  The Men Who made Money From Brexit and will continue to get richer whilst ordinary Brits get poorer.'How pollsters helped hedge funds beat the pound's Brexit crash'  via @business 
All the usual suspects are here, Brexit fundraiser Crispin Odey who made £300 million on the night. And, of course, that other well known pollster, the-keeper-of-the-Russian-secrets @LordAshcroft. 
And BBC's 'Brexit: A Very British Coup' showed the profit that resulted overnight for a major Leave backer   
The capitalists are uniting against democracy - and left-wing Remainers are shamelessly cheering them on.Tim Black on big business' attempts to thwart Brexit 
Project Fear DISMANTLED as Boeing announces 'AMBITIOUS' £40m plan for Brexit Britain  
It’s happening here too. Sadly the press is owned by the far right and even the BBC is now so biased it should wear a moustache. Press here haven’t been doing their proper job here for years. Hence the hate, lies & fearmongering that led to Brexit. Utterly awful. 
Well, it’s hardly surprising that the Farage/Johnson Far right Brexit Conspiracy is tied up with the hedge funds who want it most,  but @TheFCA really should be investigating Farage, Survation & Funds for Insider dealing 
Just posting @fidelmacook wonderful @heraldscotland piece on #Brexit madness again for any who missed it. I’ve just re-read it to steel myself for another week in the midst of the denial that is Westminster #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope #FBPE 
In summary, @bloomberg describes the referendum as a financial heist. The biggest insider trading job in history when pollsters colluded with hedge funds to create a fake bubble that was burst by a fake concession ..delivered by friend of the people, @Nigel_Farage. 
England wins one bloody game and suddenly everyone’s like, ‘we can totally make Brexit work...’ Wind your neck in mate. 
MUST READ: how private polls and Nigel Farage’s “concession” early on EU referendum night allowed hedge funds to get rich on Brexit as the pound crashed. Fascinating investigation by @CamSimpsonNews @GavinFinchBBG @KitChellel  
This is a stunning piece of journalism. We know @Nigel_Farage moved the markets on the night of the referendum with & made his hedge fund pals billions. But @Bloomberg has the inside account of how. Warning: long & fury-inducing.  
Adonis on GMB this morning really cocked up when Saying ‘if there is a 2nd Referendum’ instead of the usualnonsense of a peoplesvote. Good to see Piers Morgan saying 100k Remainerswill not influence the Govt.The insufferable Adonis should be packed off to LoveIsland today. 
You wont see any party at WM fighting for Scotlands Buisnesses.First Minister leads business mission to German amid hard Brexit threat  
‘Corbyn's indifference to anti-Brexit march could cost the Labour leader’It’s not a ‘pro-EU, long-game’ he’s playing, it’s a ‘eurosceptic, avoid the subject, realise a 40 year dream game’. Being pro-Corbyn/pro-EU is like being pro-fox/pro-hunting. 
Yep. The UK govt is unravelling due process, rule of law & checks & balances on democracy under the guise of Brexit (fear & hate machine) whilst creating a hostile environment for immigrants, the disabled or anyone impoverished by their ‘austerity’ policies. Nightmare. 
How Hedge Funds paid the Brexit pollsters to give them the valuable early info they needed to short the pound. Possibly illegal. Definitely unsavoury.   
Here we have the scotgov looking to make trade agreements meanwhile we have the tories and labour destroying them with Brexit! Scotland so you will have a choice to sink with Brexit or flourish with Indy!  
That wasn’t on the side of the #Brexit bus  
I’ve been sharing for a while the shocking way that Farage made statements he knew to be false about the outcome of the referendum campaign to enable his City...  
We have over 60 CLPs submitting our motion - get in touch to add yours. Go to our website to sign our statement. Tory Brexit will harm working communities - Labour needs to act. Pro-Corbyn group to launch drive for public vote on Brexit deal  
Varadkar: "the people ... decided on Brexit and it’s not my job to help prime minister May or the [UK] government .. my job to make sure that we don’t have a hard border on our island and ... that the negative effect of [Brexit] is minimised.”  
As remainers, we’re told (1) don’t march, it’s pointless. (2) don’t criticise Corbyn, it makes a Tory Brexit more likely (3) don’t work with the likes of the Lib Dems, they enabled austerity, etc etc. So what *are* we allowed to do? Or should we just shut up and suck it up? 
Jeremy Hunt has called warnings from Airbus about the UK’s Brexit strategy “completely inappropriate”, saying the government should ignore “siren voices”.Naughty Airbus.Trying to save thousands of UK jobs.Just pipe down and know your place.Help! 
Murkier and murkier ... long but fascinating report on ⁦@Nigel_Farage⁩ and pals, money-hungry pollsters, and even hungrier hedge funds  shorting the pound to make fortunes out of referendum night   
Britain's 5 main business lobbies have lashed out at Theresa May over Brexit  
About to go on Good Morning Britain with Nigel Farage. Will ask him whether he too thinks business leaders should shut up & stop complaining that they are being undermined by Brexit 
Well over 600,000 people have signed the #FreeTommyRobinson petition. 17.4 million of them signed the petition to leave the #EU. I guess numbers only matter when the plebs vote the right way @ChukaUmunna? #Brexit  
Out of principle, though I'm a Remainer, I will not sign your petition for 2 reasons:1. This is a Parliamentary Democracy. MPs should have the final vote on Brexit deal2. You & others have hijacked the anti-Brexit campaign to further your anti-Corbyn ambitionsYou will not win  
Dublin is top destination for UK firms after Brexit 
The EU:  Instead of serving the people, they have falsely assumed mastery over them and the people will simply not stand for it  #Brexit 
Of course the Brexit bus is being driven largely by right wing politicians, financiers and media supporters, but it’s more than a little frustrating that rather than reach for the handbrake Corbyn is sat on the back row joining in the singing #brexitshambles 
Jeremy Corbyn's indifference to anti-Brexit march could cost the Labour leader - Sky News  
@carolecadwalla @peterjukes And this too.  It is never ending. 
Exclusive: the inside story of how hedge funds made millions on Brexit with a little help from their friends in the private polling industry. Our latest. With the inestimable ⁦@CamSimpsonNews⁩ & ⁦@KitChellel⁩   
.@ChukaUmunna is getting quite excited; over 100,000 have signed a petition for a referendum on the final deal- something he disagrees with (see below). Problem, Chuka: 17,410,742 voted to leave.  
Freelance demonstrators protesting against Brexit were paid  via @MailOnline 
#Brexit has totally changed me. I used to think that I was kind of British, like everyone else. The referendum segregated me and made me an outsider. Now I wear my immigrant badge with pride. I may be a British citizen now, but I will never feel British again. It's no loss to me. 
WOW! 100,000 people have signed the petition for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal...and we only launched it 48 hours ago SIGN and SHARE:  Pls RT 
Pro-Corbyn group to launch drive for public vote on Brexit deal  
I will make another batch come autumn. Charitable cause for money raised to be decided but will be Brexit related.  
How pollsters helped hedge funds beat the pound's Brexit crash  
Exclusive: Bloomberg spent seven months talking to more than 30 polling-company executives, consultants and traders to unpack #Brexit night and what was one of the most profitable single days in the history of their industry.  @CamSimpsonNews 
The march for a people's vote shows just how many of us are disillusioned with Brexit.Just one in ten of us think Brexit is going well. Most of us think it is going badly.The public need a final stay on the Brexit deal - a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
Following the constitutional referendum a year ago, #Erdogan will be the one executive ruler. The parliamentary system is worthless &has no power. Erdogan is dictator. Just call him King of his jihadist fascist regime. #TurkeyElection2018 #TurkeyElection2018Fraud 
What does that even mean? How does it differ from a red, white and blue Brexit? Or a green Brexit? Or a soft, hard or frankly flaccid Brexit?Prehaps if we moved on from the colour, shape or erectile qualities of Brexit to some actual details it might help.  
The Big Bang made London. Brexit could undo it  
Devastating, isn't i? Then Brexit & Le Pen in France, Hungary's far right calling to round up people, Italy saying "clear the streets of trash" (Romany)... These are terrifying times. 
Beautiful sunrise over Cork City - early start, heading for Luxembourg for a Foreign Affairs EU Council meeting. Lots on the agenda, not least #Brexit .  
How a soft Brexit differs from a hard one  
Nine EU nations to formalise a plan to create a European military intervention force, with Britain backing the measure as a way to maintain strong defence ties with the bloc after Brexit 
Recep Tayyip Erdogan, who claimed victory on Sunday in the Turkey's presidential election, could possibly stay in office until 2032 under the new system brought in by last year’s referendum  
Now wouldn’t it be awful if the poll on this was to have an outcome of No to a second referendum  
Whilst regions like the #SouthernCameroons need urgent attention, the international community retreats even further into itself, worried about Brexit, immigration and little else. #AnglophoneCrisis #Ambazonia (1/3) 
Buckle Up!The whole world sees it: Trump is doing lasting damage to the global order that made the US a superpowerIsraeli firm under FBI scrutiny re targeted BDS activists via Black ops.Brexit was a massive decision and people were targeted, lied to & ill-informed. pic.twitter.com/lff72plea2 
Brexit: more nonsense than sense - between trade associations and enterprises like Airbus, there is little sense and no coherence. Business is playing a good hand very badly, leaving it wide open for the "ultra" groupescules to move in...  #Brexinfo . 
1. Believe it when I see it...every #Brexit scenario leaves us Poorer, Weaker with Less Control & Fewer Rights. The only way to prevent that is to #StopBrexit & this may require MPs giving the Ppl a #FinalSay a #PeoplesVote with a #Remain option. 
Jeremy Corbyn's indifference to anti-Brexit march could cost the Labour leader  
Alternatively:This hard Right authoritarian Government (without a majority) exploiting the 2016 #EUref result has already wiped £440 million a week from Britain's economy.#StopBrexitSaveBritain #Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch #FinalSay 
On the contrary, Brexit's made fools of them, as it has many others, because they've let their emotions get in the way in the way of reason. "All my educated friends agree with me" is a long way short of "The balance of the evidence supports my position". 
If you're still pro Brexit and you're not personally wealthy please explain why you are prepared to wreck the economy for no benefit.You surely realise that ALL the claimed benefits have now been refuted and leading Brexiters stopped pretending there were any months ago? 
This is incorrect.  There were hundreds of banners attacking Tories.  There was a massive roar of booing towards May and Boris Johnson.  There were plenty  of chants about May, the folly of brexit, lies about the brexit dividend.  One video does not a march make. #stopbrexit 
Unfortunately, the holiday in post-Brexit London proved to be a bit of a disappointment  ...  
Half of EU business leaders cut UK investment over Brexit: survey  
My latest @dcpoll @annmarlowe @ZarinaZabrisky @carolecadwalla @peterjukes @submergingmkt @RMac18 @dfriedman33 @WriteSmitty @traciemac_Bmore @NatashaBertrand @grantstern @leahmcelrath @lrozen @Delavegalaw @brexit_sham @KevinGHall @VickerySec @kenklippenstein @JoshTBoswell 
This is a wonderful thread from a wonderful person, @cliodiaspora, a brave indefatigable fighter in this struggle to stop Brexit. We are so lucky to have her on our side!   
#PeoplesVotePetition demanding a vote onFINAL #Brexit DEAL PASSES 100,000 SIGNATURES in just 36 hour!WE, the people, have THE DEMOCRATIC RIGHT to determine our own futureLets get this past 150,000 TOMORROW!Please SIGN & please RE-TWEET #PEOPLESvote 
Unpopular opinion time!If labour are in power when Brexit reality hits, they’ll be lambasted by the media, and ‘socialism’ will be blamed for the economic hit.The best thing for labour long term is to suppprt Remain. They’ll either win & remain or lose & let the tories own it  
It's all about them isn't it. They are outraged Corbyn did not go to their march because in their minds a bunch of Blairites & liberals sneering at Brexit voters and Corbyn en masse hold far more away than suffering refugees.  
Dunno bout you but my running order for priorities is:-1) get these lying cheating evil #ToriesOut 2) #votelabour and get Jeremy Corbyn in.3) sort out the brexit shit as best we can.That's it, end of.RT if you agree#ToriesOut#votelabour pic.twitter.com/VXBfLubJnX 
More than anything, the thing I hate most about this Brexit debacle is the polarisation, but if I have to pick a side, I will not stand alongside this lot.  
All SNPBAD yet here is WM own Brexit analysis!! It's dire but oh lord be sure to check out the Dutch analysis!! Somehow an independent Scotland looks like a far safer bet  Look at all the businesses leaving England too   
Another one Vauxhall Bridge Road.U.K. Freedom March.Independence Day 23-06-18#UKFMAgainst #Terrorism, Against Extremism.#DFLA#UKIP#Brexit#ThreeGirls #RapeGangs#ThreeBoys#FreeTommy#FreeTommyRobinson#WeAreAllTommy#ProactivePatriots 
If you believe in the will of the people and are against the idea of a second referendum then you have to stand by the 1975 vote, discount 2016 and we must stay in the EU. 
From a year ago - "Brexit or Little England without the Scottish Oil doesn't have much to sell to the outside world anymore ...what will happen to the £" .... Expect Curtsey May to hold on to Scotland more desperately.  
I am puzzled. MI5, MI6 and GCHQ know what Putin is up to,and have necessarily briefed May and Johnson. Would you happen to know why these ministers have not yet shared the information with our MPs and the British people? Is it that we would then demand a stop to Putin's "brexit"? 
OK let’s play Nia’s game. The 2016 ref is void because of lies, fraud, & foreign interference. There was a proper referendum 40-odd years ago with a big majority for EU membership, so we’re staying in. After all, we only need one referendum to decide things for ever, right?  
Apparently folk on the #peoplesvotemarch are bewildered by his #Brexit stance. He doesn't care. You see all the antisemitism as a thing but not necessarily the thing that moves you the most, I get that. But you need to now understand it's the thing that moves him the most.  
Vauxhall Bridge Road 360°.U.K. Freedom March.Independence Day 23-06-18#UKFMAgainst #Terrorism, Against Extremism.#DFLA#UKIP#Brexit#ThreeGirls #RapeGangs#ThreeBoys#FreeTommy#FreeTommyRobinson#WeAreAllTommy#ProactivePatriots 
The problem is @OwenJones84, you assume the far right will be happy or content with any possible outcome Brexit.They won't. Every single form of Brexit conceivable that doesn't involve centralised control and the total dehumanisation of minorities will be cast as a betrayal.  
Actually Jeremy it is entirely appropriate and I wish more firms would have the courage to do say publicly what they know to be true. Then the penny might drop that Brexit would be a complete disaster #StopBrexit 
.@CarolineLucas: “While the old Etonians like Boris Johnson might look forward to the chaos, while Jacob Rees-Mogg is even now planning to move his investment company to Dublin, we know it is the poorest who will be hurt first & worst from #Brexit.” 
GUEST COLUMN: If Trudeau's so certain about carbon taxes, put it to a referendum  
#Brexit is not about Democracy or the "Will of the People". #Brexit is Asset-Stripping on a National scale. Those who have invested in #Brexit have done so to make money - a Profit. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
"This is the largest conspiracy ever. This is global. Brexit was just a warm-up to Trump/Russia." Just wrapped interview of firebrand @DrDenaGrayson. Can't wait for you to hear her skillful, no-holds-barred take. She is not holding back! This Tuesday!  
All of our stories like @mccanntb’s story he told us last night. A story about Brexit and the threat it poses to peace in Northern Ireland and what it will mean. A story straight from the heart that made me cry. #BrexitIsPersonal 38/ 
What a fantastic and uplifting day it was at #peoplesvotemarch yesterday! Such a positive be atmosphere and it’s clear this is #brexit nonsense is not a done deal!Please do ensure you signs and share the petition.After all, it’s ok to change your mind! 
The only sane reason anybody would be pushing for a 'no deal' #Brexit is if they are holding financial positions against the UK economy. So as all of those tens upon tens of thousand people lose their jobs, they'll profit. Remind me, who are the traitors again?#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Happy birthday Brexit, c’mon CANZUK.The common bond between the United Kingdom, Canada, New Zealand and Australia is unlike any other group of nations in the world and is today on the verge of a golden age.  #CANZUK 
Exclusive: Brexit trade deal with US at risk if Britain keeps EU protections for Champagne and Feta cheese, senior Republican warns 
Let us know when it gets to 17.4 million Chuka. Or even 13,636,684 or 12,878,460 million, which was the Conservative and Labour share of the vote respectively in the 2017 General Election, - both of whom promised to respect the referendum result. 
Mr @Chhcalling Heaton-Harris,I was asked by one of your constituents @SarahLeeNotCakethat to contact you. If you could possibly take a break from seeking 1930's-esque lists of academics who oppose the government's Brexit propaganda and watch this:Thanks 
Project Fear DISMANTLED as Boeing announces 'AMBITIOUS' £40m plan for Brexit Britain  
People’s vote on Brexit deal will be ‘life raft to escape Brexit sinking ship.’ My interview with Carolyn Quinn on ⁦@BBCWestminHour⁩ 
You run a large multinational business based in the UK. You know that post-Brexit supply chain issues could drive you out of business. Do you1) Point this out to the government2) STFU like Jeremy Hunt demands? 
Two years after the #Brexit vote, we asked four Britons living in Germany how did, and how will, the referendum affect their decision to apply for a German passport.  
Tried the Brexit unicorn  glasses. Didn’t work. 17/  
Brexit, all that’s happened since June 2016, has no benefits. But after #PeoplesVoteMarch let me say that I consider it my privilege to have been able to meet so many amazing people because of Brexit. They are what keeps me going. All of you are. Together we can #StopBrexit 1/ 
Keir Starmer on Labour's 6 tests to support any Brexit deal.Labour would 'Vote Against' a Brexit Deal that Failed to meet its 6 Tests. 
Anti-#Brexit campaigner is confronted with reality by BBC host: Of 30 polls in the last 18 months, 24 of them were against another referendum, only 3 were for. "It doesn’t seem as though you have convinced the public that they want to go for this again" 
You must have missed page 24 of the Labour GE17 Manifesto, the one with Labour's Brexit policy, the one that led to the biggest swing to Labour since 1945  
#skypapers Susie Boniface bore on. Get ready shouting & screaming Brexit bashing, & Donald Trump bashing. Why keep having her on skypapers. One of the worst ones on. Never says anything good about anything. Yawn, Yawn, Yawn ,Yawn, Yawn,Yawn, Yawn, Yawn. 
Reality: Brexit will mean the last thing we will need is an extra runway   
Post Brexit TV pitch: Straight Eye got the Queer Guy.Jeremy Clarkson, Piers Morgan, Richard Littlejohn, Nigel Farage and Jacob Rees-Mogg harass a gay man until he dresses in supermarket denim and shouts “Eng-er-land” at passersby. 
Don't you wish many British politicians had the same BREXIT enthusiasm as the admirable @USAmbUK - what an honour to have such a man as the US Ambassador to the UK. 
Jeremy Hunt says Airbus should get behind Theresa May and back #Brexit. Airbus' biggest shareholders are the French, German and Spanish governments.The last people Airbus owes any allegiance to are the Tories who are destroying their business. 
Remoaners. You were happy to allow parliament to sign the Maastricht treaty, but you're not happy about the same institution triggering Article 50. At least you got an in/out referendum. We didn't even get a vote on Maastricht. 
Brexit is realigning our politics, possibly permanently. #PeoplesVoteMarch showed that, persuasively. It’s Remain v Leave now. 
Trident : While Labour tries to appeal to Brexit middle England...they automatically alienate Scotland | @ScottishCND #Trident #Dreadnought @nuclearban @ScotNational 
The greatest boost to the radical right has been Labour's failure to properly oppose the government policies or take notice of the majority of labour supporters who are against Brexit. Simply a catastrophic failure of leadership and principle.  
4 million people in the UK used #foodbanks last year because of the hostile policies you enforce on Universal Credit claimants.People can't afford breakfast at home, yet you're gloating about how you can eat outYou're a disgrace#ShameOnYou #PeoplesVoteMarch#Brexit #ENGPAN 
Prepare for no-deal #Brexit say these economists-They include:John Redwood - advised investors to pull money out of UKNigel Lawson - applying for French residency  
Brexit has already cost us more than are normal EU budget payments.This is completely out of order and counterproductive. How can we trust a government that is imposing this on us when we know we shall all be worse off for it?#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Sign it, send it to your friends & family, keep the conversation alive, make the possibility real. Enough is enough is enough! #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
'More than 50' Tory MPs prepared to defy May to stop no-deal Brexit Those 50 are just the ones brave enough to say so now. If it came to a vote for a no deal scenario, many more with smaller cojones would also be opposed. Not brave enough yet though. 
It is indeed remarkable. It is proof of how successful the EU has been in spending (our) money to spread propaganda that we are completely dependent on the EU.Roll on #Brexit  
We're just under 6,000 signatures shy of 100,000 of people calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Can you sign & RT to help us achieve this incredible feat before midnight tonight?   
Not just Brexit but failures on apprenticeships, transport, access to finance, business rates and quarterly tax reporting. All making life more difficult for businesses large and small.  
In this strong piece, ⁦@williamnhutton⁩ passionately argues against any form of Brexit. His crafty pro-Brexit Labour editors, though, reduce it to a headline against ‚hard‘ Brexit only - a qualifier he did not mention once in his text. Insidious.  
Have you noticed how the sneering, smug, ivory tower brexit fantacists love to pretend they are some kind of working class hero, whilst simultaneusly selling ordinary people down the river.  
Strange days indeed. Scotland holds a democratic indyref and Scotland won. The losers continually moan and wave flags and march a lot. Same for brexit.What's the point of voting when people won't accept the result? What has happened to democracy? 
In Istanbul, where approximately one-fifth of Turkish voters live, Erdoğan receives 50.1% of the votes as People's Alliance's votes stand at 50.8%, reversing the losses in the 2017 referendum 
'More than 50' Tory MPs prepared to defy Theresa May to stop no-deal Brexit  @dontbrexitfixit @thesilverfox971 @MutliRaceMan @BrexitBin @HowarthJudd @ThatTimWalker @David_T_Evans @TheStephenRalph @City_Livery_SM @Steve_Remainer @MarieAnnUK @unicornalpha69 
I mean, we were all on the same conference call, Tim, and Vlad definitely didn’t mention the food and medicine shortages after Brexit. He lied to us.  
We aren’t going to have food after Brexit? Vladimir didn’t tell us that. 
More and more of us – whether we voted Leave or Remain two years ago – realise we’re heading for a botched Brexit.  Demand a people’s vote 
The ordinary people who will be impoverished by Brexit? Whose NHS will disappear? Whose jobs will be decimated?I AM “ordinary people”. I’m just ordinary people with a bit of a profile.Short version: fuck you.  
A strong feeling I got from attending the march on Saturday was that Corbyn could pick up more of the blame for Brexit than the government. People are expecting May to deliver a bad Brexit. They do not expect Corbyn to support it. 
Brexit means brexit tattoo'd on their chest 
only people using the same warped economics that brought you the Brexit dividend can argue that a 3rd runway at Heathrow is a good idea. any jobs & money generated are cancelled out by the cost of environmental damage & human suffering.  #NoThirdRunway 
Proud to have been a part of yesterday's BREXIT rally in Belfast,You won't see this on MSM> Please share far and wide.  
These attacks are pre-emptive, aimed at companies which might , at last, be about to say “enough is enough” about the complete chaos and lack of information from @GOVUK......Ministers step up criticism of 'irresponsible' Brexit warning from Airbus  
Is it time for the UK to attach conditions to the Brexit divorce bill?  
British business has stopped playing nice on Brexit. Just look at Airbus  
“Financial Globalisation Has Been a Disaster. Brexit Gives Us a Chance to Resist It”This is a must read article about a post-Brexit economy from @graceblakeley 
The lies they told during the 2014 referendum were not meant to be used against them so soon, they thought they had 40 years for us to forget. 
I often feel that the conflict between some elements of the Labour movement and those who are first and foremost anti-Brexit, stems primarily from a misapprehension that you can choose which crocodile to fight: you can’t, you have to fight the one which is closest to the boat. 
Just thinking about Juncker calling the ‘UK’Small.This from the ex Prime Minister of LuxembourgA truly tiny country.This from one of our EU ‘friends’.Well this small country alternates between beingThe 5/6 largest economy in the word.Juncker epitomises the EU.Brexit ASAP. 
Britons favour second Brexit vote by 23 point margin  
Brexit already costing UK £440million a week .. it will get worse!! #indyref2 Scotland !!... After subsidising Thatcherism we can't subsidise this latest nonsense. 
The Tory rebels are powerless while there’s no opposition for them to align with.Again: Brexit is a Tory misadventure but right now it’s Labour making it happen.  
Why has the Health Secretary taken it on himself to criticise Airbus for pointing out that Brexit threatens to drive even the biggest firms to the wall?Instead, Jeremy Hunt should be fully occupied stopping the over-prescription of opioids (ie mass killing) of elderly patients. 
If you don't like Remainers because you're "bored of Brexit" or think we need to "move on" then-wooeee-do I have bad news for you. 
Sadly, yes. After #BREXIT passed in the U.K. , I did everything I could to alert Americans to the danger of liberal over-confidence and complacency helping to elect @realDonaldTrump. It’s eerie and kinda crazy to listen to my warning now, two years later. #TriedToWarnFolks 
First @danieljhannan said racist incidents post-Brexit "didn't happen".  Now he accepts they did, but blames "Remainers."[No surprise after he blamed protestors against Confederate statues for the neo-Nazis in Charlottesville..]  
U.K. Freedom March.Independence Day 23-06-18Flags & Banners!#UKFMAgainst #Terrorism, Against Extremism.#UKIP#Brexit#ThreeGirls #RapeGangs#ThreeBoys#FreeTommy#FreeTommyRobinson#WeAreAllTommy#ProactivePatriots 
Science is a fundamentally collaborative & global enterprise & the UK should seek arrangements that create the lowest possible barriers to practising scientists seeking to move across borders #TogetherScienceCan #Brexit  
Once we've stopped Brexit we need to stop Britain being hijacked again.  
'End of Europe': Merkel's Union Partner Accused of 'German Brexit' Plot  
Tories want a hard-Brexit & the #FBPE lot want to stop it altogether- Corbyn's honest enough to honour the referendum result- with a soft-Brexit. He's personally anti-Trident, but he's democratic leader not a dictator. Why don't YOU be honest & say why you hate him.  
90,000!That's how many have already signed our petition calling for a #PeoplesVote, just 1 day after the biggest #Brexit March yet. Will you take 1 minute to sign and share the petition now and help us hit 100,000 before midnight? Pls RT  
So much for the #Brexitdividend!  The Treasury could lose £10bn a year just from City-related tax revenue if we #Brexit :  
So I can stay here. This is quite a relief. It took 10 days from when I submitted the correct form. #Brexit #residence 
Every data centre needs this... Brexitears claim this is a growth industry post-Brexit but offer no solution to the fact that almost the entirety of the U.K. supply is sourced from the EU.  
Here’s another ... a screamer from Paris to London : its gas for a fire suppression system I delivered ... the gas sucks out the oxygen and puts out the fire instantly .... no ADR licence = no delivery possible .... I hope the brexit MPs know about this I’m sure they do ..... pic.twitter.com/3PtDFsdwSG 
You seem to think a Tory hard Brexit is a price worth paying to stop a Corbyn Labour Govt. Fine. But at least be honest and stop pretending to be Labour  
The Poles are out. Hard brexit. 
8) This is again extraordinary - and raises the question for Corbynites - do you care about the working classes, the vulnerable and all the rest? Do you really?Because Brexit was your first real challenge, and so far it doesn't look good to be honest 
I see anyone with an #FBPE tag is under attack from Corbyn supporters again.I voted for labour in every election since Michael Foot.And now because I want to stop brexit, a policy that will hurt the working classes the hardest, I am somehow anti corbyn. 
#BREAKING My col. today:Fidelma Cook: Brexit means England will stand alone, Ireland will be united and Scotland will be a nation again. Our @ScotTories party has helped destroy the Union 
Deliver what though, Jackson?  The same as your party is delivering in England? Because from my mates down there, I hear that it's close to hell on earth unless you are very rich. Police, hospitals, probation, crematoria, Brexit. It's all falling apart. 
When the history books retell how the disaster of Brexit was prosecuted they will conclude 'that never before in the field of human peacetime was so much chaotic, delusional, cluelessness exercised by so few for so many'. 
There was a march against Brexit too. You should have been there. 
6) This takes me on to the 2nd question for Corbynites.This week Airbus, BMW & Siemens all went public with the same "Jobs at risk from #Brexit" message the Japanese car makers gave last year.It's the same week parliament let us down so badly on "meaningful vote" 
This man's explanation of why young people should stop Brexit is flooring people  
Project Fact not Project: How Brexit is already costing the Treasury 440 million pounds a week.  Business is right to be worried.  Taxpayers should be too.  
The first referendum was a consequence of a surge in the radical right (UKIP) not a driver of radical right growth. Radical right have collapsed since the EU ref, and not just due to UKIP disorganisation - big positive shift in imm attitudes (their core issue)  
Class V Race. The idiotic false opposition that brought us Brexit. And Lexit. 
Well worth Lab Party members listening to this interview An excellent resume of Labour’s history with the EU Why the Labour Party should reject a “soft” Brexit  
I've signed the People’s Vote Petition to demand a vote on the Brexit deal. We, the people, have the democratic right to determine our own future - SIGN THE PETITION:  #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Watch me question #SadiqKhan on Brexit, and call out the false assumptions in his answers.  
For heaven’s sake! How on earth are   &  “vassal states” when, unlike the  in , they can control their own fisheries, agriculture, justice & home affairs, sign their own FTAs & have full seat / direct vote at global standard-setting bodies?#EFTA #Brexit  
The thing I loved most about the Anti Brexit and The Scottish independence marches - there was a distinct lack of angry men in acrylic sportswear Screaming BRITAIN FOR EVER as they do NAZI salutes beside war memorials & celebrating The fascism their grandparents died fighting  
How is Jeremy Corbyn betraying young people who voted for him in the 2017 general election? Labour‘s position was clear that we would accept the referendum result. Guess what happened next - we got 40% of the vote. 
I've often asked Leavers to justify why citizens from elsewhere in the EU couldn't vote in the EU referendum when they did in Scotland's independence referendum. The only answer I've had? "Of course we couldn't let them vote. They'd have been Remain & we wouldn't have Brexit". 
 URGENT DO YOU WANT to #StopBrexit?This case is being heard in the EU general court on 5th July.It has the capacity to stop Brexit and ensure there’s another vote. At a minimum it will give clarity on whether A50 is revocable.1/2  
An American wrote this Twitter thread on Brexit and it's eye-opening  
I think this is THE lamest excuse ever. Millions of people would say "hold on, these guys broke the law, lied and tricked people into voting #brexit. Let us have another chance now we know more about what's at stake." I thought we lived in a democracy?  
Labour peer @Andrew_Adonis tells @BBCWestminHour that any future referendum on the Brexit deal should be a clear choice, between accepting its terms or instead choosing to remain in the EU. 
Another election in Britain wouldn't resolve the Brexit issue, @Andrew_Adonis says  
Following Dominic Grieve’s climbdown the Tory Remoaners are now rebels without a cause after the EU Withdrawal Bill was passed, this makes reversing the referendum result an impossibility, Brexit is now unstoppable but the loonies marching to remain don’t realise this. 
Know what, Labour. The fact that the polls consistently show a significant lead for remain over leave means that the majority of the electorate doesn't want you to "respect" the result of the referendum. Now respect *that*. 
This is page 24 of Labour's 2017 manifesto. If you're among the 40% of voters who chose Labour in the election, you voted for a party which said it "accepts the referendum result." The idea Labour has betrayed voters since - by sticking to its election promises - is a lie.  
I'm publishing 4 tests to judge success of our Brexit deal.1 Is it bad for business?2 Is it bad for individual rights and opportunities?3 Does it greatly diminish the UKs international standing and influence?4 Does it please the Daily Mail? 
I LOVE THIS.  A response to me asking why Michael did not want a peoples vote.Honesty at last.  It's because the 'will of the people' is against Brexit ! #peoplesvote 
#Turkey Elections: "Everybody outside of the ruling party will tell you there was fraud in the referendum!" says @FRANCE24's correspondent in #Ankara, @JasperMortimer in response to @hrnarmgn 
Fidelma Cook: Brexit means England will stand alone, Ireland will be united and Scotland will be a nation again  The more times I read his, the more I want to stand and applaud. Well articulated  
I attack the people in charge of Brexit all the time. Fuck off with this. 
How? Whether you like it or not, Labour committed to accepting the referendum result in the 2017 election. It's actually softened its Brexit stance *since* the election by committing to a customs union. It has repeatedly voted against the Tory approach to Brexit. What betrayal?  
I don't think Remain would win a second referendum because Leave voters are more motivated and also have more time because they don't have to go to work. 
I’ve signed the #PeoplesVote petition because I believe the UK people must have the final say about whether the #Brexit on offer is the one they voted for. 
The most interesting Brexit tweet of the weekend, from Owen. ‘Circuitous, adjective, (of a route or journey) longer than the most direct way, eg “the popular youth hero followed a circuitous route"; synonyms: roundabout, indirect, winding, meandering, serpentine, tortuous’  
'This means end of Europe': #Merkel's union partner accused of 'German Brexit' plot  
Businesses dislike uncertainty, but the idea Airbus couldn’t do business here after Brexit is ludicrous. They already use engines made in the US and recently bought a major stake in a Canadian jet programme, says @TheSun 
Nigel Farage takes a swipe at Airbus' threat to leave the UK after Brexit. 
Two Questions for all ScotsQ1: What is referred to by UK Gov Minister as "Biggest Christmas Present In History?Q2: Ask yourself why you don't know.Scotland been plundered for decades,#Brexit next looting episode#DisolveTheUnion 
At yesterday's #PoliticsFest18, @Keir_Starmer said a Brexit no deal would be 'catastrophic'. Read more:  
You may have noticed that surrendering all decision-making to the govt has also proved exceptionally poisonous and divisive. A second referendum would quite clearly not be a rerun of the first: the first was vague and ill-defined; the whole point of a second is to be specific. 
Err the reason other media have not followed your ‘crusade’ @carolecadwalla is because most of what you’ve written is anti-Brexit, anti-Trump hysteria based on your own anti-Brexit anti Trump opinion not robust investigative ‘journalism’ @Arron_banks 
Did a few touristy things while in London today & walked by The Foreign Office. Looks like they're having problems getting the Bollox to Brexit stickers off  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Brexit is a sign of our 'failure', EU official Guy Verhofstadt admits - Sky NewsSiren with forked tongue.   
If Brexit Central wants to describe @ottocrat as a "rabid pro-EU Twitter troll" then let's remind everyone of their Editor-at-Large Matthew Elliott's past connections with suspected Russian spy Sergey Nalobin.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE pic.twitter.com/Ua9uC2IBCI 
Millions of people would say hold on, 'we already voted on this, you're asking us to keep voting until we give you the answer you want'. You may have noticed the first referendum was exceptionally poisonous and divisive, what do you think a second one will be like. 
Results of Brexitometer run by Hampstead Town and Belsize Labour Party at South End Green Festival on 24th June. Not much enthusiasm for Brexit around here.  
Precisely Karen. Leavers didn’t vilify people for voting to remain yet some of these extreme remainiacs seem to feel that they can do it to us. Well, they’re in for a battle because this #Brexit voter isn’t taking their nonsense. 
I have signed the People’s Vote Petition to demand a vote on the Brexit deal.We, the people, have the democratic right to determine our own future:  #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Cancelling #Brexit is not about left or right - its about cheating the people of their democratic result in an EURef - Cheat the people of #Brexit and they will destroy the UK political parties - extremism will prevail as we witness across mainland EU - the latest being #Italy 
A reminder of one of the real reasons for the right-wing foisting #Brexit on Britain:Tory, UKIP and DUP MEPs united to vote against EU anti-tax avoidance measures. The coalition of tax-dodgers!#BrexitTaxHaven #StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
So to recap the weekend. Boris Johnson used an article in The Sun to challenge the PM on Brexit. And Gavin Williamson told the Mail on Sunday he would unseat her if the MoD doesn’t get £20bn. And both will still have a job this time next week. 
Every tweet I do on the EU gets ratioed! But I'm afraid I always find many of the responses extremely depressing: a total lack of interest in winning hearts and minds, because Brexit will be so catastrophic everyone will automatically change their minds anyway. 
Very much agree with this thread. Having voted remain (despite serious misgivings about the campaign and its organisers), I'm very sympathetic to those still pained by the result.But many of the No Brexit crowd seem intent on alienating the people they need to reach out to.  
Brian Adcock on Theresa May’s Brexit Britain - political cartoon gallery in Putney  pic.twitter.com/2BUBeDVjCM 
Thrilled to have started Riddley Walker by Russell Hoban and discover it is set in my corner of Kent. This map shows the rebadging that will take place after Brexit. #amreading 
My issue with the "cancelling Brexit would trigger a hard right backlash" is my lingering suspicion that not cancelling Brexit will do much the same, only we'll have less stuff when it happens. 
No. The leader of the opposition being a lifelong brexiteer makes a hard brexit more likely.   
One of my favourite r-wing Twitterers provides some solid thoughts on Trump supporters which have strong echoes with arch Brexiters in the UK.Sadly, Trump can be voted out in under 3 yrs, whereas Brexit may as well be forever unless we act now.#PeoplesVote@LBC #r4today 
I think many politicians believe the country is not bitterly divided by #Brexit because they mistake the reasonableness & good nature of Remainers as indications of a lack of anger. They are utterly wrong, but maybe we are giving them the wrong signals. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
What do these Labour MPs have in common? 1. They all support #PeoplesVote 2. They all had the chance to vote for a referendum on the final Brexit deal last December - a 'People's Vote' if you will3. None of them didFunny, that.....  
Big interview with Caroline Quinn on the @BBCWestminHour at 1010pm on Brexit & how a people’s vote on Mrs May’s Brexit deal, with the other option being to stay in EU, looks set to be ‘lifeboat’ to stop the ship of state sinking 
Well said, Martin:"In 1975 67% voted to to go into the EEC. THE 30 % have moaned and campaigned ever since. Don't expect me to shut up with 48% behind me."#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
woman speaks out against Brexit. woman gets vile response back. woman goes to London to meet others against Brexit. woman is stalked around parliament square. woman peacefully protests. woman is followed by a Brexiteer who aims to make her feel threatened and terrified.  
Boris says F*** Business.  Hunt says it’s inappropriate for business to express anxiety about Brexit negotiations.  Liam Fox says we really might walk away without a deal.  Send In The Clowns. There Has To Be Clowns.  Don’t Worry They’re Here. 
Daniel Hannan MEP - "It’s wonderful to have people engaged in politics, it’s no small feat to get 100,000 people out on the streets but 17.4 million is a lot bigger than 100,000."More people voted Leave than have ever voted in British history." #Brexit  
Basically - as somebody who voted and campaigned for Remain, and would vote Remain in a hypothetical second referendum - the official Remain campaign was an embarrassing catastrophe, and official continuity Remain is even worse. The strategy and messaging is just dire. 
Blair's strategy is obvious. 1) Mislead the British people to think the EU will reform free movement (Cameron tried that) 2) Hope for a second referendum that reverses #Brexit 3) Then re-open the floodgates. He still thinks #Brexiteers were born yesterday. 
You've spent most of your career supporting socialist policies despite electoral setbacks- why let the 2016 referendum stop you from campaigning for what you believe to be best for the country? 
Instead, combat the far right by giving them what they want. They’ll no doubt be wholly satisfied by that, and just give up. Continuing with Brexit is telling them that a) they’re right; b) their tactics work; c) their views are now normal; d) we’ll give in to them again  
This clip of Phil Neville being forced into trying maté then hating it is basically Brexit in nutshell   
more than 50 Tory MPs - including sitting cabinet ministers - would vote to prevent a no-deal Brexit if necessary, senior Europhile Tories have warned  
Only 1 in 5 people think the government is doing a good job in the Brexit negotiations. When a deal is reached, or if no deal is reached, the people must decide if its what they want.#PeoplesVote 
Nigel Farage - "This is business scaremongering. #Airbus is an intensely political company, it was set up that way."Where their argument falls to pieces is: aerospace internationally, under WTO, is a no-tariff regime." #Brexit  
Why the government can’t make up its mind on what kind of #Brexit it wants :  
If you want to succeed in reversing Brexit you have to charm and win over:1) A significant chunk of Leave voters2) Those Remain voters resigned to the result3) Corbyn supportersAnd explain how a second referendum won't entrench/expand poisonous divisions. 
The results are just like last year referendum. Really, even after "50" percent of the votes have been announced, it is impossible to believe any of the information on the main Turkish TV stations. Worthless commentary. Such poor reporting. #TurkeyElections2018 
Remember how, during the referendum, half the political parties were pushing for Remain and half for Leave? No? Me neither. 
As Jeremy Hunt says it's "completely innapropriate", @clivebull asks should businesses be speaking out about their Brexit worries? 
Hard Brexit is on it's way courtesy of the bumbling incompetent @Conservatives supported all the way by @UKLabour.It doesn't have to be this way for Scots, we are sovereign, no court, parliament or monarch has more power.#DissolveTheUnion #ScotRef 
Labour, Corbyn in particular, pushed for Remain vote. When Leave won, Labour accepted the EU ref result. Labour cannot stop Brexit. Tories & DUP have majority and no GE before Brexit. All that can happen by slagging off Corbyn is make it more likely another Tory govt post-Brexit.  
I'm pleased to sign letter to the PM; 60 economists, business people and politicians tell Prime Minister be ready to walk away from a bad Brexit deal NO DEAL, NO CASH: Army of 60 Brexiteers tell May to get tough on EU  
Sunday shows round-up: Jeremy Hunt – Airbus’s Brexit threat was ‘completely inappropriate’  
“If I were Scottish, I would be screaming for independence. They are going to be destroyed by Brexit and it goes against everything they were told when they had their referendum on remaining in UK.”Lee Nallalingham, English ex-pat, Singapore  
The young did not vote for Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Tens of thousands of Britons opposed to the country’s withdrawal from the European Union marched through the streets of London to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal  
I know a lot of people on the left like me who voted Remain in 2016 but would abstain or vote Leave in a second referendum. If you're anti-Brexit, you need to win the argument and stop alienating people #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Asking again - when are politicians and the media going to acknowledge this and DO something about it. If you cheat in the Olympics they take your medal away. They cheated in the referendum, they mustn’t get away with it  
Labour MP @RLong_Bailey claims another referendum will divide the country again. Let us be clear, if #Brexit is forced through without a #PeoplesVote millions of people will regard it as tantamount to a crime and the perpetrators as criminals. #StopBrexit 
Thought they'd all be ready to sign in April 2019 immediately after departure. Brexit reality is a little more prosaic I suspect.  
Thankyou to everyone who came to Perth's march today and to speakers @CllrPeterBarret, @markruskell, @C_Stihler_MEP, James Provan + @PeteWishart. Great cross party opposition to #Brexit and thankyou to @euromovescot and @YEMEdinburgh for their help. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
ACROSS PARTY LINES:The protest saw Labour voters marching next to Conservative supporters as they voiced their anger at the chaos that followed the 2016 Brexit vote#Stopbrexit #PeoplesVoteBremain #FBPE 
In 100 years people will talk about Brexit like we talk about people disregarding advice to invade Russia with winter coming... 
Aznar interview in El Mundo:1) Implies that Rajoy was too soft on Catalonia.2) Calls to illegalize Catalan pro-indy parties3) Recognizes that under Spanish criminal law, doing a referendum is no motive to go to prison (blames Zapatero for it).  
A much better way forward than those blathering on about “full British Brexit” without any insight or transparency about the real world consequences for individuals, businesses & communities  
**AFTER VOTING - RT POLL**Do you think there is now public appetite for a #PeoplesVote/#FinalSayForAll on the #Brexit Deal? 
In December last year, MPs voted on whether to hold a referendum on the outcome of the Brexit negotiations. #PeoplesVote figureheads Chuka Umunna and Anna Soubry voted No. Funny that... #justsaying  
i voted for #Brexit, I am stupid. I know this because those who voted #REMAIN keep telling me so; how did I get it so wrong? Please forgive me. 
I get pulled up on the fact I criticise Corbyn a lot. Fair. So let me say this: I'm not Tory. Never voted Tory. Never will vote Tory. After Cameron, Theresa May is the worst PM we have ever had. She is truly awful. Her handling of Brexit will be maligned for decades. So there. 
Britain has a responsibility to refugees—and Brexit won’t change that. My latest thoughts on @guardian: 
Germany: ''End of Europe': Merkel's Union Partner Accused of 'German Brexit' Plot' 
The world's largest aerospace firm, @Boeing, is investing in Britain post-Brexit, and is ambitious about its future here. #BackBritain 
Beautiful day for a street stall on Buchanan St with @YSIGlasgow. People are clearly very angry about Westminster's #PowerGrab. @theSNP's positive vision for #Scotland's future is becoming an increasingly attractive alternative to the doom and gloom of a Tory Brexit. pic.twitter.com/K6SHlPXaKl 
I can understand people voting Leave to give the NHS much needed extra cash. I do. But as it turns out, we could have done just that by increasing taxes, kind of like a No Brexit dividend. Otherwise, did anyone really think "fuck business" as you voted to Leave? #PeoplesVote 
Anadolu Agency has started sharing the first results by granting 60% to Erdoğan.A manipulation / demoralization tactic they used before.2017 referendum: started at 80% for YES, eventually down to 51%.Nov '15: start 75% AKP, down to 49%.June '15: start 65% AKP, down to 41%.  
May have accidentally (on purpose) sent this picture of my partner & daughter to his family WhatsApp group with a link to the #PeoplesVote petition Older members all voted Leave.We've not talked about Brexit since the EURef.Maybe it's time we did again?  
If you’re anything like me — overwhelmed by a seemingly neverending barrage of outrage over immigration laws, Brexit, or Red Hen — remember that life happens away from our screens and devices. Take a digital break. Maintain perspective. Appreciate the good things in your life. 
I really am getting fed up of being trolled by #Labour #Leavers telling me I must be supporting the Tories because I am anti-#Brexit is beyond absurd All I want is to #StopBrexitSaveBritain and hence cannot support ANY Brexit party 
Brexit talks have effectively killed off U.K. growth says Professor of Economics Danny Blanchflower.  
Listen to the Labour frontbenchers here explaining how we can't have a #PeoplesVote because Brexit's the will of the people. And then ask yourself how long you're willing to let this backward-looking clique of economic illiterates keep Labour out of power?  
Couldn’t get along to the anti-Brexit march yesterday (for the same reason I wasn’t at Labour Live - I have my summer weekend shows booked by Xmas) but very impressed with the turnout. Hope it’s the start of something positive and unifying. 
Here's the best response to the EU bully boys Airbus & BMW threatening UK job losses:German car makers top two export markets by quantity sold in 2017:1. UK 769,0002. USA 494,000Thanks to the EU, a no deal Brexit and Trump's tariffs are going to be painful, very painful. 
exactly two years since my favourite brexit tweet  
EFTA/EEA is the ONLY model which respects the result of the referendum, the closeness of the result AND not result in a dystopian disaster capitalist future. It would satisfy all but the extremists on both sides. The anti-immigrant lobby will NEVER be happy.  
*Brexit Explained*  
Yes, Owen, but even you must ask yourself why Jez skipped off to a refugee camp rather than get off the Brexit fence for a long planned rally. Cynical or what ? Using refugees as a cover for domestic scam? Tell us it ain’t so 
Benedict Cumberbatch in first look image as vote leave maestro Dominic Cummings in ⁦@Channel4⁩ Brexit drama   
Forget about long delays in Dover, NOTHING is going to be moving at all if we crash out without a deal. The country and the economy will simply grind to a halt. Brexit is utter madness and we the people know who to blame. We need a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit 
Italian Deputy Prime Minister says Macron ‘arrogant’And the biggest enemy of ItalyGood news for #brexit methinks 
Yesterday’s #PeoplesVoteMarch was a vibrant celebration of openness, community and democracy. But the work is just beginning. And if we do secure a vote - what then?Here’s my latest for @prospect_uk on how to fight a referendum from the left - and win  
Theresa May must pick a side as Brexit fears for industry increase | Richard Partington Industry is seriously concerned & the Government are making light of those concerns. How many companies have to leave before they take note? 
Voted RemainTrust Corbyn and Labour on Brexit.Tories called for referendum and Tories are butchering the negotiation, not Corbyn#PeoplesVoteMarch 
If you hate Brexit, don't be alone on twitter. Add #FBPE to your name/bio, #FollowBackProEU allows us to find each other and connect. Don't forget to follow back your new followers.This our #decentralised political movementWe are stronger together Please Retweet 
Brexit:Once you’ve lost the argumentAnd they’ve told industry not to speak outWhen they’ve ignored JapanAnd Parliament has been neuteredWhen 100,000 marchAnd the media has been bluntedThen you can deliver a dogs dinner and there’s nothing we can do about it. #FBPE 
Great turn out at the Perth4Europe March Against Brexit today. We will not give up.  
So, as the Tories from Johnson to Hunt to Fox become increasingly anti-business in their #Brexit stance, we seem to be ever closer to a "lousy-deal-Brexit". Chaos mixed with incompetence. #business #chaos #incompetence 
Very VERY obtuse thickos who apparently watched no TV? webpages or read the press before the referendum. Now they want to overturn a democratic referendum because they "didn't know" what the vote entailed! Laughable  
Remember when Leavers said we could help fund the NHS through the "Brexit dividend"?  
If there were ~500,000 on yesterday's anti-Brexit march, as is being reported, that's about 1000 per constituency. Many times that could not make it to London. Message to MPs...BE AFRAID.BE VERY AFRAID. 
#Remoaners after the #EU referendum: "People didn't know what they were voting for... We shouldn't have had a vote.... MPs should've just decided!"Remoaners now: "We need a people's vote on the final deal". #PeoplesVoteMarch 
“The #PeoplesVoteMarch was disingenuous. They say they want another vote but actually they just want to stop Brexit. They don’t believe in democracy, that is really what this is about.”Watch spiked columnist @andrewdoyle_com on Sky News 
Peak Hunt.      Jeremy Hunt rejects quote that rubbishes prospect of a Brexit Dividend going to the NHS only to be reminded by Marr that the quote is in fact the words of Jeremy Hunt himself.  
In summaryThey lost the peoples vote in a referendumThey lost the argument in a general election.They lost in the courtsThey lost in the CommonsThey lost in the LordsThey lose on Twitter every dayBut they are going to stop #BrExit with a referendum that people don't want  
Say after me...BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT! 
Awkward.Tory Jeremy Hunt just got owned on live TV by arguing over Brexit... with himself 
Never thought we'd see the day when the @Conservatives would be at war with big business. The party has talked itself into a #Brexit policy that it can neither sustain nor escape from.  
British trucks would be blocked from entering Europe under no-deal Brexit, industry leader warns  via @BIEspanaI can already hear the cries of "scaremongering" from the delusionists. @Bremaininspain 
Found this on my hard drive from early 2016. We've already started to forget how much of the Brexit campaign was driven by an imaginary refugee threat, mainly because its perpetrators have tippexed it out of the agenda in the two years since.  
Those still promoting #hardBrexit or #NoDeal now often blame 'the people' saying ppl voted for it. That's nonsense. The Referendum gave no instructions about a date or a direction for leaving the EU. Parliament must take control of this unfolding catastrophe 
“Cumberbatch was vocal before the referendum in his opposition to Brexit. The Hollywood star was one of almost 300 actors, musicians, writers and artists who backed calls, in an open letter, for the UK to stay in the EU.”   
The Remainers coordinated Brexit threats backfire as Airbus blames France and Germany for trying to bully the UK. Airbus discussing subsidies for a new plant with the UK Government not making Brexit threats.  
Glad I don’t need a journalist to tell me Brexit means Scotland is leaving the UK and we’re heading for a United Ireland. For the people of these islands there is no other positive outcome from the #BrexitShambles #WhatUWanted 
Don’t let 6-0 win deflect you from the fact that Brexit negotiations are impacting the economy #TweetLikeSomeoneWhoHatesFootball 
Full text of the letter I and others @Econs4FreeTrade have written to @theresa_may “To have any real leverage in the Brexit endgame, the UK must reserve the right to walk away without a trade deal and take with it the £39 billion it has offered to pay.”  
Doesn't matter where Jeremy Corbyn was yesterday. Years of fudging resulting in institutionalised antisemitism, shameful deferment on Syria and Putin. Brexit. The last three years have been spent thinking..."Where's Jeremy Corbyn?" 
German investment body calls for ‘unhindered access’ to the City post-Brexit.This will come as a massive shock to Remainers. They'll find this deeply depressing. 
7/10 Labour supporters disagree with Brexit. Kate Hoey and JRM represent large Remain constituencies. Funny how leave constituencies must respect them but Remain ones must not. 
Remain and Brexit politicians ignore the other half of the electorate who didn’t support them. This is no way to decide our collective future. If parties can’t come together to sort this, then a binding referendum on the final deal needs to settle it. 
Anti-Brexit campaigner confronted with 30 polls with majority REJECTING second referendum  
Peter Bell has a new Twitter profile & it's bad news for the Scot Nats. After 2 years of tweeting that there would definitely be a referendum in 2018, he seems to finally accepted reality!Great work Pete.  
Former President of the CBI adds his voice to growing number of business leaders speaking out about the consequences for jobs and public services of the Government’s current approach to Brexit.  
German asset managers call for 'unhindered access' to City post-Brexit  
Can we reach 100,000 by the end of the weekend?#Brexit#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote#PeoplesVoteMarch#FinalSayForAll#ProjectFact#StopBrexitSaveBritain#StopBrexitSaturday 
.@BirkbeckNews has struck an agreement with @OpenUniversity to allow its students to finish their degrees online if they need to relocate to the @EuropeanUnion after #Brexit 
Throughout the referendum Leave campaigners argued that it is in everyone’s interests, particularly Germany, to negotiate a UK-EU free trade deal. Now the German Investment Funds Association (BVI) has demanded “unhindered access” to UK investment services.  
ENGLAND FANS WATCHING WORLD CUP: It’s coming home!IRELAND FANS WATCHING BREXIT: It’s coming home!  
My Nana asked me how to Instagram and girl I think the fuck NOT. We let your generation on Facebook for 5 mins and got a Brexit and Trump. Nah, you lot better stick to Hotmail before we all die in this bitch. 
Germany exported 769,000 cars to the UK, its largest export market last year. The US came second with 494,000 cars. If the UK were forced into a cliff-edge Brexit, Germany would face tariffs in its two largest markets within a few months of each other.  
If you loved the 2016 Brexit blockbuster by the acclaimed author Nigel Farage:"The worst case possible scenario is better than where we are."You’ll be thrilled by his 2018 sequel:"Brexit done badly will leave us in a worse position."  
Euratom for context. When we lose access to it we will lose access to a lot of imaging used for diseases and cancers. Meaning more will die if Brexit goes ahead.  
Mr Hunt, you may think it’s “inappropriate” for the truth to be told but those who care about the future of our nation think it’s vital for the Brexit fantasy to be challenged.  
Let’s get this to 100,000+.Sign and demand a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. The public must have the option to #StopBrexit. Please RT, sign, share and tag some friends so everyone sees it: 
Tory Brexit bill is a “land grab of epic proportions” from Scotland.  
Jeremy Hunt is quite right. How dare Airbus tell the truth about their post Brexit plans? They should lie and pretend it’s all going to be fine,  like true patriots! 
Afraid the Leave side won with fantasy and fiction. The real world of #Brexit is turning out nothing like promised. Jobs at risk, businesses leaving, even Gov own figs show we will be worse off. I hope I'm wrong but can't see where #Brexit will benefit our wonderful couintry  
Five million Labour voters voted Leave. You are demanding Jeremy Corbyn & Labour commit political suicide by walking away from all of those voters in all those constituencies, thus handing eternal rule to the Tories. Who is the Tory Hard Brexit enabler again? 
KRG doesn’t have a policy but here is what the parties are saying:KDP: A faction of the PUK is to blame for the heat. PUK: We have not sided with the IRGC to bring this heat. New Gen: The heat is a result of the referendum. Gorran: We will decide who is to blame after our meeting  
Some of Corbyn's supporters seem so locked in the mindset of tribal party politics that they are incapable of understanding that #FBPE is cross-party and non-party. So they invent bizarre conspiracy theories to explain something that is really very simple. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
The total fuck-up that is #Brexit, in one paragraph. From the latest humdinger by the best blogger on the subject (imho), @chrisgreybrexit > Two years into the Brexit disaster  pic.twitter.com/csoQZzE59G 
BREXIT: “Odds of a trade deal with Panama vanishing by the second” admits government. 
Dear friends, you will note there are many trying to frame the March as an anti-Corbyn march. Whilst people have their view on Corbyn, the #PeoplesVote march was pro European pro EU against #brexit. That's why people marched. 
They’re trying to screw us!’ France and Germany blamed for Airbus Brexit threat  
 no Jeremy - what’s inappropriate is for you to try to silence businesses in & around my constituency employing 6000+ skilled workers because what they are saying shows up chaos of Brexit 
Already big damage from prospect of #Brexit - and worse to come ⁦@ChrisGiles_⁩ 
Theresa May must pick a side as Brexit fears for industry increase  
If this is how England play after small small Brexit imagine the fucking team if UKIP get voted in 
1. When ppl state that #Brexit is the Will of the Ppl they are WRONG..it was the non-Binding opinion of only 26.5% of the Ppl (Cameron's promise ruled invalid by the Miller Case) 37% of voters & only 51.8% of those voting. These are the FACTS..something #Brexit backers ignore. 
Thank you for all your support.#FreeTommy Robinson - #Brexit March - 23 June 2018  via @YouTube 
All I’m saying is we never played this way when we were in the EU. Brexit Britain mate   
Jeremy Hunt effectively tells businesses not to share their Brexit concerns with the government or the public. They should shut-up, go away and get behind the Theresa May.If you run a business please share your Brexit concerns on Twitter. 
Could someone please remind @Jeremy_Hunt that we are not a nation at war and there is no government censorship, as much as I'm sure he, and the rest of May's cabinet of fools, wish to gag British businesses from disclosing the implications for jobs and investment of #Brexit. 
BREXIT MEANS BREXIT  
The people in my TL who say Jeremy Corbyn needs to be replaced because of his Brexit stance are the people who've spent nearly three years saying Jeremy needs to be replaced. Because of this their current position lacks credibility. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Thanks for polite engagement. It was a rather misleading campaogn by Treasury, ordered by Osborne. But  I think you will find Brexit, if delivered, is every bit as bad, or worse, albeit over a longer time frame. 
"Ignore the people, ignore the voters and ignore the members." @UKLabour's approach to Brexit is to stick it's head in the sand and hope the problem just goes away. The majority of it supporters oppose a hard Tory Brexit and want a #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
I'm Scottish, but I love watching the England game, well done England! Wee lump in my throat hearing the fans singing God Save the Queen. #Brexit #BringBackAnging 
Death is inevitable Brexit is notThe #PeoplesVoteMarch yesterday brought half a million ordinary decent people together who all believe in democracy and that we the people should have the final say. Mrs May @theresa_may doesn't think so, nor does Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn mind. 
England cannot win the World Cup. Brexit has already made them insufferable. Imagine that they are still talking about 1966 ... we will never hear the end of 2018. 
it must burn you that the referendum would never of happened if Merkel had given Cameron something to give to the British people, cap in hand he went and they laughed at him, who's laughing now 
Have heard rumours it could be as many as 500k at #peoplesvotemarch what's clear, people aren't happy with how #Brexit is going and want a #FinalSay@theresa_may if want to deliver the will of the people, don't you need to check what that will now is? 
Tories: "Get ready for No Deal Brexit"Airbus: "We're getting ready for No Deal Brexit."Tories: "Stop undermining our negotiations!" 
Have to applaud anyone who is big enough to admit their mistake, know a couple myself, both said a key thing, 'it looked easy' always a basic identifier of populism. 
Summary:1. We must stop a Hard Brexit.2. No-one wants it, apart from the voters.3. Who should never have been allowed to vote on this very complicated subject.4. Which is why, obviously, they must be made to vote again on this very complicated subject.5. That's all, folks!  
BREXIT CHAOS: Brexit Has Already Cost The UK More Than Its EU Budget Payments, A Study Shows /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
This week’s Daily Mail Cancer List:Mo) Pitta breadTu) BungalowsWe) The female orgasmTh) WiFi in classroomsFr) PanpipesSa) Not backing BrexitSu) The entire back catalogue of Sonic Youth (with the possible exception of 1988’s Daydream Nation). 
Some amazing birthdays of late. Two years ago - Brexit. Today - 5 nil at half time!  
Father in law voted Brexit. Father in law now admitting it's all a disaster. 
England last won the World Cup before Britain joined the EEC. Makes you think. In prospect another Brexit dividend... (ducks) 
Get Kane to negotiate Brexit 
Brexit has already cost the U.K. more than its EU budget payments, a study shows  via @bpolitics 
OMG WE ARE WINNING THE WORLD CUP THE EUROS THE OLYMPICS THE ROYAL ASCOT BREXIT WE ARE WINNING FUCKING EVERYTHING YOU CUNTS HAVE A FUCKING PARTY 
 let’s av it then! #Brexit 
Arron Banks ‘discussed digging dirt on journalists’ ///Irrespective of how you feel about Brexit, this can't be the correct thing to do. 
Over 100,000 people marched in London against #Brexit.  Everyone, including pro-Brexiteers, have a right to vote on the final terms of leaving. Let the people - not the PM or MPs - decide! Latest poll says 53% want to remain in the EU:   #PeoplesVoteMarch 
So much for march against Brexit. Barely 100,000 not 1million expected. sunshine often dampens the ardour of revolutionaries 
3) ...at least the march raises the profile of the anti #Brexit movement and shows people it's not settled.So how did the Labour movement, which is supposed to be about exactly this kind of action, find it's Leadership officially against this and standing with the government? 
Rubbish. It cost me around £250 to attend. Someone I met had come form Northern Ireland and it cost them over £600. No one paid our expenses. We were there because we're patriotic and we're not going to let Brexit ruin the country if we can help it. No one was paid to protest. 
Harry Kane hit that penalty with the full force of Brexit behind it #WorldCup 
Kane my boy hit that with the power of Brexit  
.@The_IoD  response to Jeremy Hunt comments describing businesses' concerns re Brexit as 'completely inappropriate'  
One of the most depressing aspects of Russia’s successful hybrid warfare campaign on Brexit is that, between its direct and partner efforts, across social media, forums, lobbies, activists, media and op-eds, is how it has distorted Parliament’s view of public opinion, flawlessly. 
We get it! You think I'm stupid. Happy to go for coffee sometime and explain why I believe in free markets/brexit. You might be pleasantly surprised, or you may still think I'm an idiot. But for now, why not take a chill pill and enjoy the football?   x  
Enough already: in the national interest, we must stop a hard Brexit | Will Hutton  
Blimey. He doesn’t just do Brexit!  
Businesses are part and parcel of Britain - we need them to spell out in detail the likely impact of Brexit and the Government’s handling of it on the country, not to be silenced. Their role is not to get behind the PM and Ministers’ very damaging and cackhanded Brexit policies. 
"unsurprising that multi-national companies have qualms about Brexit" "businesses want clarity" And from that you conclude that they should keep their mouths shut?!NO; to protect their shareholders and employees they must shout louder than ever!#shamefulpoliticalblackmail 
Tories in total denial on shambolic brexit- & now want business to shut up & not warn on key issue of frictionless borders. In fact, it's not really denial just utter dishonesty & disregard to the deep economic damage/havoc they are wreaking 
This fight isn't only important just because Remainers ARE angry. We've been angry for literally years at this point. It's in our blood now.This fight is important because of how angry Brexit voters will be if Brexit actually happens: 
I believe 17,410,742 is a wee bit bigger though. Wouldn’t you agree? That you really can’t ignore  #PeopleVoteMarch #Brexit  
The #PeoplesVote petition has been signed 70000 times since launching yesterday and is currently receiving over 100 signatures per minute!Have you signed yet? If not, visit  & demand a People's Vote on the final #Brexit deal. #PeoplesVoteMarchPlease RT! 
Because remember: Brexit is something done to Britain by Airbus, not the other way around.  
Anyone who tweets me about Brexit over the next 90 minutes will be muted/blocked. Get a life!COME ON ENGLAND!  
"What is a Jobs First Brexit?" said Pooh."A lie", said Piglet.Brilliant poster from the #PeoplesVoteMarch#StopBrexit 
Why German industry should fear a no-deal Brexit  
The UK is a large net importer from the EU. The UK economy should expect to gain, in the short-term, if trade barriers are raised between the UK and EU. Far more investment and relocation would be inward. Don’t let the “soft #Brexit” advocates fool you.  
1) Thread - Corbynites FFS wake up!I did resolve (again) to stop attacking Corbyn & to focus on the government in fighting #Brexit But the last few days have given me a reality check againYesterday's #PeoplesVoteMarch was a triumph, over 100k people all over the newsThen this 
Two Boris Johnson quotes that sum up how well Brexit is going."Britain is a great country, and.. outside the job-destroying coils of EU bureaucracy we can survive and thrive as never before."- June 2016"F*ck business!"- June 2018@BorisJohnson 
Don't criticise Chloe Westley for being a woman or an Australian. Criticise her for incessant, tiresome sloganeering and contributing absolutely nothing of any technical/policy use to the Brexit debate at all. 
The @conservatives with their absurd #Brexit and their joke Foreign Sec. have taken this country out of the front line and rendered it a game show; an enigma; and the thing most folks don't want to talk about.History will not be kind.#ToriesOut  
But @JamesCleverly thinks it’s perfectly fine to ignore 16,141,241, to ignore the GE removal of the Tory majority and the mandate for ‘no deal is better than a bad deal’? Perfectly fine to ignore the huge discrepancies between the Brexit promised and the one they will deliver? 
Unelected hard-right attacker of democracy @Arron_banks just after MP Jo Cox was murdered by an anti-Brexit far-right assassin, talking about getting dirt on politicians to destroy their careers. Get back under your rock Banks and stay there. You are scum  
Ideology overrules all logic. We pay the EU £10bn to get all of the social and human advantages, freedom, global influence, £250bn of exports and the agencies. Brexit has cost £100bn and rising  
Ashton Agar with the worst leaving strategy since Brexit, there #EngvAus 
Brexit was partly about stopping foreigners getting British jobs.With Airbus et al leaving, we will literally be forcing foreigners to take British jobs. 
Here is some practical things that anyone can do if you really want to Stop Brexit.  Don't have to dot them all but one r two would be good.  #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
The only people gaining from this division & hatred is govt, & the Brexit Bad Boys who are laughing all the way to the Bank as they witness the public fighting with one another, forgetting who actually brought all this about in the first place.Stay focused. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The ‘EU’ is . The ECB is the Bundesbank. ‘Crisis’ in Europe has benefitted . Germany made billions on the fall of Greece, as we reported.  was behind the #Brexit vote.  will make a killing of Brexiters like Boris Johnson; in league with . #FourthReich 
There are now, effectively, 3 political groupings in this country. The "far left" eg people who want Corbyn elected at any cost. The "far right" eg the ones who want brexit at any cost. And everyone else. When is everyone else going to organise under 1 leader (eg Caroline Lucas)? 
And the Brexiters here now scream "ITS AN EU PROJECT!" like that is a fucking bad thing! So clearly we are going to do immense harm to the country in the name of Brexit. And I love my country so I will oppose anyone from any party, who allows or wishes this. Phew /end. 
#PeoplesVoteMarchIf you are Anti Left then you are a gutless moron.If you are Anti Corbyn then you are a toxic media spoon fed moron.The current right wing @Conservatives gave you #Brexit The @Conservatives suck up to the most repressive Governments. 
Police presence - perceived risk to status quo;1) Remain March - stroll in hi-vis2a & b) Brexit March - batons, Chief Inspector in attendance, TSUs #PeoplesVoteMarch #FreedomMarch 
So when we point out jobs are going the Brexiters scream "ITS NOT BECAUSE OF BREXIT!". Now when several companies put their heads above the parapet & say " Brexit is the reason we're leaving" government attacks the company for not "backing government" /5 
Financial Globalisation Has Been a Disaster. Brexit Gives Us a Chance to Resist It @graceblakeley 
SHOCK as #brexit fans arrange a march.  
Asset stripping of Scotland by UK Govt continues as it pockets £167 million by selling off Scottish Crown Estate assetsThat's on top of the £160 million EU payments withheld from Scottish farmers by UK Govt#Brexit dividend? ... I much prefer an Independence dividend#indyref2 
Except of course, when challenged on what their way is, they refuse to answer (Mr Farage, you mendacious twat I'm looking at you). When businesses for the past 2 years have announced plan they have been bullied by Govt to not mention Brexit /4 
In the week when Parliament let the country down so badly the Left & Right are on same side when it comes to supporting #Brexit & smearing those fighting itHow do Labour supporters square this?Direct progressive protest against stupidity, being attacked by Labour commentators  
As thousands of good people worry about their jobs, I am appalled by #Liamfox trying to preserve his at their expense. Fox knows staying in a #customsunion and #singlemarket means he has no job. Let’s preserve British jobs and get rid of his. Stop #BrexitShambles #Brexit  
DIPLOMACY: Security for President Trump’s visit to be paid for by Brexit dividend. Presumably.  
I voted Remain. I'm not keen on Hard Brexit. But if your argument is that the votes of millions of people should be overruled by a large multinational corporation then you're not a progressive. You're actually part of the reason why Leave won.  
Skwakbox are trash and I know the correct thing to do is ignore them, but I can't help but say the idea that working class people are too poor to care about Brexit is not just disingenuous, it is deeply offensive.  
Great material for Blackadder does Brexit:- cunning plan to scare Brussels -threaten No Deal - dont plan much ourselves (at least in public) while EU publish 70 prep studies- if anyone in business decides to plan for it, criticise “threats”/ tell them to get behind Britain 
Just some of thousands that turned out supporting Brexit yesterday @BBCNews said a couple of hundred was there #FakeNews again from this anti Brexit organisation supposed to be unbiased "really "  
Started work straight from school and worked my entire life paying UK taxes. Took early retirement and sold up and moved to France. Apparently, according to #Leavers, having exercised FOM means my opinion about #Brexit is now worthless. 
Loving the look ⁦@albawhitewolf⁩ ⁦@mikegalsworthy⁩ ... you guys have become the symbol of our fight against #Brexit and for a #PeoplesVote!  
Jeremy Hunt on #marr essentially telling Airbus to shut up, echoing too many other Brexit-washed Tories. Not a one has mentioned the danger to jobs in areas already decimated by previous Tory administrations. 10,000 Airbus jobs. 100,000 in the supply chain. 
Brexit is the Conservative parties Duke Nukem Forever. 
Middle class luxury!  Don’t talk such bollocks.   Brexit will affect the poor most and help the rich.  Why do you think they are all supporting it.  Have you filled your car up lately or gone shopping?  Prices are rising because of Brexit.  
Gordon Brewer continuing to pretend he doesn't understand the SNP position on a vote on the terms of the Brexit deal. Also backed up by a journalist. Thankfully @kmckenna63 is there for a voice of some sense. #bbcsp 
I would love to remain in ( and reform) the EU. But attacking Corbyn is not the way to do that. Brexit is a Tory mess. The Labour party has to walk a political tight rope but we're fighting for the best Brexit deal possible for the country. 
If we wait for Brexit, “it will be too late to get back the lost factories, laboratories and headquarters. Democracy and our prosperity demand a second vote – now.”Barnstorming stuff by ⁦@williamnhutton⁩.#PeoplesVoteMarch #StopBrexit 
Tory Jeremy Hunt just got owned on live TV by arguing with HIMSELF over Brexit 
For just £3 a month you can help people like; Lucius Tarquinius, he had a dream of being an MEP and living a life of luxury while doing nothing of note. Brexit has ruined his future. Please donate to help Lucius find purpose. Thank you.  
One of the many things I despise about Brexit is it’s complete sodding inability to sustain a broad, pluralistic democracy. Unless you’re part of the cult you are told to shut up. 
Our party members were there too Jackson. We just held Scottish Saltaire flags. Also saw lots of local residents join the March with no banners or flags. There was 2 sad lonely union flag dressed protesters. Our party has destroyed the Union with this crazy #brexit  
No. They desire a second referendum because the first was based on lies, won with illegal funding, illegal collaboration and unethical, unaccountable advertising, and will cause enormous damage to the country and people's livelihoods.  
.@Femi_Sorry - In 2016 could you see the deal... every single #Brexit campaigner promised a better deal a better relationship with the EU.. now if the Govt hasn't secured that you can't call what we end up with the will of the people.#PeoplesVoteMarch #FBPE #marr #bbcsp 
I never cease to be amazed that so many Corbyn supporters find it hard to grasp the concept that those who oppose Brexit are critical of those who support it. 
This is precisely the sort of smearing of #Brexit voters that has made us stop listening to the remainiacs. Apparently, only remain voters were decent. Had there been less vilification of Leavers, for a choice we had every right to make, we MAY have been willing to listen.   
WATCH | "There wasn't quite 17.4 million... People who want a second referendum are in a very small minority" @LowTaxChloe absolutely spot on about yesterday's pro-EU rally. These sore losers will never get over the fact that they LOST!Support us at  
Receiving a good education is a *privilege* that acts as a social signifier and gives you a great deal of power. Lauding your education over others is not only elitist, it’s a sickening abuse of that power. And yes - this was in relation to Brexit.  
REMOANERS: Jeremy Hunt calls out whingeing businesses that keep naysaying on Brexit and claiming they'll leave Britain."I thought it was completely inappropriate for businesses to be making these kinds of threats." 
“You are living in a fantasy land: we’ve had a referendum, we voted to Leave, an election where 80% of people voted for parties dedicated to Brexit, we triggered Articled 50 - we’re leaving the EU!” blasts @LowTaxChloe to second referendum campaigner @Femi_Sorry 
The Labour right have hijacked the remain cause to try and split Labour support so they can try and overthrow Corbyn. They couldn't care less if that causes hard Brexit and another five years of Tory government in the mean time. As long as they get control of the Labour party. 
.@theresa_may Now that Cameron will go down as one of the worst PMs in history, you could quit in protest of Brexit & be remembered fondly forever. You’d no longer be assured to be 2nd worst ever. Ppl would forget you were bad at your job & you’d be a pleasant footnote instead! 
On the 6th of July my bill which calls for a Peoples Vote on the outcome of the Brexit deal will return to the commons. The public should be allowed decide if the PM’s Brexit negotiations have been good enough.#peoplesmarch #peoplesvote 
I had a friend tell me he was worried about the 'calibre' of Scottish politicians if we became independent. Deep cringe. I can't believe anyone can say this when Fox, Johnson, Gove, Davis & Rees-Mogg are driving Brexit. 
Some Corbyn supporters just don't get it. If Corbyn keeps on supporting #Brexit then there is almost zero hope of stopping it, if he opposes it then it could well be stopped. So of course Corbyn is the target of a lot of criticism. Is that so hard to understand!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
THANK YOU to the  cross party MEPs who have written to the Sunday Times vowing to protect @britishineurope  all the way to #Brexit 's bitter end.  We  got quite teary about this letter -  wonderful that someone cares. pic.twitter.com/u9xJeY2fgq 
People need to be clear, 'brexit' is the @Conservatives. The cesspool is the Conservatives. 'brexit' is a product of the Conservatives in government. The stuff about Labour or Jeremy Corbyn 'brexit' culpability is intended to distract you from the fact it is the Conservatives. 
But that's not the point. The growing evidence that both Leave campaigns broke the law is sufficient to render the referendum null and void. It needs to be re-run, not to change the result but to uphold the law. 
.@Jeremy_Hunt says it’s highly inappropriate for companies such as @Airbus to show concern about the potential job losses that could be caused by #Brexit.#BatshitBrexit 
So let me get this right, they accept the referendum result but. They want a #PeoplesVoteWhere remain is an option. So basically they don't accept the Referendum Result and they are attempting to Subvert Democracy. #bbcsp 
For once this ungrateful, objectionable woman is right. Will of people has changed, now more people wanting to leave this blackmailing, bullying, corrupt cabal.Gina Miller says will of people has CHANGED as she demands second Brexit referendum  
Sheffield City Region Mayor @DanJarvisMP: "we're confident in our future" and "determined to make the most of the opportunities" that Brexit presents. #BackBritain @RidgeOnSunday 
these are very moving words & embolden me to carry on pointing out my take on UK Brexit negotiations even if in defiance of the position espoused by HMG and a majority of the Conservative party. I believe history is on our side and my children will thank me too for being counted!  
It’s beautiful day and we haves to stop their crazy, chaotic Brexit. The damage this will do to Scotland is almost incalculable. Join us to show that this economic and cultural self harm is not wanted here.  
Fox v Boris, Williamson v May, Boris v Conservative party, Hammond v Boris, Hammond v Any minister requesting money for their departments, Sajid Javid on leadership manoeuvres, Tory Brexit rebels simmering along, are the Tories in for a long hot summer?   
Search below10 tweets from Corbyn this year on #Brexit, maybe 6 that aren't a passing reference.Nothing on:-Airbus-BMW-Vote Leave cheating-PeoplesVote march-"Fuck Business" commentHe is simply not interested in providing any Leadership on BrexitFrom:@jeremycorbyn brexit 
Jeremy Hunt has said that "threats" by business over Brexit are "completely inappropriate". The government and other Tory Brexiters are trying to silence the democratic voice of business. This is an attack on our democracy.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Rees-Mogg expressly endorses the call by #BorisJohnson for a full British #Brexit - not the soft, perpetual bog-roll Brexit sought by Remoaners  
‘I’m keen to get a million people in the streets of London just before the big votes later this year,’ says anti-Brexit  campaigner @Andrew_Adonis #PoliticsFest18 
Carry on, DawkinsEvery time you bore us with your condescending, metro-elite claptrap you make us #Brexit voters more resolute & reasonable, democratic #Remain voters more inclined to accept the resultCarry on, you contemptuous halfwit 
If you read Airbus risk assessment they are literally preparing for a No Deal Brexit, which is exactly what many Brexiter MPs complaining about Airbus heavily lobbied the Government to do and to tell everyone else to do, and is the natural result of current state of negotiations:  
Open letter to PM signed by 60 top politicians, economists & business leaders.Dear Prime Minister,To have any real leverage in #Brexit endgame, UK must reserve right to walk away without a trade deal & take the £39 Billion.No trade deal, No money!#EU 
"With only nine months left before our EU exit, we have no coherent government proposal for Brexit which even meets Theresa May’s own commitments."  
If ever there was a time for a new, anti Brexit, centre left party in British politics it is now.There are 16 million votes just waiting to be earned.A new Party, led by a charismatic leader could clear up.The time is now.@ChukaUmunna @campbellclaret 
Negotiating Brexit without splitting Britain down the middle will be hard even for rational people  
UK health minister tells companies to stop warnings about Brexit  
Daniel Hannan MEP - “Now is not a time to crow, carp or complain. We need to reach out to sensible Remainers and work with them to make #Brexit orderly and amicable.”  
Wow, what an incredible march, the biggest brexit march yet - but there’s still more to do to secure a #PeoplesVote - and the first thing is sign and share our petition: 
Is it not ‘completely inappropriate’ (criminally incompetent) to have put our businesses so at risk that they now have to issue such warnings? And as for ‘clean’ Brexit. Give it a rest. Nothing is dirtier.#marr 
Jeremy, it’s not “threats” that @Airbus @BMW @Siemens are making over #Brexit. It’s very real that your shambolic Government are already destroying the fabric of our economy, industry & communities. May is putting the jobs of thousands at risk. Another stain in Tory history.#Marr 
"Would you really walk away over a no-deal Brexit scenario?" asks Sky’s Sophy Ridge. Liam Fox says the UK's European partners would be "foolish" to think that the PM is “bluffing".  
Don't forget Rees-Mogg's hedge fund, that's moving to Ireland to avoid brexit losses  
The world's largest aerospace company Boeing is committed to investment and continued development in Britain post-Brexit. #BackBritain @RidgeOnSunday 
This is the ex-editor of Breitbart UK. The 'news' site set up by same people behind Cambridge Analytica - Steve Bannon & Robert Mercer - with the explicit intention of supporting @Nigel_Farage. Trump-Russia is Brexit-Russia. The US press have realised this. When will Britain?  
Cameron said there would not be a second referendum.@theresa_may was sat next to him and nodded in agreement. 
Two years after the Brexit vote, we asked four Britons living in Germany how did the referendum affect their decision to apply for a German passport.  
I'm Labour for a full remain too. Unfortunately it's not going to happen because the FBPE cult have pissed their campaigning opportunities away blaming our Party for a Tory Brexit.  
Former Tory party member: when Brexit inevitably goes wrong, Brextremists will blame everyone but themselves#PeoplesVote#PeoplesVoteMarch@lbc #marr #bbcsp #ridge 
WE, THE PEOPLE...We, the undersigned, demand a People’s Vote on the Brexit deal.Whether you were on the #PeoplesVoteMarch or supporting from home, let’s get this signed and help #StopBrexit.Please RT, sign and share:  
‘They’re trying to screw us!’ France and Germany blamed for Airbus Brexit threat  
Where's Jeremy Corbyn? -  Working for a result that honours the referendum result, but retains the best aspects of European cooperation. 
The irony is astounding. So much of the #Brexit debate has been privately educated M&S food-hallers calling the rest of us elitist for worrying about jobs. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Well done to everyone on yesterday's March. Let's spread the word about all the benefits we will lose if we leave with reckless No Deal or Hard Brexit before its too late. EU isn't perfect but Britain is worse off outside trying to get into global deals  
MacGill is just Official Ireland talking to itself. Writing in @sundaybusiness on my decision not to speak at #MacGill2018. AIB chair invited to speak on Brexit but not on tracker mortgage scandal or on not paying taxes on €1.6b profits sums up why. 
Our #PeoplesVote petition is at an outstanding 57k after just 24 hours. But we know there's even more support for a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal out there. Please SIGN & SHARE our petition now:  
Allow us to translate this video:Now-Cabinet minister Boris convinced people to vote for Brexit by promising NHS money that won't exist.We're promising non-existant money now.When we decide not to give the NHS money, it will be the NHS' fault.#Marr "Jeremy Hunt" 
Marr to Hunt “It’s (Brexit Dividend) not a figure we can bank on with any certainty. Even if it did materialise after exit from the EU it would be negated by the smallest of contractions in the in the economy. Do you agree?” Hunt “No.” Marr “You said it!”  
I think the ‘party of business’ might be preparing to scapegoat business for the shitness of Brexit.Should be interesting. 
Did you see the Tory Health Minister Jackie Doyle Price admitting that new NHS funding won’t come from a #Brexit dividend, but from extra taxes? Catch up on what you missed   
Health Secretary @Jeremy_Hunt says it is completely inappropriate for businesses like @Airbus to make warnings about moving jobs because of Brexit #marr 
No, ‘the more we undermine Theresa May, the more likely we’ll end up with a people’s vote to stop this whole Brexit catastrophe’  
I'm not a fan of a second referendum, I'm not a fan of referendums in general, but if your argument against one now is that we had a vote and that's that, people shouldn't be allowed any further say on the matter, then 1975 is calling and wants its result back. 
This is cloud cuckoo land! It’s not like a business negotiation where walking away from deal means status quo. A #NoDeal #Brexit means an abrupt end to status quo, legal limbo,WTO tariffs,sudden end to all rights (eg air landing rights), huge job losses... 
The UK Government trying to get that sweet Brexit deal 
No deal would be a disaster for Britain. It's the worst of all deals and the Gov's own figures say it would hit us hard economically. That's why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Even on scale of this government’s Brexit disgracefulness, for a Minister to tell Airbus to stop trying to protect its jobs & its business makes me really angry  
WATCH Jeremy Hunt caught out on #Marr on the Brexit dividend, saying he disagrees with an 'expert' quoted denying there's a dividend before realising they are his own words.  
My speech from yesterday’s #PeoplesVoteMarch on Brexit & the NHS Thank you to all who organised such a huge coming together! #marr  #PMQs 
To have any real leverage in the Brexit endgame, the UK must reserve the right to walk away without a deal and take with it the £39billion it has offered to pay as part of a divorce settlement:  
Jeremy Hunt tells Marr that Airbus is responsible for impending Brexit catastrophe because it is ‘undermining’ Mrs May’s attempt to ... undermine Airbus! Ludicrous 
Oh Jeremy Hunt, large multinational corporations like Airbus are worried by Brexit, but they can adapt, 14,000 ordinary workers CAN'T. That's what we're talking about. They plan to move their base across the Channel. Leaving ordinary people in the dust. THAT'S BREXIT.#Marr 
Jeremy Hunt just admitted he has absolutely no idea how Theresa May is going to pay for her now infamous Brexit Dividend of £20bn of the NHS.  
Impressive interview with @NiaGriffithMP on defence on #marr But the logic of the position on Brexit doesn’t stack up. Saying we have to be out. Also saying the govt can’t get a good deal. If we get a bad deal surely the whole thing can be re-examined @peoplesvote_uk 
You’ve got your priorities badly wrong if you’re angry that Jeremy Corbyn was visiting children in a Palestinian refugee camp and not attending an anti-Brexit demo. Re-evaluate your priorities. 
Our #PeoplesVote petition is at an outstanding 57k after just 24 hours. But we know there's even more support for a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal out there. Please SIGN & SHARE our petition now:  
The next time someone tries to sell you #brexit as somehow patriotic you might want to point them to this thread.This is clearly treason. No other words at to describe it. No hyperbole or exaggeration. Treason.  
#marr - Huge #PeoplesVoteMarch in London yesterday... 100,000 attended... Is the Labour Party prepared to listen to that many people?Nia Griffith(Labour) - The important thing is we had a vote 2 years ago & the vote was for #brexit.So they're not listening#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
NEW: James Hookham, deputy chief executive of the Freight Transport Association, told BI that British businesses are set to be “crucified” unless May turns “depressing” Brexit talks around said ministers “don’t understand what they’re talking about”  
I was proud to be on the #PeoplesVoteMarch yesterday until i heard the vilification of Mr. Corbyn, the architect's of #Brexit ie the @Conservatives got a free pass yet again, i left early in disgust, the tories own Brexit, it's their fucking baby not Labour's ffs #StopBrexit 
There’s no #Brexit dividend Even @jeremy_hunt has said our economy will contract after Brexit. He can’t tell us where the money they’ve pledged for the NHS will come from/how it will be raised/which taxes will go up.  in the  #Marr 
No, Jeremy Hunt, you have not done “what the NHS has asked” - you know full well that at least 4% was asked for - just to keep the NHS afloat. Brexit Dividend. What utter tosh. [in Sarah Wollaston’s words] #marr 
Hmmm Jeremy Hunt doesn’t seem very keen to spell out details of so called Brexit dividend that’s because it’s really about Tory tax rises. But they won’t tell us what tax rises are coming. Tory MPs should now be clear with their constituents about the tax rises on the way #marr 
Jeremy Hunt wheeled out to talk on #marr & parrot the Brexit Dividend nonsense. Shame on this so-called govt. 
Funny isn’t it?He’s a lifelong EU scepticHe voted RemainHe stood on a manifesto to accept #BrexitHe’s manoeuvring to stay in the Customs Union & Single MarketHe failed to attend #PeoplesVoteMarchHe’s an EU opportunistYet halfwit Corbynites & MSM call him ‘principled’ 
Nia Griffiths asked about yesterday's #PeoplesVoteMarch on #Marr but offered absolutely nothing to those wanting a final say on the Brexit deal. Labour leadership are complicit in supporting the Conservatives' Brexit. 
Brexit march getting wall to wall coverage due to the anti Corbyn sentiment it's become associated with. Well done FBPE - you're message about Brexit has been lost in lieu of Corbyn bashing by the MSM. Speaking if whom, it's a shame the NHS march got no coverage eh? #marr #bbcsp 
This is not how a functioning democracy works. I don’t care if you voted Leave or Remain. This is a nasty, authoritarian attack on our institutions, our press, rule of law. That Brexit has legitimised.And after 18 months investigation, I can tell you this: that vote is a cesspool 
The biggest lie I've heard about Brexit - and there are oh so many - is that Brexit was some kind of 'working class rebellion.The most working class parts of the UK - Manchester, Liverpool, Glasgow, Newcastle, Peckham - were all Remain strongholds. 
That's... pretty blatant & provocative. Not to mention destructive of billions-worth of Scottish nation-brand building over last decade or so. But Brexit-logic demands a new unitary UK state. It's up to Scots who value their progress to perceive that, and act concertedly #indy2 
The choice made by the British people in the referendum was to free ourselves from the EU, embrace global opportunities & that must be respected.  
Huge anti-Brexit demonstration throngs central London  
So good to be amongst 100K+ wonderful, committed people yesterday. Thank you to all who came and to all who couldn’t make it but cheered us on! We said to ⁦@theresa_may⁩ and ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ “b******* to Brexit” in no uncertain terms #PeoplesVoteMarch 
“Off you go Scotland prosper and do your thing! I didn’t support you in the last #Indyref, I didn’t want the breakup of the UK. It seems now however that has changed and you can’t be held back by #Brexit. You now have my support and blessing!” Graham Holland, Company MD, London  
By asking brexiteers if they can name a single tangible, unarguable benefit that Brexit will bring the country.  
Whilst you and your family are clearly too thick to understand what the EU referendum was about - many of us weren't.Please don't tar us all with the same brush of stupidity.  
Marchers in London reject British plans to leave the European Union, demand a new vote on Brexit as its economic costs and possible job losses loom.  
Why is it that the UK’s two most prominent atheist intellectuals have been driven mad by Brexit? Perhaps because they approach politics like science, which just doesn’t work. Human beings aren’t logic machines, they have needs that economics and ‘reason’ alone cannot fulfil. 
ST todayCBI British Chamber Of Commerce EEF manufacturing groupFed of Small BusinessInstitute of Directors Have all signed a letter complaining about Brexit.They warn transition is not enough and are tired of being labelled ‘Project Fear’They warn businesses are leaving. 
I've checked @jeremycorbyn, and the proponent of a Jobs First Brexit is currently silent on the subject of at least 30,000 jobs being announces as "at risk because of Brexit".I know, I know, Tories started this. But he could at least TRY to end it. 
Gareth Southgate has bossed his press conferences this week. Intelligent, level headed bloke Any chance he can handle Brexit? #ENGPAN 
The Brexit plan in full:Fuck businessFuck jobsFuck foodFuck medicine Fuck scienceFuck geopolitical security Fuck foreigners Fuck international solidarity  Fuck the environment Fuck human rights Fuck evidenceFuck the NHSFuck kids’ futuresFuck the UK 
Let's dish up a good wallop today, a solid blue passport 1 nil victory from a Hard Brexit Harry Maguire header. Bet these Panama players make cigars for a living, makes a mockery of the World Cup. Up the England! 
EDITORIAL MEETINGEDITOR: We could lead on Tory Gavin Williamson. Or Tory Boris Johnson. Well, two stories on Tory Boris - Fuck Business or Heathrow. Or we could lead on 100,000 marching yesterday against the Tory Brexit.MARR: Let’s make lead story a Boris Becker interview. 
Enough already: in the national interest, we must stop a hard Brexit | Will Hutton | Opinion | The Guardian  
Surprise surprise Tory #marr makes the second referendum march an an anti Corbyn one.....I guess he wasn't there because its not Labour Party policy...but don't let that stop you Andrew 
Like just don’t do it. The Brexit coming isn’t the one that most Leave voters wanted, since they were lied to so industrially. Take a breath, correct course, and just don’t do it. Super! @theresa_may 
In the #marr paper review just now, they made a huge point of saying that Corbyn wasn’t at the anti-Brexit march and that there were chants about it. No mention that he was visiting a refugee camp. 
#marr Gaby Hinsliff guardian on now. I hate Brexit, I hate Donald Trump. Says same thing evertime she’s on TV. Stop putting guardian journalists on everyday on BIAS BBC. Talk bollocks everyone of them. 
Neil Coyle, Mike Gapes, Peter Kyle, Chris Leslie, Ian Murray, Wes Streeting, Chuka Umunna.Just a small section of Labour MPs who supported #PeopleVoteMarch but who didn't vote for a withdrawal referendum just six months ago.   
READ | "To have any real leverage in the Brexit endgame, the UK must reserve  the right to walk away without a trade deal and take with it the £39billion it has offered to pay as part of a divorce settlement." Support us at  
Is there any way Brexit doesn’t lead (fairly promptly) to a depression which the Theresa Mays & Paul Dacres of the world use to foment a race war/poor-people-into-soylent-green-conveyor-belt situation? 
Arron Banks ‘discussed digging dirt on journalists’These are the tactics of authoritarian politics and not what we expect in our democracy. We need the police to defend the rule of law and investigate the activity of the #Brexit bully boys 
An incredible day yesterday! Many UKIP Students members were there flying our flags for Brexit and free speech! Of course, the biased mainstream media didn't report on it though!  
Saying F*** Business is basically saying F*** people's jobs and F*** the tax revenue business brings in to fund NHS.Johnson shouldn't be in government. He thwarts every attempt by May to get agreement on a Brexit deal. Get some grown ups in please. #Marr 
Yesterday’s #PeoplesMarch wasn’t as high as the leave vote, the Iraq protest or the fox-hunting protest but there are still 100,000+ people - and many more at home - who are angry at the way Brexit is heading towards disaster. Accept the strength of feeling rather than dismiss it 
Brexit is “exciting” for free marketeers & libertarians, because UK will need to deregulate, cut taxes & weaken Labour laws to attract investment & business. Libertarians think this is the way to grow an economy. For those of us who don’t believe in fairy tales, it’s frightening  
Corbyn whipped the LAB party to vote for 14 of the 15 EU withdrawal amendments. The so called "Tory rebels" chickened out. The only chance of a Brexit aligned with the EU customs union & single market is if LAB were negotiating Brexit. LAB aren't the problem. It's the Tories.  
Remainers signed the UK up to treaties such as Maastricht and Lisbon without a referendum. Now that 17.4m voted against the establishment line, they want us to vote again and again until we agree with them. That's not democracy! 
Anti-Brexit protesters turn on Labour leader: ‘Where’s Jeremy Corbyn?’  
"Many who backed Brexit have long mocked the kind of left-winger who lives in luxury as champagne socialists."But those who advocate a clean break with the EU while sheltering themselves from the fallout could equally be called champagne populists." 
Good to know that Richard Dawkins smug, superior elitist tone is not just reserved for Christians!  If you voted for Brexit you don’t belong to the ‘decent half of  Britain’!  Such an intelligent and non divisive statement! 
Reserving the right to walk away from the EU without a trade deal is necessary in order to have “real leverage in the Brexit endgame,” a new letter by by 60 economists, politicians and businesspeople to Theresa May says  
Where's Jeremy Corbyn? He's where the British electorate put him....in opposition to Theresa May & the @conservatives who conceived & engineered the #EUref. He can't stop a no deal or hard #brexit unless the electorate kick out the tories. Support @jeremycobyn, don't slag him off 
@grumpyfred3 100,000 remain can march 24/7 if they wish,its over, Brexit is here to stay, Guy no matter how much you try to drag UK back into your EU chicken coop, its not going to happen,do something positive for a change & clean up your own back yard, god knows it needs it. 
'You're a BIG player!' Ex-High Commissioner lists reasons why hard Brexit BEST for Britain  
The Convention of the North is very significant for Brexit & the future of the UK. Instead of Brexit we need a federal UK, with big devolution within England & a new federal Senate replacing the House of Lords, meeting in north of England. As proposed in:  
I voted remain, but I would now vote for Brexit in a heartbeat, our disingenuous politicians have taken this Country into dangerous water withall the divisions, get on with your mandate Ms May & stop pandering to your heart's desire which is not what the UK peoples voted for Mrs. 
Imagine Theresa Mays glee when she gets up on Sunday morning to find the media awash with stories of the divisions in Labour + the left over Brexit. She'll head off to church, or whatever, completely secure in the knowledge that she + her government will never be held to account 
ULTIMATUM: May ordered to tell Brussels there’ll be no divorce cash billions if there’s no Brexit trade deal. It’s time to get tough.  
As @johnsweeneyroar of BBC Newsnight prepared a report on @arron_banks mystery £££ & how he funded Brexit, the leaders of the LeaveEU campaign agreed to hire a private investigator to dig up ‘personal stuff’ about @iankatz1000, the programme’s editor 
Yesterday we marched in London for the #peoplesvote on the EU referendum. A few people turned up #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit  
What a stirring speech yesterday by @CarolineLucas at the #PeoplesVoteMarch She spoke with clarity, passion and honesty about the damage #brexit is doing to our beloved country. #remain 
How offensive! I've leafletted and door knocked for Corbyn. My husband has now lost his job. We have no au pair or second home.I am an ex free meals child.I have a low paid job in a school. I support Corbyn's policies but on Brexit I think he wrong! 
No, Kate. It's the SWORN duty of MPs to act in the national interest. This means NOT pretending #Brexit exists in a vacuum & examining impact. As you well know, we didn't have sufficient facts 2 years ago. Now it's emerging that #Brexit is contradictory, undeliverable & harmful.  
So are you going to show the same passion & commitment by attending the NHS march next week? Have you attended the anti- Austerity & anti racist marches?  Did you go on the Silent Walk for Grenfell? There are other concerns besides Brexit that we need JC as PM to help put right. 
What I  about yesterday's #PeoplesVoteMarch * Meeting friendly strangers* Feeling SAFE in a crowd (I get anxious)* Not receiving ANY abuse for being part~German/Jewish/#EU citizen#Brexit means the opposite of all these; it MUST fail.  #fbpe #stopbrexit 
Tory Policies have resulted in BrexitPeople dyingChildren living in povertyRecord numbers using FoodbanksRecord homelessAn NHS run into the groundA railway unfit for purposeAnd businesses closingSo what do people do?They have a march and attack Jeremy CorbynGet real? 
I thought we had a referendum that your side lost.We then had a general election which both labour & conservative promised to carry out in their manifestos.Start a political party for remain, get elected & reverse it.Soros has the money.  
As Lord Lawson famously said, ‘Brexit gives us the chance to complete the Thatcher revolution.’ The history, politics & economics of Brexit all set out in my new book with Will Hutton:  
A £20bn to £40bn hit to the economy Thanks #Brexit via @financialtimes 
14. Having A C Grayling represent you.15. Voting Labour to help Remain. 16. Having a lifelong hatred of referendums but now suddenly wanting another one.17. Recognising anti-politics but wanting parliament to take control of Brexit (to stop it).18. Sole focus on economics 
This man's explanation of why young people should stop Brexit is flooring people  
Thank you to Team Hopkins - it’s amazing what we can do together. We are many. Your voices are silenced but TOGETHER we are heard. We #standstrong for Brexit. ScrewEu (thank you @gmacscotland - I appreciate your honesty xx) 
David C Bannerman MEP with some hard hitting facts that the EU chooses to, or conveniently forgets to acknowledge.#Brexit  
I still fail to understand WHY ANYONE in the UK (except for those getting money from the EU) would want to stay in the EU? Well?#Brexit is principally about the UK being master of its own destiny - what is wrong with that? 
Nonsense. I'm firm Remain, however, this tweet is symptomatic of the problem. Ideology before evidence and reason. There is an argument for Brexit. If the mode of debate let it articulate properly it could be better deconstructed. Toxicity abounds from both sides. 
Brexit and Trump are the same movementIf you think the peoples vote march was big, wait for the anti Trump march 13th June.Remainers have finally found their voice. #fbpe #PeoplesVoteMarch 
An American wrote this Twitter thread on Brexit and it's eye-opening  
I haven’t slept all night as my sciatica is excruciating. But I wouldn’t have missed it for the world. Ordinary people from all walks of life, ages, gender from the U.K. and further afield united in their belief that Brexit is not the way forward for our great country 
The Tory Party used to be the party of business.Now their obsession with Brexit has turned them into the party of fuck business. 
And on 30 Apr '18 even the Remain-dominated House of Lords voted down a #PeoplesVote amendment for a referendum on the final Brexit deal by 260 votes to 202. Peers defeated the Government 15 times on the EU Withdrawal Bill - but not on this. See here:  
It's always funny to hear Brexiteers refer to the EU as them. They conveniently forget that the UK was/is a leading member of the EU institution.UK has only voted against EU laws 2% of the time since 1999.Voting record since 1999:No: 56Abstained: 70Yes: 2466#Brexit  
On 20 Dec '17, MPs rejected a #PeoplesVote amendment for a referendum on the final Brexit deal by 319 votes to 23. Only 9 Labour MPs backed it and the likes of Chuka Umunna and Chris Leslie weren't there to vote. And Anna Soubry opposed it. See here:  
Absolutely they can.And the EU will get a better deal because it won't have to compromise its regulatory standards and it offers a much larger market.Even the pro Brexit government's studies show that gains from signing trade deals with USA etc are *marginal*.  
FIFA says making political statements is unacceptable at the World Cup, so it's brave of the England team and its supporters to oppose BREXIT so fiercely by flying the flag of St George - the immigrant Turk who joined the Roman army and fought in Palestine! Well done lads! #Brave 
We were not marching against the 2016 referendum result, however strongly many of us feel that it was invalid. We were marching for a vote for all on the final withdrawal deal, with the option to reject it and remain. How is that undemocratic? 
Only if you think it’s democratic to hold our future hostage to the immutable past result of a binary advisory referendum on a vague question where key constituencies were disenfranchised & the winners won narrowly on lies & illegal foreign funding. Ask us properly this time.  
Gavin Williamson has threatened to "break" Theresa May's government if his department does not get £20bn over the next 10 years... but he backs Brexit which is going to diminish tax revenues by £70bn a year. #Idiot 
Tony Robinson - Jeremy Corbyn has consistently lied & obfuscated about #Brexit & by doing so he has betrayed the hundreds of thousands of idealistic young people who voted for him.#PeoplesVoteMarch #FBPE 
The Big Bang made London. Brexit could undo it  
A one-man motivational force: @RedHotSquirrel .  Every day we analyse and report on #Brexit & the EU.  When you spend as long in EU matters as we do, you often need to surface for a breath of fresh, clean air.  @RedHotSquirrel lifts our spirits with informative, positive news. 
Siemens UK boss joins business leaders' criticism of hard #BrexitWhat happened to the 'easiest deal in history...they need us more than we need them' ?Oh..it was all lies...better tell all the #Leavers who fell for them 
"The Brexit vote two years ago has damaged the UK economy, as a weaker pound has squeezed household incomes and uncertainty has hit investment.On that, economists from all sides agree." by @ChrisGiles_ ,v useful roundup. 
Lets persuade Theresa May to hire Donald Trump to negotiate the final Brexit. See those EU's run! 
Hardline Tories tell Theresa May: 'get ready for no-deal Brexit'  
Sorry mate, you don’t get to have another vote because you “made a mistake”. This is not a primary school quiz.And for your information, I “made a mistake” too and voted against Brexit. I would not make that same mistake again! Just look at the totalitarian control the EU wants  
100,00 march to undo Brexit. How many to undo Trump?  
Fidelma Cook: "Brexit means England will stand alone, Ireland will be united and Scotland will be a nation again". #AUOB #Politics 
Enough already: in the national interest, we must stop a hard Brexit | Will Hutton  
We did this to ourselves. We supported & elevated a couple of despots:"Rather than disqualifying them from running for the highest office in the land, the IEBC and Kenya’s chauvinistic voters viewed their candidacy as a “referendum against the ICC" 
We know ANY brexit’s damaging. We know majority are #remain. We know the job of MPs is to protect the national interests. We know @jeremycorbyn said ‘Britain must remain in the EU as the best framework for the 21stC’ We know @UKLabour FB weren’t at #PeoplesVoteMarch #StopBrexit 
Another AAP Leader Justifies Khalistan Referendum, Says People Have The Right To Demand A ‘Separate Homeland’ 
Teereza Sméagol, Gollum grovels to Royals no human being should act like this towards another, Toxic Tory Taxes rise for the poor as Super rich get £110Billion in Tax Breaks, Austerity Brexit Windrush Grenfell child poverty, get up you alien, the people, the people are sovereign  
As a 17 year old, I can confirm this statement is correct. Everyone I know my age supports Indy, and quite a few willing to campaign during next years referendum.  
Fred Hoyle coined the term "Big Bang" to belittle Einstein's theory that the universe had a beginning. He lived to regret creating the phrase, when he was proved conclusively wrong.@BorisJohnson has just coined the phrase "Bogroll Brexit" #BogrollBrexit 
If you want to have your say on the botched Brexit deal, make sure your MP sees this:#PeoplesVoteMarch 
On the second anniversary of the Brexit referendum, Britons opposed to the decision to leave the European Union protested by the thousands  
How could I resist #Brexit vs being a #Nation in one simple Picture#DisolveTheUnion@Zarkwan @bellacaledonia @PhantomPower14 @WingsScotland @iainmacwhirter @MrTopple @kmckenna63 @cairnstoon 
Brexit's biggest supporters are hedging their bet  via @bopinion 
For real though. What use is @theresa_may to Great Britain? She clearly can't get #Brexit done which is the whole reason she has her job and she can't even guarantee freedom of speech in her country as the #TommyRobinson situation shows us. She is boldly ineffective and weak. 
Sweden's anti-immigrant party is doing very well in polls and rumors of their own departure from the EU are rising. Do it Sweden!! and do it before Brexit to show how much the UK politicians are trying to stop #Brexit from ever happening. 
Brexit Brits  
Merkel faces own 'German BREXIT' Chancellor's immigration crisis is 'THREAT to Europe' 
We saw all the FREE coaches filled, through the kindness of Soros’. They all left early, keen to get back to their sheltered accommodation for their cocoa. Bless.Not sure if you’re aware of this fact, we voted, now we need a government with a spine to enforce full Brexit.  
Over 100,000 people took to the streets to demand a #PeoplesVote but only the Observer chooses to feature it on its front page. If a similar number chose to march for Brexit can you imagine the coverage? Not that there’s enough motivated Brexiters to do it!  
We live in a democracy,Jeremy Corbyn believes in democracy,the majority of people voted for Brexit,Jeremy Corbyn is leader of the opposition not PM he isn’t included in the Brexit negotiations he can only make suggestions they don’t have to listen to him. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
For example, the Brexit group co-ordinator who says not to worry because the economic damage from Brexit would only last 30 years...   
Impressive, but Ukrainians did this every week for months to change their government’s anti-EU policy. I doubt the British public has the fortitude for a #UKMaidan. It was being soft and complacent that got them into the #Brexit mess in the first place, after all.  
Brexit: PM urged to speed up no-deal Brexit plans  
ReminderHey Folks, The border crisis is a Trump manufactured distraction from the Mueller Investigation, AIQ/CA/SCL & Brexit related scandals, plus the destruction & privatization of our institutions & the evisceration of ACA & Medicare/Medicaid. Be Smart pic.twitter.com/KZSJOO80Lg 
The referendum legislation with the official question is out! #pr4bc #voteprbc Learn more and support pro rep at  
Let It RIP RIP RIP! #The #EU-#4thReich #enslavment-by-#OpenBorders #deindustrializing-by-#Climate #Lies project Must Be Destroyed! Only the #SuperRich or #SelfHating morons+Fools oppose #Brexit. Ask any Remainer WHY? THEY DON'T KNOW THEY HAVN'T GOT A CLUE! #Merkel must go. #Lexit 
#PeoplesVoteMarchThey'll all be tucked up now, thinking they did something big.We're merely another day closer to #Brexit, the fools an insignificant distraction at best. 
The part that lied; worked with Russia; lied again; the part that advised its investors to take their funds out of the UK before Brexit; the part that said the NHS would £350m a week knowing it was a complete lie.... 
Jeremy Corbyn will soon find himself on the wrong side of history..he's backed a shrinking minority & a debased #Brexit that can only leave us Poorer, Weaker with Less Control & Fewer Rights...he'll pay for it at the polls unless he backs a #PeoplesVote with a #StopBrexit option 
Leader of the Opposition, Andrew Scheer, and several members of his caucus felt some public backlash after a number of stunts, including Scheer going to the UK to pretend he is the PM and meeting with British officials about post-brexit trade with Canada.   8/17 
It was a referendum not a competition. There are no winners whatever happens. And the only reason not to get into a conversation about the benefits are if you don’t have any or know what they are . If your such a winner why won’t you simply win the argument and state the benefits 
The Brexit vote has already wiped 440 million a week from Britain's economy || via Businessinsider  
Keep on trying. No matter how you argue it, you can't deny that the BNP, UKIP, Trump, Rees-Mogg, Iain Duncan Smith, Farage, Boris, May, the DUP and the Tories all support Brexit. As does Jeremy Corbyn.That's what "siding with nationalists, xenophobes and racists" means.#FBPE 
#WheresJeremyCorbyn chants reflect disbelief the so called leader of the opposition was not at #PeoplesVoteMarch and supports Tory #brexit. It is helpful and @Tony_Robinson and @DavidLammy clear that Jeremy needs to stop supporting brexit 
So after revelations that Russia interfered in the Brexit vote, more than 100 thousand people protested in Britain today.   
You’re a disgrace. All you are trying to do is frustrate the process and hopefully gain a second referendum. I voted to leave, if we’d voted to remain, I’d never attempt to overturn a democratic vote by attending such demonstrations. I respect democracy, you don’t. Simple as that 
The US media appears to have finally shown up to cover the #Brexit - #Russia scandal & its uncanny similarities to the #TrumpRussia scandal. These are NOT two scandals, they are ONE LARGE, russia coordinated attack on the US and Europe. 
We had a vote, they won, we lost, we must get on with it. Sorry Airbus employees, BMW workers, Siemens staff but, well, as BdePJ would say "fuck business". It's democracy see? You are acceptable collateral damage, you must accept it. Your jobs so that others may profit. #Brexit 
The referendum result was the same last week too, and the week before. And last month, in fact for two years now, but you feel so passionate you’ve waited just a little over 24 months.Then used the opportunity to attack a man who has no control over the thing you’re mad about 
It's also pretty strange that the libdem party throws down the gauntlet at corbyn. WHEN THEY WITH THE TORIES GAVE US BREXIT  
I think most remainers fall into this category. I voted to remain but accept the result for what it was and want Britain to get the best possible brexit. All the hardcore remainers are doing is ruining our negotiating position and making a favourable brexit harder 
Eh? “Protesting your leader”?Erm, I thought your March was about promoting the benefits of staying in the EU & being against Brexit?Anyways, thanks for clearing that up and proving it ‘really’ is about attacking Corbyn. Not a good inclusive look imo. 
Fidelma Cook Quote:“I hold no political allegiances, have never and will never take membership in any party, but were I in Scotland and asked to vote in an independence referendum, I would not hesitate... all I see coming from Scotland is inclusion and social care.” 
Meanwhile Pro-#LowWages #Deindustrializing #ZeroHours-Contracts #OpenBorders-for-#SuperProfits-for-#EU-#thieving-#SuperRich #scum like #Branson+#Airbus+#WallStreet #AntiDemocratic Anti-#Brexit-#Blairite-#Labour-#Tories #March-AGAINST-the-People only got a trivial crowd of #Fools 
The maj of leave votes came from the working class. Leave promised more money for NHS and better wages due to control on immigration. It was ultimately a vote against austerity. That's why my main priority is getting rid of the tory govt so a brexit vote doesn't happen again. 
2 years since the Brexit vote and the biggest thing we know about Brexit so far is that Brexit means Brexit 
For those of you who voted brexit to give the elite what for .... it was the elite who encouraged you.... it was the elite who informed you and it's the elite who are negotiating for... the elite .... you've handed autonomy to the elite. Way to go that's showing them what for ! 
So disappointed that our Labour Leader will not engage with the people’s distress and anger over Brexit. He should have been there to address us - and to lead opposition against government’s mad proposal. Unfortunately, he shares their same narrow view about the EU. @jeremycorbyn 
UK gov’t: “We’re prepared to walk away with no deal.”Only the question is not “are you prepared TO do it?”, but “have you prepared FOR it?” To which the answer is a resounding “no”. Do you think the EU don’t know this? You’re bluffing with your cards facing out. Morons. #Brexit 
Off you go #Scotland prosper and do your thing! @NicolaSturgeon I didn’t support you in the last #Indyref I didn’t want the breakup of the UK. It seems now however that has changed and you cant be held back by #Brexit. You now have my support and blessing! #GoScotland #IndyRef2 
Triangulation: alienating both the working-class/left-behind (as an unpatriotic hard-left IRA supporter) AND the middle classes (as a supporter of an hard-brexit). The brilliance of it is that I can keep both strategies running in parallel without either group twigging. 
#PeopleVoteMarch Where's Jeremy Corbyn? Well he was anti-EU for 40 years then turned double agent half-heartedly for 8 weeks during the referendum since when performed a Brexit tango with Theresa May but the Corbynites will never accept their hero is a self-serving hypocrite 
Why doesn't this spoilt brat Gina Miller keep her big mouth closed. We suffered for long enough listening to her lisping away that she wasn´t trying to overturn brexit now the clown is demanding a second referendum. Soros certainly demands value for his money. 
"The decision of a lifetime": Protesters in London call for another Brexit vote  
The 2018 Election Will be a Referendum on Government Corruption - Because of this Trump and Republicans Will Win Again!  
The problem is #London is NOT the U.K. as a whole. The U.K. as a whole voted to leave and the sooner you realise that the better. We voted #Brexit and we want out of the #EU and ALL its institutions. 
We will only get #ToriesOut when you namby-pamby, tory-enabling, Brexit obsessed Corbyn haters stop attacking Labour and start targeting the government. Oh but you won't will you? You'd rather the tories were in govt forever   
Morten Morland on Airbus threatening to QUIT UK after Brexit if Theresa May fails to agree trade deal with EU - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
2016: Chicken Coup "Saving Labour" 2018: "Labour Say". Same people, different campaign (this one focusing on your fears of Brexit). Same goal: oust Corbyn, even if it risks Eternal Toryism and Hard Brexit. Make sure every member knows about this. 
‘EU referendum was a massive decision and people were lied to’  
Brexit: two years and going nowhere - we're not getting pragmatism. Between the hyperbole and the lies, Brexit is sliding out of control. Not in our wildest imagination, two years ago, could we have dreamed that it would come to this...  #Brexinfo. 
Huge respect and massive thanks to @metpoliceuk @MetPoliceEvents for superb management of #PeoplesVoteMarch today. All my initial concerns were allayed by large, ultra-professional, discrete policing. A credit to Britain and a reminder of the values Brexit seeks to demolish. 
And hold the mirror up to ourselves. The Labour Party’s red lines on Brexit need to be re-addressed. We need to be in the single market and customs union. Stop the crap.  
Big Brexit march in London England but pro rata a bigger independence march in Stirling Scotland. #2Countries2DifferentStories#AUOBBannockburn #Bannockburn #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The leaders of the Big 5 business groups, including @The_IoD, have launched an unprecedented joint attack on the government’s handling of Brexit, warning that “time is running out” to save thousands of jobs  
Those having a go at Jeremy Corbyn @peoplesvote_uk should recognise Tory govt driving this. Spotted 2 “Tories against Brexit” banners but blink and you’d miss them. Only other Conservative apart from Anna Soubry I saw was @stephen_dorrell Need more crossparty less cross approach 
Brexit latest: Britons favour new referendum by 23 point margin, poll showsPolling on the two-year anniversary of the Brexit vote shows strong support for a new referendum.So hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit.#PeoplesVoteMarch#StopBrexitSaturday 
Protection of Corbyn is more important to the Hard Left nutters than Protection from Brexit.That’s why this country is fucked. 
“.. #JacobReesMogg defends his firm setting up fund in #Ireland ahead of possible 'hard #Brexit'-@telegraph And a reminder from @HealingMB about the real deal:  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warning.The car giant BMW has followed plane-maker Airbus in warning about the consequences of Brexit.Jobs are being put at risk. Hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
Unbelievable..........   Gina Miller says will of people has CHANGED as she demands second Brexit referendum  
I was on the #PeoplesVoteMarch today. I can't see the day I'll own my first home, left alone have a second with an au pair. I like much of what Jeremy stands for but he had got it completely wrong about the #Brexit and the EU. 
Today marks the end of the beginning of Brexit and the beginning of its end.   
4 decades of neoliberalism and 8 years of brutal austerity caused #Brexit. And where was @ChrisLeslieMP when @jeremycorbyn was out on the streets protesting against those two evils? He was in the House of Commons voting for them with all the other Blairites. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
'With another Brexit meeting looming, Theresa May is haunted by cabinet splits that have broken past governments'  
Not one representative of @UKLabour Front Bench on the biggest anti Brexit march ever. If anyone had a sliver of hope that they back anything but a hard Brexit , it must have disappeared by now. #PeoplesMarch 
It’s clear Remainers’ fear of Brexit is their loss of dependency on EU for favours that UK pays over the odds on terms dictated by EU & governed by laws legislated by EU that UK complies. Brexiters love their country to be free from EU authoritarianism. 
A prime example of the bare-faced lying being perpetrated against Jeremy Corbyn, while simultaneously letting the Tories career towards a no-deal Brexit.  
You imply that those who voted for #Brexit and do not support this action do not care.Your condescending approach to #Brexit and your underhand tactics to stop it are not fitting with the Conservative party values.Cc @BroxtoweCons 
Strangely excited and very chuffed to get one of the greatest sportswomen of all time chipping in to agree with me on Brexit. Thank you Martina!!!  
I get pissed off with all these fuckin marches. I voted remain, but I’ve accepted we had a referendum and have to respect the result. I don’t believe it’s right for our future, but I hope I’m wrong. Time will tell. Just get it fuckin sorted 
Exactly so. I am sad and angry that I cannot vote labour at the moment. I want to support corbynism - I agree with so much of it. But Brexit is my red line - we will lose the NHS, jobs, pensions, everything. It should be labour’s only priority until it’s stopped. 
Thank you to everyone who came along #PeoplesVoteMarch People of all ages, every background & from across the UK came together to demand a vote on the final #Brexit deal because they care about their future and in particular their children and grandchildren’s  future 
Bavarian conservatives heading for ‘German Brexit’ over migrants  
Brexit will have an enormous impact on many industries, and as a result on many jobs, there never was a BrexitDividend, it’s as imaginary as money for the NHS printed on a big, red, magic bus.The reality of Brexit is #BrexitDeficit. 
Odd isn't it that totally unbiased #Skynews hasn't managed to find any footage of the real scale of the pro #Brexit London march despite it being quite clear on TfL's screen.They had loads of anti Britain anti #Brexit footage though.Why is that do you think? 
.The woman who said she only wanted to ensure Parliamentary sovereignty was maintained, now wants another referendum. Make your mind up Gina.The only thing Gina Miller knows for certain is she absolutely loves publicity 
Er, that line about Labour supporting a Tory Brexit......Via @Trickyjabs 
Even if you are stupid enough to be in favour of #Brexit can you not see that Germany will always score a 95th minute screamer and leave you in tears? And the EU 27 only have to play David Davis and Nigel Dodds. 
Just an observation....if Brexit is going tae be so great, why aren't we hearing on the news about loads of EU companies relocating to England?? 
One of these photos contains a crowd of 100k, one is of 50k and the other is clearly a desperate exaggeration #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit  
The Tories cant believe their luck and must be laughing their heads off, all the FBPE idiots blaming  @jeremycorbyn for Brexit while they just keep on their path to a hard Brexit the only way to beat Brexit is to beat the Tories #marr #bbcsp #PeoplesMarch 
My wife & I marched for the first time ever 3/17 (London). A friend marched with us for their first time ever 3/18 (Exeter). Today, another friend marched for their first time ever. Brexit is inflicting such damage on our country that ordinary people are getting actively involved  
The will of the people is changing. We demand a #peoplesvote on the lousy #Brexit deal  
'Soft' Brexit, is when everyone else loses their jobs.'Hard' Brexit, is when you do, too... 
Spot the difference: Picture 1: Anti-Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch today. Picture 2: Pro-Brexit Football Lads Alliance. 
Pro-EU protesters march in London, demand new vote on Brexit.  
I didn’t bump into @SODEMAction at #peoplesvote today but sure Steve was there. Shout out to all who protest against Brexit *every* day Parliament is sitting. #thankyou 
Certainly there’s no version of brexit promised that CAN be delivered . Lies fantasy & propaganda.  
£440m a week Brexit penalty *before we’ve even left*. Put that on the side of a bus #PeoplesVote 
The EU Referendum has clearly identified those who are patriotic and those who are not, the former are freedom-loving Britons while the latter love subsuming our sovereignty under a federal EU. #Sovereign 
COMMENT OF THE DAY: The sheer unbridled joy of Brexit self-harm...  
So to put this in perspective, the sum total of participation from Cardiff & Vale in #PeopleVoteMarch was about 30854,572 people in Wales voted for #BrexitThere was a 70% turnout in Cardiff, with 58% voting to leave the EUShould’ve saved yourselves the journey   
Excellent. As an Englishman I’m done caring about England and its #brexit madness. Time for Scotland to move on into the 21st century and leave the ignorant behind. And if England want to change, then stop voting for racist, anti-immigration parties and get a proper constitution. 
Almost half of British people want a second referendum on Brexit  
‘EU referendum was a massive decision and people were lied to’  
.@AdamBoultonSky @FaisalIslam @TamCohen @BethRigby @SophyRidgeSky Serious question: I know you're not a load of rabid Brexiters at #SkyNews like at the @BBC except @SkyStephen of course, so why don't you show this clip when Boris demands Hard Brexit?  
Brexit Brits celebrating today as their “independence day”. A total insult to every country that had to fight for independence from the British Empire and to those still under the yoke of British imperialism. 
Couldn't the media find any English speakers in the anti-brexit march? 
Let's be clear FBPE was never about Brexit, that is now very clear. It was always about stopping Corbyn. Didn't work, will not work. Folk are not that stupid. #Brexit. Will these same people march for the #NHS on the 30th June? Of course not, they don't give a shit about it. 
After 40 years, you’d have thought someone might have  come up with a plan for what to do in the event of actually winning a ‘leave’ referendum  
'You're a BIG player!' Ex-High Commissioner lists reasons why hard Brexit BEST for Britain 
Well this #AgedBadly #EURef2016•Referendum was fair•Will respect result•Will Leave EU•Even by one vote!@afneil @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP @LiamFox @JuliaHB1 @KTHopkins @Nigel_Farage @IainDale @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @PeterBoneUK @nigelmp Thanks @AnnDeans1 for reminding me! 
What an amazing day...I will be able to look back at these images & say 'I was there!' We are the true patriots..seeking to prevent an aberrant #Brexit which can only leave us Poorer, Weaker with Less Control & Fewer Rights.A #PeoplesVote can only Confirm the Will of the Ppl. 
I was speaking to a person today who told me they voted NO in the independence referendum that they were all for the union and would never have contemplated an independent Scotland.he has changed his mind completely and is now YES.i shook his hand.the times they are a changing 
What the coverage of #Brexit has confirmed is that the BBC is overly cautious. They invariably follow, and rarely lead. Their increasing coverage of #PeoplesVote reflects the traction it is gaining in the country.  
Lets get this #peoplesvotemarch in perspective.#peoplesvote would have you believe that 100,000 is a massive number.400,000 marched in support of fox hunting of all things (which I am against)100,000 represents 0.5% of those who voted remain.Not so great is it? #Brexit  
‘EU referendum was a massive decision and people were lied to’  
Julia and accuracy are not companions . She had to ask her what’s app mates what the CU is ( she still doesn’t know ) & didn’t realise we live in a representative democracy. She also thinks working class delivered Brexit . Data proves it didn’t. 
#PeoplesMarch cannot wait for her majesty to sign off the withdrawal bill scrapping our membership of the EU on Tuesday. Tuesday's are usually a bit mundane not this Tuesday #Brexit 
Caroline Lucas tells anti-Brexit rally: 'we must be different to win'  
May the lord help me - I’m currently getting 5 mentions a minute from all sorts including #FBPE and one thing I will not tolerate is abuse. This is what happens if I ever mention Brexit. Just go away. 
I've signed the People’s Vote Petition to demand a vote on the Brexit deal. We, the people, have the democratic right to determine our own future - SIGN THE PETITION:  #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Thank you to everyone who turned out for the #PeoplesVoteMarch today. After the low point last week with the passing of the Withdrawal Bill it was amzing to see such a huge, peaceful but implacable rejection of everything Brexit stands for. 
Almost half of British people want a second referendum on Brexit A #PeoplesVote is the will of the people! #PeoplesVoteBremain 
I felt nostalgic, exhilarated, excited and most of all hopeful. Not just about stopping #brexit. I mean the bigger picture. Fascism is creeping in. Little by little, every day. That 100-500k (pending final estimates) were willing to stand up & be counted is amazing. #PeoplesVote 
The largely remain voting #London has a population of about 9 million. On a sunny Saturday afternoon, #PeoplesMarch had to bring in folks from all over the UK to support their “cause” and scraped together about 100,000 to cry over #Brexit - voted for by 17.4 million.  
The Brexit vote has already wiped £440 million a week from Britain's economy  
Because the IRA and antisemitism stuff didn't work.In reality if it wasn't for Corbyn hard brexit would have already been waved through in parliament in the same way the tories welfare and immigration bills were. Corbyn is costing the elites money, that's the real issue. 
Corbyn is an idiot and he is killing any chance whatsoever of Labour getting into power and ridding us of these incompetent Tories !!..If there was a GE tomorrow many Labour voters would now turn to LibDems to STOP BREXIT !! #FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
Well put. Many #Colombians voted for #Duque for the same reasons some Americans voted for #Trump & some Brits voted for #Brexit: Fear of The Other, as defined & stoked by politicians: Immigrants, people of other races & faiths, of communists. Such fear is the seedbed of fascism.  
I know you're keen to suggest anyone protesting Brexit is some yuppie but it's not true. Some of us are working class and if that means signage is cardboard, poster paint, tape and a broom handle then at least we're there getting our message out.  
Brendan O’Neill on today’s #PeoplesVoteMarch against Brexit:  
Moment veteran tears into Remainers 'COMMITTING MUTINY' with attempts to frustrate #Brexit - : "Now being as the British people have given this Government the orders to leave the EU, I expect them to carry that out."  
We should put Jonathan in charge of Brexit negotiations immediately.  
Gina Miller demands second #Brexit referendum. That would betray the pledge that the first referendum would be final and binding. Just like the Remoaners in the House of Lords, Miller is unelected, self-important, sneering and self-righteous.  
Half a million in London today. Great turnout. BBC update your figures! Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Bavarian conservatives heading towards 'German Brexit' over migration: SPD leader  
Met police now saying half a million on People’s Vote march today. Half a million! So proud of you guys. Remind me what the Referendum voting gap was between Leave and Remain? #PeoplesMarchVote #StopBexitSaturday 
About 100,000 people fill streets in central London for anti-Brexit march – video  
As a #Remain Voter, I do not support #FBPE or #OFOC because 2 many of them are SNP,Tories,LibDems or Blairites - using Brexit to try to unfairly undermine Corbyn, when they should be attacking/lobbying the Tories. Tory MPs have more votes than LabourUlterior #motive#worldnews 
Full of admiration at the level of political ineptitude on display from the #FBPE crowd as they set about actively alienating constituencies required for a winning coalition while completely lacking any strategy for reaching Leave voters. Almost as if it’s not really about Brexit 
Tommy’s 30th night in Jail.  His Legal Team has launched an appeal - for bail/against sentence.A #FreeTommy message was written in the sky above the Sydney Opera House today - Thank you Oz + March 4 Brexit 
The establishment’s ongoing refusal to accept the referendum result and its full implications has weakened national leadership and direction. Britain must shake off its defeatist attitude and be bolder on Brexit, says the @Telegraph 
Don’t box Corbyn in over Brexit  from @redpeppermag 
Theresa May’s lacklustre plan and modest NHS spending increase will supposedly be funded by a “Brexit dividend”. This is nonsense. 
This week has seen big events in Great Britain’s struggle to #Brexit (to regain its national independence from the European Union). As we reach the second anniversary of the Brexit referendum, here’s what has happened:  
BREXIT IS NOT A DONE DEAL THE LONDON DEMONSTRATORS SAY... if they're right democracy is dead. These idiots despise democracy. Children who would give up liberty and our sovereignty for their entitled folly. Hitler was made of such stuff... #Liberty 
Not to 'overturn' a result, but to have a new vote on the details of Brexit that nobody knew. One of the main functions of democracy is to give voters opportunities to change their minds. Any vote can be undone by a new vote. That's not a threat to democracy. That IS democracy. 
Fuck Brexit is the answer, fuck the Tories, fuck their referendum called to stop internal fucking bickering, fuck Boris and his ambition to be PM, fuck Gove and Mogg and the rest of them. It’s our fucking future. Fuck Brexit. Fuck Brexit. Fuck Brexit. 
Had the best day today. So much fun at #PeoplesMarchVote meeting all you fabulous people @ali__samson @Ferretgrove @Sillyshib @GuitarMoog @EmporersNewC @dontbrexitfixit to name a few! Over half a million attended & I feel pretty happy this shit show can still be stopped. #Brexit 
Huge anti-Brexit demonstration throngs central London  
You really need to work on your basic geography Guy. The EU is not Europe.#ThankEUGoodbye #Brexit  
Just watched the evening news about the #PeoplesMarch today against #Brexit. These were the four selected interviewees. #Brexitmarch 
Listened to 4 British academics talking about the subject of #Brexit All 4 had no idea why the British people voted for it. More proof that the elite in Britain is detached from the people completely. No understanding that the nation is fed up with corruption and incompetence. 
Brexit has already slowed U.K. growth by 2.1%, according to a new study  
Brexit is rarely mentioned in  TV news, but the #PeopleVoteMarch made the German evening news on ARD (the German BBC basically). 
Myself and Prof A C Grayling at mega rally for a People's Vote on any final Brexit Deal. Quietly pleased we've helped to foster pro-EU cooperation#PeoplesVoteMarch #FBPE 
Labour have the 2nd highest vote share (with 3rd place about 33% behind them) and the majority of their voters didn't vote for Brexit. Tim's solution to stop Brexit is to fight the leader of the Labour Party. With tactical genius like this I reckon Brexit is as good as cancelled.  
Tens of thousands of people protested in London today to overturn a referendum result, that was voted by people. Trying to overthrow a democratic result in my opinion is threat to our democracy & what we believe in. Brexit it is, & Jeremy Corbyn plan is best. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Our Foreign Sec Mr Boris Johnson says "fuck business" & wants a "full British Brexit". This is the Brexit NOBODY voted for but the few who will benefit want you to have. If Brexit happens, it will be for the few, not for you. Fuck business fucks you.Fuck Boris, fuck Brexit  
Thousands of people marched Saturday through central London on the second anniversary of the Brexit referendum, demanding that the UK government give people a chance to make the final decision on whether it goes into effect next year  
Right Said Fred have really let themselves go since hanging about with the Brexit set.  
Dear FBPE/PeoplesVote etcBy tackling Labour instead of the majority government, you are increasing the likelihood of a no-deal Brexit. Sorry, but it will be on you. Regards The Rational Left 
Two years after the Brexit vote, we asked four Britons living in Germany how did, and how will, the referendum affect their decision to apply for a German passport.  
BUSINESS: These people would rather see the world burn than face criticism of Brexit. #PeoplesMarchVote 
"Two years after the EU referendum - and people still haven't changed their minds"  
Chris Grey's painfully accurate summary of Brexit two years in. "Outcomes... come in varying shades of bad... no one should imagine that there is any scenario in which we go back to being the country we were on 23 June 2016. That country is, irrevocably, gone."  
This is what #democracy is all about.The biggest democratic vote in our history.Two years ago today we voted to take back control of our sovereignty and independence.#peoplesvotemarch #Brexit #EU#IndependenceDay #IndependenceDay2018 
Think this upstages the Brexit demo.  
Airbus and BMW have no interest other that the responsibility they owe to their shareholders. They are clear that a no deal Brexit means their shareholders will be better served by closing the UK operations. This was the expected result of Brexit even by pro Brexit economists.  
Riddle me this. The BBC boasts of having world class journalists yet somehow it managed to miss this display of pro Brexit patriotism in the heart of London.  
What's notable about Johnson is that he only ever offers slogans, not detailed, practical policy. But detail matters for all of those who - unlike Johnson - depend on the jobs and tax-funded services that Brexit will destroy.  
Voting Leave two years ago today was truly one of the proudest moments of my life. I haven't regretted my decision for a single second. We've certainly seen various people in their true colours in the period since #Leave #Brexit #leavemeansleave 
#fbpe, #PeoplesVoteMarch I'm done with you. I voted remain, have lived & worked in Europe and am more anti-#Brexit than you can imagine. But you have been taken over by anti-#Corbyn cultists when the UK needs a @UKLabour Govt above all else. You've lost my support & that of 1000s 
dear trolls: if the tories win another election, it will be because corbyn fucked us all over with his Brexit stance and lost a shitload of support. it will NOT be our fault for not voting for someone who doesn't represent us. now get off my twitter. 
As 100,000 people marched through London demanding a People's Vote referendum on the terms of Brexit, MP @DavidLammy argued that while people voted to leave the EU, they did not vote for a "£40 billion divorce bill" #PeoplesVoteMarch 
A message from @Women_4_Europe & #WinniethePooh #PeoplesVoteMarch When you know who wants Brexit the most - Farage, Trump, Le Pen - you have to agree. I stood against racist fascist Nazi holocaust denier Nick Griffin & was proud to kick him out of parliament  
The LibDems making it abundantly clear they see  ‘anti Brexit ‘ marches chiefly as a way to try pick at Corbyn. It’s remarkable that even for his enemies Corbyn is the main figure on the political landscape. And He’s only leader of the opposition.  
He will win the next election. He will win even in the face of the #FBPE blame-storm. There are no Tory rebels, Brexit is a long-standing Tory fever dream finally actualised by Cameron's complacency. Not Labour's fault, not Corbyn's fault. 
Huge anti-Brexit demonstration throngs central London  
Also that Brexit has produced a great crop of energetic assured young pro-EU activists who by no stretch could be referred to as from London's metropolitan elite. @Femi_Sorry @albawhitewolf 
A woman who stands up and lies in HolyroodA woman who runs a £453m underspend and people are dying in our NHS because of underfundingA woman who seeks to split up most European countries on the basis that everyone is entitled to a referendum if they want oneA spiteful woman  
Voted for Brexit & don’t agree with the idea of a 2nd referendum, but respect to those who marched today for caring so much and for getting involved. Still think that despite the mistakes made since the vote, next 10/20 years will show Brexit was the right choice for this country 
Last week, sadly I had to say goodbye to some friends who lost their jobs. This is entirely due to a market contaction which is entirely due to #BrexitOrdinary people who have done nothing to deserve this find themselves victims of political ideology. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
‘The Day Brexit died’. There has to be a song in that Andrew! @Andrew_Adonis 
Brexit is shit. But another Tory Government is shittier. #PeoplesVote 
This, from a senior, pro-Brexit Tory MP, ignores that Brexit (if = leaving SM/aCU) by definition disrupts supply chains for Airbus etc. Tories used to claim to be the party of business - now, in Johnson's words, they're the f*** business party.  
Not being funny, but who is this supposed to persuade? REVERSE BREXIT AND WE CAN HAVE WACKY DANCING ON EVERY STREET!!! WOOOOO!!! #bbcsp #marr #brexit #fbpe 
Do you support #PeoplesVoteMarch to reverse the Brexit?- RT for larger sample size - 
As @Jon_Danzig writes, ‘#Brexit means we'll be poorer, with less sovereignty, fewer rights and protections, restricted trade, and diminished power after we’ve left... It's madness'. RT his report giving all the reasons why #PeoplesVoteMarch was vital. Link  
Brexit: How the UK gradually warmed to a second referendum on leaving the EU - The Independent  
I’m a remainer. This is the worst political gambit I’ve ever seen.  #Austerity ,which was enabled by the LibDems in the coalition government , turbocharged the #Brexit vote. Now prosecuting a strategy to, once again, keep a #ToryBrexit on the agenda.  Well played. 
Lots of Corbynistas doing their pieces because the #PeoplesVoteMarch was "just an excuse to attack Jeremy". Chaps, we don't need an excuse as long as his stated policy is to leave the EU on 29 March 2019 while spouting bollocks about a jobs first Brexit.#WheresJeremyCorbyn 
You lost. Brexit is happening. A few people in London waving EU flags isn’t going to change that. How do you STILL not understand the political environment in your own damn country right now? 
Investors say Brexit has had a positive impact on their trading — despite Remainers’ fears for economy  
Your toxic rants, your Corbyn bashing agenda, has actually turned many Remainers off! They’re now standing side by side with @jeremycorbyn and supporting his vision for #Brexit so put that in your millionaire donors pipe, and smoke it   
Sorry @CarolineLucas I've voted Green in the past and for @MollyMEP , I voted REMAIN but this movement that now tries to make Corbyn the enemy disgusts me. Well heeled white middle-class folk for the most part & will ensure we get a Tory Hard BREXIT government next GE! Well done! 
Huge anti-Brexit demonstration throngs central London  
Don't be fooled that because the LibDems oppose Brexit they can be trusted to oppose Tory austerity as when it comes to the big economic issues, Vince Cable's views are roughly the same as those of Boris Johnson and Jacob Rees-Mogg  
The march for a people's vote shows just how many of us are disillusioned with Brexit #PeopleVoteMarch 
The  narrow result- which even #NigelFarage said before the referendum meant that "the matter would not be settled": (he said 52% for #Remain, 48% Leave-)ought to be something that every responsible MP should be concerned with and not go pell-mell ahead.Unless you are a zealot. 
I think we should all lodge a complaint with ofcom against itv, sky and bbc of their one sided bias , showing the pro brexit march and passing it off as the remoaner protest. pic.twitter.com/9WkrEQucoI 
VID: Footage of pro-Brexit protesters and UKIP leader Gerard Batten marching on Westminster to counter the demonstration taking place by many thousands of Remainers in London today. #UKFreedomMarch #PeoplesMarchVote #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesMarch #Brexit  
No it's not the duty of all politicians. A narrow Brexit Ref victory, a flawed franchise, sold on a pack of lies& false promises, reports of electoral overspend & possible foreign manipulation is sufficient to question the legitimacy of Brexit let alone your favoured hardBrexit. 
Gina Miller  does not speak for the United Kingdom where the majority of voters supported BREXIT. She is trying to undermine the people's decision. She is an opponent of democracy and very non British 
Everybody knew the importance of there vote during the brexit and understood how important it was. The country voted to leave 
No-one in politics can ignore such significant support for re-considering #Brexit from, among others, ”farmers, doctors, teachers, delivery drivers, students, fishermen and veterans- as well as former supporters of Brexit” #PeoplesMarch#PeoplesVote 
On the #PeoplesMarchVote there is an irony: Remainers claim that Brexiteers didn’t understand what they were voting for in the referendum, yet happily claim the whole country could review and vote on an infinitesimally more complex #Brexit solution for a people’s vote 
Gina Miller asking the crowd to push for a people’s vote.Let’s remind ourselves , who is Gina Miller.Had we heard of her before Brexit.....NOWill we hear of her after Brexit.....NOWhat right has she to question the British people’sDecision to leave the EU....No 
I admire your modesty but it happened because of your passion, clarity, intelligence and integrity. It's been a genuine pleasure to witness. A rare silver lining to the gathering Brexit clouds. I salute you, mate. 
So after every general election shall we all demonstrate if our party don’t get in so we can get a recount ? Brexit will happen you all need to get over it 
Anna Soubry 2017: You can't vote for a referendum and then renege on delivering the result because you don't like the result.Anna Soubry 2018: #PeoplesMarchVote to obstruct brexit with a needless second referendum? Yeaaahhhh!  
Brexit latest:  
Let's face it, the #FBPE brigade were fired up against an establishment-provided scapegoat (Corbyn) even before the referendum result was in. They're dupes, media muppets... only standing up when their strings are pulled. 
Never forget the Tories own Brexit.#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Brexit is 6699 hours away. #brexit 
The economy is 2 per cent smaller than it would have been had Britain not voted for Brexit, a leading think tank has claimed  
A true intellectual kindred spirit who echoes so many of my own inescapable conclusions of the misguided hardBrexit trajectory. I remember 3 years ago warning a Referendum on EU membership was going to be close run & so divisive and sadly am proved right with no solution in sight  
Today I realised how being anti-brexit means you can’t also support Jeremy Corbyn. I was bullied/booed by the middle-class centrists for daring to defend his current stance. Now I know more clearly the purpose of @OFOCBrexit is 2 facilitate a Labour Party coup #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Brexit has already cost Britain more than its EU budget payments, study shows  
It looks like Brexit has created the first ever pro-EU mass movement in the UK.  
I meant what I said today - by using my own examples of transport , look at airbus - look at bmw mini .. many others to follow - these companies employ thousands of ordinary men and women - workers will feel the effects of brexit first - let’s get a vote on the deal 
More police needed to contain half a dozen gammon who showed up than for 200,000 anti #Brexit protectors.  
Could somebody tell me why #Brexit is Corbyn’s fault and not The Tory Party’s? 
Don’t call for a 2nd referendum - call for an election.Corbyn as Prime Minister ensures a soft Brexit which means access to the single market and a customs union (preventing a hard border in Northern Ireland).Let’s fight for that and get a Labour government. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Me too!  I met up with so many lovely Twitter Remainer friends.  We all met up beforehand and joined the march together. Sad it’s all over now!#Brexit#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote#PeoplesVoteMarch#FinalSayForAll#ProjectFact#StopBrexitSaveBritain#StopBrexitSaturday 
'Brexit won't happen, Trump can't win the presidency, Wenger will never leave...'  
Stop. Just stop. Your repeated attacks on our foreign secretary because of #Brexit are an embarrassment.  This is not a good look. Please take a long, hard look at yourself and quit muck stirring. It is time to quit being bitter.  
Please bear in mind, Guy, there is NO majority of the British people wishing to leave the EU. UK democracy has been stolen by a criminal conspiracy involving the likes of Putin, Farage , etc, and May has no legitimate Parliamentary majority. "brexit" is corrupt, and MUST now stop 
Brexit, Corbyn, Trump, nothing would be as globally astonishing as Germany going out. (They'll still be in the final, surely). 
"Before the referendum of June 2016, the British economy had been one of the fastest-growing industrial economies for years. Now, it's barely growing"#Brexitshambles#Toryshambles 
Thanks to all of our fellow patriots joining the Pro-Brexit march in London today.#Brexit #London #UKFreedomMarch #GenerationIdentity #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Remember when Cameron decided on an EU referendum?He (and his masters) never considered that electors would vote leave.The mystery men of influence are now panicking. They really don’t trust the masses.  
If David Cameron had triggered Article 50 immediately after the referendum as promised, we would be leaving the EU at midnight tonight  
At the #PeoplesVoteMarch today I felt a renewed optimism that sense can prevail and that #Brexit damage is not irreversible. #WeNeedEU 
I'm so tired of hearing "but Brexit" or "but he supports the ira" blah blah - if you want to live in a nicer country where  we look after the more vulnerable and be nicer to each other then there's only one person who wants this too - JC4PM  
Attending refugee camps you Blairite twat. Some serious shit going on outside of your Brexit bubble.  
Fidelma Cook: Brexit means England will stand alone, Ireland will be united and Scotland will be a nation again  
BORIS JOHNSON The people want us to deliver a full British Brexit and we MUST bust out of the corsets of EU regulation, says Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson  
HUGE Anti-Brexit protest in London  via @YouTube 
We are probably staying in the EU, after a referendum on Mrs May’s Brexit terms, so please don’t reallocate the UK’s seats in the Europe Parliament  
Tens of thousands of anti-Brexit campaigners have marched through central London on the second anniversary of the vote to take Britain out of the EU – demanding another referendum on any final Brexit deal.  
The thing I find puzzling about the #PeoplesVoteMarch Remoaner lot is why did they even bother to vote in the first referendum, if it meant jack shit as they imply? 
War veteran:When I was in army & somebody gave me orders, I was expected to carry them out.British people gave this Govt orders to Leave #EU, I expect them to carry that out.People trying to delay & or disrupt #Brexit are effectively committing mutiny! 
I dont have issue with them protesting, but why ask #Corbyn to fix things, any serious critic of #Brexit would be attacking the #Tory party, they claim to be in Govt 
As the U.K. marked the second anniversary of its Brexit vote, thousands took to the streets in London to demand a vote on any final deal.  
On hearing her today at the #PeoplesVoteMarch more than ever convinced @CarolineLucas should lead a cross party coalition of the willing ...true democrats in Parl who believe that in a Democracy a #PeoplesVote is the only way to Confirm the Will of the Ppl & validate any #Brexit. 
Two years into the Brexit disaster. A long read for the anniversary - my latest Brexit Blog post, just up:  
Big shout out to everyone who was on the #PeoplesVoteMarch today. Brilliant turnout. Amazing speeches. Thank you @CarolineLucas @Anna_Soubry @vincecable @ChukaUmunna @DavidLammy @Femi_Sorry @TonyRobinson and so many others. Brexit is not the will of the people @MaryRobinson01 
Hoping England gets the Brexit it voted for. You know, democracy. Hope Scotland gets the independence it needs. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Nice try but no-one will buy that. We were out in our thousands from all over the country because we care about it and are appalled at the damage Brexit is already causing. #StopBrexitSaturday #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Remainers stopping Brexit? This War Vet says they're "committing mutiny".  
Obey Brussels, or else! Europhile-in-chief Emmanuel Macron vows to punish countries with fines if they refuse to take in their EU quota of migrants:  #Brexit 
This might explain why I’ve been getting so much trolling from Brextremists today. Leave voters are starting to realise they were conned by Farage and Johnson. The Brexit at any cost brigade are getting worried that people are changing their minds.  
Dear Mrs May @theresa_may and Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn. Today, 10s of thousands of deeply concerned citizens marched to Parliament Square to democratically demand a people's vote on the final  Brexit deal. You have no democratic right or reason to deny us this. 
Anti-Brexit protest: thousands march two years after referendum What an amazing day! Ready for the next one on 20th October. May has seen nothing yet! We're not stopping until Brexit is cancelled! 
Sir Lockwood Smith - "You’ve got to be out of the customs union, out of the single market, none of this sort of new customs partnership business."The rest of the world won’t take you seriously and you’re a big player. The UK matters, fifth biggest economy in the world." #Brexit  
If you think this country's bad off now,just wait till I get through with it #GrouchoMarx #PeoplesMarchVote #Brexit  
The EURef was DEEPLY divisive 52%/48%.The 48% are being ignored by May & her #Brexit teamScotland & NI voted overwhelmingly to *remain* - they're also being ignored.I believe the divisions may take decades to healWill a *Peoples Vote* heal the divisions ?I really DON'T know. 
People's vote supporters r chanting  #WheresJeremyCorbyn because he's not at the anti-Brexit march 4 their information, this is where he is.  
Given London is home to 8 million, 2.3 million of whom voted to remain & with a further 2 million+ who weren’t eligible to vote, I’d say 100k being bothered to march for the EU today must be pretty disappointing. Especially given all the cash thrown at it!#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
I don't take 'progressives' that call Dominic Grieve a 'legend', Philip Lee a 'British Hero' or take selfies with Justine Greening seriously I'm afraid. Something deeply odd about attacking left when Tories are driving a hard Brexit.#PeoplesMarchVote 
I've come to the conclusion that they are not really so het up about the referendum. The task they have been given by their Tory handlers is to Stop Jeremy Corbyn being elected PM.  
Thank God for Boris.He clearly intends to fight any soft Brexit in cabinet and has denounced any ‘sort of bog roll Brexit’ that is yielding and ‘seemingly infinitely long’. He indicated bluntly to foreign diplomats  that he is not afraid of the CBI and said Brexit was ‘wonderful’ 
The march for the People's Vote shows just how many of us are disillusioned with Brexit - The Independent  
"I'm a Gulf War veteran. When I was in the army and somebody gave me orders, I was expected to carry them out. "Now being as the British people have given this Government the orders to leave the EU, I expect them to carry that out." #Brexit  
#HappyIndependenceDay #Brexit #LeaveEU ‘Imagine Trump Doing Brexit’: UK Foreign Minister Praises President@Nigel_Farage #BenGarrison #Throwback #cartoon Join the #ToonTroops at  
Two years ago on the eve of the EU referendum I was at #FungalGRC2016. So worried I went to my room & wrote this. 2 yrs on our govt has failed to translate Brexit into any workable policy. We should stay in EU! #PeoplesMarch 
It’s very nice that England are protesting against Brexit. It would have been nicer if they hadn’t voted for it. 
One of my favourite moments from referendum night - ⁦@GiselaStuart⁩ speaking to the press pack in Manchester Town Hall once the result had been declared at roughly 5am in the morning. A well measured speech, including a passage in German #Brexit #2ndAnniversary #EURef2016 pic.twitter.com/lFKjbXFUzu 
There’s definitely something stirring in the undergrowth - and in the overgrowth of Scottish politics right now.  No demand for a referendum, at least not immediately,  but I hear a lot of people expressing similar sentiments.  Just won’t go along with Boris’s Effing  Brexit 
Reports of up to 500,000 at the #PeoplesVoteMarch - massive.The public demand a final say for all on the Brexit deal, and a choice to #StopBrexit.Brexit is not the will of the people - polls show the UK would #Remain. Please RT and tag your MP and media so everyone knows. 
The foreign secretary said “f*** business” when answering a question about business’ needs after Brexit  
So many people wondering out of Waterloo station M&S wearing ‘Bollocks to Brexit’ stickers - says it all really 
Co-founder @Femi_Sorry passionately tells crowds of over 100,000 at the #PeoplesVoteMarch that Brexit means that we are losing control! And that we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal!  
Heartfelt appeal to Scots to exit from Brexit -  from respected colleague who is more connected to what’s happening in Scotland than she realises.  
All those blairites shouting #WheresJeremyCorbyn need to get some perspective.  He is at a refugee camp helping Syrian refugees who have no country left to go back to because it is destroyed. Brexit or no brexit we still have a country that isn't ravaged by war. 
Brian Adcock on Brexit: Theresa May 'not bluffing' in threat to leave EU without a deal, Tory minister Liam Fox says – political cartoon gallery in Putney  pic.twitter.com/QMZi77nb7T 
But they did march, you must have missed, mind you it was difficult #PeoplesVoteMarch                     Pro brexit    
100,000 march in London to demand a second EU referendum17.4million say no way!  
I joined 100,000+ people marching in London today to urge a PEOPLE's VOTE on final Brexit deal. Europe-wide collaboration is our best hope to reverse austerity, pollution, corporate tax avoidance, refugee crisis, climate change & terrorism. Power to the people! #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Exit from BrexitLondon, TodayJust do it. #Exitfrombrexit@LaStampa @europainitalia @EU_Commission @theresa_may @SpiegelPeter 
It was good to speak to @ShehabKhan of the @Independent earlier this month about why I left the @Conservatives & joined the @LibDems, the dangerous effects of the Tories shift to the right & how this coupled with #Brexit is devastating for our country.  
Great to be part of the bollocks to Brexit march today. Real sense from Caroline Lucus. Would that we had a PM with her integrity and conviction. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
People’s Vote March a huge triumph. Wednesday in Parliament was a setback, but the voice of the people will ultimately determine the parliamentary situation so the 100,000 on the streets of London, united in common purpose to stop Brexit democratically, the real gamechanger 
#peoplesvotemarch#PeoplesMarchVote#PeopleavotePeople who didn't vote for Corbyn, who would never vote for Corbyn critisising Corbyn for not having enough votes to change Brexit#JC4PM 
BREXIT: Daily Mail readers aren’t happy with the #PeoplesVoteMarch. To save you the trouble, I’ll briefly summarise their complaints:1) Those marching should be arrested for treason.2) They should move to an EU country because they hate democracy.3) They’re all immigrants. 
Sorry,but I'm all Brexited out. I voted remain,we lost,it's time to move on.I'm more concerned about the Tories policies which are killing people,punishing the sick,kids in poverty and so much more.Brexit or not we have to fix our country, and only Labour can do that  
Met Police estimate 500,000 people at the #PeoplesVoteMarch today. Half a million! Half a bloody million!! Take that, Brexit. You're dead.Now #StopBrexit#StopBrexitSaturday 
#WheresJeremyCorbyn? That dastardly man, off visiting refugees instead of attending an anti-Brexit march in London! Why do I support this man with his skewed priorities?   
"Among those taking part were farmers, doctors, teachers, delivery drivers, students, fishermen and veterans from the Armed Forces - as well as former supporters of Brexit." Great to see #FAB represented by a lot of great people today :) 
REALITY: As sore losers stomp their feet in London, the cold hard facts don't change. Sorry @ChukaUmunna and @DavidLammy - if you're not working for post Brexit Britain's interests you should step down.  
BBC and ITV both ignore the large pro Brexit demonstration in London today and instead push the pro EU whingefest! Further evidence you dare not trust the fake news media. 
Thousands of people marched through central London to demand a vote on any final #Brexit deal  
Yes. He's constantly voting against the government, has set out a clear Brexit policy with Keir Starmer and has said time and time again that Labour will not support a No Deal Brexit, nor a scenario that doesn't offer us the things laid out in the six tests.  
You don't see pro-brexit turn out's like the #PeoplesVoteMarch. That's because there's no cohesive #Leave movement, just splinter groups wanting different flavours of #Brexit, none of which have any tangible benefits.  
Turkey will cast its vote tomorrow, and the internet is once again exploded with all the news/analyses about Turkish politics. It's important to remember Dani Rodrik @rodrikdani's rules for Turkish referendum from last year as they are still very relevant:  
Proud to have been part of this huge protest on the second anniversary of the EU referendum.  #PeoplesVote 
This thread reflects, I think, common tilt towards alarm I have noticed in past week among people who follow the substance of Brexit process.  
Looks v odd all those EU flags. Not a good look if you want to win round Brexit voters. 
Brexit was won by breaking the law: 1) illegal money, 2) data crimes and 3) Russian involvement. How can we trust the legitimacy of a referendum tainted by systemic cheating? We need a new vote. #PeoplesVote 
Bob Moran on Boris Johnson being embroiled in a diplomatic row with Brussels after he was accused of using a four-letter word to dismiss an ambassador’s question about the post-Brexit needs of British business.– political cartoon gallery in Putney  
For the hard of thinking:Corbyn can't stop Brexit. He doesn't have the numbers.Corbyn Can't Stop Brexit. He Doesn't Have The Numbers.CORBYN CAN'T STOP BREXIT. HE HASN'T GOT THE NUMBERS.If you wanted him to stop brexit, maybe you should have voted for him last year.#FBPOff 
The greatest achievement of European integration is no war in W Europe in the last 70yrs, the Cenotaph and Battle of Britain memorial today reminded me of this. Just as it’s the young who pay the highest price in war, it’ll be the young who will pay the highest price for brexit  
Whatever the eventual outcome of #Brexit there will be supporters & naysayers. But I feel being able to control our own borders & make our own laws is a worthy goal.The UK has the creativity to make an economic success eventually after short term pain. 
i hear there were some heroic Tory MPs on the #PeoplesVoteMarch. I'm guessing their chants went... "What do we want? An end to hard Brexit! When do we want it? Right up to the moment we shit our pants and vote with the Government!" 
As for "what should Corbyn do?" it's fairly obvious.He drops any red lines on EEAHe stops his party using anti immigrant rhetoricHe builds a case around "people voted, but not for this shambles"He takes a position of "we cannot support a Brexit that costs jobs" 
Someone asked spiked today: “Do you support our right to march against Brexit?” Our response was this: “Absolutely. Freedom and democracy should extend to everybody — even those who fear freedom and democracy, as Remoaners do.”  
No. I asked you a question.  If you can't answer it, admit it.  If you can answer it, tell me how Corbyn is going to be able to stop Brexit. Not wishes and feelings.  Not position statements.  The actual mechanics of how it will work. 
Or in other words: 'Go home idiot voters, you're all drunk, misled, stupid, ignorant or racist!'This kind of arrogance is a guaranteed way NOT to win support for a second referendum and I say this as a remainer.#PeoplesVote 
#WheresJeremyCorbyn? In the Middle East visiting Syria, Palestine, Jordan. Seeing refugees & saying to them what he says to us: It doesn't have to be this way.If you're only interested in why he isn't appeasing your Liberotory Blairite Brexit obsession, take it to May for once. 
Brexit is not the will of these people. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
It’s true: Corbyn doesn’t have the power to stop Brexit. Just like he didn’t have the power to stop the invasion of Iraq. That didn’t stop him protesting against it, speaking publically about how disastrous it would be, questioning the legality of it etc... #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Today's London March was apparently 'too big to ignore' - unlike the actual referendum result?  
After today’s Pro Brexit Rally in London the only TV station to ask to interview me was Russia Today. Odd seeing as the Rally was held outside the MSM TV stations at Millbank. There must have been some reporters on duty.  
I have enjoyed brexit day in the traditional brexit manner. I threw all my money, prospects and relationships into a bin and blamed it on the guy with an accent who lives three roads over. 
Moving words from @mccanntb on the cost of Brexit to Northern Ireland - a cost in peace, in the future, in real lives… that cost is too high #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Violence didn't start in November 2017, Moyo. The November 2017 simply took power away from you and Mugabe. You had used violence to take power away from MDC many times, beginning with your embarrassing loss in 2000 referendum. 
We had ‘people’s’ vote, it was called the referendum and the ‘people’ voted to leave. Be honest - what you actually mean is ‘we want a people’s vote only until it gives us the result we want’  
Brexit is dead in the water.#PeoplesMarchVote #Brexit  
Presumably all those saying the size of today’s march justifies a second referendum will enthusiastically support the legalisation of hunting, which 400,000 marched for.  
Thank you for all our supporters who could make today's march. It was a fantastic day. 100k+ voters all making their voice's heard that Brexit will be a disaster for the UK. Thank you @Jeff_Renew for filming. 
And that is absolutely the point. 40 years of being told don't look here look over there, and still many don't get it. Sod Brexit, look at the state of the country now - it doesn't need to be like this!  
“I’m David ‘Dummy’ LammyI said black & white smoke at the Vatican was ‘racist’I said there were no police on the streets with one standing behind meI said indepndence-restoring #Brexit is ‘madness’I’m almost as stupid & comical as Diane Abacus”#PeoplesVoteMarch #FBPE 
So amusing that you Brexit headbangers think silencing public opinion is 'democracy'. People have a right to change their mind, a right to change their vote. That is true democracy in action. 
Powerful from @fidelmacook: “I hold no political allegiances, have never and will never take membership in any party, but were I in Scotland and asked to vote in an independence referendum, I would not hesitate... all I see coming from Scotland is inclusion and social care.”  
Nigel Farage 2016 - “the worst case possible scenario is better than where we are"; Nigel Farage 2018 - “Brexit done badly will leave us in a worse position than we were before." It’s almost as if he doesn’t know what he’s talking about, isn’t it...? 
'At least 100,000' attend march calling for vote on final Brexit deal  
Anti-Brexit People's Vote march in London – in pictures  
.@theresa_may & her hard Brexiteers chucked away any chance of healing when she labelled us, citizens of the world as citizens of nowhere.#Brexit is damaging to our society, our culture, our economy and our next generations.We demand a #PeopleaVote. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
I voted Remain, but these continual attacks on Corbyn and the Labour party smack on a conspiracy. The tories are the architects of Brexit and the creators of austerity. They are the enemy. I stand with Jeremy Corbyn.#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Bavarian conservatives heading towards 'German Brexit' over migration: SPD leader  
Thanks so much to everyone who came out to make the #peoplesvotemarch such a brilliant day!  Real hope and inspiration in the air - we can do this.   Democracy didn’t die with the referendum 2 years ago - and people have a right to a say #Brexit  
I hate Brexit its so divisive, the Tory Brexit the country was sold was built on fear hate and prejudice a narrative pushed to keep the Tories in power as they move public monies into private pockets, bring down the Tories Brexit is finished 
Corbynista gashead mocks anti-Brexit marchers using Daily Mail stereotypes while using Syrian refugees to launder the image of a leader who has steadfastly refused to condemn Putin and Assad, the parties responsible for their displacement.  
London march calls for public vote on Brexit deal  
French engineering firm Colas ‘is ready to invest billions in Brexit Britain’  
Ahahah no they didn’t mate, I voted to stay. Difference is, I’m willing to accept the majority vote & back Brexit to make sure it is a success. Arguing amongst ourselves only weakens our Brexit negotiations. 
Couldn't make it to the #PeoplesVote march in London today? Then maybe you can make it to Perth on Sunday! Join our friends at @perth4europe and make your feelings known about May's miserable #Brexit. 
Memelords voted for @realDonaldTrump Memelords helped @UKIP get 10,000 more members overnight when it had basically died.And memelords will make #BREXIT happen.Because the real reason we love memes is because they reveal the underlying truth that society won’t talk about. 
He’s probably making up Labour’s 128th position on Brexit......  
Disgusting. I have as much a right to make my views on #Brexit heard as anyone else. Proud to be British. And not going to be told by anyone that my heritage means I can’t march for a #PeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk @FFSake_  
I think this is part of the problem with Brexit. For me I don’t see people from the EU as foreigners. #STOPBREXITSATURDAY 
Lord of The Flies #Brexit #PeoplesMarch 
Thorougly enjoyed leading the #PeoplesVoteMarch alongside activists and MPs with over 100,000 people!It's clear. We need a final say on the final Brexit Deal! We need to take back control of our futures!#PeoplesVote #FFS 
Perhaps you should visit the Airbus factory, or BMW and explain to those who stand to lose their jobs. As my MP I am still waiting for you to give me 1 good reason for Brexit. 
When Brexit is complete, watch the people destroy the career politicians and hateful BBC . Revenge will be wonderful; and sweet.  We will drive the corrupt Establishment into the sea. They have It coming.  
Days before most important vote on Brexit you attacked Corbyn drove ex Tory ads through JMcDonnell and DAbbott constituencies and called Tory Spine of a jellyfish Grieve a ‘legend’ as Labour MPs in wheelchairs with sick buckets followed Corbyn to vote for a meaningful Brexit vote 
Listening to @cliodiaspora talking about how she fell in love with the U.K. How we’ve treated her and all those @InLimboBrexit since is truly disgusting.These aren’t British values that we’re seeing boiling over, emboldened by #Brexit.  
There’s talk of a Brexit deal involving Single Market membership for goods.  This would mean EU rules, ECJ jurisdiction, and almost certainly free movement. Call it a dog’s breakfast if you want, but Brexit it ain’t. 
Any march of that magnitude will get coverage. Looks like a peaceful and well organized event! Interesting that all the Brexit headbangers are sneering at it but the UK still allows peaceful protest. Long may it last! 
Hope this helps persuades @BBCNews the case we have been making that Brexit is not a done deal and the huge strand of public opinion of that view must be given a proper share of debate. someone tell @RobBurl cos I don’t think he’s listening to me today!! 
#Mississippi #PhilBryant #NigelFarage#TrumpRussia #Brexit Mississippi’s Republican governor is ensnared in post-Brexit lawsuit 
BBC had got our attention now! We are soooooo fed up with it that it all this can not be ignored anymore #FinalSayForAll#StopBrexitSaturday #BrexitIsPersonal #BREXITforBREAKFASTBrexit: Marchers demand final Brexit deal vote  
When the @bbc accidentally mess up and televise footage from the pro #Brexit march in London today instead of the #stopbrexit and #PeoplesVoteMarch.You can literally hear the disappointment in her voice 
LP members are *not* attacking the #PeoplesMarchVote , just those who are distracting from the real culprits behind #Brexit by wrongly attacking Corbyn. They need to focus their efforts appropriately and constructively. 
Hello world. This is Andy - a #RemainerNow Please watch and RT. Andy was lied to, and would vote to #Remain if there was a #PeoplesVote Andy says STOP BREXIT @MollyMEP @Women_4_Europe @RemainerNow @peoplesvote_uk @catherinemep @Ferretgrove 
Forbidden fruit: berry growers warn Brexit could ruin sector  
Well done to many people who worked so hard to make a success of the #PeoplesVoteMarch The turnout exceeded all predictions and the message to the politicians was clear. The people need to be given a say on the final Brexit deal 
You say that Brexit will bring golden opportunities. Boris Johnson told you so. A man whose grasp of business is so weak he can’t see the advantage of being a member of the largest single market on Earth and whose response to business concerns is: “Fuck business”. 
Did #TheresaMay lie about a #BrexitDividend?Poignant reply from @albawhitewolf #EUSupergirl & Young European of the Year 2018Her new song "There is No Brexit Dividend" performed opp. Downing St, to round off #PeoplesMarchVote Love it! Share it! RT!  
Brexit: Marchers demand final Brexit deal vote - great to see someone from #BuryStEdmunds being quoted here! #PeoplesVoteMarch  
David, we had a referendum & the people had their say. Stop banging on about being “democratic” when you are trying to reverse the referendum decision 
Me watching Labour party members attacking the #PeoplesVoteMarch which is trying to stop the obscene damage Brexit will do to the very people Labour are there to help.  
The wealthy, well-connected people who want to ‘Stop Brexit’ are really trying to stop democracy. They think their vote should count for more than ours. It is a brazen assault on the democratic ideal, says Brendan O’Neill #brexitday 
Oooops. Having played both sides of #Brexit and manipulating people, chickens are coming home to roost for @jeremycorbyn. 
Thank you ⁦@UKFM23June⁩ and all of you wonderful patriotic people! We WILL win and deliver our #Brexit.  
I wonder who gave us the EU referendum in the first place?  "Where's Niiickkk Cleeegggg?""Where's Niiickkk Cleeegggg?""Where's Niiickkk Cleeegggg?"#PeoplesVoteMarch 
I’ve noticed that a lot of these anti-Brexit protesters in London are quite old. This is far from what’s being portrayed. We are the new youth movement. We are winning. You are losing.  
About 100,000 people fill streets in central London for anti-Brexit march – video  
So proud to have been a part of 100,000 marching on Parliament, to demand a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit Deal. #FFS#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Which bit of "its a democracy" don't these commie losers get? The vote didn't go their way so they want another one. If that don't go our way, I'll want a third referendum #brexit  
2yrs ago we saw the greatest show of democracy in our history with 33 million people involved in making an important decision about our future & 17.4 million backing Leave and still we are seeing un-democratic forces at work to weaken or stop Brexit. pic.twitter.com/6Tvfq6z6z8 
Two years on and Great Britain is still in the European Union, 100.000 Brits march the streets of London to keep it that way. Brexit is the biggest con in living history.#Brexit #PeoplesMarchVote 
Brexit is not a done deal. The fight is well and truly on #PeoplesMarchVote 
I wonder if BREXIT LEAVERS had held a rally whether all the national TV NEWS operations would have covered it? I very much doubt it! 
There are many fine arguments against Brexit. But the EU doesn’t deserve uncritical celebration after the punitive austerity imposed on Greece and others. 
#PeoplesVoteMarchThe vast majority of Labour supporters are Remainers. So of course there are Labour supporters on the march. But neither the official Labour Party nor the Labour front bench are here.Because they support Brexit. 
I’m on @BBCRadio4 just after 5pm to talk about the #PeoplesMarch (this incredibly unprejudiced gathering of democracy-loving people) and why, two years on, #Brexit is still brilliant. Tune in. (Photo courtesy of @spikedonline who have been at the march.) 
Do you guys realise its possible to oppose brexit without constructing a fantasy EU based on what you want it to be, but rather speaking about the institutions as they currently exist? 
Except the BIGGEST BREXIT MARCH when 17.4 million of us marched to the polls to vote #LeaveCan idiots like Umunna really be as stupid as they seem?#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Looks like you are for the chop Anna? @Anna_Soubry - You stood on a Brexit manifesto and then voted against it - your constituents are not stupid and your Chairman should now sack you  
I'm young(ish), voted Remain, and fully standby #Corbyn's position on #Brexit. I don't need Baldric telling me I've been betrayed, ta. 
• The majority of the electorate voted for Brexit.• A significant minority voted Remain.• The majority of the electorate don't want a second referendum. The only way to square the circle is a soft Brexit and that's Labour's policy. You're welcome. 
Great turn out from all involved bar a few. This is a pro brexit march. Far right need not apply  
Co-founder @lara_spirit speaking at the #PeoplesVoteMarch where she demanded a #PeopelsVote on the final Brexit deal!!  
Digby Jones finally loses the plot, he seems to think Airbus are in cahoots with #Remain to stop #Brexit. As a failed businessman @Digbylj needs to realise that real multinational businesses are run by professional business people, they don't play at it. 
Airbus wouldn't get off the ground without Britain's help, despite what bosses say about Brexit, says Hamish McRae  
The cabinet office door covered in bollocks to Brexit stickers ...  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The real responsibility for Brexit will always lie with austerity and how both Labour and the Tories weaponised immigration over the last 20 years. Russia is guilty of many things but it was our 1% that buggered things up for us.  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Just home from my first protest march. The People’s Vote is a deeply impressive demonstration, with more than 100,000 people demanding a second vote on the self-harming lunacy of Brexit. There is still time for party leaders to listen. 
Thousands take to streets in London on anti-Brexit march  
If #PeoplesVoteMarch is the beginning of the real fightback against Brexit, it’s necessarily also the beginning of the end for Corbyn. 
Huge turnout at the #PeoplesVote  march, which is not a surprise given that #Brexit is looking to be costly, damaging and nothing like what was promised by the #Leave campaign and Brexit ministers   
You boo #Corbyn if you want to at the march of the well-heeled today. Me, I’m not for turning back. Least of all to please the most expensively shod marchers London has ever seen. Fuck Blair Campbell Robinson Lib-Dems et al. #Brexit 
It's time BoJo the clown was offered involuntary redundancy. For goodness sake Theresa, he has to goEU diplomats shocked by Boris's 'four-letter reply' to business concerns about Brexit' | via @telegraph 
Anti-Brexit protest: thousands march two years after referendum  
#PeoplesVoteMarchMany of these snow flakes marching today, couldn't be bothered to turn out to vote in the referendum. Yet they want to overturn the vote where millions did turn out to vote in 2016, because those who did vote, cared enough for the future of their Country. 
Would someone from #FBPE explain exactly how Jeremy Corbyn is in a position to stop brexit and, also, how brexit is stopped without removing the tories? Anyone? #WheresJeremyCorbyn ' 
The @BBC have now deleted this @BBCWomansHour tweet which outs their blatant anti #Brexit bias.They obviously don’t want people to see it because it confirms what we already know.You know what to do Twitter.   
Brexit isn’t a done deal. The Brexiters are back-pedalling on their promises every day. Demand a #PeoplesVote along more than 100,000 of us who turned out with laughter, good humour & brilliant banners today! Sign here  
It's a real emotional day. Thinking back to 2 years ago I so clearly remember the shock and sadness I felt. Since then I've joined the fight against #brexit and our elected representatives have let me down time and time again. #PeoplesVoteMarch #BrexitIsPersonal 
June 2016:"Lol Keep Jeremy Corbyn away - he is a walking political disaster. Get the innocent smoothie guy with Ainsley Harriot. They r cool"June 2018:"Jeremy Corbyn with the merest unconscious glance could stop Brexit in a second. Where is he?" #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Do we really want someone who does this in front of royalty leading our Brexit negotiations?   
I am not owning this. Russia launched a full-fledged new world order campaign that includes trump, brexit, Turkey, Calif breakup, US w/d from UN human rights comm. The weaker & more divided the US, EU & world is, the better for Russia. 
#ChickenCoup2 - this time hijacking the Remain movement to try and undermine Corbyn. Which will split the opposition against the Tories when the GE is called, and guarantee Eternal Toryism and Hard Brexit. Still, as long as they get Corbyn out, eh?  
It’s also about Northern Ireland, security, Erasmus... it’s not the 48%, it’s the majority demanding a #FinalDeal but it’s also about this; no leader has sought to heal the terrible wounds caused by the referendum. I want a more tolerant Britain. #PeoplesVoteMarch#StopBrexit 
We will not give up. We will fight for our right for a People's Vote. It is the people who will bear the brunt of Brexit & it is the people who should decide Britain's future #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Almost half of British people want a second referendum on Brexit  
Baldrick @tony_robinson has a cunning plan: a PEOPLE's VOTE on final Brexit deal. Remain in #EU but reform it. Make EU more democratic, accountable, fair & just for ordinary people. Let the people decide. Take back control. Power to the people! #PeoplesVoteMarch has 100K people! 
Vince Cable: Damage is being done & its being done to the prospect of the younger generation who have been shafted by the older #BrexiteersCaroline Lucas: Brexit is not inevitable it's not a done deal.. together lets demand a #PeoplesVote & together we'll win#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Once we’ve stopped Brexit, the real world starts, says @ACGrayling 
 to see @Anna_Soubry at today’s event “demanding” another referendum. When she said she accepted the verdict of two years ago was she being economical with the truth? (Pic via @MrAndyParsons) 
My favourite non-serious anti-Brexit placard at the very very serious #PeoplesVoteMarch today. 
Aerial footage of the #PeoplesVoteMarch shows thousands joined the protest to demand a vote on the final #Brexit deal. Read more about today's march here:  
“At least 100,000” march against Brexit? Over 17.4 million voted for it. Move on, lads  #StopBrexitMarch #PeoplesMarchVote 
Parliament Square absolutely packed for the #peoplesvotemarch. Biggest Brexit rally ever. Over 100k here. Including @thatginamiller, @petertatchell, @vincecable, @anna_soubry, @carolinelucas, @tony_robinson, @dancingthemind. 
Remember when Labour opposed having an EURef and the Lib Dems were all for it? Remember when they Lib Dems mocked Farage for suggesting that the Referendum may have to be re-run if the result was marginally for Remain? 
Attacking Corbyn and Labour rather than Tories makes a hard Brexit more likely, not less.The only person with the power to call a 2nd referendum is Theresa May.Labour have opposed the shambolic Tory Brexit plans at least 34 times. They’ll stop a hard Brexit. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The moment Brexit died?  
I can’t be the only one who thinks the Lib Dems alongside the Tories have done more to damage our country for the past eight years. Attacking Labour will only make a hard-Brexit more likely. 
Facebook hate groups delivered America to TrumpFacebook hate groups delivered Brexit to UKIPFacebook hate groups delivered Ontario to FordNow Facebook hate groups are gearing up to deliver Canada to CPCCanadians must wake up to the real threat before it's too late.#cdnpoli 
The irony of some on #peoplesvotemarch using the occasion to attack Corbyn. You are working to keep the Tories in power. They will ignore your concerns and you will get the Brexit you deserve 
Spot on from the former Labour peer, Lord Stoddart. Brexit should not be seen as a "damage limitation exercise" - if executed properly, it is a fantastic opportunity for Britain to become Great once again!  Support us at  
May be Thompson should have joined us at our North East Scotland Fisheries Development Partnership meeting yesterday when we discussed the impact of Brexit on our fishing industry. But you never attend those meetings, do you @RossThomson_MP ? Talks like Farage, tweets like Trump 
At least a hundred thousand according to police here demanding a say on the final Brexit deal. I'm here with ⁦@BestForBritain⁩. We need a #PeoplesVote now! #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Tony Robinson says Jeremy Corbyn has ‘told lies’ about Brexit as the crowd breaks out with ‘where’s Jeremy Corbyn’ 
It is not just Conservatives who voted #brexit You, like the Labour leader are dismissive of the Labour northern heartlands who voted to leave too. It is not a party thing wanting to take back control of Britain's future.  
Nottingham MP says “time for leaders to listen” about Brexit. Except... all but one of Nottingham councils voted to leave  #StopBexitSaturday 
Going to do a little thread that is obviously inflected by my own prejudices but is my view on the history of the prospects for overturning Brexit / achieving a ~soft~ Brexit. 
Thousands march through London to call for a 'People's Vote' on whether to approve the final Brexit deal Britain strikes with the EU -- if an agreement is struck at all  #Brexitmarch 
“Brexit is like a political Ponzi scheme - invest in a promise but you can’t read the small print” : activist speaker in Parliament Square today. Yep.#PeoplesVoteMarch 
.@vincecable & @CarolineLucas: ‘Rarely been so important to set aside tribal party loyalties for the good of the country. Brexit necessitates unlikely alliances.This is why we, along with Conservative @Anna_Soubry & Labour’s @DavidLammy, will be leading #PeoplesVoteMarch’ 
The People’s Vote March #PeoplesVoteMarch is huge. The largest anti-Brexit march ever.   
Powerful anti-Brexit speech from Caroline Lucas - no Brexit dividend in our already-austerity-savaged economy, our EU friends should never be used as bargaining chips. A precious gift to travel, live & love in 27 other countries. #PeoplesVote 
9. We are going to need a further transition period because so much time has been wasted (see 8. above)  10. Parliament must - and will - have the final say on the Brexit deal. 
6. The public think it's all going very badly7. There isn’t a majority in the House of Commons for a No Deal Brexit8. Management by the Prime Minister in the party interest has taken precedence over leadership in the national interest 
37% voted leave. 33% didn't vote. 30% voted to remain. By your logic you came 3rd in a 2 choice referendum. 
Bollox to Brexit stickers decorate the Cabinet office door #peoplesvotemarch #brexit  
Two years after the EU referendum what do we know? 1. The promises of the ‘easiest trade deal in history’, ‘we will hold all the cards’, ‘the exact same benefits’ and ‘no deal is better than a bad deal’ have all foundered on the rock of reality 
I don't think a second referendum is a very good idea for many reasons - the first campaign was horrible and this'd be more so, creating a stab-in-the-back myth for the far right is unwise, and re-running votes when you don't like them is one of the worst things abt the EU 
Theresa May’s modest NHS spending increase will supposedly be funded by a “Brexit dividend”. This is nonsense  
Thousands join London march to demand Brexit deal referendum  
Baldrick @Tony_Robinson at #PeoplesVoteMarch - Brexit will be a disaster. But... I have a cunning plan! *Cheers and whooping* And you have a cunning plan too! It’s to campaign for a People’s Vote @peoplesvote_uk #ExiitfromBrexit #CunningPlan 
News about the NHS.Loren Gavaghan: The NHS is in big trouble. Short 40K nurses & 10K Doctors. Social care has been slashed. And more. Brexit is making this much worse. There is a 96% reduction in nurses from the EU. Endless statistics of disaster. #peoplesvotemarch #stopbrexit 
the #PeoplesVoteMarch was one of the best things I’ve ever been a part of - 100,000+ telling the Westminster Establishment that we, the people, demand our democratic right to vote on the final Brexit deal  
Crowd at #PeoplesVoteMarch chants together: “We demand a people’s vote” (on Brexit final deal)#PeoplesVoteMarch #brexit  
Hahaha! BBC makes a huge error by accidentally showing the pro Brexit demonstration gathering in London.  
RED WAVE RISING! Tsunami will flood & sweep Dems into oblivion. Blue wave is now a blue stain soon to be wash away.The 2018 Election Will be a Referendum on Government Corruption - Because of this Trump and Republicans Will Win Again!  via @gatewaypundit 
My mate who has to live in this shitty mess loves Jeremy Corbyn & doesn't give a toss about Brexit. In fact to say it's not on his radar would be an understatement. #PeoplesVoteMarch #FBPE #OFOC #JC4PM 
On this day in 2016, Britain voted to leave the European Union in the so-called "Brexit." The “Leave” campaign won 52 percent to 48 percent. More than 17.4 million people voted to sever ties with the EU and about 16.1 million voted to remain in the bloc.  
Tintin and the Brexit plan #peoplesvotemarch 
Labour could have jumped ahead in the polls today if it weren't for Jeremy Corbyn's absence from the #PeoplesVoteMarch and from any opposition to Brexit. Labour must be beginning to realise their Leader is holding them back #WheresJeremyCorbyn 
Wow. Not happy about Brexit? We understand mistakes over here across the pond. Love you guys   
Not trying to be sarky - a genuine question. Is this an okay thing for an official #BBC account to tweet? #Brexit #Remain #FBPE 
Check out the sheer scale of today’s massive #PeoplesVoteMarch, filling central London.The public demand a final say for all on the Brexit deal, and a choice to #StopBrexit and #Remain in the EU.Please RT and tag in MPs, journalists and media.#StopBrexitSaturday #FBPE 
Clear and direct as ever @CarolineLucas ‘Brexiters, we don’t want your vision of a mean-minded Little Britain. We don’t want a Britain that betrays the futures of our young people.... we know there is NO Brexit dividend... we are proud to welcome EU citz...Together we will win.’ 
Meanwhile, in Scotland, thousands march in a Scottish Independence rally in Bannockburn. Thanks, Brexit. You'll guarantee the break up of the UK.  
Meanwhile, whilst the anti-Brexit loons take to the streets with their ‘No to Brexit’ placards (in 74 different languages), the Brexiteers are like....’whatever’...#Brexit - Leave & Thrive   
With awesome @thatginamiller who has done so much to hold the UK govt to account over #Brexit. At PEOPLE's VOTE MARCH in London to demand a second referendum on the final Brexit deal. Not the PM, not MPs. Let the people decide. Take back control. Power to the people! #PeoplesVote 
We've had a #PeoplesVote. It's called a referendum! A million more people voted to leave.  Would you be marching if you had won? I think not, Respect the result. #Brexit #BritainsFutureIsBright 
SNP : Let's spend 99% of the budget & keep 1% in case it's needed in an emergency.Tories : no, you must take a leaf out of our Brexit book & spunk the lot with no contingency plans for bad weather etc.Why Scotland trusts the SNP over the Tories. 
1000´s of people marching in London to prove we want a peoples vote to stop Brexit#StopBrexitSaturday #PeoplesvoteBremain #PeoplesMarch Gina Miller says will of people has CHANGED as she demands second Brexit referendum 
Incredible scenes as so many people from across UK call for their say on a final #Brexit deal - because jobs, living standards, rights and our public services are at stake  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
A huge privilege to be on #PeoplesVoteMarch with Welsh hill farmer David Hardwick - first time he’s ever been to London in his life, but he’s made the effort because he’s so worried about the harm #Brexit would cause.#ExitfromBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Great to meet Welsh hill farmer and ⁦@LibDems⁩ member David Hardwick, making his first ever visit to London to seek #ExitfromBrexit through #PeoplesVote because of the harm #Brexit will do  
For once even the BBC can't bury this news story. Hundreds of thousands from all corners of the UK are telling @theresa_may that the country isn't united behind #Brexit.BREXIT IS NOT THE WILL OF THE PEOPLE #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Their EU citizenship is about to be robbed by far-right populism. And they're not having it! #brexit ##PeoplesVoteMarch 
Vince Cable. ‘We are not citizens of nowhere. Many of our industries are in the balance. Brexit is not a done deal. Brexit is not inevitable. Brexit can be reversed.’‘The vote that took place 2 years ago is not forever. There were many things we didn’t know.’#PeoplesVoteMarch 
BIGGEST BREXIT MARCH YETAt least 100,000 are at the #PeoplesVoteMarch today, marching on Parliament to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Please RT:  
The EU is complicit in $22 billion of illegal state subsidy to Airbus to build A350 and A380. Only in May this year, WTO declared that this state aid was illegal. A rogue company supporting a rogue organisation in defeating #Brexit?  
The man whose successes include buying useless German water cannon, backing Garden Bridge, building an airport on Thames estuary, botching release of UK citizen in Iran etc etc promises Full Brexit Bullshit. Again. How is he still in government?  
"#Brexit is personal for everyone. I met my wife with the #Erasmus program. They call her and my child citizens of nowhere. We are the people too"#PeoplesVoteMarch #AllPeoplesVote 
OMG some professional reporting about Brexit from BBC News. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Our vote against the EU 2 years ago exposed the elite’s prejudices. They really don’t trust the masses. But Brexit shows us that ordinary people are far better than bureaucrats at making big political decisions, says @Tom_Slater_ #brexitday 
The proud tradition of #British protest. Over 100,000 demand a @peoplesvote_uk on the #Brexit deal @Open_Britain #PeoplesVoteMarch 
A great crowd at the Pro Brexit Rally in London at Millbank.  
"Brexit betrayed - leave now - No deal is the best deal" #Brexit #London #UKFreedomMarch #GenerationIdentity 
Organisers of the People's Vote march have estimated "in excess of 100,000 people" are attending the event in central London in support of a referendum on Prime Minister Theresa May's final Brexit deal 
Rally in London for the #PeoplesVoteMarch to demand a final say on the Brexit deal that includes a choice to #StopBrexit. 
Twice as big as any other #brexit march #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVote #PeoplesMarch 
Over 100,000 people here today, twice the size of any other brexit march, all chanting ‘Where’s Jeremy Corbyn?’ #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Two years ago I was captured with my team on @SkyNews & @foxnewspolitics celebrating in Manchester the famous #Brexit referendum victory of the ordinary citizen against snobbish elitists, Corporatist greed and liberating us from their anti democratic EU project. #BrexitBritain 
Absolutely, after contributing 25 years to the prosperity of this country I should have had a vote in the Referendum and we should have a vote on the final deal now as parliament is shockingly unable to secure one for itself.  
Of course. #ChickenCoup failed, so now Blair, Mandelson & Campbell are hijacking the hopes & dreams of a generation of Remainers to make sure Corbyn won't get to be PM when the snap GE is called. Hard Brexit & Tories in power for a generation is a small price to pay, though   
Thousand of brexiteers descend upon London on the 2nd anniversary of the historical vote to leave to show their disgust with the handeling and speed in which Brexit is being delivered, but you wouldn’t know because most MSM are only interested  in reporting on the remoaner march. pic.twitter.com/PHNA0caHmH 
@BBCNews accidentally broadcast #ProBrexit protest. #BBCOOPS#Brexit #FreedomMarch@afneil @JuliaHB1 @Arron_banks @KTHopkins @DVATW @CllrBSilvester @BrexitCentral @DrTeckKhong @AMDWaters @Nigel_Farage @DCBMEP @PrisonPlanet @DanielJHannan @andywigmore 
Anti-Brexit march update: The head of the march is now in Parliament Square, the tail is on Whitehall near Trafalgar Square.  
Does Britain want a second referendum on Brexit?  
All those winging remoaners in London today, moaning away like a herd of cackling nanny goats#Brexit - Leave & Thrive   
Calling the PM, @theresa_may.If your Foreign Secretary says “f*ck business” on reports of business concerns about #Brexit, do you really think he’s the right man for the job and the ‘embodiment of Global Britain’?#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
Time travelling man explains Farage and Brexit to Albert Einstein.  
I have a simple message for those on today's anti-Brexit march: thank you so much for supporting what is essentially a fight for good against evil; right against might; sanity against madness; and love against hate. If there's any justice in this world, we *will* win. 
Massive ant-Brexit march in London and massive pro-Scottish independence march at Bannockburn, both on same day, confirms that #Brexit has only succeeded in unleashing a political and constitutional crisis of mammoth magnitude. #AUOBBannockburn 
Whitehall crowds. Angry chanting. Bollox to Brexit Stickers on No.70. These People are sick of Brexit. These People want none of it. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Proud to join the 100,000+ people on the #PeoplesVoteMarch asking for a say on the final #Brexit deal. Time for Leaders to listen!  
Huge #PeoplesVoteMarch fills central London - too big for politicians and media to ignore.The public demand a final say for all on the Brexit deal, and a choice to #StopBrexit and #Remain in the EU.Please RT and tag in MPs, journalists and media.#StopBrexitSaturday #FBPE 
Parliament and the House of Lords: Respect the people's choice!#Brexit #UKFreedomMarch #GenerationIdentity #Belfast 
Marching in London now with ⁦@CarolineLucas⁩ to demand a PEOPLE's VOTE on the terms of the final Brexit deal. Not the PM, not MPs. Let the people decide. Democracy demands that the public have the final say. Take back control. Power to the people. #PeoplesVote #EU 
Anti-Brexit protest: thousands march two years after referendum  
Spot on...#PeoplesMarch #Brexit #STOPBrexitSaturday #StopBrexit #BrexitAnniversary 
Two years ago the silent majority stood up to the elites and corporate globalist bullies, and defied them. Let’s celebrate this historic exercise in democracy, but remember the fight continues to ensure our voice is heard & we get a full #Brexit. Happy Independence Day!  
Will Hutton attacking Labour leadership on #peoplesvotemarchThis mindset, of attacking left over right, makes a hard brexit more likely not less.  
This quote from our greatest Briton of the 20th century has worn extremely well and if only he were our PM today he would have had the strength of character and leadership to achieve #Brexit and see off the retribution of the ideological Brussels elite.  
Great to be part of the HUGE @TheGreenParty bloc at the #PeoplesVoteMarch! We believe the people deserve a say on the final terms of the Brexit deal   
Anti-Brexit protest: thousands march two years after referendum  
Massive turnout at #PeoplesVoteMarch in London. As in the US, Brits are facing the tragedy of a future shaped by a xenophobic minority who colluded with Russia #Brexit  
I'm in London with the @LibDems calling for an #ExitFromBrexit on the #PeoplesVoteMarch. Democracy didn't end two years ago and when we know what a Tory #Brexit looks like, the public should have the final say.  
Those on today’s #PeoplesMarchVote are outnumbered by over 170:1 by those who actually voted to leave and by over 180:1 by those who tuned in to watch England v Tunisia and even by 6:1 by those who voted UKIP at the last General Election. Not a game changer, in short. #Brexit 
We’ve finally found the Brexit dividend!!Wether you marched in spirit or sweated it out on the streets on London, one thing is certain - our movement IS the Brexit dividend. We’ll never back down and we’ll never give up. #PeoplesMarch #peoplesvote #fbpe 
The #PeoplesVoteMarch is hands-down the whitest, most middle-class demo spiked has ever seen. This is a screech of rage of the comfortable classes against the masses who voted for Brexit  
Solidarity to everyone who came to London for the #PeoplesVoteMarch. It is good to see so many protestors demanding a final vote on a Brexit deal. The Tories have really got this country in a mess!  
What will your abiding memory of June 23rd now be? The year of that fatal referendum result? Or 2018 when hundreds of thousands marched through London and turned the tide against Brexit? #PeoplesVoteMarch #StopBrexitSaturday 
Marching with more than a hundred thousand people calling for a say on the final Brexit deal.Because why on earth should we sign a deal until we know what it is? #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
I love it. So many people marching today who've probably never been on a political march in their lives.Brexit has woken a whole generation to the dangers of populism.Maybe there is a tangible benefit of Brexit afterall! 
"We're going to be the losers unless we remain in the EU" - @laurabundock's been talking to anti-Brexit campaigners at the #PeoplesVoteMarch in LondonFollow the latest here:  
Anna Soubry at the #PeoplesVotemarch - the problem with Boris Johnson is not only had he never run a business.. he doesn't talk to business... he also at one time said he wanted the softest brexit..#StopBrexit #FBPE @Anna_Soubry 
Today’s turnout at the #PeoplesVoteMarch has been BRILLIANT! At least 100,000 people are marching because they want a vote on the final Brexit deal! 
Today’s turnout has been AMAZING! Two years after the referendum, this is the biggest Brexit March, with at least 100,000 people, showing the extremely strong demand for a vote on the final Brexit deal! #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Happy Independence Day. Let’s make sure this truly does become the day when the #UK rejected superstate ownership and chose to sail alone as we always have as a proud island nation. The division should end and #BREXIT embraced to ensure it’s the success it should be.@UKIP 
BINGO#Russiainterfered in #Brexit using the same strategies (illicit financing, bots/trolls, ultra-nationalism) and some of the same players (#CambridgeAnalytica, Bannon, Mercer) as #TrumpRussia.This was NOT “coincidence.” It was a COORDINATED attack 
BIGGEST BREXIT MARCH YETAt least 100,000 are at the #PeoplesVoteMarch today, marching on Parliament to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Please RT:  
Incredible scenes at @peoplesvote_uk march with cross party colleagues and tens of thousands of people from every part of Britain and every walk of life demanding a vote on the #Brexit deal #PeoplesVoteMarch @Open_Britain @WalesForEurope 
Leading Brexit supporters talking tough, and opponents take to the streets, on the second anniversary of Britain's vote to leave the European Union, @JillLawless writes. 
Right on cue, it looks like leader's office WhatsApp groups have distributed today's line warning anyone on today's #PeoplesVoteMarch against trying to influence Labour's position on Brexit.  
... Because amazingly you can be both pro UK and pro EU at the same time #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVote #brexit #fbpe #europe #PeoplesMarch 
Currently operating over the #Brexit marches in #London JM 
Brussels will stop recognising hundreds of British job qualifications, including dance teachers and gas engineers, in a no deal Brexit - as thousands march demanding a second vote two years after the EU referendum#StopBrexitSaturday #PeoplesVoteMarch 
I had 40+ years to consider the effects of the referendum of 1975. After 20 years, I concluded we had made a monumental mistake. The next 20 years only served to emphasise the point; I voted Brexit. Your suggestion that I was uninformed is not only offensive, it's UTTERLY STUPID!  
Today I hosted a gathering of Northern Mayors and Leaders in Newcastle to set out the opportunities and challenges we face. We agreed to focus on improving transport and skills, a Brexit settlement that benefits our areas and the need for more devolution of powers and funding  
An hour to get onto Pall Mall from St James' Square but finally we've joined the #PeoplesVoteMarch! And it's HUUUGE! #Brexit#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote#FinalSayForAll 
I think the thing I’m enjoying the most about #PeoplesVoteMarch is all the nice, polite little old ladies walking around with “bollocks to Brexit” stickers.  
So every general election, if labour lose then we just keep voting?Any referendum that doesn't go the lefts way, we just keep voting?Anytime the left don't get their way, results overturned?This is the result of people who have never heard the word "No". 
No, I can't agree. Our common enemies are the Brexit parties and those who support Brexit whilst pretending to be Remain.  
EU supporters march in London to call for Brexit deal referendum  
London, pro-EU second referendum march, right now.  
This is an excellent, detailed and informative piece on #Brexit, and the State of the Unions between England, Scotland and NI. Recommended. 
Ten of thousands...are you listening T May, J Corbyn. We don't trust you on Brexit and we, the people, want to decide what is best for our country.  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Not Brexiting is thirsty work. Let’s all have a pint & not Brexit.#peoplesvotemarch#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote#FBPE 
We all seem to be agreed, Brexit needs rethinking#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Astonishing pictures show thousands marching from Pall Mall to Parliament to demand a referendum on the terms of Brexit, two years on from the vote.Watch live here:  
Thousands of anti-#Brexit campaigners are marching through London #PeoplesVoteMarch. Follow the latest here: 
Wow! The crowds are HUGE at the #PeoplesVoteMarch. The British public are clearly passionate about demanding a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal and sending a clear message to Parliament. 
Two years on from Brexit I find myself standing with those who voted Leave. I voted remain. If it was 2016 again I would vote Remain again. But today having made peace with the results and having met Leavers who are not what I was lead to believe I back them. 
Anti-Brexit march update: The head of the march is now in Whitehall, the tail is in St James's Street.  
Thousands attend Brexit march through London to demand a Brexit, two years on from the vote … No report on that though? Wonder why ?? Bias .. ?  
Cross party MEPs marching for a vote on #Brexit @peoplesvote_uk #peoplesvotemarch #loveEU 
Far-left figures like Aaron Bastani and Paul Mason have been attacking anti-Brexit campaigns like @OFOCBrexit all week. If they really want debate, they should make their own arguments on Brexit instead.  
Two of the strongest drivers of Brexit vote were oppo to imm and demands for greater sovereignty. In 2 years since, attention to imm has dropped off a cliff (& public become more positive), while Brexiteers have attacked any sovereign British institution that disagrees with them 
#Catalonia already held a referendum on independence and conversations between the Catalan and Spanish presidents on July 9 should address why Madrid doesn't recognize the right to self-determination, according to Catalan Vice President Pere Aragonès  
#Somalia: Key dates in the political calendar • Stabilise the country: ?• Complete constitutional reviews: Dec 2018 (no referendum planned)• Southwest elections: November 2018• Puntland elections: January 2019• Jubbaland elections: August 2019• Popular elections: 2020 
FULL BRITISH BREXIT:EGG on our faceThe economy’s TOASTWe’ve become has-BEANSUnemployment MUSHROOMSMade a complete HASH brown of itSausAGES to rectify this terrible mistakeIt’s a total BaCON.#PeoplesVoteMarch 
People don’t want a half-hearted Brexit - some sort of hopeless compromise in which we stay half in and half out. They want us to deliver a full British Brexit and take back control, says Boris Johnson  
Remainiacs can't even convince people who voted Remain to help join the campaign to overturn Brexit. What chance have they with the 52% who voted for it? Add in the fact a second Remain campaign would be headed by Blair, Adonis and Campbell and you see where this is going... 
We are at the #PeoplesVoteMarch in London standing up for freedom of movement and demanding a final say on Brexit. Join us   
"We need to be heard. 48% of the people who voted haven't been given any attention" - thousands of campaigners are marching to Parliament Square calling for a vote on the final #Brexit deal #PeoplesVoteMarchFollow the latest here:  
"You can't vote for a Referendum & then renege on delivering the result because you don't like the result" - @Anna_Soubry 2017  
So am I right in thinking that our Stazi Government have blocked all live feeds for the Pro- Brexit Rally ?  Or is it just me being cack handed ? 
Tens of thousands marching for Brexit in London today!We want our country back!  
None of these people owned an EU flag before Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
EU supporters march in London to call for Brexit deal referendum  
One group of people blame everything on the EU. Another blame everything on Brexit. Both groups r wrong!The real cause of all our problems is Neo-Liberalism that has transferred massive sums of wealth from the 99% to the 1% since Thatcher came to power in 1979 #PeoplesVoteMarch 
BMW threatens to pull out of post-Brexit Britain.Last year the UK accounted for nearly 10% of BMW sales (Germany itself accounted for only 12%), nearly three times as much as France (3.7%). they really can't afford to lose the UK market.. 
#PeoplesVoteMarch@theresa_may can you hear the will of this people yet? 
What do you give for a second Brexit anniversary again? Is it flint or sackcloth? 
OUR LONDONSTAN MAYOR,INTERFERING IN BREXIT.Detest this creep. Nothing more tedious than a rabble rousing nobody. Please vote him out...He thinks he owns Londonstan the shithole he has made it!                               #fo2eu pic.twitter.com/kmnLso9RHP 
Live at #PeoplesVoteMarchA Lot of People demanding a final say on #Brexit#FutureEurope 
A friend sent me this video from today’s #PeoplesVoteMarch in London. Inspiring to see so many people out marching and making their voices heard against this destructive Brexit. Democracy must prevail - there must be a #PeoplesVote on the final deal 
Brexit is becoming a destroyer of jobs across the U.K. and has created no jobs for British people in the U.K. at all.  
New facts have come to light about the costs and complexity of #Brexit that no one could have known at the time of the #referendum. Promises made by politicians about Brexit will not be kept  #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVote #EU 
.@Hugodixon speaking to @williamnhutton at the march. We can stop Brexit. Yes we can. #PEOPLESVOTEMARCH 
I’m bringing back #followfriday (on a Saturday) because of the #PeoplesVoteMarch.#ff Brexit:-@mrjamesob is single-handedly fighting stupidity with factsTHREAD... 
Neil Carmichael ex MP(Tories against #Brexit) - This is about our national interest... this is about the future of our country... this is about the future of our economy & we can't afford to stand idly by while all of those things are at risk. #FBPE #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The First Minister described it as a "wake-up call". Having failed to wake up his leader who is failing to oppose the Tories - & enabling, facilitating an extreme Tory Brexit that serves the wealthyMore here: 
Dear Brexiters.When Brexit leaders talk about 'deregulating' - they are talking about getting rid of rights such as sick pay, maternity rights, safety regulations etc.And when @LiamFox talks about 'the Labour Market' - he's referring to you.Regards,Tom 
BREAKING NEWS: UK Government cancels Brexit after being shouted at by seven pensioners  
The refusal of the Govt to discuss across parties, or reveal the terms it’s trying to reach, means the only way we can get an outcome the electorate is happy with is by a referendum on the deal. This is too serious an issue for a minority Govt playing minority politics. 
Great turnout, superb atmosphere. #Brexit is most definitely NOT the will of all these people...#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Brexit: Crowds gather for People's Vote march to Parliament  
God speed to everyone going on the #peoplesvotemarch today. I can’t make it because I’m visiting my brother who moved to Spain after the French company he worked for in Newcastle moved its UK operations to Europe because of Brexit. 
GEORGE Soros’ fight to stop Brexit will go on for another FIVE YEARS, the tycoon hinted today as he called for a second EU referendum.  With any luck, he’ll be DEAD IN TWO!                   #fo2eu  
Do you support #PeoplesVoteMarch in thier calls to reverse the disaster that is Brexit? 
There has been a total media blackout this morning despite tens of thousands of patriots making their way to London to celebrate the second anniversary of the BREXIT victory!                       #fo2eu 
On 2nd anniversary of referendum ready to march for ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ with ⁦@Anna_Soubry⁩ ⁦@ChrisLeslieMP⁩ ⁦@MrAndyParsons⁩ 
Attacking Corbyn and Labour makes a hard Brexit more likely, not less. Me for @novaramedia on day of #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Amazing to have the backing of @ProfBrianCox for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal #PeoplesVoteMarch 
We’re marching for a #PeoplesVote#Brexit is a BIG deal, not a DONE deal  
"Haymarket/Pall Mall" #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Britons favour second Brexit vote by 23 point margin and that includes 35% of leave voters ! 
Brexit is personal: The human cost of two years in limbo #StopBrexitSaturday#PeoplesVoteMarch@The3Million & @BritishInEurope 
#anna_soubry leading from the front, incredibly courageous person. Hats off to her.  #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Huge crowds filling central London for the #PeoplesVoteMarch.This is massive. The public demand a final say on the Brexit deal, and a choice to #StopBrexit.Please RT and tag in MPs, journalists and media.#StopBrexitSaturday #FBPE 
I’m celebrating Brexit Day by shitting myself in public and then blaming my neighbours for not clearing up the resulting noxious mess. 
If we all work together WE CAN rewrite this horrible story of #Brexit. There is still time to give people a #FinalSayForAll if we all work together for an #ExitFromBrexit. #PeoplesVoteMarchRT if you agree. 
Two years since the EU referendum, lets never forget this moment   
Happy Brexit Day! Celebrate the traditional way by making a cake, lighting all the candles and then slowly letting it burn your house down, while telling everyone you have a plan to stop the fire but not actually doing anything about it. 
Minister warns Airbus it will lose huge defence contracts if it pulls out of UK over Brexit Finally we have some reaction to the EU threats.  
All for One #EuropeOne #Europefor all.  United we stand in #Europedivided we fall with #Brexit. Oppose #BrexitMarch for One EuropeMarch for unity, peace and equality.#PeoplesVoteMarch#PeoplesVote#PeoplesMarch#StopBrexitSaturday#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
That moment when we exercised our democratic vote to leave the #EU.Those who voted remain who are, still losing their minds, should look at those who voted remain, but have since accepted the result.It is time to come together#IndependenceDay #Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Thousands of anti-Brexit protesters march on 2nd anniversary of vote  
Soubry to be de-selected?Let's hope soIt would be a lesoon to the other traitorsTory MP, Soubry’s flirtation with idea of a centrist Party,even more than her betrayal on #Brexit won't go down well with Tory activists. This does not bode well for her… 
Half the country including me know #brexit will be resounding success once we have our freedom & our money back, the other half will be crying into their quinoa moaning that we can't be dictated to by unelected foreigners in Brussels anymore & will have to make our own decisions  
Attacks on Corbyn and Labour Make a Hard Brexit More Likely @AaronBastani 
Today in history: the #Brexit vote took place today in 2016...  
#anandmenon1Anand, please, no, no, it is not the fault of the EU! Everybody knew beforehand that, whatever negotiations, Brexit would only lead to a choice between bad options for the U.K. I personally wrote an Oped in FT, long study in CER, etc...BEFORE the advisory referendum.  
#PeoplesVoteMarch thousands of demonstrators tailing all the way up Piccadilly demanding a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal.  
Those who are attending the #PeoplesVote march have every right voice their opinion. However as a Soft Remainer who voted and campaigned for Remain I have always made clear that I think pushing for a Second Referendum is a bad strategy for those of us opposed to a Hard Brexit. 
Theresa May's threat to walk away from Brexit talks if Brussels tries to punish Britain is not a bluff, warns Liam Fox  
Anti-Brexit march: St James's Street is closed southbound. Pall Mall is completely closed. The march commences at 1pm to Parliament Square via Trafalgar Square and Whitehall.  
Dont forget the Queen Backs Brexit when she firmly told remainer Nick Clegg the EU was heading in the wrong direction. Her stinging reprimand went on for “quite a while” leaving other guests around the table stunned. God Save the Queen on Independance Day  
We are at the #PeoplesVoteMarch in London where thousands are demanding a final say on Brexit. Add your voice to ours - let’s have a #PeoplesVote  
Which of these Brexit options makes you feel happy?  
More than 24,000 signatures in just a couple of hours. The message is loud and clear:We, the people, deserve a say on the final Brexit deal. Agree? Sign the petition now: #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVote 
Really mixed generations. Young and old know Brexit = disaster #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Boris Johnson warns Theresa May not to deliver a 'bog roll Brexit' that is ‘soft, yielding and infinitely long’  
‘Older people all want Brexit...’ #PeoplesVoteMarch 
It's been two years since the UK voted to leave the EU so we're setting the record straight on some common myths #FreeTradeUK Myth  Countries won't want to do a trade deal with the UK after Brexit.Fact   
Boris Johnson response to questions about the economic damage of Brexit: ‘Fuck business.’ Not much more anybody needs to know about the whole project...  
Not enough is being made of how Brexit is essentially a project being inflicted by the over 65s on everyone else. 
To all on the various Peoples vote marchers  today.Remember your leader Soros a foreign National And his lackeys are hoping for 1million people toTake part.Just remember the Referendum was won by 1,2millionPpl.Have a nice hot sunny wasted day.Nobody will stop Brexit. 
There is a world outside of Brexit you know. Other issues, like the Israel-Palestine conflict, are just as important. 
Hurrah! The US media has now shown up to cover the unfolding Brexit-Russia scandal & its uncanny similarities to the Trump-Russia scandal. Because these are not two scandals, they are the same scandal. With one factor common to both: @nigel_farage 
Not to be confused with a 'full English Brexit' which consists of baked beans and 6kg of gammon  
Tens of thousands of people set to take part in biggest anti-Brexit protest yet.So let’s make #StopBrexitSaturday massive today - at the #PeoplesVoteMarch and online. 
Here’s the wonderful @ellekeiller explaining why she’s at the #PeoplesVoteMarch today to demand a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal @FFSake_ @peoplesvote_uk 
Instead of £350 million Brexit dividend, £440 million Brexit cost. Every week.  
Owen thinks it’s “brilliant” that John McDonnell avoids a perfectly reasonable question on Labour’s Brexit policy and tells a complete lie into the bargain.  
We waited forty years to have a voice; two years ago today, we spoke and voted to leave. We decided Britain's future. Today let us raise our flag  with pride as we lead on to a bright and prosperous future as a free and independent nation. #EUReferendum #Brexit 
This genius discovered the perfect metaphor for Brexit  
Nobody wants a ‘second referendum’... nobody!People simply want a (first) vote on the deal we will finally be offered.If the deal works in Britain’s favour then people will back it. No brainer. If it doesn’t... then they won’t. Simple. What’s to fear?#peoplesvote 
"Brexit means England will stand alone, Ireland will be united and Scotland will be a nation again" via @fidelmacook in today's @heraldscotland 
The EU isn’t prepared for a ‘no deal’ Brexit - the UK should not hand cash to Brussels without a trade deal, warns @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
As somebody that works in supply chain for a major UK retailer, I am terrified by Brexit. 
Brexit Business Policy2016 - We'll continue to trade as before2017 - We'll lose some existing customers in the EU but we're going to open new markets2018 - OK, it's 15 years before we're back to where we are now but with a worse EU trade deal. Hey! Why are you all leaving?  
 Two years on from the Brexit referendum, the only thing uniting Tories is a power grab on the @scotparl's powers.  Pass on the facts: 
"People are angry. That's why they're marching for a People's Vote"WATCH: @JamesMcGrory is absolutely right that people are angry about the mess the Gov have made over Brexit. That's why they're at today's #PeoplesVoteMarch. Please RT: 
People across the country want the government "to fulfil the mandate of the people - and deliver a full British Brexit," says @BorisJohnson. #TakeBackControl #IndependenceDay 
I trust the PM will write to everyone losing their jobs because of Brexit setting out why it’s worth it. Meanwhile, Jeremy Corbyn will explain they’ll just be differently employed, watching Homes Under the Hammer. 
Three of our Bremain Council are determined to get the message out today: #Brexit is bonkers!#StopBrexit #WeLoveEU 
I am so proud of the FREE BRITISH for breaking the chains of their European Union Jailers..!HAPPY INDEPENDENCE DAY UK..! #Brexit #EU (#UE)#PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVote #BrexitMarch 
I find Vince Cables blaming Brexit for slowing growth incredibly dishonest. He simply cannot allow people to think its the result of austerity which he supported. 
UNFINAL FIGHT: #BREXIT EDITION: Two years since Britain voted to leave the EU and the fight still goes on!   
James McGrory @Open_Britain - People are angry at the mess the government is making over brexit. #Brexit is such a big deal it should include all 65 million of us in the country & that's why people today are marching for a #PeoplesVote#FBPE #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Sir Winston Churchill was passionate about democracy. The #PeoplesVoteMarch is also about democracy and giving a voice back to the people of the U.K. by granting them a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
The happiest moments in my life include:Birth of my daughterWedding dayMy hubby proposingBirths of my younger siblingsScuba diving with a whale sharkCage diving with great white sharksDawn at Machu PicchuTropical storm at Angkor WatWalking on a glacier in Chile& Brexit 
Boris warns May not to deliver "bog roll Brexit" | Hammond and Clark reportedly urging firms like Airbus to speak out in favour of soft Brexit | Juncker promises no hard Irish border even if no deal | EU to launch emergency probe into UK expats' rights  
Sir Lockwood Smith: UK must Leave #EU Customs Union & Single Market"You can't be in a half-way house. None of this 'customs partnership" business- the world won't take you seriously!UK is a big player & you can take your place on the world stage"#Brexit 
Two years since the Brexit result, and the people who took back their country still have no idea what to do with it. 
No Tim, I sat next to you when John Redwood casually said you'd just have another referendum 
Two years after the Brexit vote, we asked four Britons living in Germany how did, and how will, the referendum affect their decision to apply for a German passport.  
Waiting for the People's Vote march to start & thinking of business Brexit warnings. Airbus, Roll's Royce, Nissan, BMW, Chubb, Deutsche Bank etc. Not to mention those Govt has bullied to keep quiet. Boris says, "Fuck business." I say, "Fuck Brexit." 
Those of us who voted for #Brexit are like Nazi’s according to this chap.Personally, I would say that those (like him) who are ignoring the democratic process, and trying to force their own views onto others are like Nazi’s #IndependenceDay 
Two years on from the referendum vote, I’m more optimistic than ever about Britain’s future.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg:'June 23, the anniversary of Brexit referendum vote, will be remembered as a big moment of change in British history as big as the Great Reform Act of 1832, victory at Waterloo in 1815 or the Glorious Revolution of 1688'#Brexit #Leave #EU 
And one final point. To those who want to shout ‘go back to talking about food’ everyone who has a vote is entitled to have an opinion. But for what it’s worth I am all over the impact of Brexit on our food supply chains. I can tell you we’re in serious trouble 3/ 
So Boris Johnson wants a “Full British Brexit.”Good luck with that. I prefer a full continental myself.  
The original referendum question was dismally written. Since then we have more and more information about what a bloody mess we are wandering into on the caprices of a power hungry wing of the Tory party. Parliament is incapable of opposing. It needs to come back to the people 2/ 
Thousands of people marching in London, against Brexit.  Well, that's it.  Stop Brexit now.  These people are far more important than the 17.4m people who voted to Leave the EU.  At least they must think they're more important .... 
We are stronger together, yes we can STOP BREXIT#StopBrexitSaturday 
Today I’m off to the march for a second Brexit vote. To those who want to shout ‘but we’ve already had a vote’ let me mansplain shamelessly: democracy is not a set of end results. It’s a process. That’s why we get to change the government every five years 1/ 
I despair. Genuinely I do. I’m an ex Deputy Chairman of a constituency association and at this point I can’t see how I can ever even vote Conservative again. With cretins like @BorisJohnson leading the charge, Brexit can’t fail to be a disaster 
happy brexit day ya fuckin morons 
Impressed by how many are marching today in favour of the correct plural of referendum as being referendums. 
John Longworth:“On 2nd anniversary of biggest democratic mandate in British history, our message is clear: Get on with it Prime Minister!The time has come to make it clear to #EU that if their abhorrent behaviour continues Britain will walk away"#Brexit 
The Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson wants a British Brexit, he's not interested in job's, investment, in fact he told EU officials 'Fuck Business', there you go, that in two words sums up the tory approach to #Brexit, one question, why hasn't this tub of lard been fired? 
You keep saying this, but we know that by 2021, Brexit will be something that the UK, on average, voted against.Nobody would be celebrating. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
the #PeoplesVoteMarch is trending top in the UK, ahead of a so-called 'British Brexit'   
There's no good Brexit.We want zero Brexit, no Brexit, Stop Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
Add your name! This petition will be delivered to No. 10 Downing Street the week before the Brexit deal returns to Parliament later this year.  
The majority of anti-abortion twitter bots and trolls flagged during the referendum may have been run from the US 
Superb ?????? He has a go at a reporter ! You think that's superb ? You are easily appeased.What would've been superb would have been a constructive opposition to Brexit !!! This has to be the worst opposition in living memory . 
'Why I loathe Brussels: They steal our fish, squander our cash and treat our views with contempt'  #Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
#JeremyCorbyn rightly predicted the effect of #Brexit on  #Airbus 
Two years since the Brexit vote and today @LibDems & #Remainers from all over the country are marching to give YOU the final say on the deal. The Tories are hell-bent on taking us off this cliff come what may. We must unite and fight hard for an #Exitfrombrexit. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
ANDREXIT: Well, two years on from the referendum and this is where we are. The Foreign Secretary is doubling down on his bullshit, making toilet paper analogies in The Sun while Mail readers furiously demand the impossible. Sometimes I want to punch this country in the face. pic.twitter.com/BbgPfvPgov 
The latest ITV poll says if there was a new #Brexit referendum people would vote 53% To 47% to remain in the EU. I support a second referendum - A PEOPLE's VOTE - on the terms of the final Brexit deal. I'm marching for that vote in London today. 12 noon in Pall Mall SW1. See you!  
Here are Bremain's Elspeth and Sue showing London what they (and we!) think of #Brexit! #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVoteBremain 
Boris calls for a "full British Brexit". No halfway house, not just a bacon sarnie and a cuppa - the whole shebang!Now get on with delivering it! Support us at  
The day of the referendum result I walked from Dublin Castle in full #repealthe8th regalia.grey clouds gathered, an old man walking by said ‘god will smite us with storms and rain this summer for the sin we committed today’. best #irishsummer we’ve had in years!  
How do you reckon that?#PeoplesVote is informed democracy.Nobody is forcing anyone to change their mind by checking again before we Leave.If enough people still want Brexit now more info is available they'll vote for it. If they don't, why are we doing it?#PeoplesVoteMarch 
The North East voted to Leave, but will be the hardest hit by Brexit. North East based firms are either looking to leave the UK or have done no preparation for Brexit. The uncertainty has caused the dichotomy, it will crush the region. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
They rant about project fear, but the real project fear was the decade long attempt of the right-wing press to whip up fear and hate against the EU, immigrants and refugees. #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The modern Brexit-maddened Tory party in a nutshell. They’re not conservative, they’re not unionist, they’re not pro-business. What’s left except English jingoism?  
EU collapse:- UK: #Brexit- Greece: bankrupt- Slovenia: populist win- Sweden: anti-migrant party 1st in poll- Poland: judicial reform, anti-migrant gov't- Italy, Austria, Hungary, Czech, Denmark: anti-migrant gov't- Spain: independence Catalonia & Basque, looming elections  
It’s #IndependenceDay. The anniversary of our #Brexit vote two years ago. Just as a reminder, the areas in red on this map voted to leave the failing EU. #HappyIndependenceDay 
Was watching sky news interviews on #brexit a guy said he thought "Scotland was part of England".. Not the UK but of England.  Realised this guy isn't alone. It's how a lot of people think.      Scotland will never be seen as equals. #indyref2 
On my way to the #PeoplesVoteMarch on the 2 year anniversary of Brexit! Looking forward to addressing the crowd later! #PeoplesVote 
Two years on from the Brexit vote, I’m clear that London will always be open to the over 1 million EU citizens living in our city. #LondonIsOpen 
Foreign Secretary, Boris Johnson does it again with his ‘full British Brexit’ and ‘fuck business’ remarks. Quite frankly, I’m amazed Jeremy Corbyn cops more flack for Brexit than this clown. Perspective please.  #peoplesvotemarch pic.twitter.com/Utn7aMrgyU 
Last 48 hours summarised: we care about helping business except for when any of them put their heads above the parapet to weigh in on how the UK should leave the EU (but if they're praising the Govt's chosen #Brexit path it's ok) 
Region by region importance of Airbus to UK economy. No Brexit Dividend. Brexit disaster unless we wake up. March today  
Two years on, I’m still thrilled that we’re leaving the EU at the end of March 2019! Delighted that we passed the EU Withdrawal Bill this week, a massive step to delivering on Brexit, and we have huge opportunities ahead of us as we leave the EU!   
We know that a lot of people can't make it to the #PeoplesVoteMarch for medical, financial, family or other reasons. But you can sign the petition from your own armchair! Please do so, and let the public decide what they think of #Brexit negotiations! 
2 years ago UK growth was highest in EU, today it's the lowest. With more and more business threatening to move overseas today should be renamed We're All Paying For Stupid day.#Brexit 4 Dummies 
Johnson calls for 'full British Brexit' two years after referendumHe doesn't care that hundreds of thousands of jobs will go and people will lose their homes and families will be split apart. Just so long as Bellend Johnson can satiate his xenophobia  
23rd, TODAY #VictoriaStreet #Victoria #London 1pmSUPPORT FREEDOM OF SPEECHSUPPORT TOMMY - SUPPORT BREXIT#MBGA #UK #England #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit #FreedomOfSpeech #WorldCup @crusaderkeif @trotman_deirdre @NickRider20 @chels3CARES @GerardBattenMEP 
Anti-Brexit march to draw tens of thousands to London  
Wherever you stand on #Brexit that is pretty tragic.  
Two years since the Brexit vote and today we're marching to give YOU the final say on the deal. The Tories are making an absolute mess out of Brexit - the people deserve the option to #Exitfrombrexit 
The #FBPE cult is a hopeless cause. They won't listen to reason, they won't try and find common ground, they aren't interested in the Labour party's future or anything other than their utterly inflexible demands. Muting any who can't tell me how Labour can stop Brexit from now on 
Official confirmation that Brexit will leave us covered in shit.  
SIGN THE PETITION: we demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Cassette Boy VS BrexitFeaturing:- David 'on holiday' Cameron- Boris 'lies on the bus' Johnson- Theresa 'no hope' Mayand many more muppets...#brexit #peoplesvotemarch #brexitmeansbrexit 
This is an important and original piece of work on the cost of Brexit from @JohnSpringford. Our economy is about 2% smaller than it would have been without the referendum. @CER_EU 
"F*** business"EU diplomats shocked by Boris Johnson's 'four-letter reply' to business's Brexit fears at Foreign Office reception for Queen's birthday. 
The Brexit vote has already wiped £440 million a week from Britain's economy@FBPE @J_amesp @TheNewEuropean @acgrayling @carolecadwalla 
We just HAD to do this one... watch #LoveIsland's Hayley Hughes put her burning #Brexit questions to the BBC's Brussels reporter @adamfleming   
The @spikedonline article on #Brexit we published two years ago today, as voters went to the polls, had the headline: Why today is a great day for democracy.A very important read today, after two years of attacks on democracy from the political class:  
Today’s @peoplesvote_uk march will be the biggest protest London has seen in decades we cannot trust Tories or Labour on Brexit the people must decide jkib us #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Today a #PeoplesVoteMarch takes place.Never before have so many people democratically voted for anything, ever.They voted FOR Brexit. #RespectTheVote 
It's been two years since the brexit vote. Here is a definite list of everything we definitely know about brexit.1.2.3.4.5.6.7.8.9.10. yeah you might have fucked this up lads 
On the day Boris Johnson calls for a "Full British Brexit", this from Siemen's chief exec..."I think the realities are setting in and I think it is time to getaway from slogans, 'full British Brexit', 'going into combat with Europe'. It's all incredibly unhelpful" 
Why I loathe Brussels:"For me, referendum result was turning point I’d hoped for since 1979.The people had achieved what the politicians had failed to do.It’s a shame it took so long & so much damage was done before it came."#Brexit #EU via @MailOnline 
Today we march for a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal. To mark the occasion, we're launching a new petition, to show the government that we mean business. Please add your name and share far and wide. #peoplesvotemarch 
Here we go! @BHGreens @CarolineLucas w/ @BHforEU and @peterkyle have just boarded the train. On the way to #PeoplesVoteMarch to send a message from Brighton and Hove: Give people control, give people a say on the #Brexit deal!  
“Fuck business!” - our foreign secretary on the Brexit anxieties of UK PLC. The unsackable in pursuit of the unspeakable. pic.twitter.com/HMEpoEkKiG 
On this anniversary of the #Brexit vote, my thanks go to Britain for her generosity. Not just £40bn but your aerospace and motor industries as well.  #ThankYou 
Sugar cane is Belize's biggest export.Leave EU Official's Andy Wigmore was the Belizean trade envoy during the EU referendum. Why this has never been an issue is quite beyond me. Wigmore and Leave EU official were literally working in the interests of Belize not UK farmers.  
A full British Brexit is like a full English breakfast.Nobody quite knows what belongs in it, half the country would rather go continental and if it's not done properly it will make you sick. 
.@Femi_Sorry - Who signs a deal without seeing it first... a #PeoplesVote on the final #brexit deal is the only democratic way forward. People were promised a better deal & if the Govt doesn't deliver a better deal it should be up to the people to decide.#FBPE #PeoplesVoteMarch 
When even The Telegraph is reporting on how Brexit is a shit show propelled by the deluded, you know it is a total shit show. The penny has dropped.  
To those on the #PeoplesVoteMarch - remember who is in government.The only person with the power to call a 2nd referendum is Theresa May. 
Even the driver on our coach to #PeoplesVoteMarch thinks Brexit is the worse decision the country has made. 
Introducing _Wretched Strangers_ - eds. Agnes Lehoczky & @jtwelsch; presented two years since the UK Referendum on EU Membership, it celebrates the work of non-UK-born writers in solidarity through struggles ongoing and to come. Available to pre-order now:  
Going on the #PeoplesVoteMarch :)Less than 38% of those allowed to vote 2yrs ago chose Brexit when given the chance, & most thought they were making things better for Britain not worse.#PeoplesVote allows us all to confirm if we still want this path or not.#PowerToThePeople 
The Airbus "threat" taken apart.  They have neither the supply chain nor technology base to move. #emptythreat All part of the no change, #Remain strategy. #Brexit 
BBC reporting British ministers saying they are prepared to walk away from Brexit talks. This either a) Fox sounding off; b) a (stupid) bluff; or c) insanity. Regardless Fox, Johnson et al all make any deal far, far less likely.  
I see @BorisJohnson is waffling on about a “Full British Brexit” in the Sun this morning. As though a heaped plate of eggs & bacon is going to fix @BorderIrish & a business exodus? 
Going through with Brexit is like getting a tattoo on your forehead 18 months after half the pub said it'd be a really good idea. 
WTAF is a British Brexit - the word Brexit has the word Britain in it already FFS 
2016: “Brexit will provide more opportunities for business”2018:“Fuck business” pic.twitter.com/qM0S4oX6ye 
#FreeTommy 23rd, TODAY #VictoriaStreet #Victoria #London 1pmSUPPORT FREEDOM OF SPEECHSUPPORT TOMMY - SUPPORT BREXIT#MBGA #UK #England #FreeTommyRobinsonnow @crusaderkeif @trotman_deirdre @NickRider20 @chels3CARES @GerardBattenMEP @CaolanRob 
SCOOOOP from ⁦@JamesCrisp6⁩ “F*** business!” declares ⁦@BorisJohnson⁩ to EU ambo at an FCO reception, as he vents at CBI and others for frustrating clean Brexit dream. Cue head-shaking in Brussels.   
All the very best to everyone on the #PeoplesVoteMarch today. I hope it’s not hijacked by those whose raison d'être is to attack and damage Jeremy Corbyn. Brexit belongs entirely to the @CONservatives & they have shown, repeatedly, that Party always comes before people. 
Boris Johnson calls for 'full British Brexit' two years after referendum  
Happy Brexit Anniversary!   
You need to let people know what is going on... Get this TRENDING!!!Read now: #Brexit #FreeTommy #NigelFarage #PeoplesVoteMarch #FreeTommyRobinson #iamtommyrobinson #immigration #freedom #brexiters #marchforfreedom 
On way to the @peoplesvote_uk march on #Westminster with brilliant  campaigners from #Cardiff and across South Wales - it’s time to speak up against this reckless #Brexit and give people a say on the deal @WalesForEurope @Open_Britain #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Today I'm recording a film score so I'll miss the #PeoplesVoteMarch on #StopBrexitSaturday but I am with you in spirit  Apart from anything else the livelihoods of today's orchestra players are at risk from the impending calamity of Brexit.  
Today marks 2 years since Scotland voted clearly and decisively to remain within the European Union and this would be the best option for Scotland’s future. Find out how @scotgov is committed to #ProtectingWhatMatters throughout the #Brexit negotiations:  
23rd June 2016 - We Won BREXIT ⁦@Nigel_Farage⁩ ⁦@Arron_banks⁩ ⁦@andywigmore⁩ #IndependenceDay #Brexitmarch 
As Boris Johnson dismisses business concerns over Brexit with “fuck business”, here’s his more complete guide to who can and can't get fucked.#PeoplesVoteMarch pic.twitter.com/OjVucjKZ5I 
On train from Ketering - debating Brexit last night - for people’s vote march. Pall Mall at 12 noon. Do come! Your chance to make a big difference! We may divert to march through the BBC studios, so they don’t miss us and have to report it! 
WATCH: @vincecable will be speaking at the #PeoplesVoteMarch today on how Brexit is a big deal and not a done deal. Please RT:  
Dear UK, It's regulations on your paid holidays, maternity rights, safety at work @BorisJohnson is talking about 'busting out of'' after Brexit. Regards,Tom #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The only bog roll we need at the moment is one to clear up the disgusting mess being made by Boris and his mates #Brexit  
OVERWHELMING: 70% of Brits want EU immigration reduced post-Brexit, 73% want it cut to the tens of thousands, poll shows.It's time to take back control of UK borders. 
The only difference between a remainer and a brexiter is a cross on a piece of paper. I'm marching today for all of us, for my nation because realise it or not, Brexit will fail is all.#StopBrexitSaturday#FinalSayForAll 
Let’s all wish the @peoplesvote_uk an enjoyable march against Brexit today. They don’t get out much so it’s nice for them to get some exercise and fresh air. #careinthecommunity 
The No Deal Brexit is the only Brexit worth having. We offer the EU zero tariffs if reciprocated and we walk away. We keep our £40billion. We stop this embarassing "negotiation". We regain our National pride. Just. Walk. Away. 
Happy Brexit Day, everyone! Two years on, this is still one of the happiest moments of my life...  
Boris Johnson and his 'British Brexit' lies and buffoonery - I cannot imagine a worse role model in politics. See through the faux patriotism and look at the reality of the man. He is not funny, nor charming - he is a toxic, hair-brained pound shop Donald Trump. Make it stop. 
That Tory Brexit business plan in full: "Fuck business."  
Happy Independence Day OTD two years ago I cast my vote with the 17,410,742 who voted to Leave the EU.Britain voted for BrexitTo take back control of ourBordersLawsMoneyNow #LetsGetOnWithIt#Freedom 
BREXIT SHOCK: May is prepared to WALK AWAY and leave EU severly damaged, reveals Fox  
There is also a #FreedomMarch in favour of #Brexit in London today.@AMDWaters Leader of @ForBritainParty will speak at it.UK media will report on the #StopBrexit march but not the #ProBrexit march.Thee bias of the UK media is blatant. 
EU officials: “more than 50% chance the U.K. leaves with no deal” Splendid. No deal is precisely the Brexit I voted for #Brexit 
Tens of thousands of people set to take part in biggest anti-Brexit protest yet  
Two years after referendum 868,000 more people are in work,   stock market at all time high. So much for Project Fear 
Why @BBCr4today are you ignoring the pro #Brexit march where I’m speaking and @GerardBattenMEP? No wonder listeners are leaving in their thousands 
Wow!!! The Express got an exclusive with @DavidDavisMP and he said Brexit is going to be great. That is some scoop. Meanwhile @BorisJohnson warns against ‘bog roll Brexit’ in @TheSun as a way of deflecting from his Heathrow cowardice on Monday. GET THE BULLDOZERS OUT 
No, I weighed it up & thought, is the march going to be like-minded people who want the best for the many or will it be a load of neoliberals like you having a tantrum because you didn’t get your own way & enjoying using Brexit as a stick to beat Corbyn & thought nah #peoplesvote 
Can you imagine if Sturgeon launched Scottish Independence without a plan, failed to reach agreement with the UK then simply said “Fuck business!”. #brexit #indyref2 
Awake to jingoistic mind-rotting bollocks from Johnson, Fox and Davis and intellectually vacuous discussions of #Brexit on #r4today . These are some of the most depressing times of my life. 
Boris Johnson supported our EU membership until a few weeks before the EU referendum, then supported Brexit as a self-serving career move... What a ****  
"The Foreign Secretary was asked about the fears of some business leaders over Brexit and replied: “fuck business.””  
I’m changing my car next year. It’s currently a German vehicle. Interestingly, subconsciously into my psyche, there’s a thought crept in about not buying German again. I wonder if many others have had similar thoughts since the Brexit negotiations with the EU? 
Theresa May to business: "Hard Brexit is real. You should leave now!"  
Vince Cable - Public opinion is now moving.. people feel very strongly that #brexit is a mess. Whether you're for brexit or against it public opinion is now showing strongly that the public want a #PeoplesVote on the final deal.#StopBrexit #FBPE #peoplesvotemarch @vincecable 
Boris promises a “full British #Brexit”. Presumably meaning it seemed like a good idea at the time, we’ve over indulged and ultimately just increased our chance of an untimely cardiovascular death. 
I'll miss today's march but it's terrific to hear of so many happy people out today celebrating Brexit Day. 
Can't wait for @mattzarb to explain to @mjrobbins that Airbus are talking about the consequences of a no deal #Brexit, something Corbyn opposes but which Tory "rebel" Dominic Grieve made possible by voting against his own amendment. But yeah, by all means, blame Corbynites.  
“Fuck business”.  That’s just the attitude this country needs going into the challenging new post-Brexit world.  
I think we need a referendum so we can vote on whether to have a Full British Brexit, a People’s Brexit or a Red, White and Blue Brexit.  
Lovely morning! Have a great day, everyone Marching for Brexit, Tommy and FREEEDOM....thank you for representing me @ForBritainParty Stay safe everyone  
Petition for a #PeoplesVote just launched! Together with today’s massive march in London let us send a message that our politicians hear loud & clear. We demand a vote on #Brexit with the option to Remain. Please sign now! PeoplesVoteMarch  
Boris Johnson calls for 'full British Brexit' two years after referendum  
The state of this; “we lost so we want another vote”. The terms of the referendum we campaigned in promised to implement the result.  
Hate to say it but the vast majority of MPs in Labour & Conservative parties now complaining about a botched #Brexit voted for it when they waved through Article 50 knowing full well there was no plan or preparation done  
´Fuck business’ says the shameless @BorisJohnson who said #Brexit would deliver a huge economic boost.  
I wish all Europeans and British people a happy Brexit anniversary and an EU free future for all Europeans  
Lots of calls on back of Airbus/BMW intervention for rethinking of Prime Minister's Brexit red lines. But one red line more than any other is shaping Brexit - the desire to end Free Movement. That inevitably means Single Market membership is off table. 
The British public is not thick.We are not against democracy.But we lostSo we want another vote.No parliament can be bound by its predecessor.Nor can any electorate.Team Brexit can then push for a 3rd voteThat's politics.They might winIt's OKBut we want to fight it 
Thousands of people are set to march for a people's vote in London today, on the 2nd anniversary of the UK voting for Brexit. @TomSwarbrick1 asks: What would a second referendum achieve?  
Talking to @BBCBreakfast ahead of #PeoplesVoteMarch , @VinceCable points out that Brexit is not a done deal and the Conservatives’ chaotic negotiations mean there is a massive lack of clarity that is pushing major employers to leave the UK 
#PeoplesVoteMarch and rally is being discussed on BBC Breakfast TV. Earlier on Radio News. This is good. A vote on the deal and not a 2nd referendum. The BBC can't ignore us any longer. 
2 years ago the British people made the historic decision to leave the EU racket. I'd vote exactly the same way today; 3 or 4 times if i lived in Hackney.#Brexit#Leavethe4threich. 
Never give upNever shut upNever sit downNever back down.Never walk awayNever turn your faceNever stop shoutingNever stop caring.Never let them winNeverEverLet them win.#stopbrexit #peoplesvotemarch #fbpe #brexit #Torylies #democracy #IamEuropean  
Any Brexit supporter claiming there will be wrong sort of Brexit should be asked one simple question.Did you support sending Article 50 notification on or before 29 March 2017, when there was no evidence UK had done any preparation?For a botched Brexit was then unavoidable. 
Weather is perfect for marching!We shall have an amazing day of solidarity. We are on the front page of the BBC website. #PeoplesVoteMarch is already trending on twitter. Be part of it! Two years on from that dreadful referendum we claim back democracy. #PeoplesMarch 
Exclusive: "F*** business"EU diplomats shocked by Boris Johnson's 'four-letter reply' to business's Brexit fears at Foreign Office reception for Queen's birthday. 
Happy Brexit Day! How are you celebrating? #EUreferendum #twoyearslatersituationsuboptimal 
Good morning, Britain. Yesterday was the second anniversary of Boris Johnson's fascistic rallying cry to make 23 June our Independence Day. Instead of bunting for Brexit celebrations, we're having a #StopBrexitSaturday. Get over it, Brexiters, You're losing now. 
HAPPY BREXIT DAY!I am off to Gloucester to join the Brexit march there!Fly the flag and get outside to demonstrate your support for Brexit and also your frustration!GO !  GO !  GO ! 
If you are in London for the #PeoplesVoteMarch today, meet us outside the Royal Academy on Piccadilly for a photo at 11:00If you can’t be there, please retweet your support and help make our voices heard We will not be silenced. Brexit can and must be stopped   
Ahoy #Brexit Journalists: this is a huge story. Ask Boris Johnson etc what no deal would mean for a British qualified French doctor in Lyon or a British qualified British architect in Spain. Or are they the lucky ones who are going to do all that fruit picking? @BritishInEurope 
We, the undersigned, demand a People’s Vote on the Brexit deal. Please sign the petition   
There is no ‘Brexit dividend’. According to new CER analysis, Brexit is now damaging the public finances by £440 million a week.'What's the cost of Brexit so far?' by @JohnSpringford#costofbrexit#BrexitDividend 
We should stop trying to rerun the referendum and start fighting for the softest Brexit possible. 
Boris Johnson warns against 'bog roll Brexit'After two years and with so much at stake this is the best our foreign secretary has to offerThis is what happens when you hand over your future to charlatans#StopBrexit 
A #PeoplesVote is win win for Britain. If brexit supporters are right and we get a good deal, it will be accepted. If not, the peoole will reject it a bad one or no deal #brexit. Anyone against #PeoplesVote can only have their own agenda at heart. @peoplesvote_uk 
My 1-year-old daughter just asked: ‘Daddy if our #msm is so impartial, why are they all reporting the Anti-Brexit march, but didn’t cover the #FreeTommy one? I told her she was a racist bigot who didn’t know what was good for her. #PeoplesVote 
I don't want a "bog roll brexit", nor a huge jobbie Brexit, I just want no Brexit and my country and continent back. That's why I am demonstrating today. #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The 'Corbyn-can't-stop-Brexit-(but-he- really-wants-to-honest)' crew are strangely silent on why Labour won't back a #PeoplesVote despite knowing 66% of the electorate want one (excluding don't knows). 
A full British Brexit is indeed what we voted for. May has no intention of delivering it.   
MUST-READ: today were marching at the #PeoplesVoteMarch to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT: 
23 JUNE 2016It's depressing that the campaign to undermine Brexit is still being fought with such toxic intensity. So much damage has been done to Britain, not by the vote, but by the refusal of Remainers to accept it with Remainers still branding Leavers as uneducated racists.  
Yet you signed up to the withdrawal bill and your MPs abstained instead of 'Standing Up for Wales'.This is the result. A disastrous Brexit.Don't try to hide behind Nicola. You collapsed far too early because the Union is far more important to you than the people you serve.  
Even though many disagree with me on the proper way to eat crumble (cold with cream) and pork pie (brown sauce), we all agree #Brexit is a fucking disaster and that is why we are marching today in London. For your future, for your kids, for our country. #StopBrexit 
Best wishes to all who are celebrating today! Let's hope we can all come together again and move forward as a country again now! #independenceday #brexit #EUref 
Gentle reminder that TURKISH ELECTIONS TAKE PLACE TOMORROW! WHATEVER THE OUTCOME THE IMPLICATIONS FOR EUROPE ARE HUGE!! STOP OBSESSING ABOUT BREXIT FOR A DAY AND PAY ATTENTION TO EVENTS IN TURKEY!!Have a nice day. 
Thanks @JuliaHB1 for supporting a People's Vote on the Brexit deal!!! #PeoplesVoteMarch 
A good way of marking 2 years since the referendum would be for Boris Johnson, Jacob Rees-Mogg and co to go to the Airbus and BMW factories and explain to the workforce why they are so keen to keep open the option of no deal. It would be an interesting discussion. 
What's the cost of #Brexit so far?New analysis by the CER – estimates that the UK economy is 2.1% smaller as a result of the vote to leave the EU. The knock-on hit to the public finances is now £23 billion per annum – or £440 million a week#FBPE 
See you soon @Devon4EuropeFrom all over the UK, groups & also individuals are on their way to London for the #PeoplesVoteMarchIt's glorious weather, so join us at Pall Mall from 12 to march on Parliament & demand our voices be heard on #BrexitIt's OUR turn to make history!  
Today we march for freedom, justice, peace and democracy.For our fellow EU Citizens in the UK and for UK Citizens in the EU.To show the govt that ANY kind of Brexit is illegal, unacceptable and utterly insane.Today we march to #StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Britons favour second Brexit vote by 23 point margin  
Teereza’s Tory English Brexit Breakfast  
An essay on poetry and Brexit, ahead of the publication of @jtwelsch and Ágnes Lehóckzy’s Wretched Strangers. @bhousepress 
Anti-Brexit march to draw tens of thousands to London  
TODAY!! 23rd JuneJoin the largest ever demonstration of its kind, the #PeoplesVoteMarch, to demand that we, the people, are given a vote on the #Brexit deal.12pm, Pall Mall, LondonSee you there! 
"the Prime Minister now realises that no deal is not an option at all.Leaving us with two: a Brexit that is economically ruinous and one that, essentially, equates to membership without the perks."Indeed.#Brexitshambles 
2 years ago 17.4 million people took part in a real #PeoplesVote . We marched to our polling stations and voted for change. For 2 years we've been called racist, ignorant and stupid and that we can't have change by all the powers that be. Decision made. Time to implement #Brexit  
I’ll be speaking later at the #PeoplesVoteMarch in London...come down! Pall Mall, London. 12. #PeoplesVote#Brexit  
I've estimated the cost of Brexit so far in this new analysis for @CER_EU  GDP loss: 2.1%Cost to public finances: £440m a week 
Nawaz Sharif is trying to turn the impending election into a referendum on his treatment by the generals  
The Big Bang made London. Brexit could undo it  
Like many people, today is my first march. The divisive narrative of Brexit does not represent this country. There is strength in unity.  I'm British, I'm European and I'm proud to walk with each and every one of you today.   #StopBrexitSaturday 
Brexit: Campaigners to demand new vote in London march - We’re headlining ⁦@BBCNews⁩ ! Join us today ⁦@Labour4EU⁩ #StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Yay! #PeoplesVoteMarch is already on the BBC News website.What they will realise is that this is not just 'campaigners' but all kinds of people who have never protested against Brexit before.Today is the day we all march for a #PeoplesVote on the deal. 
A global-facing, outward-looking post-Brexit UK."Patrick Minford and his team of economists on Free Trade, have calculated that there will be a #BrexitDividend of £135 billion,just between 2020 and 2025, & a further £40 billion a year from then on." 
Brexit was about immigration.Trump's victory was about immigration.Recent elections in France, Hungary, Poland, and Italy all pushed back against immigration.Obama, Hillary, Schumer, all recently ran against illegal immigration.Today's Democrats must really want to lose. 
Wow @BBCNews is reporting the #PeoplesVoteMarch ! BBC News - Brexit: Campaigners to demand new vote in London march  
Anti-Brexit campaigners who want the public to have the final say on Brexit will take to the streets later to argue it is "not a done deal".  #PeoplesVoteMarch  
#Brexit is going to be "fantastic" for the UK economy and Theresa May is going to do a "good deal" with BrusselsDavid Davis, the Brexit Secretary says Britain is at an advantage because English is "the best language in the world for doing commerce, science & medicine & so on".  
Since 1973 we've been under the heel of the EU dictatorsTwo years ago today we voted to get our freedom back at last.It's taken far too long but we'll finally #Brexit on 29/3/19.If the Tories don't deliver the Brexit we voted for,then we will have to vote in a Gov that will. 
#NigelFarage: "The #referendum wasn't about #economics. The referendum was about 'Do we want to govern our own country, Yes or No?'. That is the fork in the road this government has been told to follow & at the moment they're not doing it!"  #BBC #SKY #LBC 
Great to see Philip McCann discussing his research on the regional  impact of Brexit on @BBCNewsnight  - about evidence not conjecture! 
Full text @Jacob_Rees_Mogg Vision for post-Brexit BritainPragmatic but also inspirational.#quote "Trump said..'I will ALSO offer you complete FREE TRADE if you reciprocate’. We should grab that opportunity because it could lead to such economic dynamism" 
#StopBrexitSaturdayBrexit: Campaigners to demand new vote in London march  
Carey Mulligan is astounding in BOYS & GIRLS, owning the stage for just under two hours in a witty, perceptive and ultimately devastating performance that feels like a referendum on a collapsing society finally looking in the mirror. Helluva way to set the stage for WILDLIFE.  
Any past US president in would be working with Britain, and our other allies to punish Russia for Brexit, as well as US election rigging. But not @realDonaldTrump ... he is completely in bed with the dictator. 
#StopBrexitSaturday Tens of thousands of people set to take part in biggest anti-Brexit protest yet!   
#EEA #BrexitEfta/EEA countries:- only take on trade regulation, not all EU law- have a seat at the top-table WTO where the regulations originate in the first place- have control over budget contributions to european programmes- have strong powers to regulate migration issues  
Trump has many surface ties to the Brexiteers. He has met with Banks and the nationalist leader Nigel Farage. He has echoed their rhetoric and even their cause, labeling himself “Mr. Brexit.” More revealing is the pattern of similarities below the surface  
It will be great to see everyone at the #PeoplesVote, bravely campaigning against democracy. Please join me next week when I'll be campaigning against Sadiq Khan's appointment, last week's lottery numbers, and the result of the Battle of Hastings. #Brexit 
Both a no deal Brexit and the Government’s non-SM, non-CU Brexit plans taken apart in just two pages.  
#Brexit: an idealogical clusterfuck premised on post imperial delusion....is what Airbus, Siemens, BMW, Jaguar Land Rover, Honda, Nissan, Toyota etc..actually meant. 
"As the plot in the United States is slowly exposed, a remarkably similar one in the United Kingdom is quickly surfacing. Lies, secret meetings with Russians, covert financing, social-media bots. Putin did the same thing in Brexit as he did with Trump."  
Tom: We need a brand strategy to encourage UK trade after Brexit, because things aren't looking too great at the moment.Jake: Slap a union flag on everything & call it GREATTom: But Scotland already has a distinctive brand...Jake: The British government said to ignore that.  
Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson says people will not tolerate a "bog roll Brexit" that is "soft, yielding and seemingly infinitely long" 
Reminder to women living in a post referendum world: you can walk away from men that you don’t want to talk to. 
This is the Brexit you voted for. Shit isn’t it. 
Really intrigued by the Airbus worker who simultaneously rejects any possibility of scaremongering - "the reality is companies are folding before Brexit has even happened" - but is still happy he voted Leave.  
2 years ago today: a new dawn broke, did it not? #EURef #Brexit  
German business chiefs fear economic disaster of 'disorderly Brexit'  
If you are pro #Remain...join in with #FBPE...Why?'Cos it's working..if it weren't the far left & right would be ignoring us.#FinalSay in the Autumn with a #StopBrexit option to Confirm if the Will of the Ppl is still to #Brexit or now to end this #BrexitShambles & #Remain 
RT if your mates who support Brexit do so because they 'Think' or they 'Believe' without any logical argument and seem a bit ( alot ) thick 
I don't think there should be a second referendum. I think brexit should be scrapped. 
Support for leaving has declined notably in the two years since the Brexit vote  
EU WILL LOSE: Britain heading for ‘fantastic’ future as UK WON'T make Brexit concessions  
The holes are starting to show in the country's economyTaking apart and remaking  the fabric  of 40 years ....in 2 years..#Brexit is madness.  
After all the scaremongering from the 'Better Together' lot, during the Scottish Independence Referendum - it seems that an Independent Scotland (in the EU) is in fact, the only way of keeping these companies on these shores!...  #indyref2 #ScotRef #DissolveTheUnion 
My predictions are always wrong so I hope this one is: Theresa May holds another referendum in which the options are hard Brexit or no Brexit. Hard Brexit wins and all the people who campaigned for a second referendum wish they hadn’t. 
Well, that’s Brexit sorted!  
Cutting off our nose to spite our face with Brexit isn’t working.If MPs won’t make a decision on the Brexit deal, let the people do so.Hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
I agree it is time for do or die. Either Scotland accepts English #Brexit & thereafter total domination by England or we light the "Fiery Cross" & declare rebellion!  
The Labour Party has the opportunity to offer this country leadership out of Brexit. We can respect the opinion of those who voted in the referendum, stay in the single market and enforce the rules of conditionality. Have we the guts to do it? 
The rhetorical devices of the Leave campaign are trotted out daily by BBC journalists as if they are still reporting on a referendum campaign. Asking the boss of Airbus if their own analysis of a no deal Brexit is 'just project fear again' is tabloid territory pathetic. 
I know we're just yelling this into the void at this point, but if you're gonna cover Mexican elections: THEY AREN'T A REFERENDUM ON TRUMP! Almost every voter I've spoken to has listed the economy and violence as their top issues(Here's a quick primer: ) 
THE FIGHT BEGINS.Scotland's Brexit Minister says Holyrood will not give consent to any further Brexit legislation until the devolution system is fixed 
Brexit has already cost the U.K. more than its EU budget payments, a study shows  
If Brexit is a bog roll it’s Izal. Hard, uncomfortable and all it does is spread shit everywhere 
Airbus, BMW, farmers today coming out with Brexit reality ..  rhetoric failing as reality takes over  
Irish prime minister rejects Theresa May’s Brexit customs back-stop plan  
The #PeoplesVote say there's no such thing as a jobs-first Brexit.Yes there is.Read what #Airbus says on an Orderly Brexit.Either we engage with this & work to protect jobsOR we trot out 'I told you so' gratuitously from sidelines. I'm for the former. 
The People were sold a fantasy #Brexit. Brexit will destory British Jobs. Now the reality is hitting home it is the patriotic duty of us all, if we voted Leave or Remain, to #StopBrexit 
BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warning - BBC News  
Aerospace giant Airbus warned that the 'severe negative consequences' of Brexit could force it to leave Britain entirely — which would put 15,000 UK jobs at risk. Read more:  
And hold the mirror up to ourselves. The Labour Party’s red lines on Brexit need to be re-addressed. We need to be in the single market and customs union. Stop the crap.  
This is the kind of conspiracy theory about #FBPE coming from a noisy minority of Corbyn's supporters, reminding us it is not only rabid nationalism that is echoing the genocidal politics of the 20th century, it is also a resurgent politics of leader-worship. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
If there was ever a "Statue of Brexit"  it would have engraved on the plinth: "give me your narrow minded,  your delusional and your liars"March with us tomorrow...let's stop to this madness. #PeoplesVote #FinalSayForAll #StopBrexit 
Don't get lost in the Remainers Brexit fog. With around 1 in 5 cars built in Germany being sold in the UK, it's easy to see why BMW is so keen on frictionless UK borders and zero tariffs. 
Tomorrow I will be marching in the #PeoplesVoteMarch - the second time I have marched this year, the second time I have ever marched.The consequences of #Brexit are huge. We all deserve a #FinalSayOnTheDeal 
Catalan President Quim Torra gives monarch two reports and a book about police violence during the referendum  
*Brexit Explained*  
The Brexit vote has already wiped £440 million a week from Britain's economy — @CER_EU  
I don't believe May & the Brexiter elite have any #Brexit negotiating strategy, not even a 'threaten to blow your foot off' strategy.  The Government's inability to agree amonsgt themselves, makes the case for a #PeoplesVote leading to an #Exitfrombrexit , even stronger. 
BREAKING: BREXIT ALREADY COSTING THE PUBLIC FINANCES £440M A WEEK - new analysisModelling by @JohnSpringford & @CER_EU finds economy already 2.1% weaker than it would have been without Brexit.Hit to the public finances is £23bn a year. 
Yes. Inadvertently apt metaphor by Boris. Can have bog roll Brexit or his alternative, which is wiping your arse with your hand.  
BMW issues Brexit warning one day after Airbus Wow, that is absolutely AMAZING. It's almost like it's being coordinated. Who'd have thunk it eh ! 
The Airbus situation has now made UK Gov show its hand that the No Deal scenario is the bluff we always knew it was. #Brexit 
Most companies have hidden their plans to scale down & relocate during the transition period in order not to scare staff & reduce share prices. They now realise it’s time to speak out or watch UK self-destruct in Brexit  
Tick tock - The rest of the world has realised that there's something very odd about the Brexit vote....  
#Newsnight has stumbled across the knowledge that our manufacturing areas have the most to lose from Brexit. Finally the penny drops. It's the UK's financial industry that wants freedom from EU regulation and thinks it has the most to gain. 
More UK businesses have spoken up against the prospect of a hard Brexit: 'The implications for the British economy [of a 'no deal' Brexit] are very, very severe'  
#newsnight Peter Bone is a cretin! It's frightening that such a dim fucker could get elected as a MP. Hasn't occurred to the stupid sod that we're still in the EU so we haven't yet suffered the impact of Brexit! 
"I don't want a bog-roll Brexit, I want a Brexit where we stay covered in our own shit." pic.twitter.com/DFmDc4kHRE 
Dacre & the right-wing press have not introduced fascism into the UK, but they have injected several key fascist ideas into our political culture. And if there were a grave economic crisis in the next few years, fascist politics would find fertile ground in which to grow.#Brexit 
ITV News at Ten reported there is to be an anti #Brexit march in London tomorrow. No mention of any other marches. @itvnews total misrepresentation, completely untrustworthy, biased and useless. 
'Within minutes of a vote for Brexit the CEO’s of Mercedes, BMW, VW and Audi will be knocking down Chancellor Merkel’s door demanding that there be no barriers to German access to the British market.' - David Davis, Feb 2016  
Risk assessment Airbus provides update on impact of Brexit No Deal/Deal scenarios#newsnight 
what is also true tbf is that over the next decade plenty of chief executives will blame Brexit for an array of self-inflicted or random problems and it won’t always be possible to separate cause and effect 
Boris: 'We will have the freedom to bust out of the corsets of EU regulation and rules - to do things our way, to make the most of British leadership in the growth sectors of tomorrow. #Brexit is the chance to turbo charge those capabilities"  
I voted against Article 50 as Brexit will destroy jobs. Some biz leaders not speaking out as “don’t want to scare staff”. Shouldn’t bosses tell workers their jobs are at risk from any Brexit, hard or “soft”?  
BBC News's latest anti-Brexit report 'forgot' to mention that Airbus is part-owned by the governments of France, Germany and Spain - and gets EU funding.  #Brexit 
Great stuff from @BorisJohnson - fighting back against the orchestrated campaign by big business to overturn the Brexit the electorate voted for.  
Philosopher Karl Popper warned that the tolerant must claim the right not to tolerate the intolerant, for to give the intolerant unlimited tolerance is to risk the destruction of a tolerant society. Foolishly we have tolerated Paul Dacre.  #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Boris to mark the referendum anniversary. by warning May not to deliver a 'bog roll #Brexit' that is 'soft, yielding and infinitely long'. He adds: 'Across the country I find people...just want us to get on and do it. They don’t want a half hearted Brexit'  
BREAKING: @BorisJohnson warns @theresa_may off a “BOG ROLL BREXIT” - voters “don’t want some bog roll Brexit - soft, yielding and seemingly infinitely long.”  
BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warningYet you won't find many companies reliant on Govt contracts protesting, funnily enough.Because #Brexit is now a shibboleth and, if a company doesn't support Brexit, it won't be winning that contract.#StopBrexit#FBPE 
Remember David Davis? “There are no downsides to Brexit, only upsides”? Simpler, happier times.....#BMW #Airbus. 
Airbus.  BMW.  Unipart.  Any others?  Is the penny beginning to drop that #Brexit is going to be an absolute disaster for the UK and, most of all, us plebs?Or are we all still falling for this no deal is better than a bad deal pish? 
So have @Airbus timed their #Brexit warning to divert attention from the fact that they’ve been receiving illegal subsidies from the beacon of virtue that calls itself the #EU?  
Boris takes on Brexit again in the Sun with some very funny lines  
Friend: “If you replace Prince William with Michel Barnier, that’s how the PM is currently conducting the Brexit negotiations.”  
#Airbus VP Katherine Bennett now retweeting Labour Kier's negative Remain propaganda. She was happy to support the PM Theresa May manifesto to deliver #Brexit when she was on the Conservatives Party Parliamentary candidates list & going for seat selections for last years election  
OMFG: Nigel Farage > "Brexit done badly will leave us in a worse position than we were in before, Brexit on its own isn't some magic cure."... We always said they'd say it's the Remainers Fault.  
1. Brexit can't be "done well" - it's damage limitation at best.2. The hard right are preparing the ground for "stab in the back" narrative and new party. 
Worked for 12 years in automotive & for 10 years in aerospace. They employ hundreds of thousands directly & in the supply chain.Full hard Brexit will destroy these sectors in the UK forever. It's not a price that anyone should be willing to pay.#PeoplesVoteMarch#StopBrexit 
Dunno why there's no retweet option so will post clip.  Happy Independence Day, UK, June 23rd.@DavidJoBrexit #BrexitFrom your friends in #USA #WWG1WGA 
Someone tell him that brexit means Siemens' wind-turbine factory in Hull will relocate to the European mainland. You can't nationalise the "talent", the intellectual property, the servers, the training. So it's goodbye not only to aerospace, it's also goodbye wind power.  
March with us @jeremycorbynMarch for the aerospace workers, march for the car workers, march for whole industries threatened by Brexit.“They must not be sent down the road. The industry must not be destroyed, and we will make sure it is not destroyed” 
So the Kipper/Tories and the Boy Wonder Trots are demanding Airbus be nationalised because they warned Brexit will force them to leave.Proving to us all that the bit of the horseshoe theory where the gap is joined is a lake of pure undiluted fucking stupid.Morons.. 
Nigel Farage on Brexit in June 2016: "The worst case possible scenario is better than where we are."Nigel Farage today: "Brexit done badly will leave us in a worse position." 
Seriously. Watch the whole interview & then call me on Monday to explain why he’s not a lying, racist shitweasel who is not about to launch a lying, racist, shitweaselly attempt to claim that the Brexit disaster has nothing to do with him & his lying, racist shitweaselry.  
The message that despite Brexit, #LondonIsOpen to trade & talent is one I was proud to take to India last year with a delegation of businesses to the cities of Mumbai, Delhi & Amritsar. And it's one I'm proud to share tonight at the UK-India Awards tonight. #UKIndiaWeek2018  
I went to LabourLive and I tried to ask Shadow Chancellor John McDonnell about the number of people wearing Bollocks to Brexit stickers. Instead of answering my question he said this... The full tale is on this week’s podcast:  
Thanks to @carolecadwalla 's reporting we're seeing a pattern of collusion with Russia in Britain (over Brexit) that closely resembles the Trump campaign's over here.  
Ah, how easily the lies flow. What about Nissan, Toyota, Airbus, Pfizer, city of London and thousands of others, jobs created to serve the EU single market and jobs which Davis’s Brexit will destroy. They just can’t stop lying  
Having screwed us on Brexit, May now turns her attention to our military, threatening to downgrade them to a defence force so we become dependent upon the EU for defence. Of course she will claim she is doing this to save money. We are getting nowhere with this mistake. 
And another one.... ‘BMW joins Airbus in warning over potential impact of Brexit.’ #BMW #Airbus #BrexitChaos 
Thoroughly enjoyed @BBCAnyQuestions - some fantastic organised gammon heckling at the back but some coming on the @peoplesvote_uk march tomorrow and overall mood definitely against Brexit 
Catalan president gives the king of Spain two reports by the Ombudsman and a book on the police violence during the independence referendum (Photo: @govern) 
I'll be joining what is likely to be the biggest public demonstration since the Iraq war tommorow. I'll be there for every #RemainerNow who wants a #FinalSay. We must have a #PeoplesVote to validate brexit. 
Tomorrow's front page: Welcome to Brexit ... two years on, Jacob's getting exactly what he wants and we're all suffering. Second anniversary special.  
Biggest employers reveal the Emperor has no cloths before we all die of Brexit cold. #PeoplesVote 
Before the opening ceremony of the Mediterranean Games the Catalan president has given the Spanish King two very special gifts: a report by the Catalan Ombudsman on police violence in the referendum and a book with images of the violence committed by the Spanish police.  
The Brexit holes are getting bigger every week...sorry every day and when they go, they've gone. bye bye..they wont be back for a very very  long time if ever!Britain is sinking F A S T!please retweet  
Best part of 300,000 jobs announced today are under threat if we continue with Brexit and not a word from Comrade Jobs First Brexit.Not.....a.........word...... 
Fell off my seat when I seen this  @theresa_may @arlene @bbceastenders #dot #nick #BrexitShambles #brexit #indyref2 
Let's just have all 'Brexit-related' industrial threats coughed up now so that some rough sums can be done and we lower business taxes and our EU divorce payment accordingly. By month's end, say. 
#BREAKING Catalan president gives the king of Spain two reports by the Ombudsman and a book on the independence referendum  
I’m old enough to remember when the Govt had a fabulous Brexit plan but it was a secret and they couldn’t tell us about it because if it got out the negotiations would fail. 
BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warning: is Industry finally finding its voice?  
C’mon finally admit it #brexiteers ... we won’t judge.  My dad is the ultimate brexiteer from Thanet, he met @Nigel_Farage & exulted him above all else ... but now ... finally in private ... my step dad admits that Brexit is a total mess 
Siemans...15,000 jobs....another Brexit warning.  
Tomorrow marks the 2nd anniversary of the single biggest act of self sabotage by an advanced country in the post war era. Even Nigel Farage is making his excuses. I'll be on the streets of London demanding a #PeoplesVote on a referendum on the deal and I hope you'll be there too 
The impact of Brexit could be “devastating”, says creative industries’ trade union.More and more unions are concerned about the potentially “devastating” impact of Brexit on workers’ rights and jobs. March tomorrow for a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
Under the European model of crony capitalism, political and business elites are often as thick as thieves. Project Fear must be understood in this context.  #Brexit 
CLINTON OUT! Hillary wades in on Brexit in Ireland but is met with furious PROTEST  
The damm has broken ...BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warning.#PeoplesVote  
TOMORROW is the anti-Brexit march calling for a vote on the final deal in London. Will you be marching in the large Liberal Democrat group on the march? @OpenBritain #peoplesvote  @LibDems @catherinemep @VC4PM 
Remember this?"There were cheers of jubilation as Vote Leave came out top in Flintshire"This is where they make Airbus wings.Hopefully the people of Flintshire can now understand how damaging #Brexit is and join us in London tomorrow! 
Britain being dumb enough to vote to leave European Union, its biggest trading bloc and ally .. This is what has made Russia happy. #Brexit  
James, I've worked in the Motor industry for the last 25 years in both U.K. And Ireland and be in no doubt, any brexit is mental but a hard and obtuse one is f@cking suicidal ... #the end  
1/ I suspect that the reasonableness of Remainers is at once a virtue & a huge handicap. I think it makes politicians feel that they can safely trample all over us. If we looked a lot more angry & volatile I think they would pay us considerably more attention.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
And so it begins. Airbus, Nissan, Toyota, BMW and many more to come...Brexit bonus? AYE RIGHT!   BBC News - BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warning  
More bad news from the real world.  How is that Brexit dividend going?  
Airbus has very close links to the French, German and Spanish governments, which are major shareholders in the firm. The EU and four of its member countries provided billions of dollars in subsidised financing to Airbus:  #Brexit 
According to 13 polls over the last 18 months, no you don't appear to be turning it around Pam. Latest here say's 48% don't want a second referendum, against 38% who do.. 
Statistically, about 52% of those who voted and belong to these companies now see their jobs threatened. Many polls have shown people didn't think they'd be personally affected negatively by Brexit. So there's a starting narrative i think - Project Fear was real. 
Couldn’t have said it better  #Brexit #LeaveEU 
Reality is finally biting. I am very keen to establish the circumstances in which good & decent people who voted for Brexit can recant without being blamed, abused or insulted. I would welcome advice on how best to achieve this.  
Brilliant to see three more Labour CLP's pass motions calling for @UKLabour to support a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal.We'll be raising our flags to @EdPentlandsCLP @WatfordLabour and Chelsea & Fulham CLP at the #PeoplesVoteMarch  We are @Labour4EU, we are @Remain_Labour 
Come on labour, more than three quarters of us don’t want Brexit.What are you playing at ?  
Science is a fundamentally collaborative & global enterprise & the UK should seek arrangements that create the lowest possible barriers to practising scientists seeking to move across borders #TogetherScienceCan #Brexit  
Tens of thousands of people set to take part in biggest anti-Brexit protest yet  
British business has been far too quiet for too long on Brexit - @FinancialTimes View welcomes Airbus’ decision to speak out about the challenges ahead and encourages others to do the same  
It's almost like this whole #Brexit thing is bad for trade and investment. Who knew? 
Did Jason Kenney have a referendum when he helped choose this current equalization formula as a senior minister in the Stephen Harper government? It sure sounds like Jason Kenney thinks Jason Kenney is an idiot. Right @jkenney? #cdnpoli #cdnecon #ableg 
I have learned today that I was an extremist for opposing brexit. I was also called an extremist for opposing disability benefit cuts. The commonality between the 2 is rights, upholding rights, fighting for rights, putting rights at the centre of all what we do 
Corbyn's Brexit pledge is holding out. He said not one job would be lost because of it.He's bang on. By my reckoning, 200,000 and counting is definitely not one. 
'Hardly surprising!' Farage slams Airbus for making Brexit threat after EU hands it £16bn  
 Unlike SNP MPs we know that @NaeFear doesn’t need to read from a, Nicola Sturgeon approved, script. As an SNP grandee his intervention is significant. There is NO Brexit power grab only manufactured grievance. Read what he has to say here  
Airbus said today it would have difficulty moving parts & components across borders after Brexit. It didn’t explain how it currently moves its parts across all global borders under WTO rules. WTO rules apply to most global movements. The EU is small beer compared with WTO.  
Remind me, which business sectors in the UK benefit from #Brexit? 
Brexit is a wonderful thing and Brits should take pride in it, says Brendan O’Neill:  
More UK businesses join Airbus lead on hard Brexit warning  
A former leader of London's financial district believes Britain unlikely to get generous access to the European Union financial market after Brexit, resulting in a loss of 75,000 jobs & 10 billion pounds ($13.2 billion) in tax revenue   
U.S. Ambassador Johnson; "To see this defeatist attitude towards Brexit is a bit startling to me."“How can a country with this great a history, this great a language, this great a legal system and this great a presence not be successful?”Answer: Theresa May. 
EU subsidised Airbus:If UK doesn't get a Brexit deal then Airbus moving production to US or ChinaLast time I checked both US & China *not* in the EU or EU customs union either.Proves once again EU will do anything to put politics before people... 
‘Tens of thousands of people are expected to descend on Westminster for an anti-Brexit demo on Sat to mobilise public opinion in favour of a referendum on the final deal’#PeoplesVote 
John Major is absolutely right on #BrexitDifficult to comprehend how Conservative party of which Major, Heseltine & Patten were leading lights has changed to where many are dogma-driven, xenophobic populists.Frankly I'm surprised they're prepared to remain associated with it.  
Anti-Brexit march to draw tens of thousands to London  
Politicos going into meltdown over Airbus statement trying to repudiate it are quite revealing. Why so concerned if you're that confident in the current #Brexit course? Just ignore and move on 
‘Not project fear, just dawning reality’. This stark warning from Airbus is proof positive of why an #EEA-based #Brexit has always been the only viable option. It is vital and urgent that both the govt + leadership of my own Party now hear this message.  
Brexit proper will be due to happen on January 1st,  2021—fully four and a half years after the referendum  
I haven’t actually seen any of these anti-Brexit “youth movements“ do much. All I’ve seen is the same few people appearing on the media and staging stunts with hardly any activists. Is it really a movement? 
Looks a lot like Russia provided a huge chunk of the seed money for the Brexit campaign. I’ll raise the question again: Trump spent $66 million of his own on his campaign. Did Trump, who stiffed Cohen for months on $130K, have $66M cash lying around? 
Airbus, Project Fear and the truth about a no deal Brexit  
Two things should worry everyone. First, that Brexit is not what we were told it would be. Second, that government is simply not interested. Ministers are fanatical about Brexit now. Evidence, concerns, suggestions can go hang.  
The Remainers aren’t giving up easily in their quest to block Brexit.They continue their attacks on us but we will keep on battling for what the people voted for! Help us carry on the fight!   
Great column. The similarities between Trump and Brexit, as well as National Front in France all follow similar pattern - that’s because they are all part of the same Russian effort.  
To be fair, I'm not sure even @johnredwood takes @johnredwood seriously anymore. He is now a man who gets paid to advise rich investors to take their money out of Britain while insisting to the Brexit voters he helped to con that our economy is booming.  
New podcast: @JamesDelingpole is joined by @LowTaxChloe for a chat on tariffs, Brexit, , political correctness in Australia, and Trump.Listen here: Subscribe on iTunes:  
Now @BMW joins the growing chorus with serious warning about the course the Government is pursuing on #Brexit - these are *real* jobs and livelihoods at risk  @Open_Britain @peoplesvote_uk @WalesForEurope 
John redwood was threatening industry before the referendum if they spoke up against brexit  
Wear more clothes than you own. Borrow a box of fashion to wear all month long. Plans start at $79/month. Introducing the new way to shop. 
READ: my comments for @FT @PickardJE on how other companies like @Airbus @BMW are expressing “Abject frustration” on #Brexit and are “increasingly scathing about both the course the government is on and the complete lack of clarity” @Open_Britain 
If, as Nigel says:Brexit done well = richer UK & Brexit done badly = poorer UKIs that not a solid rationale for a #PeoplesVote where the public can judge whether they what the Brexit the Govt offer?  
Thank you for writing about this. American media haven't given this shocking story proper attention. Russian goldmines for Brexit's biggest financial backer? Who lied about his meetings with Russians? Huge. 
BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warning. Enough said#PeoplesVoteMarch  
READ: Following on from Airbus' announcement this morning, the car giant BMW warns of the adverse consequences of Brexit. Please RT:  
If we aren't careful, Brexit will finish what Thatcher started. 
I'm going to March for a People's Vote and demand a say on the Brexit deal - sign up and join me on June 23rd  #PeoplesVote 
Oh god, I do love @mrjamesob’s way with words. Smack bang on the nose. #brexit #stopbrexit #fbpe #peoplesvote #ukpolitics #uk @The3Million 
OMG and suddenly the Brexiters realise that the experts warnings are true. I think reality is about to bite big time and that’s just the beginning of the Brexit avalanche. Now watch as they all start blaming the EU and immigrants. 
BMW warns against Brexit. ......8,000 jobs....  
Will #Brexit be an economic and political disaster? Yes says Airbus. No says @sammywilsonmp. Mind at rest. 
Bloody Hell. Who’s next?“The car giant BMW has followed plane maker Airbus in warning of the adverse consequences of Brexit.”  
Dear @PureGymCharingX I have just cancelled my membership but can I still come in and use the gym when I want without any further cost? Am just using @theresa_may ‘s template for #Brexit - thanks Janey 
Just a quick reminder - the unfolding disaster that is the "U"K economic outlook is *exactly* what disaster caitalists WANT - a disaster they can exploit and profit from. #Brexit isn't  an accident.@BrexitBin @MarieAnnUK @terrychristian @JolyonMaugham @abcpoppins @Keir_Starmer 
... and among the more hilarious reactions: a conservative MEP proposed nationalisation (you read that right, a Tory going full Venezuela) and an MP wants assurances from the government that Brexit won’t have negative effects (how should they do that?) 
They've also been informed that criticising Brexit (i.e. "telling the truth") would be viewed very unfavourably when Government contracts and/or subsidies are being awarded. I have this on *impeccable* authority.  
I genuinely cannot deal with this level of stupid. #Brexit  
Airbus leaving the UK need not happen.Nicola should announce the intent to hold a referendum on leaving the UK but staying in the EU within the next 2 years (or whatever)Maybe some of these huge companies would support an independent Scotland as an easy place to relocate too. 
Government minister hides leading role with hard Brexit group@SteveBakerHW breaks ministerial rules forbidding membership of parliamentary groups, or the offer of formal support to pressure groups dependent on government funding#Brexitgate 
.@JackLopresti on yesterday's mtg @AirbusintheUK:  Despite making £4bn last yr they requested more Govt support & invited PM to open new facility. "At no point was Brexit mentioned by Airbus. Airbus seem to be in a state of confusion about their position."  
Every MP that voted to trigger A50 knowing there was no plan in place shares responsiblity for Brexit job loses. No exception. No excuses. 
Businesses now queuing up - somewhat belatedly-  to urge the UKGov to get its Brexit finger out. If they won't take Remainers seriously they'd better pay attention to major employers. 
For two long years all I've heard is project fear from brexiteers, I've heard not one benefit of #Brexit apart from we're taking back control, which we've always had, ffs Airbus is now proving what remain said all along, but tory ideology will destroy us, thank god I'm leaving. 
TOMORROW!! June 23rdJoin the #peoplesvotemarch to demand a #peoplesvote on the #Brexit deal. 12pm, Pall Mall, London.Come dressed as a lion or a unicorn if you so wish! 
Local politician hates policy he had a hand in creating. Promises to hold pointless referendum that cannot change policy he had a hand in creating. ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ #ableg 
Now BMW joins Airbus in warnings over Brexit. Any voter who believes government’s vapid platitudes should be in no doubt that jobs and prosperity will melt away. Brexit is a luxury for the rich and privileged 
Ben Jennings ‘In the event of crashing out of the EU, adopt the Brexit Brace Position’ - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  This week's @theipaper cartoon... #Airbus #Brexit  
Today’s warning from Airbus is not project fear –it is economic reality. Jobs & investment are being put at risk because of the Govt's chaotic &confused approach. The truth is clear to see: a no-deal, hard Brexit would cause irreparable harm to British biz  
Spectacular legal analysis from UN expert @Alfreddezayas, concluding:* Right to hold Catalan referendum was protected by international law...* ...and by *Spanish constitution** Spanish Govt has violated 16 internatl laws.Let's take a look...  
"Nationalise Airbus" was the moment people prepared to argue anything to get Brexit properly threw their dignity in the bin. 
Moses led the Israelites out of Egypt, who is going to lead us out of #Brexit? 
BMW joins Airbus in Brexit warning  
Broughton, the town in fear after Brexit warning by Airbus  
Someone should produce a dystopian movie about a #Brexit Britain in about 15 years time, populated by the poverty stricken old, ignorant drunks and fascist thugs working for tax-dodgers, money-launderers & crooks from around the world inhabiting fortified luxury estates. 
Theresa May should take “inspiration” from Donald Trump in the Brexit negotiations and cast off Britain's "defeatist" attitude, according to the US ambassador to the UK  
Sir John Major on Brexit vote: “This was an advisory referendum. This idea of the will of the people has got more holes in it than a colander.” 
Very posh, very expensive office,must be wealthy people who are backing the Anti-Corbyn Brigade.Concern about #Brexit or concerned to use Brexit to unfairly blame/attack Corbyn. They'd be tackling Tories if they were just concerned about Brexit.Ulterior motive. #OFOC#art 4JC 
Based on what happened after the June 2015 elections and in last year's more or less fraudulent referendum, there's a high probability the government will try to steal this election. 
 John Major had a chance to say all these things during the referendum. He did. The public disagreed. IF you're a democrat the question moves on to how not whether we leave. This endless reopening of decision to Leave is so damaging  
In light of the #Airbus warnings I've written for @DailyMirror about why a Tory Brexit is bad for our jobs, bad for our communities and bad for our country.  Please read and share.  
Brexit and the horseshoe theory of politics: loony pro-Brexit Tory MEP and celebrity Corbyn fanboy from Momentum both  threatening to nationalise Airbus. The country has gone mad. #BrexitShambles #twats pic.twitter.com/TUMlDBkCUm 
Sir John Major says the U.K. is making a “monumental error” with Brexit and that leaving the EU comes at the “worst possible time”.“The timing could scarcely be worse,” he says.  
Good news is that no-one need any longer indulge Brexiteers by politely pretending that there's a case for going ahead with Brexit. Not an economic one; democratic one; legal one; moral one; constitutional one; ethical one; or one that it will unify the UK. None has any merit now 
Brexit spokesperson agreeing Brexit will cause 30 years of economic downturn and still advocating for it. It’s a lifetime. Most of the people who have voted for it won’t even be around, while the youth of the nation will have lost an entire generation’s opportunities.  
3) Crashing out of the CU as the Tories would have us do in a Hard Brexit, leaves nationalised Airbus with the same problem - cut off from the supply chain of it s sole customer.Haven't quite thought this through, have you? 
A quarter of a million jobs could be at risk if Airbus leave. This is the reality of Brexit. Will business leaders please get their heads out of their arses and start shouting STOP BREXIT. Companies aren't going to wait for any 'deal', they're off NOW! 
Tomorrow I will be marching for:The 3 Million EU citizens living in the UKUK citizens living in other EU countriesAll those whose jobs are at risk from BrexitAll those who cannot afford the economic damage Brexit will be deliverOur NHSCome join me #PeoplesVote 
Two years after British voters, in the biggest vote in our history, voted to regain control from unelected Brussels Eurocrats, Airbus, BMW & other Franco-German corporations are trying to bully and intimidate us into surrendering the Brexit we voted for. How should we respond? 
Steve Baker accused of playing "fast and loose" with ministerial rules after @openDemocracy investigation finds Brexit minister had undisclosed meetings with European Research Group - latest by Jim Cusick, @JennaCorderoy and me 
Spend a little part of your Saturday getting your voice heard. The tide is turning, but the govt keeps blustering on, moving towards a destructive Brexit. Know that you did what you could, & show up tmw to demand a #PeoplesVote?  
Airbus is not leaving UK because of ‘bad Brexit negotiations’. Airbus is leaving the UK because of Brexit, period. Some politicians need to stop tweeting their ‘concern’ and get out there and back the public getting a final say on this god awful deal we are going to get.Rant over 
It makes WINGS...what are you going to do with them? Attach them to the Brexit unicorns.   
In my mind I have personified #Brexit as an English bloke called Steve who has filed for divorce but refuses to open any letters from his solicitor and instead just watches three world cup matches a day followed by Love Island before passing out drunk on the sofa. 
This is the greatest country in the world, and I want it to be greater still. The Brexit deal will have a massive impact on the future of our country. On something as big as the Brexit deal we should all get to decide what is good enough? #peoplesmarch #peoplesvote 
Even if you nationalised UK bit of Airbus you can't stop  Franco-German bit from moving wing production to an EU factory. They don't have to buy UK wings if Hard Brexit makes them too expensive due to end of frictionless trade.  
Here's another way to measure Brexit progress:49,049: the number of words in the U.K.'s withdrawal treaty2,518: the number of words the EU and U.K. have agreed on 5: That's the percentage of Brexit negotiations that are done 
It is vital that we all unite against #Brexit for our future generations - my recent conversation with @SODEMAction. 
On the eve of the second anniversary of the EU referendum, the independent Labour Peer, @lordstoddart says "The British people had a vision of a positive future outside the EU, when they bravely voted for Brexit on 23rd June 2016.  It is a about time the Government did too!” 
Jason Kenney says if the UCP is elected he will hold a referendum to change the equalization formula. #ableg 
Half a league, half a league,Half a league onward,All in the valley of Brexit   Rode the six hundred.“Forward, the Light Brigade!Charge for the guns!” he said.Into the valley of Brexit   Rode the six hundred. 
Theresa May is a Globalist Lib Masquerading as a Conservative. There’s no Way Referendums like BREXIT Should be Allowed to be Ignored/Overturned in a Democracy.Brits Deserve Better; Democracy Demands itThe Conservative Party Needs to Oust Theresa May 
Unilever, Barclays, J Land Rover and now Aerospace all moving jobs to EU due to #Brexit. This will hit our economy & harm British families. A scenario denied by Fox, Rees Mogg & Co. Brexit is now unfolding with chilling speed #FBPE 
Farage is now claiming #Brexit being done badly is to blame for Airbus planning to relocate. Erm, I think he added too many words. Take away the 'being done badly' and it's spot on. 
So @IsabelOakeshott claims she was going to report the Very Very Bad Boys of Brexit (a year late - this coming October). But still she's retweeting their lies. Damn the public interest and national security. She's still working along side them.  
During the EU referendum Airbus was frequently cited as a firm that would relocate if there were a vote to leave  
Two years after the EU referendum, support for the government's immigration targets is widespread across the country and political allegiances, according to a poll for Channel 4 News . Find out more during our debate at 7 on 4 tonight  
Our reps at #Airbus fear that the PM and her party are not listening. This has to change.  A Tory Brexit will devastate UK jobs  
Politicians are voting for a bad Brexit deal.March with us tomorrow: #PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May's Brexit will cost us thousands of jobs, devastate communities and hit the poorest hardest as we fall easy prey to the likes of Airbus.It is time for the left to fight back. @chakrabortty 
Erthygl / article from 2013, three years before the Brexit vote.  
I'd genuinely and sincerely be very interested to read his "Brexit Done Properly" White Paper.  
 to @EdPentlandsCLP @WatfordLabour and Chelsea & Fulham CLP.  On the eve of the #PeoplesVoteMarch - all three local parties have passed motions calling on @UKLabour to change policy and back a #PeoplesVote. You can be next. #Brexit is not inevitable.   
Yet your cabinet members in the Welsh Labour government agreed without any reason to pass to the Withdrawal Bill, & due to abstention from Welsh Labour MPs, which had paved the way for a hard Brexit.Yet, unsurprisingly, you come out with this. Weak as water the whole lot of you!  
Airbus has delivered a body blow to Brexit Britain. It won’t be the last | Aditya Chakrabortty  
Brexit in one tweet.  
Will this be the wake up call the PM needs? Whilst the Government rows with itself over Brexit, Airbus and their workers, like many businessesare desperate for a glimmer of certainty. Government needs to start listening to the concerns of business, and quickly.  
OK Supreme Court rules Oklahoma Taxpayers Unite's HB1010XX veto referendum petition invalid. #oklaed 
Good to catch up with the Taoiseach @campaignforleo after the British-Irish Council Summit in Guernsey - we even got to enjoy some sunshine as we discussed #Brexit and Scottish/Irish relations.  
Memo to Theresa May & David Davis: Please confirm that a no-deal Brexit would mean NO DIVORCE BILL. 
Oh look at that, anti-Brexit MPs (mostly @DamianCollins) are exempting themselves from new data protection laws by citing parliamentary privilege. 
Trump plans to impose a 20% tariff on all cars imported from the EU unless the bloc removes import duties and other barriers to U.S. goods escalating his global trade war. At what point do fans of Farage, Banks, Mogg, Fox et al. turn on them for making absolute fools of them???? 
I’ll be on @infowars 6pm BST.  #FreeTommy, freedom of speech and Brexit. 
I'm growing increasingly annoyed by the sheer ignorance of Leavers in particular these MP's and @theresa_may banging on about this #BrexitDividend.Brexit is costing Britain an indeterminate sum,, jobs are being lost at an uncontrollable rate and future loses guaranteed. 
Is there any chance of a brexit repeal? Or a second referendum? Given that most no voters are now aware that it doesn’t mean kicking out the foreign people and actually means losing your job 
Dutch @Douane preparing for #Brexit. I enjoyed meeting newly recruited customs officials and discussing with managers of Customs  and National Food Safety inspection operational solutions for the unfortunate consequences of Brexit.  
Airbus has delivered a body blow to Brexit Britain. It won’t be the last | Aditya Chakrabortty  
The British people had a vision of a positive future outside the EU, when they bravely voted for Brexit on 23 June 2016.  It’s about time the Govt did too. It really is disappointing that it is the US Ambassador who is reminding us of what a great country we are and not the Govt! 
I've been out in #Clapham this afternoon telling people about @peoplesvote_uk and our big March tomorrow. Join the campaign to give the people a say on the final #Brexit deal:  
Tim Martin: We IMMEDIATELY save £10 Billion a year!“The Australian high-commissioner said no-one ever lost out from free trade.We [also] pay a lot of tariffs to EU which is collected on non-EU imports."#Brexit #Leave #EU 
Seems Cambridge Analytica may have had Clinton emails a month before Wikileaks & the Trump campaign began exploiting them.And that May's government has not been over-helpful to the Mueller inquiry.Why?And what does it know about Russia & #Brexit? 
 What do Brexit and Trump add up to? Howard Jacobson has some strong thoughts on the matter to share with @mrjamesob. 
.@thomasbrake on the need for MPs to take a stand against the botched Tory Brexit. #ExitfromBrexit 
Brexit supporting Ministers claimed that the UK fishing industry would have exclusive access to all UK territorial waters. Now, local fishermen could find the UK industry ruled by Europe: but with no say. That’s why I pledged to protect Cornish fishing interests in Westminster. 
Timid rebels, no Brexit dividend, and the UK already threatening to back out of its promises on the Irish border. All this and more in my latest #ScotlandinEurope update. 
I was disgusted by your rhetoric on TV today.  Shame on you for calling 65 million Americans 'Nazis'.   People like you are the reason Trump won and I promise you this 'referendum' you're requesting will get him re-elected. 
The first time I tried to order a coffee at Starbucks (it was for my sister) I sounded so mixed up the barista gave me the coffee for free and then I spilled a third of it on myself while adding cream. Simple. But at least we have 5 months to get for the referendum. #BCpoli 
Owen Smith - Airbus is a great British & EU Co. & it supports over 100,000 jobs. The Labour Party should be crystal clear unless we stay in the SM/CU then we are jeopardising these sorts of jobs.. there is no such thing as a jobs 1st brexit... there's only a destructive brexit. pic.twitter.com/2dU4dMurJl 
I would like to thank @Nigel_Farage personally, as well as Leave in general for all the lovely new #Airbus jobs it looks like we’ll be getting in the rEU.And people say there’s no such thing as a #Brexit dividend. 
So today from #Blairites we have had...AntiSemitismMilitantBrexitSmear after SmearToday is also #Windrush70 They haven't mentioned that Tories deported them. Not once.FUNNY THAT 
Sally is a small business owner. She's concerned about the effect of Brexit on businesses like hers and that is why she is coming to the #PeoplesVoteMarch tomorrow so she can demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Sign up NOW -  
280 days until Brexit and potentially no flights and as of today the Gov is advertising for a Brexit aviation negotiator.I wish I was joking... 
I caught up with Scottish FM @NicolaSturgeon and @fmwales Carwyn Jones after the formal summit here in Guernsey. Spoke about #Brexit & shared priorities.  
What if the true Brexit Dividend is the solid gold entertainment value of watching every single Brexiteer go a full 180 on every other political principle they've ever held in an increasingly desperate attempt to justify it? 
Interesting to see @Nigel_Farage preparing *the #Brexit was stabbed in the back legend*. The more that goes wrong - and there is a lot to come - the more he will blame the implementation of the idea not the fact that Brexit is fatally flawed.  
#Brexit is a fucking shambles ( contains swearing and mentions of people who like doing Nazi salutes) pic.twitter.com/tJ6oU3vc10 
MSNBC Morning Joe panelist Donny Deutsch compared the 62,984,828 people who voted for Donald Trump in the '16 election to Nazi guards, adding that the 2018 midterm election should be a referendum on his supporters. My story on The Hill. Comments welcome:  
Nigel Farage: Scrap #EU "Common Fisheries Policy,Common Agricultural Policy,Working time directives-I could go on!We want to be our OWN countryWe want to govern our OWN countryWe want to be independent people!We don’t want Juncker governing us!#Brexit 
Let me fix that for you:If proof was needed that Brexit needs to be abandoned (and fast), this is it.  
Just remember this Brexit mess is all because of 50 right wing, eurosceptic Tory MPs, disciples of Thatcher, who believe in the supremacy of markets and minimal social provision. They are bankers, investors, individuals with fingers in pies who will trouser millions after Brexit 
Join The Big Brexit Rally tomorrow, Saturday 23 June, at Carlisle Place, London. Get your Union Jacks ready! 
Good to see others pointing out that we need more time on #Brexit. It‘s a no-brainer that if it’s worth doing, it’s worth doing well regardless of how long it takes - I said as much in my resignation statement @EveningStandard @George_Osborne  
Something something something Brexit.....  
Stop ‘Defeatist’ Brexit Attitude and Take ‘Inspiration’ from Trump, Says U.S. Ambassador   
A no deal Brexit risks 14,000 Airbus jobs leaving Britain. No deal is the worst of all deals. March with us tomorrow for a #PeoplesVote so that the people, not the politicians, can have a vote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
By the way, I imagine @theresa_may is grateful for Airbus's intervention - in that its Brexit analysis puts enormous pressure on the Cabinet's Brexiter ministers to fall in behind her vision of Brexit at next week's ministerial away day.  
Leavers think Britain can import talented workers like a commodity. They are deluded. Talented workers choose where they live & work, and many will not choose a hostile Britain that treats them as barely tolerated intruders. Many already here will leave.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
People ask me why I fight when I have no kids. I fight because other people do, I happily pay my taxes for schools & healthcare for other people’s children. I fight Brexit for the same reason.. I’m a human being who can see beyond his own needs. 
There was no plan. Deleter Cummings admitted there was no plan he could get over the line. So he deliberately ran with contradictions. There was never anything to implement. Brexit's failure was baked in - and inevitable.  
John Springford(Centre for EU Reform) - Our research tracks how countries, whose economy behave similar to the UK, have done since the referendum & we have seen a hit to UK growth of about 2.1% & that means a hit to the public finances of about £440m per week.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
What is about to happen in Mexico feels akin to the election of Donald Trump in America, Brexit in Britain and Italy's turn towards populism  
As I recall, that’s what pollsters told us on the day before the referendum too  
Since the Brexit vote, the number of European nurses and midwives coming to work in the UK has fallen through the floor, while newly qualified European medics are leaving in their droves. It is deeply troubling, and just the beginning of Brexit’s devastating impact on the UK. 
This is in part true.Brexit is possible to do well, but would take a least a decade and at a slow pace.But anyone who who clapped and cheered the Article 50 notification being sent, prematurely and without preparation, should take their share of the blame.  
5/ It's evident that Farage has noknowledge of export industries. I recall him sneering at the concerns of a pharmaceutical industry dude (that's a successful UK exporting industry) during a referendum debate. "Sell to the domestic market". You think they don't do that already?! 
Pleased to address #HS18 along with @Bidwells & @shepweddrural on the rural economy after Brexit. And to meet with @SRUC @JamesHuttonInst @qmscotland and other key bodies. #HighlandShow #GreatDayOut 
London!! I'm on my way - at Girona airport, Spain flying to Luton for the #PeoplesVoteMarch in London on behalf of @BremainInSpain to demand a #peoplesvote.Because Brexit is Bonkers!@SimonManleyFCO @ukinspain 
That's a stretch! banned in Scotland by SNP in 2014 and SNP Ministers wrote to UK Govt about it in 2016. That MP voted for Aberdeen's devolved powers on farm & fish to be ripped up last week oh and also voted to stay in CFP for at least 2 more yrs post Brexit WITH NO SAY! 
Utterly agog at #airbus. Not at the news, we all knew that, but at the feigned shock, unease and demands for reassurance from MPs over it. You know, that thing they just totally voted for. This is what brexit is guys, own it. 
Good article by my (no relative) namesake What’s a ‘meaningful vote’? Brexit lessons for democracy  via @CityAM 
Good. I was told (don't know if true) Russian groups use brit companies or investment funds to peddle cash, and if there's an issue, they take the funds through another fund in Europe... MPs want police inquiry into whether Russia funded Brexit campaign  
This is the dawning #BrexitReality for workers and companies across the country. Airbus employ 14,000; supports 100,000+ jobs in their supply chain with 4,000+ UK suppliers; provides 1.7bn in annual tax revenue. There is no "jobs first Brexit" but there could be a #PeoplesVote 
Another lunatic Remainer @mollymep driven nuts by Brexit.. the @metpoliceuk will be kept busy this summer! Just received seen a letter signed by 18 MPs asking for an investigation into treason ! 
I'm about to start my journey to join tomorrow's #PeoplesVoteMarch, but my presence there is to demand any vote has an option to REMAIN. I have been #StopBrexit since day 1 & will not deviate. I refuse to be fobbed off with soft Brexit. Tomorrow for me is #StopBrexitSaturday 
Today I've seen tweets saying TB, scurvy & other diseases have returned aplenty to UK. I've read that many big business's are leaving the UK through #Brexit shambles. I've seen UK trolls trouncing the ScotGov, and it's been horrible So my feelings are #DissolveTheUnion  ASAP  
I'm beginning to think that Brexit might not go that smoothly after all. 
BBC Brexit in one picture -  
Airbus is not alone in wanting to up sticks and leave Britain - this list reveals all  #Brexit #Airbus 
UK, Survation poll:EU membership referendum18-24 | REMAIN 82%, LEAVE 18%25-34 | REMAIN 64%, LEAVE 36%35-44 | REMAIN 61%, LEAVE 39%45-54 | REMAIN 51%, LEAVE 49%55-64 | R 41%, L 59%65-74 | R 38%, L 62%75+    | R 39%, L 61%Field work: 19/06/18–20/06/18Sample size: 812 
UK: Two years after the Brexit vote, a majority of voters would vote to remain in the European Union, Survation poll says. #Brexit 
Leavers so convinced of the merits of Brexit surely have nothing to fear from another Referendum. The 'independent' UK 'gets back control' from 'unelected foreign bureaucrats' message surely will be an ever lasting one   
Hmm … So if Labour accepts the “will of the people” on Brexit, why don’t they accept the “will of the electorate” on all the other Tory policies?#FBPE 
The UK makes Airbus wings ffs, not FMCGs or stuff that's difficult to supervise on export/import. If the EU wanted to behave like grown-up there'd be no problems at all. But of course they are hell bent on making a 'costly example' of Brexit. Good fucking riddance to the wankers. 
280 days to Brexit. The mind boggles at the continued, widespread, misunderstanding of what the single market actually is. 
After Airbus warns it could leave the UK in the event of ‘no-deal’ Brexit, David Davis and Boris Johnson unveil plan to save the UK aviation industry:  
You ever notice all the unionists droning on about how independence will impoverish Scotland, are completely silent about the reality of the economic devastation happening with Brexit. #hypocrites 
Unite the union has over 12,000 members working in Airbus and its suppliers. Will that be enough for Len McCluskey to demand a change of direction on Brexit from Jeremy Corbyn?  
If you voted brexit and you end up losing your job, livelihood and or home. Who are you going to complain to? 
increasingly obvious that if Brexit turns out badly the Brexiteers will blame the implementation and never, ever accept even a sliver of responsibility for the consequences 
Airbus, Land Rover, the Brexit “dividend” lie. The list goes on. With PM, Cabinet and MPs unable to act, the people must take control and demand a #PeoplesVote 
I see @Nigel_Farage's shameless campaign to pass the buck and get his excuses in early for the shit-show he helped create is now fully up and running.I don't remember him saying "Brexit isn't some magic cure" two years ago. He must've forgotten to mention it.  
Not my Brexit. If only my particular variety of unicorns had been allowed to flourish, none of this would have happened.  
As Great Britain is embroiled in conflict with the #EuropeanCommission about the exact terms for #Brexit, Poland is being threatened by Brussels with sanctions over its judicial reform.As a result, Poland and Great Britain are tightening relations between each other.  
Certain of the press are reporting that, post-Brexit, "nearly 4 million EU nationals will be 'allowed' to stay in the UK".  What on earth is going to happen to the other 62 million of us? 
Listening to Lidington on tv news you'd imagine that the WM govt were an entirely innocent party in the devolution problems and were the pinnacle of reason. I'd remind him that Tories caused Brexit, own Brexit, and will forever be shackled to it. Scotland? We're off #ScotRef 
Now @BarristerSecret is now only a few dozen behind overtaking.Please do #follow him/her, if you do not already, as they chronicle the chaos of the criminal justice system just as I do of Brexit.They are the best UK law tweeter on Twitter.  
Friends! A powerful new recruit for Our Remain Camp!Our Anjem predicts that Brexit will cause a huge shortage of skilled terrorists in Our UK!And yet, when you mention this - literally - explosive fact to Leavers, they just say "Good thing too!"Talk about Far-Right bigotry!  
Good points here about middle class Remoaners lecturing working class people about voting for Brexit just because they’re upset about paying more for their foreign nannies & artisan bread.Meanwhile, working class people are actually on the front lines of multiculturalism.  
Thank you Catherine De Bolle @Europol for a very informative visit. #Brexit means that we will have to put Europol-UK relations on a new footing, so we can continue protecting the security of citizens.  
So which Brexit calamity shall we talk about?- the loss of thousands of jobsor- that Vote Leave broke electoral law and 2 cabinet members and a PM special advisor oversaw the Vote Leave campaignWill of the people, my arse 
I just figured out what the Brexit dividend means. It's not for the UK, it's for the EU, who'll gain from the mass exodus of companies to the continent. 
Alastair Campbell - May is trying to deliver brexit by only paying attention to the 52% & the 48% can go & hang. Tens of thousands of people will be at the #PeoplesVote march & they don't think #brexit is a done deal & they want the #FinalSay on the deal.#FBPE @campbellclaret 
With Blair, New Labour,  EU ruling banking classes, CBI,BBC,Sky News, the Times, Goldman Sachs ,JP Morgan, George Soros, the City,the rentiers,the blood-sucking parasites of Britain’s ruling establishment, & the House of Lords, against #Brexit I’m sure glad I’m on the other side 
The Corbynites are finally waking up to the damage Cobyn's pro-Brexit stance is doing to him politically. And they are terrified of it. Hence the sudden ramping up of their attacks on the anti-Brexit camp. 
And to think that Millions of brave young men gave their lives up for our freedom....For GOD'S sake woman....GET ON WITH BREXIT!!!!  
Exchanging notes on Brexit with Hayley Hughes #LoveIsland 
Brexit resistance campaigns are allowing their pre-existing ideological hatred of Corbyn to distract them from what might be actual effective campaigning tactics  
Brexit the Tory tool to save their tax haven offshore wealth from being Exposed And their power grab upon the U.K. to create a one party Tory Dictatorship state!  And The Looming Financial Crisis Nobody Is Talking About, but Should Be  
Three screenshots.  You decide. #Brexit #Airbus 
Predictable to see #FBPE cult claiming Airbus potential job losses is 'waah Brexit' not the actual fact Airbus are talking specifically about Tory lack of clarity & potential 'no deal' hard right Tory scenario. Cue attacks on Corbyn (who's trying to stop that btw)  
"supports a free and independent England" what a surprise: an American Trump fan with little clue about basic UK politics thinking he can make an incisive comment on Brexit 
Direct quote Nigel Farage:“Brexit on its own isn’t some magic cure”.Just think about that for a moment, then try not to throw something at the wall & scream out loud.  
Airbus is working to create a #Brexit buffer but says that it could abandon the UK if there’s no solid trade deal.  Via @ReutersTV 
Where the hell are they gonna fly to? Once Brexit comes you'll be lucky to afford a bus to end of the street  
"Brexit done badly will leave us in a worse position than we were before" says Nigel Farage.This is exactly where Theresa May's government is taking us. Spread the word!  
Tomorrow at 12 we will be joining thousands of people across the country to march for a #PeoplesVote vote on the final Brexit deal. RT if you will be there. Time is running out. @peoplesvote_uk 
MOGG: MPs can’t delay Brexit, there is no legal basis. Government must now deliver independence. Let’s get on with it! 
As the emerging #brexit bears no resemblance to what was promised, it’s not surprising that more and more people want a say on the actual deal...  
For a second I read this as ‘proof that PM’s Brexit needs to be abandoned’ and got excited. But that’s the only way we can stop this mess - and Britain’s economic decline - in the long term. Brexit itself is now the red line.  
Everyone is forgetting something - Brexit was never actually supposed to happenOnce you remind yourself of that it all makes far more sense - it doesn’t make it any better, but lowers the blood pressure a bit 
"That's Not My Brexit...The Airbus Has Flown Away"  
The impact of Brexit on our industry and our members will doubtlessly be wide-reading. Without input from the unions, it could be devastating. Creative workers need a voice in negotiations. You can help us achieve this. #EquitySeatAtTheTable  
I really hope those that voted #brexit have the courage to offer themselves up for redundancy first but I bet they won't.... This is what they voted for so should own it. #airbus 
The problem he’s suffering from is that Brexit was his publicity machine and it’s gone wrong. It was never supposed to happen. It was supposed to be vehicle for his lifestyle. Now it’s happening he’s being exposed for what he is. He’s having to backtrack and land blame elsewhere. 
Twice now in 6 days Nigel Farage has said we will be worse off after Brexit. It's called "getting the excuses in."  
“In a nutshell, what is Brexit?” @HayleyHughes_xx asks @adamfleming #bbcdp 
Well, well, so Mr Farage now accepts that Brexit will make us poorer. I think he just won us the people’s vote  
This is happening @HayleyHughes_xx talking #Brexit on #bbcdp 
Join UKIP Leader ⁦@GerardBattenMEP⁩ on Independence Day TOMORROW in London at 3pm for his Brexit Speech!Let’s stop this Brexit Betrayal#ForTheNation 
You wouldn't sign a bill without checking it first, so why should the #Brexit deal be any different? Join the #PeoplesVote march:  
The big names of Brexit are very triggered by Airbus. They are scared stiff people will discover the consequences of Brexit before they get their tax avoiding low wage Brexit prize. 
Did you vote leave? Read thisThe only reason the govt is pushing ahead with damaging #Brexit is,not because it’s good for UK, but the result of #EUref If you don’t want the #Brexit she is pursuing to be in your name, Act, say you’ve changed you’re mind. Be #remainernow 
Brexit Time makes his debut at Lingfield tomorrowThere are two racehorses called Brexit, as well as others called Brexiteer and BrexitmeansbrexitThey are a combined 0/15 so far 
Airbus prepares to leave. Pfizer warns UK life science dominance under threat. Our two last great industries - pharma and aerospace - quiver before Brexit. Thank you Nigel Farrage, Boris Johnson and Jacob Rees-Mogg - enemies of manufacturing. 
My politics is issue-drivenI support Corbyn because he is the best chance of getting the kind of society I wantI support a 2nd ref because it is only way to stop madness of Brexit I will be marching tomorrow for 2nd ref I hope and trust I don’t see people attacking Corbyn 
'I’ve also seen what’s possible when young people participate, and make your voices heard. The Irish abortion referendum was an inspiring sight. People flew home to vote from all over the world.' @HillaryClinton @tcddublin#HillaryClinton #TrinityVisitors 
Of course Brexit could be a failure or staying in the EU . If we elected Jeremy Corbyn it wouldn’t matter either way! Let’s face it what really upsets you is the end of the political agenda you believe in. Defeated by the British public.  
And a cheaper more superior deal is with in easy reach by simply remaining in the EU, the deal we already have. PM needs to tell the Brexit voting idiots on national TV that Cameron & Tory Govt made a hideous mistake. No more Brexit, UK gets back to work. Common sense FFS. 
Airbus say they will move production to the US or China?  Possibly another EU country, but they are giving China as their first choice?This has simply nothing to do with Brexit, but Remainer moaning from an EU financed company. 
How have normally biz friendly voices taken such an obtuse approach to some generally accepted views about trade barriers when it comes to Brexit - arguing its no big deal, manageable (if not a good type of) disruption, and firms complaining are vested anticompetitive interests? 
Man who thinks caging children is a good idea says Brexit will be great 
#inlimbotoo is out! Thank you to all our British contributors for sharing their experience of life in post referendum UK and EU. Please read their stories, we will be marching together for all #citizensrights tomorrow. 
Asked why the Prime Minister was still "pushing ahead" with her Brexit plans despite thousands of jobs being put at risk, a spokeswoman for the Prime Minister said: "Because people voted for it." 
Hi @jeremycorbyn I think it's clear now that there are jobs being lost because of brexit. Can you start opposing it please?  
Brexit was a fork in the road where we made a binary choice. The success or failure will be determined in future decades. Nobody likes change but sometimes it is v necessary  
brexit is one thing. but this is also a damning indictment of an economic model that left periphery regions entirely dependent on foreign direct investment and a handful of companies. they're policies many figureheads of the remain camp supported and oversaw  
'These last few years in Ireland have been a testament to the power of young people to shape the future – from the 2015 marriage equality referendum, which saw historic youth turnout, to this year’s abortion referendum' .....#HillaryClinton 
There is nothing ministers can do to stop it. They have caused it by letting ERG write hard Brexit policy. You and your colleagues need to start standing up for Project Reality against Project Fantasy.  
"It's indicative of how much of a hash of Brexit the government is making that companies like this are publicly making these statements" @Ella_M_Whelan #bbcdp 
Dear @GeorgeFreemanMP where have you been these last 2 years during which economists, trade experts and Remainers have been warning about this? It's really not satisfying to say we told you so, but we did, over and over again.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Which is why @UKLabour should support a tougher stance against Brexit including the idea of @peoplesvote_uk so country can decide ‘is this what we wanted from Brexit?’  
Europe’s biggest plane-maker could abandon the UK if #Brexit takes place without a trade deal.  Via @ReutersTV 
I bet OFUC and FBPE are livid at those Tory ‘rebels’ now Airbus have pointed out the catastrophic implications of a no deal Brexit. But we all know they’ll somehow blame this on Jeremy Corbyn, because it’s him they want to remove, not the Tories. 
On Radio 4 at 12.15 talking about the deluge of World Cup gambling ads on TV. No, this won’t help stop Brexit. No, that doesn’t mean it’s not important. Thanks a lot 
“Britain is not xenophobic!”“Nobody is talking about kicking you out” “It was not about you, it was about our independence” These are things former friends & an inexplicably popular right wing gay twitterer said to me two years ago. You support Brexit. You support racism  
NIGEL: We voted for independence, not to be ruled by losers in Brussels.“Referendum was about do we want to govern our own country? Yes or no? And we chose to govern our own country.“  
Seems like everyone is preparing for Brexit except for the country that actually voted for Brexit  
In exactly 24 hours, we will be marching on Parliament to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Will you join us tomorrow at the #PeoplesVoteMarch? Please RT: 
Brexit-supporting Leave Means Leave issue statement on Airbus (•French-run Airbus•) which is well worth a read  
"I will be seeking assurances from the leader of the Leopards Eating People's Faces Party that there will NOT be leopards eating people's faces as a result of us voting 'EAT THE FACES' in the Leopards Eating People's Faces referendum"  
brexiteers expressing fury at the consequences of brexit is a tweet genre i predict big things for in 2019 
MPs seem scared that they may actually be held accountable for their actions after Brexit which gives power back to the people.Independence is something many countries have fought for over the years. As Jacob says, it should be embraced!   
Most sensible thing to do now is not abandon red lines but to abandon #Brexit which a clear majority now want. The most Democratic way to achieve it is to give the Ppl a #FinalSay with a #Remain option which a majority of the Ppl also want.Why do U deny the Ppl the choice? 
Nobody better act surprised. This, the insinuation that we should be removing EU migrants from the country, is the bloody basis of the whole of bloody Brexit. But don't mind me and my elitist concerns. This is fine. We can totally make Brexit work from a left wing perspective.  
The problem with Brexit is that all the bad news will arrive too late. 
Is the Welsh Secretary @AlunCairns our country’s representative at UK Cabinet going to speak up against the damage that a hard Brexit will bring to Wales. His silence regarding Airbus today is deafening! 
The government is now considering allowing convicted rapists to stay permanently in Britain after Brexit. What a kick in the face for their victims. What an insult to the decent people of this country. Do what you will May but when the right man gets in he will undo your damage. 
Get with the programme of Jackpop Crackpop Tupperware Teereza’s Booming Batshit £90Bn Migrant hating Brexit Bonanza it’s a Far Right Extravaganza as the sun breaks on a New Tory Dawn the Govt tells the nation it’s time to Get Fruit Picking Bigots!! pic.twitter.com/3zg8Nb8M2G 
For so many, for too long, "no deal" was a mere phrase and a posture, Brexit bravado.And now, we are seeing the real world application of "no deal" being a serious risk.Not only aircraft that come down to earth. 
.@UKLabour had an opportunity to help us defeat the Conservatives over the EEA, but wasted it. Their amendment was nothing more than a meaningless distraction. Brexit is not inevitable, but we need Labour front-bench to do their job and join us in taking on the Tory Government. 
3/ We both know that its only a matter of time before LBC/Fox get bored of Brexit and drop you as you become increasingly irrelevant. Shame that place in the Commons never worked out for you. How many attempts was it? 8 I believe... 
2/ Once Brexit is over, you will disappear back under the rock you crawled from as the country loses more and more businesses/jobs.You NEED the Brexit process to be drawn out as long as possible to keep paying your bills, which is why you suggested a second ref only months ago.. 
Airbus will need UK wings to fly. Brexit is no threat to Airbus. The UK will willingly honour its contracts to supply the wings. 
1/ Nigel, you always knew that these were the consequences of leaving the EU but you didn't care.Brexit was nothing more than a vehicle to promote your self-importance and career in order to fund your £4million+ mansion... 
It is a timely reminder to the gloomy parts of the UK establishment. Brexit is full of opportunities. The Chancellor tells us the Treasury is not against Brexit, so will they cheer up and stop trying to recreate every feature of our membership of the EU as we leave? 
The anti-Brexit forces claim to be new champions of Parliamentary sovereignty after all those years when they were busy giving it away to Brussels. They have to accept that Parliament has decided to leave and made that clear when it sent the letter. 
"Nighty, night, don't the Brexit Bill shenanigans bite" says @afneil #bbctw pic.twitter.com/aalIWavYPI 
Netherlands would be one of the great hopes, if any, in an attempt to peel away northern European trading nations from Brussels Brexit position - Dutch seem to just be preparing customs, ports, airports for No Deal, more than anyone, including us.  
So to round up: Airbus say Brexit will mean jobs abroad, electoral commission say Leave campaigns broke rules, the Chancellor admits no Brexit dividend and public back a #PeoplesVote 2:1. Why wouldn’t you come to #PeoplesVoteMarch tomorrow? 
When Brussels decided to end tax avoiding practices within its member states, Britain decided to leave the EU  #Brexit 
No 'hard border' in Northern Ireland under any circumstances, glad we're all agreed now let's crack on with #Brexit and Leave.  
Juncker tells Irish politicians ‘I wish I were drunk’ in bizarre speech blasting Brexit  
NEW: As Airbus threatens to leave the UK, @Nigel_Farage admits "Brexit done badly will leave us in a worse position than we were in before, Brexit on its own isn't some magic cure." Erm, hang on a minute?   
Sweden Democrats @jimmieakesson is calling for a referendum on EU membership after the general elections in September 2018, hoping for a 'Swexit' result.www.dailymail.nco.http://uk/news/article-5859953/Could-SWEXIT-Right-wing-Sweden-Democrats-call-referendum-EU-membership.html 
Join our MARCH FOR EUROPE! Let's send Theresa May a message that we don't want her botched Brexit and that the people should have the FINAL SAY on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain. Details below   
On Brexit, @DavidLammy tells me: "I worry that so many Labour colleagues seem supine ... We are not delegates, we are here to speak truth to power with our conscience." 
Interesting to see if Number 10 back attacking Airbus as the response to deal with Airbus explaining the consequences it has established of what it can establish is Government policy on Brexit 
Airbus delivers a Brexit ultimatum (and a wake-up call) to Theresa May  
REALITY - UK growth down to 2.1% since the EU Ref.. Which by calculations means a hit to public finances to tune of £440m per week. #Brexit  
Me: wow it’s hard to find a good analogy for Brexit.Universe:  
Brexit uncertainty and the chaotic approach by the government is putting more jobs at risk.If you want the final say on the deal with the option of staying in the EU, before these warnings come true join our campaign:  
Today we launched our new video on the importance of seasonal workers to Scottish agriculture,  highlighting the enormous challenges facing the industry after Brexit.Watch the film online here:@NFUStweets @ScotLandEstates @FergusEwingMSP @SGRESAS 
Peak Brexit front page - yes your high skilled engineering job might be disappearing but on the bright side you'll have a right old laugh out in the fields all day picking fruit  
.@adamboultonSKY - Ken Clarke do you believe there is a #brexit dividend?Ken Clarke - Complete nonsense.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Don’t box Corbyn in over Brexit,  @Calderbank argues 
responses here “EU state owned company punishing Brexit” - it is 11% French, 11% German, 4% Spanish, 74% is floated - but perhaps yes - this is a gift to any EU leader eg Macron needing to repatriate high value manufacturing from outside single Market/ CU. Applies elsewhere too. 
#Brexit equals job losses. The social security safety net is now far flimsier. Job losses will lead to people losing their homes, to hardship, to family break ups.#Brexit is a bloody shambles and MPs either don't care, or don't understand. Wake up you fools, defend your country 
So my BXL source tells me Airbus warning prompted by warnings from BXL that 'no deal' Brexit now more likely than not and that base case is for a 6-12 month extension of Art50 to agree a "deal, no deal" WA. We are in deep, deep trouble. 
So Airbus are leaving Britain because of Brexit...Rolls Royce are moving to Germany because of Brexit...Trump won't do a trade deal...India won't do a trade deal#BrexitShambles goes from bad to worse - but at least the Mad Men of Brexit will have to own it now  
Why only yesterday was Theresa May heralding a "brighter future" for Brexit Britain. Utter bullshit. Too all those soft Leavers: you may have slept through the first alarm but it's still not too late to wake up. pic.twitter.com/JwlriAo7mm 
Important for @GovUK to recognise that their actions have broken one of the key foundations of devolution.  They have to think about how to fix it....Holyrood 'won't approve any Brexit bills' - BBC News  
US UK ambassador 'startled' by 'defeatist attitude' on Britain Leaving #EU"As an American I'm just not used to that!How can a country with great history, great language, great legal system & this great presence not be successful?"#Brexit via @MailOnline 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage: "The referendum wasn't about economics. The referendum was about 'Do we want to govern our own country, Yes or No?'. That is the fork in the road this government has been told to follow & at the moment they're not doing it!"  
Isn’t a ‘People’s Vote’ essentially a second referendum? And isn’t it really a ‘stop Brexit’ vote? If “remainers” won that vote, would we have best of three? Why couldn’t “leavers” demand a rerun as THEIR ‘people’s vote’ was overturned. Bad move in my opinion. 
George, “this sort of major loss of jobs, investment and prosperity” is *intrinsic* to Brexit. And the sooner MPs realise this, the better for everyone.  
For dance teachers, osteopaths, farriers, gas engineers & many other professions:  #brexit preparedness note advises EU nationals w/ UK professional qualifications to consult authorities on need to obtain recognition of those qualifications in EU27. 
The Airbus news this morning just reinforces that there are no upsides to #Brexit○UK was always a global player, there are no new trade deals○UK always was sovereign○UK always had control of its borders○UK gets a zero brexit dividend for the NHS, just higher taxes 
Airbus says a no-deal #Brexit would force it to reconsider its long-term position in the United Kingdom.  
Holyrood 'won't approve any Brexit bills' until the "broken" devolution system is fixed, says Scotland's Brexit Minister 
Every step must be taken to uphold the basic individual protections set out in the Charter of Fundamental Rights. That is why @LibDems offer a path away from the Tories’ shambolic Brexit. That is why we offer the people the final #VoteontheDeal, with an option to #ExitfromBrexit 
Today should be John Bercow's last day as Speaker - when he was elected, he promised to serve only nine years. But because he hates Brexit he's choosing to cling on to power long past his expiration date. No honour!Support us at  
UK (Northern Ireland), Lord Ashcroft poll:Irish Unification ReferendumRemain in the EU by joining the Irish Republic: 47%Leave the EU by staying in the UK: 53%Sample size: 1,400#Brexit #Ireland #HardBrexit #EuropeanUnion 
The political giant that is Kenneth Clarke, gives some bloke (I forget his name) a little lesson on Brexit. #EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
'Britons favour second Brexit vote by 23 point margin' Join the #PeoplesVoteMarch tomorrow - Pall Mall at 12.00 to Parliament Square and demand MPs give us a clean vote on the real options 
Wrote about the Brexit and fruit picking a while ago and was mocked for being a Remoaner and God it's all just so depressingly predictable 
Airbus says no-deal Brexit would threaten its role in UK  
Good morning world! Who’s getting their marching boots ready?Join us and thousands more tomorrow as we call for an end to Brexit, and show our #solidarity for all those affected by this divisive and destructive ideology #PeoplesVoteMarch #StopBrexit 
In fact the poll question did not mention "second referendum". A cynic might suggest the question was deliberately framed to yield max backing for another vote.  
Today my bill which calls for a public vote on the outcome of Theresa May's EU negotiations is published. The public deserve to be asked if they support the PM's brexit bill or whether they want to remain in the EU.Read why I moved this bill here:  
Later...GFMP: Prime Minister, did you see the Times today? Might Airbus leave?PM: Erm, wait... [checks notes] I have been very clear that we are seeking a Brexit deal that works for the whole country.GFMP: Ah! Thank heavens! Thank you *so much* for setting my mind at ease! 
#brexit makes PERFECT sense if you can accept that these people don't care. They. Don't. Care. They will have a way to retain EU cit, they will have private health care, they will make money off #brexit so they'll be fine. They. Don't. Care.#FightBrexit for a #PeoplesVote 
EU migrants 'allowed' to stay here."Outrageous!"They can bring their families."Unacceptable!"Francesca, your Italian neighbour, is a hospital nurse."Ah?"She pays taxes & contribute to UK pensions."Err..."If no deal #Brexit, she must leave."Wait... I didn't mean HER!"  
Any rational person reading the #Brexit news today - and especially about @AirbusintheUK - would conclude that the chaos demands a new and sensible response from @GOVUK which has to include continuing #SingleMarket & #CustomsUnion membership. Not holding my breath for it tho .. 
Airbus publishes Brexit risk assesment and halts all investment in the UK.Statement here:  
Oh for a voice of reason, unmoved by the wailing of the Extreme Brexiters. The ref was a narrow win. And our Brexit should reflect that and always should have reflected that from the beginning. But now we’re staring down the barrel of worst possible outcome. 
Top @Bbc boss distances himself from Humphrys’ unashamed Brexit stance ... you have to be so careful Rob. If you need Comms advice to avoid this kind of thing you know where to come  
Airbus on “severe disruption/ unrecoverable delays/ billions in lost turnover” sign of disbelief of exasperated businesses on direction of travel on Brexit, finally going public, not with threats, but with logical consequences of political choices:   
#Airbus seems to be in the news today... is this relevant?  #Brexit  
Did anyone else notice that @PhilipHammondUK yesterday put £1.2bn into the Bank of England reserves to ensure it had the capital necessary to bail out the country after #Brexit ? 
.@MichelBarnier just updated NL cabinet on #Brexit state of play. NL fully supports his approach in the negotiations with UK. Further progress is needed quickly, in particular regarding the withdrawal agreement.  
Brexit is not a game. Thousands of jobs are at risk. Government must stop playing with people's lives.  
Then attend our counter march, for Brexit @UKFM23June 3pm speeches, Whitehall, starting 2pm in Victoria. Don't just tweet, do something. 
Context: Senior city figure last week, told me last week that big bis keeping quiet on #Brexit because issue so divisive they fear political consumer backlash if they speak up. So it’s very significant that #airbus has spoken to @thetimes 
It’s sickening Mark, these are good hardworking people, I hope and pray that I won’t have to convene a meeting in future to tell them our contracts aren’t being renewed.It’s controlling my life, Brexit is the worst choice the U.K. has ever made. 
10,000 - UK manufactured parts 14,000 - UK people employed110,000 - UK supply chain jobs"Airbus has confirmed it is considering cutting thousands of jobs in the UK as it starts to “press the button on crisis actions” over concerns about #Brexit." 
But you knew this would happen and still voted Brexit through. You also know the car manufacturers and many more will follow. There’s no excuse, you ignored all the warnings. 
But “the people” were told that Brexit would be good for manufacturing, good for trade and good for high-skilled jobs. When remainers said there would likely be major economic damage,they were told it was project fear..Now who’s fearful? Not Brexiters but people working at Filton 
The EU have warned everyone that no progress is being made because Britain aren’t really at the Brexit negotiating table. They are also preparing for, and setting billions aside to mitigate, a no deal end to this mess.Meanwhile, a British unicorn tells the BBC:  
Don't worry. This was clearly stated on the Brexit ballot paper in 2016....It's fine. It's what we voted for, right?#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Erm, this Airbus story ... hardly a revelation. The CEO wrote to all staff before the referendum, basically urging them to vote Remain. In the letter he promised that, whatever the result, Airbus wouldn't leave the UK.He's a disgruntled pro-EU partisan. 
NEW: @Keir_Starmer responds to Airbus's warnings about the threat of a no deal Brexit.“The Government’s reckless decision to keep no deal on the table and to rule out a customs union or strong single market deal after Brexit is putting jobs and the economy at risk."  
Brexit two-year anniversary tomorrow, but I can’t find a card. Apparently there is one, but nobody knows what it looks like or how much it costs. 
Then resign your seat and have your leader call an election, because with your shambolic government (and frothing, greedy Tory backbenchers like Rees-Mogg and Redwood) a 'sensible Brexit' is impossible. 
'F**K BREXIT' cut into my grass, refers to Brexit. I have learned how dishonest it is, and I really care  
The issue is that May did not want Brexit, does not believe in Brexit and actively seeks to dilute Brexit.  
Ever since the Brexit vote I have been advising Ireland was the Achilles heel for The Little Englanders Brexit wet dream. That point will be proved conclusively in the next week.There is a beautiful irony to it all. 
Today in German views of #Brexit:"There is great danger that London and Brussels will reach March 29 2019 empty-handed. Two years after the referendum, the UK is heading for a disorderly Brexit with no brakes" says influential industry federation @Der_BDI 
Airbus is preparing to pull investment from the UK & move aircraft production elsewhere.Their annual UK tax revenues are £1.7bn!! Brexit will devastate the country. If you still support then you accept and embrace that...Still, there's always fruit-picking #BrexitShambles #Airbus 
Julia: "There comes a point where there isn't anyone left to employ".Thank you Julia for reminding us all that immigrants are net contributors to the UK economy. And fundamentally necessary to tackle our ageing population.Shame about your Brexit "they take our jobs" allies... 
Provocative  #TheTimes front page on #Brexit. Above the fold: where we are now; below the fold what we might become....  
Again, note the decline in moral standards. During the referendum EU citizens told 'of course nothing would change for you, what kind of a country do you think we are'? 
Airbus revenue covers over 20% of our EU membership. One company. Brexit is absolutely moronic. 
Brexit in a nutshell: Tens of thousands of manufacturing jobs are about to be lost, but don't worry because fruit-picking is "more fun than you think"... #StopBrexit #FBPE 
#US ambassador to the #UK, Woody Johnson, says that the current “defeatist attitude towards Brexit is a bit sorrowing to me”. I agree. 
An independent Scotland in the EU could invite Airbus to relocate it's UK operations to Prestwick.Let's MAKE jobs not TAKE jobs.#indyref2 #brexit #Airbus 
Fun Brexit Fact: 14/11/07, Vince Cable, then acting LD leader, tabled an amendment to show regret there hadn't been a proposal for an EU Referendum in the Queen's Speech, MPs voted him down 7 to 1. #VinceWho #FBPE  
Larry the cat doing a fine job in 10 Downing Street and looking very sure of himself...maybe he should be part of the Brexit negotiations...  
Having spent 2 years fighting to #StopBrexit, I now wish I'd spent the 2 years before that fateful referendum fighting to #BanTheDailyMail & I doubt we'd be in this mess today.Tomorrow I protest not only for #PeoplesVote, but in support of the 3.8 million EU Nationals. 
Rees Mogg: No legal basis for Parliament to delay Brexit in the event of no deal  
This is why we are marching for a Peoples Vote tomorrow. The people of Britain are behind us. They want the final say on #Brexit. #peoplesvotemarch 
Brexit has transformed the idea of a vote on the unification of Ireland from something seen as a remote possibility, to a probability, and one with an uncertain outcome.My piece on that shift for @POLITICOEurope 
The ‘wake-up call’ was the day after the referendum. We have been warning of this kind of action for two years. Airbus is tip of the iceberg. If we ditch single market and customs union, we ditch our communities, businesses and prosperity. Maybe now they’ll start to listen.  
Yes, and if proof were needed that Labour should stop peddling the fantasy of a “jobs first Brexit”, this is it too #airbus #PeoplesVote 
Fantastic labour and trade union movement  rally last night demanding an exit from #Tory Brexit - give British people a vote on the final #Brexit deal!  
It’s time for Parliament’s ‘shy remainers’ to publicly join the fight for the people to have the final say on any Brexit deal @VinceCable and @CarolineLucas write for @timesredbox ahead of tomorrow’s people’s vote march 
The unique thing about Brexit is that politics is going to collide with reality on a fixed date. That rarely happens. People like Fox and Johnson are bluster merchants. Their experience of life is that rhetoric carries the day. Engineers don’t factor rhetoric into their planning. pic.twitter.com/07mLTB2L43 
Shock poll reveals major support for a second referendum on Brexit 
‘A tangible cost of the shambolic Brexit negotiations.’ Alistair Osborne spot on about Airbus’s tragic disinvestment from the UK, in today’s Times  
One of those days when you remember that Brexit was originally a slightly tongue-in-cheek riff off Grexit. 
Brexit should be cancelled on national security grounds. We cannot increase defence spending to modernise our military if the tax base shrinks.  Breaking up EU / weakening UK is part of Putin’s plan to destroy the NATO alliance. #StopBrexit now. 
Unsubtle message here - as EU27 prepare summit message to up preparations for No Deal Brexit - Dutch preps pretty far ahead as we revealed this month re advice on British parts to exporters...  
"Let them pick fruit," commented Brexit minister Mary Antoinette.  
Have you got an anti Brexit story? We'll get it trending top on Twitter.Have you got a pro Brexit story? Don't bother, we have a dedicated team here at Twitter to bury it along with terror attacks. 
Trade Deal Minister quits as he has no trade deals. Greg Hands would have been allowed to miss the Heathrow vote and is taking no media calls. Greg has parachuted out before Brexit crash.   
Exactly!The only people who benefit from Brexit are rich tax avoiders and our international competitors.WHEN WILL REMAIN POLITICIANS GROW A BACK BONE AND FIGHT LIKE CRAZY TO STOP THIS BREXIT MADNESS?! Anyone, ANYONE, going along with Brexit is as guilty as the Brexiters.  
“If Brexit doesn’t happen, in full, then Britain has no serious claim to be a democracy. If this mass outpouring of democratic sentiment is sold out or softened, people will start searching for new ways to ensure that their voices are heard.”Brendan O’Neill on Sky Australia  
Airbus plans UK job cuts amid fears of hard Brexit impact  
Of course May hasn't got a deal from the EU yet Mr Airbus. The EU have no intention of ever giving her any deal whilst you and other big business pressure May to reverse Brexit with your empty threats..... 
Well what on earth did anyone expect from Brexit?! Seriously?  How many warnings does it take to stop this madness?! Brexit is LOSE, LOSE, LOSE!Why are @Conservatives still pursing this utter madness?!BRITISH PEOPLE DO NOT BENEFIT IN ANY WAY FROM BREXIT!#StopBrexit !!! 
Your daily reminder that single market and customs union membership means continuing  free movement, ECJ jurisdiction and no U.K. trade deals - ie no Brexit.  Staying in these institutions whilst having no say over policy would be the worst of all possible worlds.  
The @TheEconomist reports that the #economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of #Brexit via @TheEconomist 
Airbus says it will leave the UK if there's no deal on Brexit.That is a threat. All threats should be treated the same way.I'd say to Airbus what I say to all threats. Do it then, don't put it in the diary. 
I’m sure Putin is happy, along with US defence contractors that will buy UK tech companies for a song. It’s not too late for you and other progressive Tories to save the country from Brexit. #RegnumDefende 
In Cardiff speaking to CBI on entirely predictable and predicted report that @Airbus would take flight with #Brexit. Main blow at Broughton in N. Wales. Shared platform with @AmberRuddHR before referendum at airbus supply chain factory warning of risks. 
"Brexit will be a wonderful success."For Jacob Rees MoggFor tax dodgers For xenophobes For racistsFor you? Seriously?This man is talking bollocks. #WonderfulBrexitMyArse#Brexit#PeoplesVote#StopBrexit 
Not “project fear”. Just “dawning reality” say Airbus on #Brexit. When will this tin eared government and PM listen to those employing tens of thousands instead of the extremists in their own party? This is deadly serious. @Open_Britain @WalesForEurope 
At the time those pushing for UK to get back to gold standard were very similar to those pushing for Brexit.If only we could turn policy clock back then Victorian trading greatness could be revived. Claps and cheers when it was done.It was a disaster. The world had changed. 
The #Peoplesvote campaign is working. Even 35% of Leavers are in favour now. Not sure if that means they are all #Remainernow or just worried that the Brexit they wanted is not the one being pursued.#PeoplesVoteMarch #PeoplesVoteBremain 
Sadly Airbus are not alone but Airbus have to be praised for putting business reality up against deluded Brexit rhetoric - many big companies who share their view are still, even now, silent!  
Airbus employs 14,000 people in 25 UK sites. They say even an “orderly Brexit” poses “significant risks...higher complexity, more effort, more cost, more friction/delay”. So they aren’t expanding UK supplier base. Terrible news for jobs & manufacturing @laboursinglemkt 
Business needs to follow the lead of Airbus in spelling out clearly what almost all of them are thinking. Govt needs to listen. Labour needs to explain what a ‘jobs first Brexit’ means in light of this. Country needs to get real 
Hope that Airbus workers come to the march for the @peoplesvote_uk tomorrow. Today’s announcement is Project Fantasy hitting the hard realities of Brexit destroying jobs and living standards  
“Brexit” is to blame for racism in the same way that maternity wards create childbirth. I mean, there is a link there, but all the really important work was done a long time ago.  
3.8million EU migrants are allowed to stay here after Brexit: That’s 600,000 more than estimated – and they can bring their families  via @MailOnline 
Optimists: I love these summer eveningsPessimists: the nights are drawing inMe: Brexit is still a really bad idea regardless of how many hours of daylight there are 
Seriously worrying, if true, story in @thetimes of @Airbus planning major disinvestment from the UK. I will be seeking urgent reassurances from Cabinet Ministers that this sort of major loss of jobs, investment and prosperity as a result of #Brexit will NOT happen.  
@Labour NEEDS TO UNITE to STOP BREXIT There are a 70Million reasons to do it The lives of every individual in this country will be diminished for the next 30 years IF Labour does not come out now GUNS BLAZING! 
At 07:00 working visit at @Schiphol meeting @DickBenschop, Royal Military police and @Douane to see the engagement of Dutch authorities actively preparing airport security for #Brexit  
Interesting mini-thread on Carney's insight.The dappy nostalgia which led UK to the disasterous  re-adopt gold standard = the dappy nostalgia behind Brexit.Policy as a comforting time machine back to Victorian certainty.  
*A Brexit fan during the EU ref not understanding the consequences*@mrjamesob @adamboultonSKY @faisalislam @BethRigby @tamcohen @susannareid100 @piersmorgan @Anna_Soubry @ChukaUmunna @owenjbennett @carolecadwalla @DPJHodges @Peston @Femi_Sorry @maitlis 
Scottish Brexit minister @Feorlean says @scotgov doesn’t trust Sewel Convention any more and can’t see how consent motions brought forward for other Brexit legislation in current circumstances #bbcgms @BBCRadioScot 
"We had met with Theresa May for an hour during the week and we came from that meeting clear that the policy for the Tory party is Ireland last - if at all." - @MaryLouMcDonald #NewstalkBreakfast #Brexit  
Airbus threatens to leave UK after Brexit after "losing patience" with Theresa May and her negotiating team. 14K Jobs + thousands more in the supply chain. Strong and stable, people, strong and stable.  
If @jeremycorbyn can say "not a single job lost through Brexit" without utterly opposing it now something is very wrong. If Brexit happens these jobs will 100% be lost.  
The threats coming from big industry, (intertwined within the EU), to try to influence Brexit negotiations, clearly demonstrates that the EU is a protectionist cartel that wishes to exclude rather than include. 
Abject hypocrisy from @WelshLabour - the branch outlet of @jeremycorbyn who whipped MPs to abstain on EEA last week. #LabourFail to protect jobs. #Airbus #Brexit #ProjectReality 
High quality, high paid, unionised jobs. Loss of Airbus wouldn’t just be harmful to families affected, it would deal a major body blow to our aerospace industry and manufacturing supply chain. The choices we make during Brexit matter. Put jobs first @theresa_may! 
I have just seen a Quitling on here claiming this is Airbus’s management fault for not spending two years preparing to be ready for Brexit. They have - they are leaving the U.K. 
Nailed as usual. Brexit is about the re-establishment of the establishment by the establishment.... for the establishment.  The new order will be the old order... "when we use to control things" as they would say 
Anyone who works for #Airbus - turn to your friends who voted leave and thank them for losing your job. #brexit #r4today 
Im just think about  how much SNP have done for Scotland . Just imagine Scot Lab/Tory/LibDems were in charge we would be bending down to WM and handing them anything they want just to stay in their so called great Union. And no alternative to Brexit, thank you @theSNP 
The risk of Airbus cutting investment in the UK because of #Brexit uncertainty is one of the reasons why @theresa_may voted Remain. She can still do the right thing and give the people a #FinalSayOnTheDeal #FBPE 
I am a Labour Party member and, it breaks my heart, but I won’t be voting Labour until you start looking after the poorest and most vulnerable by changing your position on Brexit. I’d be a hypocrite if I did.Ps I’ve already been reported 
News report on Airbus. "The UK government says, given the progress it has continued to make in Brexit negotiations...." Sorry what? 
Airbus is the single most important company in Wales. It cannot be allowed to quit Britain because of Brexit and the  incompetence, intransigence and divisions of this Tory Government.  
The Brexit Dividend!Airbus prepares to leave the UK (14,000 direct employees, 100,000 in their supply chain). And Brits are being urged to try fruit picking before it all rots in the fields.Never saw any of that on the side of a bus.#willofthepeople 
Guardian report on Airbus planning major UK job cuts due to Brexit; the economic benefits of being in the EU were never properly explained to British people for 40 years, we were mostly fed negative rubbish about straight bananas...  
Airbus: 'Catastrophic' Brexit would threaten our future in the UK  
READ | “The British have always been experts and great business people, so to see this defeatist attitude towards Brexit is a bit startling to me," said Ambassador Johnson. He's not the only one, although startled isn't perhaps the word we'd use. 
Airbus has threatened to pull out of the UK after warning that under “any scenario, Brexit has severe negative consequences for the UK aerospace industry and Airbus in particular”. Brexit means losing control of our economy. 
Yesterday, Saturday was the day after tomorrow, now tomorrow is today and tomorrow is Saturday 23rd June, the day I will join many thousands of deeply concerned, ordinary decent people to protest against the #BrexitShambles. #Brexit is bad for #Airbus, #StopBrexit keep Airbus. 
The more the EU shows its true malevolent colours and threats, the more it galvanises and consolidates our Brexit resolve. 
‘Too dangerous’: Airbus reiterates Brexit warning  
After millions of pounds and almost two years, pro-EU campaigners are celebrating polling that shows they are still within the margin of error of a draw in a new referendum. A new referendum that isn’t happening. Interesting measure of campaign success. 
So thousands of EU nationals who do not live here will be allowed to stay in the UK post Brexit. Tens of thousands of others can also bring in their families. We aren’t serious about taking control of our borders!   
I see Brexit is all coming home to roost. And I’m not sure the Home Office announcement on “settled status” changes anything. The government have misread the room and companies are having to act o the basis they aren’t reliable or trustworthy. Auto trade and banks next. 
Today's Daily Mail isn't just xenophobic.It isn't just another comment on Brexit.Linking a topic about migrants to benefits, violent crime and rape in the first few paragraphs alone.This is carefully worded hate speech.Is this what Britain wants to be?#StopFundingHate 
Airbus have been warning about this for some time, giving evidence to Parliamentary Committees. Lost tax revenues, jobs, etc. All this could be avoided by maintaining regulatory alignment through EEA and customs union membership. #Brexit  
The airbus Brexit risk assessment doc   
Ah the sweet irony.The self-styled 'Party of big-business' (Tories), being told by actual Big Businesses that their Brexit fantasy is an absolute pile of fucking shit.#Airbus 
Time to end the absurd ideological cage-fight that Brexit has become. Gov needs to publish a coherent strategy ASAP that explains the hard choices & compromises needed to protect UK industry - regulatory alignment for goods, movement of workers, etc.  
 the reality of disaster that is #brexit : thousands of aerospace job losses around the UK including Chester. For govt this is only about internal Tory politics. For everyone else it’s about real lives, real jobs, real threat to future prosperity. 
"We've go to protect our employees, customers and shareholders. We need clarity" - Airbus CEO Tom Williams warns the company could leave the UK if there's no Brexit transition deal #r4today 
If 3.8 million EU citizens are allowed to stay in the UK after Brexit, why are UK citizens like myself losing the right to live, work, love, retire and lose our EU citizenship, rights, & protections?Surely this defies even Leave logic?@TomTugendhat I have written to ask you. 
Dear @Airbus thank you so much for telling the truth about brexit 
Our response to the announcement from Airbus on Brexit:  
Yesterday morning Starmer and Thornberry confirmed Labour say "We are leaving EU...last night, After 121,000 Airbus and associated jobs at risk..."We must attack Tory Brexit"Stop the stupidity #Labour  - all Brexit is a disaster!#PeoplesVoteMarch#FBPE 
Be not downhearted, ye folk of merrye Englande! What need have we of Buses of th'Air when each man shall have His owne Flying Unicorn?#Airbus #Brexit #ProjectFact 
2016: "Brexit will bring new opportunities and prosperity"2018: "Hey you know what's fun? Picking up all that fruit we've left out to rot."  
UK, Survation poll:"When the negotiations are complete, to what extent would you support or oppose holding a referendum asking the public if they will accept or reject the deal?"Support: 48%Oppose: 25%Field Work: 19/06/18-21/06/18Sample size: N/A#Brexit 
At this stage, If you think ‘Labour are the same as Tories on brexit’,  Id prefer if you saved me the bother of muting you by not commenting. Not spending another second arguing with the politically fathomless. Thank you in advance #spanner 
It’s taken 36 hours for Brexit to go from statute book triumph to project grim reality on Airbus jobs 
Will be off to work in a minute, but could you please RT this so that anyone who was at Labour Live who saw what went on with the "Stop Backing Brexit" protesters can comment below on what they saw? Also any pics/vids of it, please. Thank you. Have a good day. 
I’m no big Vote Leave fan but the entire @ElectoralCommUK rots from the head down. The chairman has said that Brexit is a complete load of Eurosceptic nonsense & others call for a 2nd Referendum. Yet they ignore complaints against Remain.  
Airbus now threatening to move out of UK post Brexit. The more the bullying & threats, the more I am justified in voting for Independence.  A possible short term hit will bring a long term big gain for the UK. Let's build our own aircraft industry again. We have the Knowhow. 
WEAK GOVERNMENTUK Government has already unilaterally offered all EU nationals arriving by 2021 a lifetime right to bring their entire family. Now the government is considering letting convicted rapists from the EU stay here for life post-Brexit.  
Every day, Brexit becomes more ludicrous. Just think of millions more people on JSA. Billions less in tax revenue from the companies which have fled. And people actually think an indy Scotland in the EU would be worse. Beans, magic beans for sale... 
My Brexit predictions from exactly two years ago. Too many are coming true for comfort, though I missed fruit rotting in the fields, Trump’s trade war, and Corbyn’s support for a Tory Brexit. Dismal.  
Brexit dividend  
Brexit shitshow headlines today:•Airbus on brink of pulling investment from Britain•Tens of thousands of manufacturing roles at risk•EU/US trade war kicks in•Chancellor says ‘Treasury is not the enemy of Brexit’ - Why the hell not???  
Airbus generates £1.7billion in tax for Britain. That’s approaching a quarter of UKs net annnal contribution to the EU.Has a country ever died from self imposed idiocy before?#brexit - so much winning.  
You didn't want your top-tier manufacturing job anyway...  And "picking fruit is more fun than you think."  Brexit's economic impact summarised in one handy front page.  
Remainers & #remainernow are the true patriots. Anyone still pushing for Brexit must be doing so for their own twisted agenda. Please get yourself down to London tomorrow #PeoplesVoteMarch We must tell the govt, loud & clear: no one voted for this! #WATON 
The biggest problem with being opposed to Brexit or Trump is that you end up gleefully sharing bad news because it proves your point. It's like warning your kids not to touch the fire and then laughing hysterically when they get 3rd degree burns. 
Get with the programme of Jackpop Crackpop Tupperware Teereza’s Booming Batshit £90Bn Migrant hating Brexit Bonanza it’s a Far Right Extravaganza as the sun breaks on a New Tory Dawn the Govt tells the nation it’s time to Get Fruit Picking Bigots pic.twitter.com/3zg8Nb8M2G 
Desperately worrying for Welsh economy. Why we should stay in the single market and the Customs Union and why Westminster should seek the endorsement of our national parliament before any Brexit deal.  
And still more consequences flow. A potential €200m contract between European Space Agency & Airbus in Portsmouth will be moved to France or Germany because of Brexit.  
Bogus of @LeftFootFwd to say Leavers “did not ‘respect’ the 1975 vote”. It was implemented, then after 40 years an election was won on the promise of a referendum, then we fought and won that. That’s not the same as trying to prevent the 2016 referendum being implemented at all.  
Every day brings more bad news about the secrecy, lies, incompetence & frankly outrageous way this govt is approaching Brexit. And Corbyn is closing his ears to what Brexit means for the majority of Lab voters.Join us tmw at #PeoplesVote march. Make your voices heard. 
Airbus says it may pull its British investments if the country leaves the EU without striking a Brexit deal  
Survation finds that by 48% to 25% those polled want a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
“In any scenario, Brexit has severe negative consequences for the UK aerospace industry & Airbus.”Tom Williams COO, Airbus. As they prepare to withdraw major investment from UK over state of Brexit negotiations. Paging May & Corbyn.  
Survation Brexit anniversary poll has REMAIN 5% ahead  
Oh calamity, Jeremy! Your ‘Brexit for jobs’ has just gone up in smoke! Have you ever heard of anything as daft as ‘Brexit for jobs’ for heavens sake? #Labour’s betrayal of working class Britain, of all of Britain, continues.  
Four million EU nationals will get right to stay in the UK after #Brexit - and violent criminals could be among them  
All UK media morning news repeated every day:1, demonize #Trump in any way possible no matter what he does2, talk down #Brexit in any way possible, frighten the population into losing it's nerve3, continue the poor migrants narrative ignoring dangers of limitless numbers 
#Brexit is our generations #polltax - but this time our entire way of life and the foundations of democracy are under assault. Time to #MarchForYourLife#PeoplesVote 
Special mention to the gazillionaire tax dodgers and hedge funders who bankrolled Brexit and whose lives will not be affected one tiny jot by the loss of hundreds of thousands of well paid manufacturing jobs.  
Sick of hearing from the #FBPE crowd. Right now there are 2 realistic options for the future: 1) Out of EU & Corbyn-led Labour govt, or 2) Out of EU & Tory govt. I prefer option 1. If you say you won't vote Labour until they are 100% against Brexit then we'll all get option 2.  
This means @carolecadwalla owes a more few people a big fat "I toldya so" for this investigation proving her prescient #Brexit reporting to also be 100% correct.#TheResistance 
You’ve cut the front page off too early - let’s revel in the glory of what we’ve truly become because the two headlines together sums it upBrexit: Because why build aircraft when you can pick fruit?  
Brexit: This is significant, Airbus prepares to abandon investment in Britain. How long before Nissan, Toyota etc do the same? The #peoplesvotemarch on Saturday couldn’t be more timely. 
So airbus have come out today and said they will leave if there is no deal and no transition : then the car makers will leave - I said this will happen if vital components cannot travel without and delays : if we leave the CU .. what brexit MPs  said a no deal was a good idea ? 
Tom Williams, of Airbus Commercial Aircraft, said in "any scenario" Brexit had "severe negative consequences"  for the UK aerospace industry and Airbus in particular: That is any scenario, any Brexit deal, not just crashing out without a deal.  
This is the reality of a "jobs first Brexit". And there's much, much more to come.Do you feel lied to?  
Airbus plans UK job cuts amid fears of hard Brexit impact  
Airbus says no-deal Brexit would force it to reconsider UK presence  
Britain releases details on how it plans to process as many as 3.5 million residence applications from European Union citizens after Brexit.  
Opinion: A compromise for #Brexit is possible  
Not only are @The3Million European Citizens losing their rights in this country, but this is how many are treating us.We are not just migrants, we're not things to be demonized, we are human beings who have built our lives in Britain, and Brexit should not change that.  
Trudeau just declared war on the west!  Time for a referendum on section 36, or on leaving! Need to up the anti!!  
Countdown to #BREXIT - calendar, schedule, key dates, + a great deal of unexpected detail about all sorts of things, Brexit-related. Recently updated. 
This is from Airbus' statement about their operations post Brexit.Note that it specifically refers to difficulties moving *people* and not just goods.So how's your jobs-first Brexit ending of freedom of movement Brexit plans eh, Tories and Lexiters?  
Yes @darth_synot. The delegates at Uluru, following the well informed and unprecedented process leading up to it, considered previous legislated representative bodies. We know legislation will be repealed one day, our Voices muffled again. Take us to referendum #auspol we’ll win. 
Some of @Garexit's #indyref (Scottish independence referendum) retweets got a surprising amount of attention considering that @Garexit only has 55 followers. How'd this happen? 
Despite Brexit not being among the search terms, @Garexit also found this bot (@brexit_clock) due to the #indyref hashtag. It tweets the time remaining until the theoretical date of #Brexit.  
Stop being 'defeatist' about Brexit and be inspired by Trump, Britons told by US ambassador  via @Telegraph 
Airbus warns no-deal Brexit could see it leave UK  
Delighted to discuss #brexit & #border matters in (literally) high places in DC!I came away convinced of sustained, protective interest re: peace process.The UK's friends abroad are v.aware of what is at stake for NI in Brexit.Thank you so much for facilitating this @WIPLive 
Alberta will always be treated as a colony to be milked by the federal government. The time has come to hold a referendum on renegotiating our constitutional relationship with the federals to keep our wealth & decision making here at home.  #ableg 
The US Ambassador has called on the British to be optimistic about Brexit. He says our defeatist attitude is ‘sorrowing’ to him. Quite right. But guess who sets the tone for the defeatism?—May, Hammond, and most of the cabinet. A fish rots from the head, as they say. 
The public want a final vote on the Brexit deal, by a huge margin: 48% to 25%.And Britain would vote to #Remain in the EU, by 53% to 47%, says the latest @survation poll. We should #StopBrexit. Let’s march on Saturday for a #PeoplesVote with an #OptionToRemain. 
Bloody well BeLeave it: UK election watchdog expected to report that Theresa May’s administration is implicated in an elaborate overspending cheat scheme for Brexit referendum.  
The tragedy of Brexit becomes more stark by the day.Now Airbus prepare to move business from Britain amid Brexit fears.More and more jobs are being lost. We need to #StopBrexit. 
Brexit won't happen! Despite the cheering from biased BBC, tabloids & Putin-fed traitors, an inspiring large number of people believe the UK won't be able to find a majority that wants to crash out of the EU. No deal will be found.Remain is the UK's only option.#StopBrexit 
If you're one of the 14,000+ UK workers employed by #Airbus, or one of the 100,000+ working in the company's UK supply chain......don't take this #Brexit stupidity lying down!Join the #PeoplesVoteMarch this Saturday and tell Theresa May what you think! 
Brexit: solutions are not for the plebs - neither Airbus nor the finance industry needs to be a problem But a mere author of a lowly blog couldn't possibly know that. I'll stand back in awe and wait for Great Men to deliver us from disaster...  #Brexinfo. 
Airbus threatens to leave the UK because of uncertainty over Brexit  
This is the end of Brexit, for sure  
There is a lack of wisdom in the UK parliament. Brexit is a child of anger, stress and desperation. Logic played no part in the Brexit vote.How sad it is, that parliament is so full of shallow personalities and the arse-lickers of Vanity. 
Labour is as fatally & terminally split as Tories. Time for moderates & Remainers In both to stop the Brexit mayhem.  
Ruth Davidson on tax increases...before and after it was announced that taxes would have to rise to fund the NHS - under the guise of a 'Brexit dividend'  
Airbus has threatened to pull out of the UK after warning that under “any scenario Brexit has severe negative consequences for the UK aerospace industry and Airbus in particular”.That's, 'under ANY scenario', Brexit has severe negative consequences. 
I knew it was bad, but some of the figures in Airbus' statement are eyewatering (in one way or another): 10,000 original parts manufactured in the UK. 14,000 people employed in the UK, 1,900 expats. 110,000 -one hundred and ten thousand- UK supply chain jobs. Brexit is criminal.  
Two #brexit stories on the The Times front page:1. “Fruit picking is fun, job seekers told”.2. “Airbus prepares to relocate out of of UK”. Brexit future in a nutshell.Enjoy.  
This is not project fear.Airbus is preparing to move production out of the UK because of Brexit."Airbus’ production is likely to be severely disrupted due to interruption to the flow of parts and/or discontinued airworthiness."Official statement here: 
Hows that 'Jobs first Brexit' working out for you Keir?#StopBrexit 
Main ‘anti Brexit ‘ group “Best for Britain” , run by millionaire financier who funded Cameron and now funds Blairite group Progress. Is this why ‘Remain ‘ groups waste time being ‘anti Corbyn   
RIP Koko the Gorilla, dead at 46. Too soon. She was our last hope of an intelligent Brexit negotiator to replace David Davis. 
Brexit dividend. Airbus announces it is preparing to move production out of Britain.  
The enormous Airbus factory in North Wales is one of the jewels in the crown of UK manufacturing. This is a wake up call. A pragmatic, sensible Brexit that protects trade & jobs is vital.  
Things just got real for me.2 weeks ago Airbus increased their regular monthly order to us 25%.Sounds good. At first.I wondered at the time if they were perhaps stockpiling in readiness for Brexit.Just seen this....#BrexitIsPersonal#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
Brexit summed up on a front page:We’re losing highly skilled jobs and investment.But think of the fun you can have toiling in the fields, people.#StopBrexit 
If proof was needed that the PM’s Brexit red lines need to be abandoned (and fast), this is it.  
Why are Sky News giving uncritical air time to fake “journalist” Isabel Oakeshott on #skypapers? She has NOT explained herself yet on the Brexit emails. Disgraceful that Sky are helping her rehabilitation.  
BREAKING: At risk 14,000 direct employees and 110,000 jobs among 4,000 suppliers .Airbus UK says it's planning to move out because of Brexit.“We have sought to highlight our concerns over the past 12 months, without success." 
The "Brexit Dividend" seems to be nothing more than an economic crash and burn.  
There you have it, in black and white, on the front page of the Times. Literally tens of thousands of high quality engineering jobs at risk. Once gone, gone forever. But it's ok, cos they can pick fruit. Stop this madness now. #Brexit  
You know what - I challenge any local politician in Northern Ireland to meet me in a public forum, of their choice, to engage & debate on:“How will BREXIT maintain or improve the material & economic well being of Northern Ireland?”#BREXIT 
"There isn't going to be a Brexit dividend, it's a Brexit deceit." Good start from @JonAshworth #bbcqt 
Brexit isn't anti-establishment. It's just reshuffled the establishment.Farage, David Davis, Boris Johnson, are just as establishment as Cameron, Clegg and Osbourne.Want to see REAL people taking back control? Come along on Saturday.#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Airbus workers should not worry. Rees-Mogg has promised marginally cheaper lamb imports. #Brexit 
@theSNP have consistently warned of the costs of Brexit. This is a wake up call. To protect jobs, we need to stay in the single market and the customs union. We run the risk of enormous economic self harm. @theresa_may knows this but will not stop. 
Tmr’s @thetimes: “Airbus prepares to take flight” and pull investments from the UK in the event of a hard #Brexit. This is a company with the jobs we need - 14,000 direct & 110,000 jobs. Seriously alarming. What will it take for the establishments running Westminster to wake up!  
If Airbus leaves the UK would lose tax revenues of £1.7bn, excluding social costs of subsequent redundancies. This firm's revenues cover 21% of net UK cost of EU membership - & that's just one company (via @Sywert). Underscores again the self-destructive stupidity of Brexit  
1,000s of skilled jobs are on the line due to the shambolic mess the Gov have created over Brexit negotiations. Everyone who wants to protect our future should join the #PeoplesVoteMarch on Sat & demand a #PeoplesVote.  
"If Theresa May lied about the Brexit dividend, it's astonishing!" says the lady in the audience...WHERE HAVE YOU BEEN THE PAST EIGHT YEARS???#ToryElectionFraud#UniversalCredit#homelessness#UNCRPD#Fracking#SaudiArabiaOn and on and on... #BBCQT 
Decisions made now will hamper our country for a generation. Brexit will impact our jobs, our families and our communities; our standard of living and our state of mind.We reject it. We disrespect the lies and liars that brought it. We stand against it.FFS @UKLabour wake up. 
None of this is about parliamentary procedure. Or internal party wranglings. It is about my constituents' jobs. And the actual money in people's pockets.@laboursinglemkt #Brexit  
Tens of thousands of jobs and billions in taxes now at risk thanks to May’s push for a hard Brexit.  
Great Scott !It's that awful Tim *Wetherspoon* Martin on #bbcqt tonight !pronouncing on the so called #Brexit dividend !Give me strength ! 
Oh fucking hell Tim Martin again invoking fisheries as a reason for Brexit... fishing that accounts for less than half a percent of GDP and employs fewer people than Poundland #bbcqt 
New poll shows big support for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Fantastic boost ahead of the march on Saturday!  
If the Stop Brexit campaign gets that 48% who want another referendum up towards 60% then they’re in with a chance. But they won’t do that wasting time targeting the leader or the opposition instead of trying to win people over, and therefore MPs, in Leave voting constituencies  
Labour abandoned the white working class when Tony Blair chose immigrants and lower wages over improving the lives of working families. Corbyn's the same, he milks the Unions for money but doesn't give a monkey's about the people who pay, or the ones who voted for Brexit.  
Bad news for Flintshire, Wales and the U.K.What part of a “jobs First brexit” or a “clean brexit” is this, @jeremycorbyn & @theresa_may?“Airbus prepares to take flight: tens of thousands of manufacturing roles at risk over Brexit” #bbcpapers #skypapers 
Another Brexit triumph? @thetimes reports Airbus preparing to pull investment in UK & move production of aircraft wings elsewhere. It generates £1.7bn in annual tax revenues for our country 
Often hear journalists say public get media they want. But media also creates the public. Impossible to underestimate the roll of British media in creating Brexit and the current political climate in Britain  
A perfect Brexit front page , lose highly skilled jobs and we can all go and pick fruit. 
When the negotiations are complete, to what extent would you support or oppose holding a referendum asking the public if they will accept or reject the deal?Support: 48%Oppose: 25%via @Survation, 19 - 21 Jun 
Grim @thetimes splash,@elliotttimes says Airbus  are preparing to be the first large manufacturer to pull investment after losing patience with Theresa May’s stalled Brexit negotiations. “In the absence of any clarity, we have to assume the worst case scenario”  
That’s the first lead for Remain in any @Survation poll since March (visualised below). The research also found that Britain is split down the middle over whether there’ll be a Brexit dividend (40% yes, 37% no).  
Two parts of that tweet right - I’m pro Brexit and have written for The Spectator. But I’m not right wing, not anti immigrant and the name’s Ella. Nevertheless - tune in. I might surprise you.  
Here we go again: more about cheating by #Leave campaign in #Brexit #Referendum and questions about whether current cabinet ministers broke the law...  
Both the Labour Party & the Conservative Party are fatally split & will never recover. Time for the moderates & Remainers in both to form an umbrella group of the centre & Stop Brexit.  
New Survation polling on Brexit: — Referendum on final deal: 48% yes / 25% no— A no deal Brexit would be: 47% Bad / 32% good— Soft Brexit 43% / hard Brexit 37% — Remain 53% / Leave 47% 
Polish President's chief of staff warns that the centralised eurozone budget proposed by Macron and Merkel could spell the end of the EU:  #Brexit 
Airbus the aerospace giant on the brink of abandoning British investment. Tens of thousands of manufacturing jobs at risk over #Brexit The Times 22/6/2018  
Honesty would be admitting there is no 'Jobs First Brexit' @EmilyThornberry Honesty would be informing the country that every Brexit means less jobs, less wealth, less public expenditure.Such honesty is in short supply, but in desperate need. 
May I ask why the hell is Brexit still on going if all this evidence is there? Is it not going to be questioned? Do all the MPs know this? The Parliament? The PM? Will Nigel and Boris be held accountable? Will this get buried and swept away with just tweets? 
I'll be there with other cross party MEPs who oppose hard Brexit or Brexit full stop. Hope as many as you possible can make the effort to turn up send a signal to HMG and opposition that we care about UK EU relations.  
I always enjoy catching up with @KimDarroch, the British Ambassador to the US. Lots of catching up on issues including trade, national security, Brexit update, and wars in the Middle East. We have a very special relationship with the UK!  
The front page of tomorrow's Daily Telegraph: 'Drop the defeatism on Brexit, says the US' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I spent this afternoon in Leinster House with our strong all-island Sinn Féin team consisting TD's, MPS, MEP's & Senators. We engaged with the EU's chief Brexit negotiator, Michel Barnier & President of the...  
The eejit who failed to get a single prosecution for the horsemeat scandal, who promised to end homeless children living in hotels by June 2017, who sent our navy right to the coast of Africa to pick up migrants and bring them back to Europe is now our point man for #Brexit  
I nearly threw the hat in today, to give up protesting #Brexit Then I thought, fuck it, I'll stop protesting when we remain or I die. Whichever one comes first.#FBPE 
Millions of EU citizens living in Britain face having to post their passports to the Home Office to gain the right to remain after Brexit, under plans unveiled on Thursday  
Brexit is stupid and wrongBrexit is stupid and wrongBrexit is stupid and 
University lecturer Puts Brexit on the same level as Nazism Why am I not surprised?  
When do @metpoliceuk get involved in this?#Brexit was won by breaking the law!@vincecable PLEASE keeping shouting until this crime is prosecuted.#BrexitFraud#BrexitRussia#FBPE 
It's been a week of highs and lows, but it ends for me with Paul Dacre - the editor of the Daily Mail, who championed and arguably enabled Brexit - about to be ousted and a heartening party for @TheNewEuropean to celebrate its 100th issue. 
This from a professor of Politics likening Brexit to the Third Reich Ask first is he one of the Liberal Elite who might teach your son or Daughter at University one day.Talking about many dead before the fraud of #brexit Is exposed.The men in the white coats need to be called  
On the day of the EU referendum result:#Tories had no #Brexit plan#Labour had no Brexit planThe Civil Service had no Brexit planParliament hadn't debated BrexitThe dust hadn't settled but at 7.29am #Corbyn said #Article50 should be triggered immediately.#StopBrexit 
Excellent, informative and very well organised #Brexit information evening tonight by the @BritsinGermany team. Not a lot of good news out there but comforting to see that there are people out there working hard to make a difference for those affected most by Brexit. #SignMeUp 
It's a sad indictment that the media attending Labour Live were too interested in reporting disinformation about an anti-Brexit protest to bother reporting on the McStrikers' brilliant talk in the solidarity tent. What a real shame. Like Momentum, they're the #WrongKindOfYouth 
MP Emily Thornberry has accused Chuka Umunna and other Labour Brexit rebels of wanting to overturn the result of the 2016 Brexit referendum.WELL OF COURSE IT IS, ITS MOST SANE PEOPLES OBJECTIVE . Has she still NOT GOT IT ?  #FBPE 
RT'ing - keep being told that the country now wants to Remain.  I wish it were true, then a second referendum would be worth the risk.  Sadly, at the moment, all it will do is increase the gulf between the two sides, start another cycle of hate speech with no certainty of outcome  
Philip Hammond takes astonishing public swipe at Boris Johnson as Tory Brexit civil war deepens 
Brexit fan Tim Martin has already complained about staff shortages due to Brexit. #Idiot #BBCQT 
First antenatal classes tonight.'What are your concerns about Labour?''I mean where to start, but the stance on Brexit is...' 
Immigration targets are irrelevant.If #Brexit happens and people voted due to immigration then they are going to get a nasty shock. Every trade deal will require a softening of the UK VISA system.That means more immigration and not less.#PeoplesVote 
Give them a voice: #PeoplesVote “Brexit youth: 'I am angry and the future scares me' - BBC News  
Right wing Labour MPs during leadership coup: 'what the members think is irrelevant. It's the electorate that's important & Corbyn must go.' Same MPs over Brexit. 'we need a vote of the members to decide our Brexit policy. The electorate are too stupid to be listened to.' 
- Brexit- Trump- Argentina 
In other words, the referendum was won with illegal money and a joint criminal enterprise. Of course the BBC won't say what's blatantly obvious. How can we continue with Brexit when systemic cheating occurred in the Referendum?  
For those with the memory of a goldfish, PBP campaigned for #Brexit...  
Does this Brexit spokesperson speak for you?(Credit @bbc5live) 
“When Britain stood alone in 1940 after defeat at Dunkirk, we were cut off & ridiculed. True leadership sometimes feels isolating. Yet we’ve never suffered for it. We’re resourceful & well connected; our brand is strong in the world” @PennyMordaunt #Brexit 
Quite rich from someone who, with a straight face, claims her party could deliver a “jobs first” Brexit.  
Before the referendum, when my profile was much, much lower, I was on the BBC all the time. Since the referendum: substantially never. 
Now May is questioning Britain's role as a military power. How far is this worm going to go in degrading of this country. She has conned us out of brexit is flooding the country with "refugees", doesn´t know how many illegals there are here. Get her out before there is F.A. left. 
New immigration rules for EU citizens post Brexit, includes for those who've spent less than 5 years in UK, have to declare any criminal record.That should ring alarm bells. The authorities obviously don't know much about those already here & they're entering every single day. 
Me: hi Taoiseach Leo: well done on the referendum Me: thanks man, hi jean-claude I’m jeans and vans but sure don’t I represent the youth  
Phenomenal speakers  tonight saying ‘Together to Exit Tory Brexit!’ And let’s fight for a @jeremycorbyn Labour Government! From @WeAreTheMU General Secretary, to @GeraintDaviesMP @CatherineWest1 @Andrew_Adonis @lahamnett @nickdearden75 @Andrew_Adonis 
Britain's Fox says now zero chance of stopping Brexit  
It was a territory we exploited the crap out of for sugar and servicemen for two world wars. Puerto Rico deserves a referendum on statehood 
I'm about 15 minutes from posting something truly shocking that a Brexit spokesperson said today. And I was going to use their picture as the thumbnail. But apparently I just have too much mercy. I'm just going to cite the group they represent. But seriously...  
EU citizens will have to pay to stay in Britain after Brexit  
Have you any idea how many people would vote for Labour if it dropped its insane support for #Brexit? We would have a Labour govt faster than you could blink. 
Theresa May has been accused of “putting people’s lives at risk” as bitter row continues over the Tories’ despicable decision to force sick and ill Labour MPs to vote in person on key Brexit bill  
The government knows there is no Brexit dividend. Why are they misleading the public?We’re better off if we #StopBrexit - the #Remain dividend could help fund the NHS. 
Not taking a lecture from SF who opposed EU for decades, but happy to confirm my view that whole of both islands being in single market better than just here. A hard Brexit hurts ALL of Ireland & it’s hypocritical to reject north/south border but push for one in the Sea #noborder 
Thank you @sajidjavid for this nice and carefully worded email about #citizensrights post-Brexit and for claiming you "take immense pride" that EU citizens live in the UK.While it is positive to have a few more details on settled status, I am not reassured and here is why   
Very sad to see Thornberry come out so strongly for Brexit, with all its implications of division, disinvestment and disruption. It's a recipe for increasing poverty and putting the #NHS totally at risk.#PeoplesVote 
I'm followed by about a dozen avid pro Brexit men... all men... who live abroad. Many of them in France. I wonder how many are applying for French citizenship on the sly. My guess is - all of them. 
 Lammy's at it again. Sick Naz Shah traveled 200 miles from Bradford to vote against the government in the crucial Brexit vote, no doubt under massive whip pressure. But, in David Lammy's world, that makes the government "inhumane". Huh? Desperate stuff indeed from Mr Lammy  
Now that the EU Withdrawal Bill is law, we need to stop thinking of Brexit in terms of what they, Brussels, will let us do.  It how we want to arrange things that’s key. If we can get EU cooperation on some things great. If not, crack on. 
So in summary you want me to leave the UK because I object to Brexit - Fay can stay but only if she shuts up and you're not a hypocrite for being a Brexiteer in France. Thanks John. It's been an education.  
Left Against Brexit? March for a People’s Vote this Saturday!  
Well said Emily Thornberry weak careerists trying to undermine the only chance of a decent future millions of us have, a fair Labour government, need to be called out.Emily Thornberry sparks Labour row after accusing Brexit rebels of 'dishonesty'  
If you want a #Peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal, make sure you're marching with us on Saturday!  
Big thnx @Nicva for presenting new case studies on #Brexit impact. Lively & frank discussion after but disappointing to hear SDLP suggest British Govt “soft Brexit” option superior to Special Status or The Backstop proposed by EU 27. Now is time to stand firm with EU & Dublin.  
Jo Maugham has been utterly found out after backing Tory ‘rebels’ and attacking Labour. These people make a hard Brexit more likely. Just keep on calling people names Jolyon. It’s a badge of honour.  
And here's Matthew narrating a video with the 'BIG BEAST' Tories involved in their fraudulent Vote Leave campaign - bonus points if you can recognise their patsy who's caught red-handed, top right. 
Javid slams EU for not spelling out protection for expats after BrexitWithdraw EU migrants Visa offer, until EU back down, to offer like for like!  
This is what I’ve always said! May told me we were safer in, richer in, stronger in, so I voted in. Now she doesn’t even acknowledge my existence as a Remainer and tells me #Brexit is a big bonanza for Britain and I should shut up.   
So it's clear, lies, cheating and Russian influence are all shown to be involved in delivering Brexit. And yet Parliament are soul searching about "the will of the people".  
A Westminster whimper, and a Brussels bang? My latest Brexit Blog post, on this week's developments and emerging events, just up:  h/ts @GeorgePeretzQC @tconnellyRTE @rafaelbehr 
Two years ago today Britons voted to leave the EU, but they didn't vote on what sort of Brexit they wanted. Why is a softer Brexit is better?  
.@Nigel_Farage gives his take on the latest Brexit developments and more live from NYC. Watch here and get involved:  
This feels like a hostage video, with May desperately reading a script crafted by her captors on the Right of the Conservative Party. The Prime Minister is a #PrisonerInPower.She knows Tory MPs are using her to carry the can for a hard Tory Brexit before they force her out.  
I'm Swedish, so I don't really feel obligated to follow every twist and turn of this. But with Russian propaganda supporting Brexit and the authoritarian wave in Europe, it seems important to know what's in store for our own elections. 
By dragging out the Brexit process, Remain Lords and MPs risk pushing Britain towards the worst possible Brexit deal.  
We won the battle of 23 June 2016 but the Brexit war still rages on with foreign billionaires shamelessly funding campaign groups wanting to deny us our independence. Help us keep fighting for the Brexit we all voted for!   
How would Brexit affect the opportunities of British people for university education?  
In similar way to Tories, it appears, as we hurtle towards destructive #Brexit , different elements of  Labour have less & less in common.In circumstances it'd be entirely understandable if Chuka Umunna & others decided to plough a different course.  
UK’s elections regulator has already ruled one major Leave campaign, Leave. EU, broke electoral law. Will soon report that designated campaign Vote Leave broke rules too. So will Parliament properly investigate the Brexit referendum? Or will some puny fines suffice? @gavinsblog 
GraylingCampbellMillerCleggAbbottGeldofBlairMandelsonSoubryRowlingKinnocksHeseltine..all other RemoanersThey’re whining nowCan’t wait for their collective, hysterical breakdown when we’ve finally left the dying EU & rejoined the rest of the World#Brexit #FBPE 
Who would be setting the global standards after Brexit: the UK or the EU?  
Too many of the Westminster Elite have ZERO experience in business and commerce. Diane Abbott is a fine example, Corbyn is another. All they care about is politics and race & are business illiterate. Compare to Trump's skill sets and figure out why Brexit is hampered. 
I would ask them in the name of God why? In just what alternate universe is Brexit a good idea for the working class, let alone anybody else? 
Thanks @tomhfh for pointing out that young working class Brits don't want Brexit... because... you know... maths 'n' stuff.   
If the rules were broken, the Referendum should be voided and rerun 
Dave Brown on Theresa May kicking the Brexit can over the cliff – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Britain won the Brexit vote on Wednesday ending 40 years of EU servitude.Trade Minister Liam Fox:"So in case anyone is in any doubt, the chances of the UK not leaving the European Union are now zero!"#Brexit #Leave #EU via @MailOnline 
Electoral Commission expected to report on July 4th or 5th - draft findings suggest Brexit campaigns did break the rules, and recommend at least one fine - but being challenged by legal teams  - story online v soon 
EU is getting ready for no-deal Brexit, says Jean-Claude Juncker  
We are pleased to say that @PeterTatchell will be addressing the large crowds this Saturday at the #PeoplesVoteMarchSign up and join us to hear Peter’s thoughts on Brexit and the need for a #PeoplesVote from a human rights perspective:  
Brexit is also teaching the EU the value of EU membership. It's very educational, as a certain Frenchman likes to say.  
Dr Lauren Gavaghan will be speaking at the #PeoplesVoteMarch this Saturday. Here, she explains why she is coming down and why she is calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Make sure you're coming as well - sign up now:  
We endorse the march in London on Saturday and we can say, without any doubt, that Northern Ireland's Remainers who can't be there are saying #marchforme. Everyone who walks is defending our peace process from a ConDup Brexit. We applaud you all. #PeoplesVote 
Those in Labour promoting Brexit seem to be on the wrong side of wrong! 
PA copy from @ScotlandRHShow this afternoon is headed “SCOTLAND’S FARMERS WILL GET ‘SPECIAL TREATMENT’ AFTER BREXIT - GOVE”.   Knowing @GovUk  (& Gove) believing that would take a massive collective  “suspension of disbelief “, to quote Coleridge. 
Cab Sec @FionaHyslop stated that @scotgov believe there should be no fee for #SettledStatus, but that "if @GOVUK refuses to change their position the Scottish Government will look to meet the settled status fees for #EU citizens working in our devolved public services.” #Brexit  
Ignoring the impact for a moment, some people are considering Hard Brexit to be easy. It isn’t. Whilst it is the easiest in terms of negotiation, it is, in fact, the most difficult form of Brexit to implement. In the timescales being discussed: by difficult, I mean impossible. 
These are the Brexit facts:1》Hard Brexit or No Deal will result in a hard border down the Irish Sea.2》Soft Brexit will give truth to Leave lies by ensuring we pay fees and take orders from the EU without any say.3》Remain would hurt no one but the tax dodgers and racists.  
Latest LAB voter split in YouGov's Brexit tracker  
Cringe factor here is off the scale. The anti-Brexit movement is cross-party because Britain is cross-party. The obsession with some on the left with total purity and segregation risks destroying the chance to defeat both Brexit and the Tories  
A depressingly large number of people still think the UK is going to shit just becausei) Brexit is taking too long, orii) Brexit isn't being done rightThey still believe that their impoverished lives will improve if only Brexit will be delivered.How to get through to them? 
Javid’s post-Brexit settlement plan does nothing to reassure EU citizens | Tanja Bueltmann  
That's the reality of Brexit. Those of us not privileged enough to live in nice unaffected areas voted leave because we deal with the issues raised daily. We see the detrimental effect mass migration has. It's not a pretty sight and it's certainly not safe. pic.twitter.com/e7tq9t9fhv 
Speaking alongside @Manuel_TSSA at his anti-Brexit rally in Congress House at 7pm. Brexit is the enemy of working Britain. Manuel on the front line calling for a people’s vote to stop it - as well as trying to save the railways from Grayling! Proud to be on same platform 
This is the city we live in. A Winnipeg Councillor wants to put the question, should people be allowed to cross the street, on the next election ballot. Why not put every roadwork project to a public referendum?  
He isn’t sleeping until Brexit is stopped & we resume sensible national policy to Make Britain Great Again!  
A Westminster whimper, and a Brussels bang? My latest Brexit Blog post, on this week's developments and emerging events, just up:  
Good news Remainers - we're getting a re-run of the referendum after all! Unfortunately you may not like the result this time round either...  
Richard Boyd-Barrett put firm questions to European Commission president Jean-Claude Juncker: Can we trust Europe, and can we trust the assurances that it will not impose a hard border post-Brexit?Juncker's answer was equally firm as he shouted 'Yes!' across the chamber.  
Said the man running from an election that would be a referendum on his role in the Trump regime, his complicit obstruction of the Trump/Russia probe via Nunes, his tax cut for the rich, his attack on healthcare, #BabyJails and more.Gutless and spineless.Quite the legacy, Ryan. 
Charges vs Jail #FactCheck 1. Referendum = 30 years2. Explicit lyrics = 4 years3. Pinch £40m = £200k bail4. Rape = £6k bailSource: #EU member state 
And they have been a breath of fresh air in the Brexit debate to push back on the stale stench coming out of so many MPs on this. And old born agains like @paulmasonnews who should know better than try to put young people off activism 
At @ScotlandRHShow today for excellent evidence session w rural sector reps for @CommonsScotAffs inquiry into impact of #Brexit on trade & #ScotlandTheBrand then a quick tour around this amazing showcase for the best of #Scottish 
The language of genocide. The fascists must be fought root and branch. There is no place for them in a civilised and humane society. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
oh dear, Nigel Farage now going around claiming 'I never said we would be better off leaving'... maybe he doesnt remember a guy called Nigel Farage writing 'Britain Would Be Better Off Going It Alone' #brexit #trainwreck 
Awful yobbish behaviour from someone who has completely lost focus of the issue. Namely Brexit and British jobs. 
If you weren’t worried about Italy and Europe before, this is chilling. Brexit is a mild symptom but it’s a symptom. Beware of creeping acceptance. It’s not normal. It’s Italy, it’s brexit, it’s Trump it’s more. . .  
The real reason why they want you to hate @jeremycorbyn and @johnmcdonnellMP is they want to crack down on Tax avoidance the big hitters own most of Britain's media.    Brexit is about taking back control and keeping their cosy tax laws whilst we lose our jobs claiming UC.  
Lol Action Bronson shaved. Fucking Hell. Should change his name to Action Brexit. pic.twitter.com/RV5YUJDd0i 
A British judge compared the Brexit crisis to the one at Dunkirk in 1940  
Can anyone else hear the cry for help in Theresa May's voice when she says the word 'Brexit'?  
'What are the EU willing to give up?' Verhofstadt put on the spot in tense Brexit grilling  
.@MaryLouMcDonald to Jean-Claude Juncker: Tories cannot be allowed to pressurise Ireland into accepting a calamitous Brexit  
We've had a week of Brexit blue-on-blue action, so good to see Labour getting in on the act.  
Brexit-triggered flight from London:•JPMorgan looks for bigger office space in Milan•Goldman Sachs to double the number of staff in Frankfurt•Asset management companies increase their presence in Dublin or Luxembourg•Moody’s move staff to Frankfurt 
The Govt voting down the amendment to maintain EU environmental standards after Brexit is not a ‘win’ for anybody. Those laws are designed to maintain the highest standards of protection for our environment, and we should be strengthening, not weakening, those regulations. 
A duo of @Femi_Sorry and @lara_spirit from @OFOCBrexit will be speaking at the #PeoplesVoteMarch on Saturday.Join us this weekend and hear why Femi and Lara are calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal:  
Strongly welcome @MayorofLondon's call for a registration system for EU nationals that is free of charge. Rights must be safeguarded by an Independent Monitoring Authority. We need to know what this body will look like & what powers it will have #citizensrights #Brexit  
1750 Followers. Thank you all. So before I depart for non EU land a quick plug for my book. Which is a novel. Bit of political background, sex, violence, spans 3 nations and ends on the night of the Brexit vote which was a coincidence!  RT's appreciated pic.twitter.com/VWtWQLEHqW 
Gina Miller is taking audience questions via ⁦@Slidoapp⁩. The #Brexit vote was “far too binary”, she says, adding that it had led to binary thinking in all walks of life. #FutureWorldOfWork #BusinessFest 
Could Article 50 end up being extended and Brexit delayed? Cabinet Brexiteers are increasingly worried about this  
Gina Miller: “We need to go back to the real causes of Brexit, and the real cause of Brexit was not the EU.” #BusinessFest #Brexit @thatginamiller @TheBusinessFest 
The best description of Brexit is still the Luxembourg PM's: "Before, they were in and they had many opt-outs; now they want to be out with many opt-ins."  
.@ShelaghFogarty - Seamus  needs to understand that Brexit is personal. He can't dismiss @nickynoo007 's story as a one off. Everyone has a story like this. If you have used your EU rights then #Brexit will pull the rug out from under your life. 
So the Lib Dems are leading the debate on legalising cannabis, stopping Brexit and fining upskirting. A good day to join us?  
Earlier my dad and I went to look at the old entrance to a bomb shelter in central london and there was a really nice French guy, a sculpture student , recarving the faded names into the war memorial there with a chisel and I just thought, Brexit is really fucking stupid. 
In light of Jim Shepard pouring a fraction of his fortune into buying the front page of newspapers across BC this week to campaign against the PR referendum, here’s a reminder of who’s behind the NO side.Not your local citizens group! #pr4bc #bcpoli 
You can trust Labour as much as you like but they now have zero influence on Brexit. They blew the chance to win the EEA amendment and their six tests now cannot be used.The only possible option now is a #PeoplesVote. Corbyn is also against that. But you can trust him! 
Ireland flourishing, confident & secure in the EU, the EU & Eire flags flying together above the Prime Minister’s office in Merrion St. Dublin. - but, bemused & troubled by the UK’s Brexit idiocy & its threat to all Ireland because of the GFA. 
I knew the Prime Minister's speech today about Brexit reminded me of something...  
Brexit feels like two passengers furiously arguing about the destination of someone else’s car - and right now 65 million of us are hurtling out of control.My latest for @guardian on the choices May keeps refusing to make 
John James, the chairman of customs agent Star Cargo, said that proposals put forward by the government could lead to 'catastrophe' as leading figures from the logistics industry discussed Brexit. Read the account in full and spread the word! 
What’s worse than selling Kirkuk to Iran? Selling half of Basur to #Turkey. Great job #KDP! how’s the referendum going by the way?  
Philip Hammond will today expose Theresa May’s lie. The truth is that #Brexit will leave us without money for schools, homes, farmers - and looking at defence cuts. Guess who'll benefit from that? 
Mr @PickardJe figure ignores UK landings were £900m in '17.EU catches 60% of fish in UK waters which can be ours under int. law post Brexit.That means landings double to £1.8bnFactor x4 for processed value= £7bnEU quota force discard half catch means x2 potential again!  
EU Brexit Coordinator’s backing for Scots Govt ignored by Reporting Scotland  
Good sense prevailed and Brexit will proceed.  
Brexit means Brexit 
Brexit youth: 'I am angry and the future scares me'. When asked how they feel about the vote to leave the EU, there's one overriding emotion: anger - at the fact nobody asked them what they thought.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteMarchBremain 
The problem at its most essential is that there is currently nothing untrue about the statement "Jeremy Corbyn supports Brexit." And so people who don't support Brexit and do support Jeremy Corbyn are feeling a bit uncomfortable. 
Bastani & his comrades have gone Full Brexit, throwing everything they've got at pro-EU Labour supporters, calling them Tory shills, elite astroturfers, the works.The vast majority of Labour supporters & young people are pro-EU—& apparently now unwelcome. #OFOC #FFS 
It does indeed need to be said @Andrew_Adonis I support Corbyn I support a second referendum The constant intemperate attacks on Corbyn by others wanting a second referendum are both grossly unfair and highly counterproductive  
The #Brexiteers never compromised after their defeat in 1975. They persisted through sheer determination, hard work and bloody-mindedness. We #remainers must do the same. #brexit is not a done deal #PeoplesVote 
Brexit youth: 'I am angry and the future scares me'  
If a second referendum was so important to @tessmillsy, why didn't she vote for Owen Smith? Something doesn't add up here. 
Even the Express beginning to see the latest he? 'BREXIT TRAINWRECK!' UK could become 'PIRATE ISLAND' says think tank in security threat - Express  
No, remember the risk to the economy and ADD the risk to security: “Forget the debate on the economy — Brexit is a huge risk to our security - Evening Standard  
Amanda from @FFSake_ along with many other young people and students will be marching this Saturday for a #PeoplesVote because she believes that young people deserve to have a say on the final Brexit deal. Don’t forget to sign up if you haven’t already -  
So according to @AaronBastani, people who unfurled a banner protesting Labour’s Brexit policy should have been made to leave Labour Live for “causing a public nuisance”. Yep, that’s definitely a festival of political ideas, and a new brand of politics...  
Are you confused by Brexit yet?Try getting your head around this announcement from the House of Lords.  
The “overwhelming majority of Labour members” elected @JeremyCorbyn, TWICE, @BenPBradshaw. The 2nd time against someone who offered members a 2nd referendum but was humiliatingly rejected. We chose Jeremy to lead us & to represent us. We trust him & Keir! Not FPBE OFOC.  
It seems I'm in the minority in being 100% sure that Brexit will be cancelled, but I'm still sure.     It's taking longer than I thought it would, and doing a lot more damage than it needed to, but in the end the UK always does the pragmatic thing.  
Oh. And a reminder too of the half a million pounds @LordAshcroft donated to the Conservatives last year. He's one of the party's biggest donors...& he's sitting on info about how Russia sought to influence Brexit vote. Think about that...  
Join us to march for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal THIS Saturday! Meet at St James Square at 11:30am. We’ll have placards and flyers to hand out! @TheGreenParty @FFSake_ @peoplesvote_uk@hannarrr_ @benparker18 
Jean-Claude, while you're plotting in Dublin, here's a nice sight of Visegrad meeting. Orban plus PMs of Poland, Czech Rep, & Slovakia.... Oh yes, and looky here, it's Austria's Chancellor Kurz with them. Distinctive #Brexit research & news:  
'Anti Brexit" group say Tory MP is a legend, but spend thousands sending smear-y poster trucks to Labour Leadership constituencies. More on corporate links of 'Our Future Our Choice'  tomorrow.  
The Withdrawal Bill has cleared the Houses of Commons and Lords.We are leaving the EU!  #Brexit here we come!  #GlobalBritain here we come! 
WATCH 34-year-old @AaronBastani can't debate 20-year-old anti-Brexit campaigner @tessmillsy without smearing her and calling her a liar. And he claims to want more free debate in Labour... 
Had a smiling, congenial chat on Brexit and defending Labour position (and I get this). The people most likely to call other people ‘vile’ and ‘obnoxious’ turn out to be rather nasty!  
After yesterday's vote in parliament, do you think we will get a #FinalSayForAll? #PeoplesVote #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBillPlease RT after you vote for a larger sample. 
It’s taken you 2 years to work out that the referendum had immigration at its heart .. take a bow ...  
I, like most @UKLabour members I speak to, trust @jeremycorbyn and @Keir_Starmer on BrexitSpecial interests resourcing the ‘stop Brexit’ movement make a hard Brexit more likely. What’s more, the people at the top don’t want a socialist government Me with @OFOCBrexit on #bbcdp 
This is key - look through my timeline you'll see I've been a longtime Corbyn supporter, often arguing with people (including Ian) over his merits. But Brexit is to me bigger than any party. I'm very pro-labour, largely pro-Corbyn, ultimately pro-EU. It's possible to be all.  
Labour brocialists kicking out at an anti-Brexit youth movement is a bad, bad look. 
How do you currently rate the realistic chances of stopping #Brexit now?: 
And now @hilarybennmp asks the killer question: will the "settlement" scheme still apply and be valid in the event of a no deal Brexit?@carolinenokes (disturbingly) evades the question, so I think the answer is "no". So much for reassuring EU citizens. 
The closer we get to the Referendum date remember this,you will get lots of it.  
EU Brexit Coordinator’s backing for Scots Govt ignored by Reporting Scotland 
Waiting for my train yesterday, I had a lot of people saying they agreed with my placard. Of most interest were a couple who work for Virgin Media, who said that the uncertainty around #Brexit was crippling their business.... 1/2  
The Brexit abyss is fast approaching. Time to apply the brakes | Jonathan Lis  
Phone call with PM @juhasipila on next week’s #EUCO discussion of migration, EMU, Brexit and trade. Good consultations. 
Useful meeting with rep from Japanese Central Bank who considers Brexit a lose-lose-lose game. He is interested where the British government are going to find trade partners to replace lost EU trade. Clearly not in Japan whose banks at least will relocate away from Europe. 
Lots of different people are involved fighting Brexit - pro and anti Corbyn Labour people, Conservatives, Greens, Welsh and Scottish Nationalists, Lib Dems, activists, former Cabinet secretaries. 
It’s not enough for the Brexit Ultras that they won the 2016 referendum. They won’t stop until they’ve surpressed all opposition to their distopian vision for the UK.  
NEW from @ft's @cynthiao on the mystery millions of @arron_banks. In 2016, tthe year, he became biggest ever political donor & Brexit's main backer, his principle source of income - his insurance business - suffered a £32 million loss.  
Labour leadership in a much better position on Brexit than it was before and doing some commendable things. But the obsession with treating any criticism of it as a plot against the dear leader is terribly silly. 
If you think Greg Hands is resigning purely over Heathrow you’d be mistaking his discretion.Greg has been visibly pained by having to go along with May’s ridiculous #brexit ‘strategy’ & is exiting in a way that is politically astute.Expect to see more of these resignations. 
The boss is proud that we are getting on with delivering the Brexit people voted for.When asked by the intern, he was unable to say which particular Brexit that is. 
In which Brexit Central produce a staggeringly amateurish hatchet job on my friend and colleague Chris, resulting in lots of new followers for him and the CakeWatch Podcast site going down due to the number of people trying to listen to it.  
In which Matthew Elliott's vanity project Brexit Central 'exposes' someone who literally says they work for the EU as someone who works for the EU.Tomorrow: SCOOP! George Soros revealed to be working on behalf of George Soros  
Day 4 of us being  at #UNDC18 talking to UNISON members about #citizensrights post Brexit and how it impacts their EU coworkers and colleagues.  
Hi @PhilipHammondUK, you may have missed this as the phrase “Brexit dividend” is absent from extracts of your Mansion House speech released overnight. The bold in the PM’s tweet suggests bulk of money will come from the “Brexit dividend” with “just a bit more” from the taxpayer  
Labour are trying to get as soft a Brexit as possible with the consent of the British people. They’ve played a blinder these last 12 monthsEvery member I speak to doesn’t want to sacrifice the 2017 manifesto for the wrecking ambitions of Mandelson, Campbell and the elite #bbcdp 
TWO! That’s how many days are left until tens of thousands march on the streets of London calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal - this Saturday! This is set to be the biggest march since the EU referendum. Don’t miss out and sign up now -  
Hall of Fame: the Labour MPs who voted for Brexit yesterday: Frank Field, Kate Hoey, John Mann and Graham Stringer. 
Our Associate Director, Julia Wilson says research will suffer if we cannot bring in the brightest minds. Read more about our recommendations for a new #immigration system after #Brexit. #TogetherScienceCan #GlobalTalent 
Brexit has given a voice to the little people who have been silenced for too long. I think European people are now beginning to understand the consequences of an undemocratic & authoritarian EU political project & they don't like what they see. Change is a coming...#Brexit #EU 
Two years ago we were entering the last hours of campaigning in the referendum and @Keir_Starmer was one of thousands of Labour activists campaigning to #Remain. At @Remain_Labour we think it’s time Keir came back to our side. Let him know if you agree: 
Taoiseach couldn't hide his delight when Micheál Martin told President Juncker to "safely ignore the reports that there is any question about the stability of the core Irish political consensus and mandate on Brexit".  Reports "have no substance to them", he said. #Brexit 
Chance of Brexit reversal now gone. Will not stop debate on it, though. That’s the trouble with delusions. They last to the end, and beyond.  
It's easy to forget that #Brexit is politics & we need to employ political tactics to #StopBrexit, so please start tagging the press teams of both @UKLabour & @Conservatives in all your Tweets! @OFOCBrexit @FFSake_ @SODEMAction @RemainerNow #FBPE@labourpress & @CCHQPress 
Saturday March STOP at the stall opposite Downing Street to write a postcard to MPs to say no to Brexit We are aiming at 1000s!  
“Causing a public nuisance I suppose so, why not” @AaronBastani on Our Future Our Choice asked to leave #LabourLive after unveiling Stop Backing Brexit banner in #bbcdp debate with @tessmillsy 
In 2014 when I registered my Yes vote. I honestly couldn't have forseen how bad the UK has come in 4 yrs since. A right wing Tory government, ruling us. Brexit on its way & more austerity. We need to get Independence quick or we are  f#cked. We're now being stripped of all powers 
Aaron Bastani on Daily Politics defending the ejection of the anti-Brexit protesters from Labour Live by smearing the protesters as Tory infiltrators. Attacks his opponent by insinuating she's a liar when says she voted twice for Corbyn. He is a truly vile human being. 
“Say the Government comes back with a deal in October saying it will give £39 billion to the EU, in return for the good faith of the EU to discuss a trade deal, that would be very hard to get through parliament,” says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on future Brexit rebellions in the Commons  
Sinn Féin President @MaryLouMcDonald is currently speaking in the Dáil during an address from President of the European Commission Mr Jean-Claude Juncker. Teachta McDonald has described Brexit as the biggest threat in a generation to our all-island economy". #Dáil 
My cartoon Thursday @TheTimes.......#TheresaMay survives yet another #Brexit crunch vote. #MontyPython 
The govt will be poorer without the conscientious and conservative @GregHands. Most recently he was a Remainer who accepted the ref result and worked hard in the Intl trade dept to make the most of the post-Brexit opportunities. 
Leading pharmaceutical companies have warned that the UK's life science industry and the patients who rely on it could be under serious threat from a bad Brexit deal. Yet another worrying consequence to public health. Please share. 
When everything goes to shit and we’re poorer and businesses are hit and unemployment goes up, never forget this man wanted Brexit come what may (after moving his business to Ireland)  
Brexit: 'You are not alone', Juncker tells Irish government  
On Saturday, @GreenJeanMEP will be joining @TheGreenParty at the @peoplesvote_uk march in London.Because given all we've learned in the past two years - from the implications of Brexit for cancer treatment, to the UK's role in the world - we must have a vote on the final deal.  
With MPs set to debate the Erasmus study exchange programme later today, Muhammad, who was an Erasmus participant, says it’s wrong for Brexit to threaten such opportunities and that is why he is marching for a #PeoplesVote this Saturday. Sign up -  
There isn’t much time left to conclude an agreement on #Brexit & to have it operational before the UK’s departure next March. There is an urgent need to intensify our efforts if we are to get there. We expect the UK to honour their commitments on the backstop in full.  
In Leinster House with SF TDs, MEP, MPs and Senators listening to President of European Commission Jean-Claude Juncker. Good Friday Agreement should be preserved in its entirety. Brexit will undermine it.  
Brexit: Three 'simple' questions for EU citizens to stay in UK  
Terrible scenes yesterday. This Eight-Month Pregnant MP Is In Pain But Was Forced To Take Part In A Brexit Vote  
This is appalling treatment.And it was all so that the Govt could reject the amendment & shut out all other parties’ voices (Parliament) on Brexit.They want a Tory-only Brexit. How does that represent the whole country? We need a #PeoplesVote on their ‘deal’. 
Greg Hands' Heathrow resignation makes him 6th minister from the 2 Brexit depts (DExEU & DIT) to go since Art 50 was triggered.David Jones - Jun 17Lord Bridges - Jun 17Lord Price - Sep 17Baroness Anelay - Oct 17Mark Garnier - Jan 18Greg Hands - Jun 18Mission Impossible? 
EU solidarity with Ireland is stronger than ever on #Brexit -  Ireland is not alone in Brexit talks, says Juncker via @RTENewsNow 
.@CommonsLeader still claiming there'll be a #BrexitDividend and that reports of a slowing UK economy since the Brexit vote and post #Brexit are crystal-ball gazing. I trust the IFS myself. They state that by 2020 tax revenues will be £15 bn lower, e.g. no Brexit dividend. 
you ignored your constituents by going with the government on Brexit despite being in an overwhelmingly remain constituency so cry me a river 
THE SNP ARE ACTIVELY SEEKING A BAD BREXIT DEAL FOR SCOTLAND...  
Jacob Rees-Mogg claims everybody is 'victorious' after Brexit vote  
We must pop this notion we don’t need a #PeoplesVote because we already voted in 2016.Tories have just shut the other political parties out of power on Brexit (via the meaningful vote).So how do we stop them crafting a Brexit that suits Tories only?That’s why #PeoplesVote 
We have NO detail for #Brexit at all. Nothing. No Irish Border or Gibraltar plans, reciprocal citizens rights, trade agreements etc. etc.  Yet. NO MATTER HOW BAD THIS GETS we have no choice whatsoever but to do it. That’s a breach of duty of care by the Govt to the country 
There is still time to join one of dozens of coaches organised from all over the UK to bring people along to the #peoplesvotemarch on June 23rd. This is a nationwide movement to demand a #peoplesvote on the #Brexit deal. 
Dear Mrs MayTell me again: the benefits of #Brexit are what, exactly?#StopBrexit 
Jimmie Åkesson's Swedish Democrats (@sdriks) have surged to first place ahead of September's election. The party is anti-EU and have pledged a referendum on their membership.    
I'll be joining @OFOCBrexit on #BBCdp to discuss their 'unique' brand of lobbying shortly.These interests have made a hard Brexit more, not less, likely. Time to stop attacking Labour and Jeremy Corbyn. pic.twitter.com/OenJ3YGjhW 
Dominic Grieve: "I have returned from my meeting with @theresa_may. She has agreed to amend #Brexit. We have peace in our time..."  
Sir Lockwood Smith (fmr NZ High Commissioner) on #Brexit: We look forward to you once again taking your place on the global stage. You are a major global player. We have missed your voice.  
A backstop cannot have an expiry date and it must form part of the withdrawal agreement. We thank the EU for their unwavering support regarding the #Brexit negotiations.    
I may not be able to help prevent the darkness surrounding #Brexit.I might not be able to stop the exponential rise of #fascism.But these things will be temporary, as they always were before.And, one day, I'll be able to look my grandchildren in the eye.Will you? 
Lowest growth in EU. Most unequal regional performance in developed world, by a mile. Entrenched inequality though Labour, coalition and Tory governments. Burgeoning national debt. Brexit in chaos. Let’s now ask: should we be a “tier 1” military power....... 
TLDR: ex Legatum trade chief Shanker Singham, now at IES, and a member of Liam Fox's 'committee of experts on Brexit trade, has now also taken a job w/lobbying firm Grayling. "A glaring conflict of interest" reminiscent of Adam Werrity scandal say campaigners. Singham disagrees  
Italy EU Summit NoGo & save trip money!Salvini:“If we go to Brussels to play script already written by France & Germany, if they think to send us more migrants instead of helping us, then we shouldn’t even go. We save the money for the trip!”#Brexit #EU 
OK, this is getting ridiculous. We've now got Corbynites attacking the Tory anti-Brexit rebels for not being rebellious enough, whilst simultaneously attacking Labour anti-Brexit rebels for being too rebellious, whilst attacking all them for being in bed with one another. 
NIGEL: MERKEL IS FINISHED“Immigration led to the Brexit vote, immigration led to the new Italian government, immigration will finish off Angela Merkel.”  
Stat of the Day: After Brexit 80% of NATO funding will come from non-EU countries says @jensstoltenberg 
“But let’s be clear, there will be no withdrawal agreement, no transition agreement and no managed Brexit if the British government do not follow through on their clear commitments in writing to Ireland and the whole EU as a whole.” Irish Foreign Minister  
Dennis Skinner says Tories' 'disgraceful' Brexit vote tactics are even worse than the 70s 
Invaluable briefing from the ever brilliant @commonslibrary on #Brexit & Air Quality. It’s all very well transferring EU environmental law into UK law, but without an effective watchdog it will just become zombie law. *side eyes @michaelgove* #CleanAirDay  
Yesterday some Rebel Tories planned to scupper the Brexit disaster. Today they're just Tories.Yesterday some Labour MPs voted with the government to push through the Brexit disaster.Today they're just Tories.#FinalSayForAll 
Great to be back in #Brighton, where I spent my first 3 years in the UK, where I had my first job, where I met the love of my life.Today I'll be at #UNDC18 at @The3Million promoting the need to preserve the rights of people like me who came to the UK in good faith before Brexit  
Good MPs voted against the Meaningful Vote amendment - but this was never about giving Parliament another vote. This was about trying to stop or delay Brexit.Govt must stand firm against MPs who refuse to accept the referendum result. 
BRIGHT: Manufacturing orders up 13% in second quarter of 2018. “The recovery in orders and a return to bumper growth in production suggests the lull in manufacturing activity may be over.”Despite Brexit, of course.  
WATCH: Please RT to remind @ChukaUmunna that he said he would respect the referendum result whatever the outcome & that we would leave the EU if Leave won "even by one vote".Now he campaigns for Single Market membership & the Customs Union. Sad!  
We've known for some time that Theresa May plans to reduce Britain's economic power but now it looks like she could be set to do the same for our military power too, according to MOD insiders.Brexit will weaken the UK on all fronts. Please share.  
With @campaignforleo and @simoncoveney meeting with @JunckerEU @MichelBarnier and @PhilHoganEU - "The EU remains totally behind Ireland on Brexit.  The Irish backstop as outlined in paragraph 49 of the Joint agreement in December must form part of the Withdrawal Agreement."  
The Brexiteers don’t give a damn about Parliament being sovereign. For them, the only thing that’s sovereign is the referendum result. They will do ANYTHING to get us out next March, so long as we’re out.  
An honour to welcome @JunckerEU to @merrionstreet today for talks on #brexit #futureofeurope and next week’s @EUCouncil meeting. It’s his first visit to Ireland as Commission President. Also delighted to welcome @MichelBarnier and @PhilHoganEU 
Aye, sure bring your dogs to stand in a queue and lift the leg on me post-Brexit. The final humiliation  
I think we should be optimistic about our Brexit future. What can possibly go wrong? Converting Kent to a lorry park will be a boon to our construction industry. 
Cheltenham, Devizes, Dorchester and Kendal are all worried about the effect of Brexit on the NHS. Many health professionals have also voiced their concerns. Come down to the #PeoplesVoteMarch this Saturday and demand a vote on the final deal. Sign up -  
Calling @theresa_may.Did you know that the ‘British people’ who voted for #Brexit include my neighbour who only voted Leave ‘cos Remain will win anyway’?She was doubtless not the only one.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
The EU missed a trick when they passed over Lord Sewell to write their constitution.Just think, if the EU had had a Sewell Convention they could have ignored the Brexit vote, over-ruled the UK's refusal of consent, stopped #Brexit, and grabbed a bunch of powers into the bargain! 
My comment piece in today's @thetimesIE : The Right to housing would build us all a brighter future. Having a secure, adequate home is a fundamental need. Holding a referendum on #Right2Housing would involve the public debate that is urgently required 
Why does Theresa May insist Parliament ‘cannot bind the hand of Government’?Because Parliament = the other political parties too. May wants to ensure other parties, representing broader public opinion, have *no* say on Tory Brexit.That’s what this ‘meaningful vote’ is about. 
Important day for Ireland and #BREXIT today with visit of @JunckerEU and @MichelBarnier to Dublin to show absolute solidarity with Ireland 
A good thread debunking the nonsense that anti-brexit people are an "anti-Corbyn movement". If Corbyn opposed brexit we'd support him.  
If you're cheering on the removal of European products to be replaced with domestic ones, you don't get to use the 'Global Britain' moniker. Period. #Brexit negotiations don't change when protectionist instincts are acceptable #consistencyfail 
Brexit remains chaotic and shambolic and the Cabinet remains divided. That is why tens of thousands of people will be marching on Saturday for a #PeoplesVote @BBCr4Today 
No Brexit deal without agreement over Irish border - deputy premier  
More "sovereignty" and "Democracy"...Despite the fact that I pointed out that it actually says in the #Brexit White papers that "We never lost sovereignty" and our laws are made collaboratively with #EU partners. And all laws have to be passed by directly elected MEPs. 
If it helps, I'm pretty sure about her view on a second independence referendum. After that not so much. 
Our report on immigration after #Brexit is out today. Suggests policymakers must balance a range of economic, demographic and social goals and consider how different programmes are likely to affect migrants decisions.  
Another election in Britain wouldn't resolve the Brexit issue, House of Lords member Andrew Adonis says  
The Brexit we voted for will NOT be delivered. We voted to stop Freedom of Movement, stop paying the EU billions which should be spent domestically, leave the single market and stop EU involvement in our laws. STOP LYING TO THE BRITISH PEOPLE - WE ARE NOT FOOLS !! #brexit  
.@Andrew_Adonis-"#Investors must understand that the big threat is not #JeremyCorbyn. The #bigthreat is the hard Right of the @Conservatives"History will only ask one question of our MPs: "How did you vote re: #Brexit?'@BloombergTv-@Brexit#CityOfLondon 
Me & @Femi_Sorry just participated in a 4-way debate with Leavers on @bbc5liveDebate ended with Lucy from "Leavers of London" demanding "#Brexit at any cost"When asked to define "any cost" she clarified "30 year economic downturn"So, most of our working lives?#StopBrexit 
Here's @BBCEleanorG impartially updating our Brexit countdown. We had to retake a couple of times because she looked happy in one and sad in one.  
Seems like the 'Brexit was a racist vote' lot are out in force after last night.Here's me going off on that subject @UnleashedComedy EdFringe & Uk TOUR  
Utterly terrifying. How, Prime Minister, can you be delivering “the Brexit people voted for” when even your own Cabinet can’t agree on what that is?A charitable interpretation of this performance is that you KNOW you are destroying the UK but somehow feel you have no choice.  
NEWS! Chancellor to announce tax increase to pay for pretence of successful Brexit  
Before the English civil war Charles 1st believed England should be ruled through the divine right of kings after #Brexit it will be governed by the divine right of cunts 
Separated at birth: identical twins rejoice as they are reunited & discover they share the same dream of destroying the West. #Brexit #EU #Khanage 
"That's why tens of thousands of people are marching on Parliament on Saturday"Britain is heading for a bad Brexit deal but it’s definitely not a done deal. The demand for a #People’s Vote is getting louder. March with us on Saturday:  
Those that oppose Indy are the same people that told me Iraq had WMD ready to deploy in 45 mins are telling me Putin & Assad are bad guys ,Trump is a good guy, Israel commits no crimes against Palestinians and Brexit is best thing ever, is that right? 
Sajid Javid has accused the EU of failing to match Britain's progress on arrangements for expats after Brexit  
To recap:Those who seem to think Brexit means LESS money available to invest in public services:- The IFS- OBR- Bank of England- IMF- The ChancellorThose who claim Brexit will mean MORE money available to invest in public services:- Theresa May- The ERG- Jeremy Corbyn  
Daily Briefing:- Eastern Europe leaders meet ahead of mini-summit on immigration- UK to outline immigration rules for EU citizens post-#Brexit- Euro zone meeting on debt-relief plans for Greece 
Choosing between a rubbish Brexit Deal and No-Deal isnt a 'Meaningful Vote' - it's #HobsonsChoice! #BrexitShambles 
HUGE: Anti-EU Swedish Democrats surge in YouGov poll, most popular party ahead of election in September. This week they called for a referendum on the EU. All bets are off! #Swexit  
Can Nicola Sturgeon halt Brexit? Scotland benefits from rUK being in EU & as third largest party SNP sd have clout at WM. But recent events demonstrate no respect for Scots south of border. So fight to halt Brexit must be led by English @KirstyS_Hughes 
About to go on Bloomberg @Brexit show to explain why Brexit not a done deal and, despite Dominic Grieve’s tactical retreat yesterday, there will still probably be a people’s vote to stop Brexit 
Parliament approves EU Withdrawal Bill | May risks row over plan for single market for goods | Home Secretary Sajid Javid hits out at EU for neglecting rights of UK expats | Verhofstadt admits Brexit is sign of EU 'failure' | GCHQ chief rebukes Barnier  
Why should EU citizens, who have contributed to British society & paid their taxes, be financially punished for Brexit, when they were denied a vote? @Europarl_EN has serious concerns on this. But also on lack of preparation for UK expats on the continent 
“The UK pharmaceutical industry and the patients who rely on it are under serious threat from Brexit" - Pfizer UK chief. 
Today's #Justsaying list:• Brexit is shit, but we have to make the best of it.• The NHS crisis is about more than money, it's about Privatisation.• Never trust a Tory• Trump is awful but the UK's treatment of immigrants is not much better.• Never trust a Tory. 
Don't know @ottocrat and don't always agree with his tweets. But I'll stand up for his right to post his stuff, and if I don't like it, we'll have a debate. Horrible but unsurprising that Brexit central should attempt to smear rather than debate  
The Brexit that 26% of the population voted for. ‘The people’ so frequently invoked by Brexiters under the misapprehension that ‘the people’ will supinely put up with being led by the nose for much longer, may suddenly turn up. - 23 June will be a taste. Stop Brexit #PeoplesVote 
I wonder whether @UKLabour and @jeremycorbyn realise that #Brexit makes their entire manifesto undeliverable.  There will be literally no reason to vote #Labour at the next UK general election if Brexit happens.Was this @PeoplesMomentum's plan all along or was it incompetence? 
Almost two years to the day since we voted for independence yet Brexit progresses at a snail’s pace. Nigel is right - either get on with it or get someone else in who will! Support us at  
Min @SimonHarrisTD will announce a women’s health action plan to follow the “unfinished feminism” of the referendum of the Eighth Amendment #unfinishedfeminism @ellenmcoyne 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg is right that the completion of passage of EU Withdrawal Bill through parliament is perhaps the definitive Brexit moment (other than 29 March) because it reconstitutes (in the literal sense) the UK as an independent sovereign state. It means...[see thread] 
Brexit is fucking stupid. For the money we are spending on leaving the EU we could buy everyone in the UK over 500 Greggs steak bakes EACH how is this even a choice vote for me this is my only policy. 
That was a great opportunity for Mishal Husain to raise with Rees-Mogg the revelation that his investment company has opened a Dublin office to avoid the consequences of #Brexit but of course she didn't. #r4today 
Jacob Rees Mogg making it plain on @BBCr4today that there was no real concession offered yesterday - and that the Speaker’s room for manoeuvre will be zero if the final Brexit motion is drafted so as to be ‘neutral’.           In other words - there will be no meaningful vote. 
This Saturday we say 'NO' to Brexit & we PROTEST!#StopBrexitSaturday #FBPE #PeoplesVoteMarch@mrjamesob @Tony_Robinson @terrychristian @Labour4EU @BBCNews @SkyNews @BestForBritain @MarieAnnUK @_Britain4Europe @No10Vigil @LeedsEurope @Mcr4EU @Scientists4EU @Women_4_Europe 
By the way, we need more vanity project Remain-supporting parties like we need holes in the head. If you want to block Brexit, join @LibDems 
I'm, not sure what's worse, David Davis' Brexit Bulldog chuckle, or Jacob Rees-Mogg's tone of pained ponderousness, or the sound of nails being dragged down a blackboard. 
Interestingly in the words from the speech released overnight by the Treasury there was no mention of the "Brexit dividend" which the prime minister claimed at the weekend could be used to pay for a substantial part of the extra spending on the NHS!  
The European Parliament’s chief Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt has told MPs that it is a “fact” that an independent Scotland could join the EU after Brexit.  
To all MPs, in whatever party, who voted to respect the referendum result yesterday; thank you  
What we know:- the Govt's debt reduction programme will continue.- Brexit will reduce tax revenues- the NHS is getting a bigger budgetThis means higher taxes and more severe austerity for (non-NHS) public spending. We're all about to become much poorer, with no end in sight. 
Brexit no longer means Brexit. Brexit simply means a mess.  
Sick liberals call the 8th referendum result 'Ireland coming of age'. Unfortunately, it also means lots of babies never coming of age. 
‘@andreajenkyns: Brexit Britain’s best years lie ahead - we must not be shackled to a bad EU deal.“Ultimate aim of a global, outward-looking, free trade championing country will not be achieved if we get a bad deal for Britain.” 
So I stand with @ottocrat in solidarity and I hope you will all join me. Don’t let anyone intimidate or silence you. To Brexit Central I say: shame on you. 9/ 
Today sees the publication of 100th edition of the lovely @TheNewEuropean. Here's my illo for @michaelwhite's column in said outouring of joy, about the NHS Brexit Dividend  
There was no "Brexit people voted for".People voted to leave the EU, but the detail of what that meant was never discussed.This is not "the Brexit people voted for". This is "the best version of a disasterous Brexit that our ill-prepared negotiators could muster."A bad deal  
From the off I’ve believed in @JeremyCorbyn & @Keir_Starmer. It’s been disappointing & so frustrating to see so many of our own gang up & attack them. What’s been clear: they DON’T want a ‘hard Brexit’. The FBPE & OFOC mob should be ashamed for spreading that narrative. 
1) The people of #Scotland didn’t vote for it2) There cannot be a smooth and orderly #Brexit because all the alternatives cause economic & social damage & dislocation3) On the evidence to date the Tory @GovUk couldn’t even agree on how to deliver a pizza 
Excellent journalism from Andrew Neil, challenging the nonsense of the Brexit Dividend. #NHS #NHS70 
The fundamentals of Brexit haven't changed. Brexit is shambolic, Cabinet is chaotic, and Parliament has 5 more Brexit bills it can amend and take meaningful votes on.  
This is gobsmackingly hypocritical ! The UK doesn't let most British in EU vote in a referendum which throws their lives into turmoilIt then refuses to meet themNow it accuses other EU countries of not registering them when all but France already do ! 
The whole Brexit negotiation is a farce. Brussels knows this. The UK government is highly irresponsible and does not have the best interests of the country at heart. #FBPE#PeoplesVoteMarch 
May to concede free movement of people to get free movement of goods? Another weakening of what is an increasingly useless Brexit. She will keep the borders open given half the chance.   
PARLIAMENT IS SO INFECTED with Brexit & infested by the ERG that it can`t even deliver a meaningful vote for itself. This Saturday, remainers will show the country the right way to go. #StopBrexit2018 
Brexit has turned into a war, with no tolerance for an opposing view. People will not accept that a majority decided to leave, they would rather see their country fail, this runs from the electorate through to House of Lords. Sad sad times.  
Be in absolutely no doubt, @LibDems are against Brexit. There are more parliamentary opportunities in 2018 to keep the UK in the EU, in the Customs Union, in the Single Market, & we will exploit every opportunity to protect the UK from this damaging Tory disaster of a Brexit. 
#Brexit sell-out Theresa May needs to wind her neck in. #Trump is doing what he was elected to do, which is more than can be said for her. 
People seem surprised the Tories are recruiting a £70,000-a-year aviation negotiator for Brexit - who doesn't need any knowledge of aviation. Theresa May has recruited an entire cabinet that doesn’t have any knowledge of government. 
2 years on from the EU referendum and with only 9 months until we leave the EU, Theresa May still has absolutely no idea on her strategy and implementation of Brexit.“Smooth and orderly Brexit.” - It’s the diametric opposite.  
And as to Brexit - how does it make us *more* democratic in the international space?Surely we’re moving from having transparent votes (in Council & Parliament) to lobbying the EU27 in shady rooms.Where’s the citizen control there?Brexit makes the UK citizen more remote. 
Sod Brexit;I'm voting Labour because they will invest in our NHS, and keep it safe from money grabbing profiteers like Branson.They'll reduce waiting times to access treatment to 18 weeks max,no matter where you live.For the many  
not a surprise if Pti joined hands with GDA both having many things in common in past too,both were supporting Musharuf,IKbeing the Chief polling agent of dictator’s referendum and Arbab was the nominated CM,both gave the same statement on 18thOct attack on BIBI’S Rally 
No mention of May’s phantom Brexit “dividend” to fund the NHS in Treasury advance extracts of a speech by Chancellor Philip Hammond. 
Anyone who's never had moments of rage about Brexit doesn't understand Brexit properly. 
Amateur MP Andrea Jenkyns makes a complete fool of herself and @guyverhofstadt politely, but firmly, explains to her the basis of the Brexit negotiations in perfect English.  
When will @theresa_may learn that attacking @realDonaldTrump at every turn,is not a good tactic when we want a free trade deal with USA after #Brexit.PM should read the'Art of the Deal.'  
1) Corbyn supporters & #FBPE Simple acid test:If Corbyn was unambiguously anti #Brexit would #FBPE, #OFOC etc continue to "undermine" him? No, of course not, he'd have my full support for a start.These movements are not anti Corbyn, we simply believe Corbyn is pro Brexit 
If Brexit Central’s attempt to shut me up has angered you, a fair response might me to keep retweeting the thread that got them so riled in the first place. 
Brexit Tragedy:The UK voted to #LeaveThen the EU set the negotiating trapsWe fell inThe PM went to the countryDUP wins top spot at the tableNow we can’t vote to save ourselvesEven Houdini would drownNext the White Paper suicide noteLions led by donkeys#FBPE 
Its simple really. If you want the best result from Brexit, you will get behind Labour, who have maintained integrity around the leave vote while placing workers rights and human rights at the centre of their brexit strategy. They are your only hope for a fair outcome #brexit 
If #Brexit is still the will of the majority of the people, why are #Leavers dead against a vote by the public on the final deal, now we are better informed, which includes an option to exit from #Brexit?It's been two years since the original vote. The mood has changed. 
'As Mary Berry might have said: this display of concern from the British Government is a bit late and a bit rich'.  Our Chair Jane Golding's statement response to Sajid Javid on the blame-game over UK citizens' rights   @britishineurope #Brexit 
Brexit Central have published a hatchet job on me. You all know I’m no troll but I *will* speak out to oppose what is being done to my country.  
FBPE OFOC Labour MPs clambered out of their sick beds in wheelchairs holding sick buckets to follow Corbyn to vote to put Parliament in control of Brexit, Get Behind Corbyn, not spine of a jellyfish Grieve, the Nasty Party Tories for the millionth time there are No Tory Rebels  
I think for all the billions of calories used up by MPs talking about Brexit, it’s probably best to assume the Tories and DUP have enough people to do what they want until 2022, ‘rebels’ wont rebel and Labour should get on fighting for the many not the few. 
#bbcqt Why do you keep putting bloody Remoaner bore Afua Hirsch, on TV all the time. Non stop  I hate Donald Trump I hate Brexit guaranteed. Loves doom & gloom the more the better. Never says anything good about anything. Good luck Tim & Ella against them 3 MUPPETS.  
The Tories are securing sweeping powers to water down human rights & equalities laws via Brexit legislation. They could change laws without consulting MPs or public - a significant threat to all of our rights. #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit #r4today 
Lets get the nfu to shut 25% of farms for one or two days to deliver a supermarket brexit bonus at a weekend with empty shelves and reduced choice. @Farmers4EU@Douglas4Moray 
People voted for Brexit because they were sick of the Tory party ruining their lives.To ensure Brexit, parliament has now handed over complete control to said Tory party.Great job, Britain!#FBPE 
When there's a “Chilcot-style inquiry” into Brexit they will want to pay special attention to the extraordinary pro-Brexit bias at the BBC, not least from #TheAndrewsSisters 
And this is what the Tories fear being exposed! the Panama and Paradise Papers Scandal, Offshore Residents frightened that their thieving days are numbered. Brexit is the biggest con ever pulled on the U.K. Public, By a "Corrupt Westminster Parliament"  
Two years after Brexit vote, British leaders still tied in knots over how to leave Europe  
Only a true pseudo-intellectual could watch Brexit; the Trump election; the rise of Le Pen, the AFD, Viktor Orbán, Law and Justice, Salvini, and the Swedish Dems; and still think what people want is a world without borders.  
IPOB Insists On Referendum, Not War For Realisation Of Biafran Nation - Optimum Times -  #SayNoToWar #Biafra #IndigenousPeopleOf Biafra 
Holy hell. Awful robocall just now from Bill Good, scaremongering over the November electoral reform referendum. How much money do the fat cats who are fighting to keep First Past the Post actually have? Anyway, it's proof of just how good FPTP is for Big Money. #bcpoli #pr4bc 
Talking of rats - Poor old Arron, the 1975 referendum, which he has now illegally funded to overthrow, returned a highly conclusive 67% v 33% result which the 'Vlad Boys of Brexit' refused to respect; but let's not allow the facts to spoil another mindless 'Banksmore' story!  
I have a PhD in nuclear physics and I have taught maths of one sort or another for many years. I am anti-Corbyn purely as a result of his Brexit position, which I see as being totally irrational (without any mathematics).  
Brexit: Theresa May vows 'smooth and orderly' EU exit  
Brexit was never about *the will of the people* or the good of the country, but about the Tory Party extracating itself from Cameron's failed gamble that UK would vote Remain. A Cabinet Minister let it slip:Gov't choose to destroy the country to save themselves#NotMyParliament pic.twitter.com/NETlFZWKVo 
Tories want EU to bend its rules,Ireland to break its rules. Scotland now to hand over its rules.welcome to Brexit Island.A fortress of English exceptionalismBrexit was a vote to take back what we never lost, in order to lose everything we currently have. 
26.5% of the People, 37% of voters, 51.8% of those expressing a Non-Binding opinion in support of some unknown #Brexit destination which we now know can only leave us Poorer, Weaker, with Less Control & Fewer Rights...The denial of a #PeoplesVote to Confirm CONSENT is Autocratic 
#PresidentTrump points to man in #Duluth audience wearing a #Q t-shirt ...#Qproof #Qproofs #QAnon #BREXIT #MAGA #MEGA #MBGA #TrumpVisit#GreatAwakening@realDonaldTrump 
Another bl**dy Orwellian lie!"A Brexit that gives Britain a brighter future."She's seen DExEU's analysis, which altho' highly optimistic, still showed every configuration of #Brexit harming us.What is she smoking?  
Kevin Maguire asks why MPs who won't accept responsibility are in Parliament. Has he met the Tory MP in Angus who didn't vote in the Brexit referendum because she couldn't decide how to vote? 
More PR and no details on Brexit as usual.What concerns me is Theresa May's body language and gaze. Every day she seems more uncomfortable with the stuff she has to say...  
Why don’t you join the Liberal Democrats?Your ‘meaningful’ vote was for a meaningless Brexit, as a prelude to a reversed Brexit. You fool no one. You are also in breach of the party manifesto you were elected on. Resign and fight a by-election if you have any guts or principles. 
WORLD NEWS: Fucked (Brexit) Fucked (running out of cheese) Fucked (but has kangaroos!) Fucked (government is a soulless, self-humping pack of baby-stealing space Nazis) Boring, but surprisingly popular  The weather’s fucked 
Brittle much? What is she on? Well I suppose the knowledge that she has just broken the Treaty of Union, as well as condemning England to a slow lingering decline into obscurity  .... yeah, okay, more tranquilisers then ...#Brexit #DissolveTheUnion #EUWithdrawalBill 
Let's put this to bed:- Basic Maths Corbyn can't stop Brexit- He's a Socialist - He's not part of the political class- He's not got the Tories / neo-liberals in their pockets - stick that in your pipe and smoke it  
Tory soft-Brexit rebels have the crappest rebellions. In Tory Remain Episode IV: A New Hope they'd be all "ok Darth, how about we tell you where the base is but you promise not to target it with the Death Star. Deal?" 
just received message from my brother Michael that his Portuguese citizenship has come through. Absolutely delighted at least one of the family will be able to work & travel freely throughout the EU after this stupid destructive Tory Brexit. Now where’s my Irish granda’s details? 
There are a few occasions in history when reason & self-interest fall out the window & an irrational destructive hysteria takes over. The fall of ancient Athens was one. Salem witch trials; South Sea Bubble; onset of WW1; Stalinism; Nazism; McCarthyism; Iraq.Now Brexit. 
Dear @eucopresident,Our PM has gone completely mad. Please stop negotiating with these people, while she gets treatment. The British people did not vote to leave the EU. There was an advisory referendum, which gave no mandate for this action. Her actions are invalid. #StopBrexit 
The #PeoplesVote was on 23rd June 2016, in which 17,410,742 voted for #Brexit - the BIGGEST mandate in UK political history. As a #VoteLeave campaigner, I’d have respected a Remain victory. Why can’t #Remoaners? 
So not a #brexit dividend then! Just increased borrowing to make it look like one! - Guess what folks! Scotland will get the opportunity to pay 10% of that borrowing and I doubt very much NHS Scotland will see any of that money, it being devolved!  #Scotref #Indyref2 
POTUS has referred to migrants as "animals" who "infest" the US & used infants as capital:- To pay for his wall- To avoid mid-term elections becoming a referendum on HIM- To galvanize his racist baseTrump will continue to push boundaries (internment camps) until he is stopped  
The Brexit vote wasn’t “the will of the British people” - a small majority of people in England and Wales, with much bigger % majorities in Scotland & N Ireland to Remain.  
“I think that nothing would hurt our democracy more than to give the people a choice, and then not to trust their judgement when they give it.”@theresa_may speaking yesterday about #Brexit and the #EUWithdrawalBill 
Brexit could cut wages by 30% over next two decades, says private equity boss Guy HandsLeaving the European Union will be bad for most people but good for his own multi-billion pound fund, he says 
A lot of cognitive dissonance among British pundits asking "how could US political culture deteriorate so rapidly?" whilst viewing #Brexit as just a procedural soap opera rather than a legitimisation of nativist delusions, prejudice and indifference to the suffering of others. 
Even for a now ex-Taoiseach, this is blunt speaking. Bertie Ahern says Arlene Foster "not a very easy person" who "needs to cheer up", he talks of "that buffoon" Boris, idea of united Ireland opposed by unionists is "ridiculous" & Brexit peril for Ireland. 
You and your fellow Brussels sycophants should face deselection before the next election. You betrayed the electorate who voted in the referendum, those who voted you into Parliament on your manifesto and you have betrayed your party. Worst of all you have betrayed the country.  
The reason we haven't been offered a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal is obvious... #Remain would now win by a landslide. Young people would be mobilised in their droves. Polling companies have picked up the swing but not its extent. And this, apparently, is democracy... 
Labour and Tory “rebels” have settled into a comfy pattern: if Labour votes against gov’t, rebels behave. When they vote against gov’t, Labour is told to abstain. So, all can claim in the future “I tried to stop hard #Brexit” without actually doing it. No principles and no spine. 
Just can’t understand how so many MPs still support #Brexit when they know it will be a disaster for the country and their own constituents. Any MP should always put country first and party second. Will they admit they were wrong when the UK is on it’s knees? #MeaningfulVote 
"The Brexit people voted for".... Stop Lying!  
I get that people are fed up with Brexit, bored by it, don't understand what's going on, lost interest, but we need people to start paying attention. We appear to be sleepwalking into a hard Brexit. We must challenge UKG & DUP. Hard brexit would have dire consequences for NI 
When I twice discussed devolution  issues with Dominic Grieve he was only really interested in the sovereign rights of the UK Parliament.  That is what he has been fighting  for - not the rights of all those who will be impoverished by his party’s chaotic wrong headed #Brexit 
Erm, how about negotiating a shit Brexit deal that severely damages our economy & delivers on almost none of the promises made by ministers. And then forcing it on the country without allowing the public to express their view on it. Doesn’t she think that may harm our democracy?  
THE UNITED Kingdom could be ripped apart after a shock Brexit poll revealed support for Northern Ireland quitting the union and reunifying with the Republic of Ireland has surged. 
So after a year of pissing about, the will of the people has been upheld and the #Brexit bill has finally made it through parliament, virtually unamended.Now we only have 4 months left to actually discuss things like trade... 
“In the United Kingdom, the Mother of Parliaments, when the people speak their voices are heard” @theresa_may#Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
Brexit happened in large because of disaffection with British politics.This was exacerbated by the Lib Dem & Tory coalition & their destructive ideological austerity. Blame the Lib Dems.Blame the Tories.They are why we are in this mess.We must get LAB into power. #JC4PM 
Thanks to the vast majority of Labour MP's who voted against a Tory power grab.Let's resist this attack on our democracy, our rights and our protections. Let's challenge every impact Brexit has on our lives, every day.Let's campaign for a #PeoplesVote 
Watched this twice...She clearly knows she's making a mess of it. The people must have a say on the final deal and the chance to exit from Brexit  
Time to be an independent nation once again, take back controls of our laws, money and trade.#Brexit  
Peter Brookes on meaningful Brexit vote – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
"THERE is "not a rope in existence that is strong enough" to hold Scotland to the rest of the UK if the Conservative Government pursues a hard cliff-edge Brexit, the SNP has warned"#TheDayDemocracyDied 
If ministers have an ounce of sense they’ll now prepare full steam for a no deal Brexit.  “We are where we are” they’ll say in March.  Not if you pull your finger out now, chaps 
Dominic Grieve is a tory i nearly warmed to because of his sensible stance on #Brexit. He has now voted against his own #GrieveAmendment (you couldn't make it up), proving that old adage, when push comes to shove tories will always put party before country, #MeaningfulVote 
Sweden is waking up.Right-wing Swedish Democrats call for a EU referendum.And guess what, they are now by far the biggest party in Sweden according to the latest YouGov poll with 28.5% of the votes. 
Just give this video a quick watch and see how farcical the lords made the process of passing the #EUWithdrawalBill How many months did they waste? All for nothing because we are more or less as we started out.#Brexit 
Breaking - @PhilipHammondUK to admit for the first time that taxes will have to rise to pay for £20bn NHS boost. Words released tonight ahead of Mansion Hse speech tomorrow do not mention “Brexit dividend”. Debt target remains. 
We're on our way now! What a HUGE opportunity Brexit is for us all to change Britain for the better! Whatever your politics or concerns, whether you voted Remain or Leave: NOW is the time to SUPPORT the process, seek positive change! + it's time for artists to get more involved!  
Right, I'm nailing my colours to the mast & I know I'll get a lot of flack for it, but here goes... There are only 2 parties who can get us out of this Brexit nightmare and, as it will not be the Tories, I shall focus my energies on influencing @UKLabour.#StopBrexit @Labour4EU 
My Uncle is very distressed by Brexit and disappeared this evening, mumbling something about “a meaningful vote”. Please retweet to help find him.  
We. Are. Leaving. #EUWithdrawalBill passed by ParliamentBrexit - Now #LetsGetOnWithIt 
We promised that we would use our strength in the @HouseofCommons to deliver on the referendum result and today we honoured that promise again.  
After today's Commons' vote against a "meaningful vote" the "Brexit Dividend" will be Scottish Independence #Indyref2 #thanks 
The Conservative Party I campaigned for in 2010 and voted for in 2015 was pro EU, pro single market, pro the national interest, pro economic competence and pro parliamentary sovereignty. But since the referendum that party has ceased to exist and I’ve been forced to abandon it 
Incorrect.The #brexit that people voted for included:- 'sunlit uplands'- 'exact same benefits'- no job losses- £350m pw brexit dividend- no risk to GFA- and something about sovereignty  (though me & most people don't really know what that means as we have it already). 
I am so sick and tired of what's happening in the name of #Brexit. Corrupt Tories make up their own rules and #Labour either support them or abstain. Only #SNP and #GreenParty offer hope for the future of Scotland. I'm off to the hills for a couple of days. #TheresAlwaystheHills 
The tories are scum.Pregnant MP Is In Pain But Was Forced To Take Part In Brexit Vote"I have had to struggle into parliament, aided by a wheelchair at times, only to be checked out by government whips to make sure that I’m not faking it," Laura Pidcock 
Thanks to @SNPCupar for organising such a good open meeting on #Brexit  tonight - packed house at Duffus Park Bowling Club and great questions .  
I could be wrong, but if the Dems are trying to make the midterms a referendum on catch and release, they can forget about any Blue Wave. Today. Right now. 
12/ Today has been like the tale of the Frog and the Scorpion.  Tories do what they do. Even the most "centrist" of Tories will take May's Hard Brexit over the risk of not being in govt. any more. Many Lab MPs will take May's Hard Brexit over a Corbyn govt. 
Shame on the following @Conservatives MPs who voted against the will of the British people today:Antoinette SandbachPhillip LeeSarah WollastonAnna SoubryKen ClarkeHeidi Allen#EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit 
The meaning of the EU Referendum was absolutely clear. Saboteurs are determined to make it meaningless.  
If a no-deal Brexit worries this most equilibrial & system-literate of minds,  you should be panicking.  
We thought we'd seen it all with Thatcher, but this new breed of Tory is even more relentless in its pursuit of ultimate power.Yet against them we've taken a water pistol to a gun fight.FFS @UKLabour, oppose this Tory Brexit which is the antithesis of everything we stand for.  
I have just completed the Cadwally course on investigative journalism.Watch out for my first major article tomorrow.Forget Facebook. Forget Russia and Bots.The truth;The EU influenced the referendum & caused Brexit - by being totally fucking useless.It must be investigated! 
My Aunt is very distressed by Brexit and disappeared this evening, mumbling something about “a meaningful vote”. Please retweet to help find her. x  
I blame nobody for what happened in the House of Commons today. I just despair at the vulgar triumphalism of the Prime Minister who celebrates the progress towards Brexit which of course she knows is disasterous for our nation. Politics in Britain has never sunk so low. 
8/ as well as increasing the gulf between the two sides of the argument. We should focus on inclusivity and developing respect for one another, not undertake actions that drive people further and further apart. The Referendum was a serious wound to our national psyche... 
My future in the UK was bright enough.On 23 June 2016, it was permanently darkened.You have done NOTHING to brighten it again.The settled status is a huge loss of rights.There is still the possibility of no exit deal Brexit. What will happen to us then? 
4/ The only way we can stop Brexit is by getting the Tories out of govt., implementing Labour manifesto promises, esp. for the post-industrial areas that have suffered from years of underfunding and neglect, and work to move the national rhetoric away from blaming immigrants. 
Your Brexit leaves us copying the laws of the EU but no longer having a say in those laws. That makes means we have with less control than EU Members!!That's NOT the Brexit people voted for!#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Today’s Commons vote has been an historic achievement and we should be incredibly grateful to all those ministers and teams involved for pulling it off. It has involved great resolve and ingenuity in the face of some disgraceful ‘fun & games’. Clean Brexit here we come. 
Today Parliament has passed the EU Withdrawal Bill, a crucial step in delivering a smooth and orderly Brexit – the Brexit people voted for.  
PLEASE RETWEET THIS ALL DAY...TO SAY THANK YOU TO THESE LABOUR MP'S WHO VOTED WITH THE GOVERNMENT TODAY IN SUPPORT OF THE MAJORITY OF THE PEOPLE, WHO VOTED FOR BREXIT.Frank Field@frankfieldteam Kate Hoey@KateHoeyMP John Mann@JohnMannMP Graham Stringer@gstringermp 
Scotland voted Remain the ppl voted for NO BREXIT. #indyref 
This is total nonsense. No one voted for the Brexit you are delivering. 
Everyday the promises before the Independence referendum of 2014, are shown up for the lies they were. WM has no respect for Scotland's wishes. They treat us with contempt & as a colony. Everyday I hate this Union more & yearn for my country to be Independent. #DissolveTheUnion 
Like I said:  Brexit is the biggest tax-avoidance scam ever perpetrated in Britain:  
"Today Parliament has passed the EU Withdrawal Bill, a crucial step in delivering a smooth and orderly Brexit – the Brexit people voted for." - PM @Theresa_May 
Pleased to have a chance to discuss #Brexit in @ScotParl today with members of the #Bundestag Committee on Economic Affairs & Industry including chair Klaus Ernst 
An MP was wheeled through the voting lobbies, high on morphine and carrying a sick bucket, the moment Brexit lost the dignity it never had | The Independent It's the UK that's sick, & we all need a sick bucket. 
Ireland's premier has accused the UK of stalling progress in Brexit negotiations and warned of the consequences of not striking a border deal  
Remember it is always darkest before the dawn, as Florence sings. Today's defeat changes nothing.The government still faces the impossible Irish question and the nightmare customs issues at the ports. These are effectively unsolvable, which means Brexit WILL fail. 
And the end of a very productive day here in London. Many worthwhile meetings, engagements. It’s a time for vigilance as the Brexit negotiations come to a head.....  
Today is Black Wednesday for the anti-Brexit cause. But there is a long way to go 
REMAINERS THIS IS NOT A DRILL!Government and most MPs have shown their complete disregard for those they claim to represent. They are willing to do ANYTHING to push #Brexit through. Be kind to each other, support each other and prepare for Saturday's march! #PeoplesVote  
The moment the Lords backed down and allowed the #EUWithrawalBill to pass.The #Brexit bill will now receive Royal Ascent and will become UK Law.20th June 2018 is a historic day folks  
In an historic moment, the EU Withdrawal Bill has now been passed by the House of Lords.It comes after an attempt by Lords to try and water down and stop Brexit, with a Remoaner amendment defeated earlier in the day by MPs in the House of Commons.     
Tory MP battling cancer leaves hospital to vote on Brexit legislation. At no point did the Conservatives try and spin this remarkable act of commitment to attack Labour. What we see today is an absolute disgrace from Labour’s MPs.  
Ross tried to trip the EU's Brexit co-ordinator up – it backfired. 
Thom from St Albans is excited to be coming down to the #PeoplesVoteMarch this Saturday. People are coming from far and wide to make their voices heard and to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Don't miss out - come down and join us! Sign up -  
Apparently mr rees mogg was stickered  today with a bollocks  to Brexit sticker ......  
Jacob Rees-Mogg peeling a Bollocks to Brexit sticker off his back this afternoon... It’s the “will of the people”...  
One good that came from Brexit. A hairy-arsed, uncompromising, often edgy, unapologetically socially liberal and SUCCESSFUL hard copy & digital weekly newspaper.100 issues old this week. Well done @mk1969 @sanglesey & all contributors   
An ache, not a sting: Britain’s economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of Brexit  via @TheEconomist 
It's absolutely appropriate that Brexit, the vote in favour of which was obtained only by lying and cheating, can only be brought into effect by more lying and cheating, to and of Parliament and the EU.From beginning to end, Brexit has been and will continue to be, an epic con. 
And BREXIT means BREXIT 
A parliamentary vote on the final deal would have become a confidence vote in the Government and no matter how many Labour MPs want #Brexit they would vote against in such a scenario bcse they are politicians first - with our own rebels joining them, that could have been fatal.  
I’ll be appearing on BBC News tomorrow at 15:20 discussing Brexit and young people! 
Finally they have accepted democracy. How much time have they wasted? How much have they damaged negotiations by endlessly sticking up for the EU? #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit  
The EU withdrawal Bill passed with very little amendment and will receive Royal Assent tonight. Thank God. Bring on the Trade Bill so we can now talk about our great future and people can see what #Brexit will look like.  
So desperate and disgraceful has this Govt become in its handling of #Brexit that they treated my friend and colleague @NazShahBfd in this appalling way today. Despite this Naz voted on behalf of her constituents. /9 
The House of Lords has passed the EU Withdrawal Bill after peers backed down on an amendment about allowing Parliament to have a say on the final Brexit deal 
Parliament confirmed its own lack of credibility today by voting against itself. If it doesn’t believe in itself, why should we?Game over for parliamentary sovereignty and for any hope that MPs have the necessary competence for Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
In 2002 the Countryside Alliance mustered 400,000 people for a march to uphold their ability to hunt foxes with dogs.Ask yourself: is stopping Brexit more important to you than killing a small wild animal was to them? If so, join us on Saturday 23rd June in London. 
Excellent news.The Lords have approved the #EUWithdrawalBill.Great news.Now, bring on #Brexit  
New facts emerging since the process started make this a very different #Brexit to that promised: £40bn divorce bill with payments till 2064; no 'dividend' for the NHS; loss of EU market access conceded; no new trade deals in place; & more. Today changes none of these things. /8 
It’s coming home! It’s coming home! It’s coming! Brexit’s coming home!  
Before #euref, assorted Brexiters PROMISED EU citizens in the UK wouldn't lose rightsNot only will we lose rights but if there is no deal, we could end up illegal immigrantsAll the rights EU citizens in the UK are set to lose after Brexit  @BIUK_Politics 
What’s age got to do with it? And what’s with the “We”?FBPE isn’t a party - equally many people were *never* socialists: Tories, Lib Dems (you know, the ones that set up the conditions for the referendum in the first place)PS why swear at someone just for being younger than you? 
So with a 52-48 split, there's no way people would have voted for Brexit if "No Deal" was what was on offer. So if the deal is crap, Parliament must be able to pass it back to the people!#MeaningfulVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Did you know that Diane Abbott claimed that she was too Ill to attend the vote in the House of Commons to trigger article 50, citing a migraine?Then she appeared in a pub moments later. I don't think she is that into #Brexit#EUWithdrawalBill 
Wild that Dennis Skinner, a lifelong Eurosceptic was busting a gut to win this vote and there are still people out there claiming Labour secretly wants a hard Brexit  
To quote a man who fashioned the Europe of today: on the Brexit Bill ‘ this is not the end, it is not even the beginning of the end, it is merely the end of the beginning’.  Churchill.We fight on. 
Meeting this evening with Theresa May highlighting:-The need for Ireland to be prioritised in the Brexit negotiations -Intergovernmental conference to be convened-Investment West of the Bann & the A5-Long tern solution for Billy Caldwell so he can return home #RepresentingWT 
Undoubtedly, the #EUWithdrawalBill has shown that: both main parties have divisions on #Brexit; the Govt is still proposing a hard Brexit that will destroy jobs and harm public services; and,Breixters in Govt - like David Davis - want to keep open leaving with "no deal" BUT.../5 
Today I voted, with Labour colleagues for a #MeaningfulVote on the government’s draft Brexit deal. Bitterly disappointed that this key moment to place Parliamentary democracy at the heart of the Brexit negotiation was lost 
Looks like the EU Withdrawal Bill will complete its passage through parliament tonight. It’s a big moment because it means the UK framework for Brexit is established and law. A big hurdle in way of leaving EU surmounted 
There are still 5 #Brexit related Bills still to make their way through Parliament which are legally binding and amendable: Customs Bill; Trade Bill; Fisheries Bill; Agriculture Bill; and, Immigration Bill. There will also be a huge number of statutory instruments to pass too. /3 
Brexit: Expectation Vs Reality  
The #FBPE brigade must realise LABs hands are completely tied on Brexit. Time after time Corbyn's LAB voted for amendments which were voted down by the Tories & DUP. My conclusion is #FBPE are just anti LAB & nothing to do with anti Brexit. Being against LAB is ridiculous.  
Can a kindly #FBPE supporter explain this to me like I'm a 6-year old:If an almost fully unified Labour Party can't ensure that even one of the most basic of amendments passes in the House of Commons, how on earth are they supposed to "stop" Brexit? 
Completely agree w/this. No attempt from pols to explain reality to voting public and most MPs will put party before country. British media filled w/ myths about ‘they need us more than we need them’ and Brexit dividends. Are bookies taking bets on no deal? I’d be in  
Not a peep from the journos who have undermined and attacked Remainers all week, Labour members included, about the Labour MP's who supported a devastating Tory Brexit today.They're either play ground bullies, value their careers above our country, or support a Tory Brexit. 
The PM at @Policy_Exchange - nobody has voted for anything more in our country than we voted for #Brexit. Nothing would harm our democracy more than failing to deliver it. 
THREAD: Today's events in Westminster - which relate to the process and not the substance of Brexit - do not change the fundamental mess and chaos of Brexit. The UK is heading for a bad Brexit deal but its not a done deal - a lot will happen between now and the Autumn. /1 
‘Tory rebel’ Dominic Grieve votes against his own amendment. LOL! Tell me again how this revolt posturing is not a political trap to destroy Labour by inducing them to come out against Brexit! You fbpe’rs and similar shithouses within Labour are clueless. This is all Tory gaming 
If you could never imagine the labour giving tories a free hand then you never saw them carry out dirty tricks and lying for them at the Scottish referendum and later dancing with them in the streets  [with them]  after conning the Scots at the Scottish referendom  
Remainers down south need to leave Labour. Corbyn manifesto will not be implemented due to austerityA red brexit is the same as a blue one 
Right, bug bear; if you proudly state that ‘you want your kids and grandkids to have all the benefits you had’ while carping about Brexit, yet never lifted a finger while student  tuition fees were tripled and social welfare was butchered, you are full of shit and can do one. 
The UK Parliament today disempowered itself in the Brexit negotiations. Rather than “taking back control” it insisted on abdicating responsibility on the most important issue to confront UK in 70 plus years. A once great Parliament stands silenced (by itself) and disgraced.  
Interesting #StopToryBrexit petition from @PeoplesMomentum arguing for @Labour to support giving the PEOPLE the final say on the actual #Brexit deal :   
Interesting that people who have spent years telling us all how completely and utterly useless Jeremy Corbyn is are now telling us how he could single handedly stop Brexit, we really have become a nation that chats shite, haven't we? 
Whoever you are, wherever you live in the UK, whatever you do, however you voted in the referendum - I have one simple message for you.Join us in London this Saturday, June 23rd. March for a #PeoplesVote. Everyone deserves a #FinalSay on Brexit.Let's all be heard at last. 
We have been campaigning for months to persuade Tory MPs to rebel against the govt on important Brexit votes like the meaningful vote amendment. But today, many flipped after having given us their word. Our generation were relying on you today, and you let us down. 
Labour hero of the day - Dennis Skinner. Despite representing a Leave constituency and supporting Brexit, he knew the importance of the #MeaningfulVote and voted against the gov't and phoned round to persuade others to do the same. #ToriesOut #JC4PM 
Rees-Mogg:You said EU insist on hard border because ‘rules are rules’But EU has not always obeyed the rules, has it?Maastricht Treaty forbids EU states to assume other member debts.But #EU provided Greece with bailout funds in 2009 debt crisis!#Brexit 
Grieve voting against his own amendment while Naz Shah voted in a wheelchair should, in any reasonable world, utterly discredit people saying the key to stopping brexit is to pressure labour. Pay attention to which clowns fail to appreciate this. 
And to everyone saying nice things about me coming in to vote on Brexit while 9 months pregnant....I've done what I could this week, can you do yours by joining the People's March on Saturday to fight for a People's Vote and an  #ExitfromBrexit? (3/3) 
It is all going downhill. Theresa May and the Tories are ignoring sovereignty & using any method possible to drive through a Hard Brexit. This, alongside bowing to give tacit support to Trump on his family separation policies... #MeaningfulVote #BrexitShamles #ShameOnUs 
Labour MPs clambered out of their hospital bed & sick beds today to follow Jeremy Corbyn's lead in voting to put Parliament in control of Brexit. They failed because Tory "rebels" betrayed democracy by voting to give Theresa May the final say on Brexit. 
Let's get one thing absolutely clear! If Brexit by some miracle turns out to be an absolute success, does anybody believe under a Tory Government, the proceeds of it will reach the ordinary people? Of course not, any benefits will go right to the usual suspects. "WAKE UP!" 
#AndrewRosindell #MP - "I think that people are getting rather tired of  this. They want the Govt to get on with it. They want to get out of the #EU and get on with the job of building up our own global relations."  #BBC #SKY #LBC #BREXIT @ConHome #Tory #UK 
The intensive farming model that pumps animals full of antibiotics just took a hit thanks to new EU rules. This will mean higher animal welfare standards across Europe.But for the UK this comes with a #Brexit...  
With everything pointing to this being a sovereignty-stealing, poverty-pushing, health-service-hampering Brexit, do we really need to get close enough to see over the edge?#MeaningfulVote 
Keir, you enabled this. Your spineless inaction and refusal to confront your idiotic leader.If Brexit happens and it's a disaster, don't expect your "six tests" to cover you. This is on you as much as the Tories. 
With the way that #Brexit "negotiations" are progressing, I cannot help but think that our Prime Minister would lose in a game of Connect One against an amoeba, even though she had been given the first move. 
Here it is. Farage, who used Nazi imagery during the referendum campaign, supports Trump's policy of separating babies from their mothers and caging up children.He would no doubt support doing the same thing in Brexit Britain. Because he is a racist and a fascist.#StopBrexit 
My thanks to MPs from across different parties in the House of Commons for their goodwill and best wishes as I voted, at 40 weeks pregnant, in today's close division on giving Parliament a meaningful vote on Brexit (govt maj 16 votes, sadly my side lost). However... (1/3) 
Yesterday it was Donald Trump saying that immigrants "infest" the US.Today it's Trump fanboy & #Brexit conman Arron Banks describing the House of Lords as a "nest of rats".Fascists really love infestation metaphors. They're a great way to fuel hatred & dehumanise people.  
Bob Moran on meaningful Brexit vote – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
My grandad didn't vote for fascists, he shot them.My ex-partners grandad, who was at Bletchley park, said to me about Brexit & the Tories cosying up to Trump "we are on the wrong side". These people have seen the rise of fascism & telling us its happening here.Best we listen 
WELL WELL WE TOLD EM Peterhead fish processing could be relocated to Poland after Brexit, expert warns 
Quick check:Only 11% UK think Brexit negotiations are going well  Government's experts say any Brexit would be harmful Vast majority of Parliament's MPs agree Our Sovereign Parliament can't make contingency plans until November#MeaningfulVote 
After today's fuck up, I repeat: Cameron’s decision to hold a referendum - a fuck up. A simple majority referendum - a fuck up. The result - a fuck up. Result not debated, Article 50 triggered - a fuck up. Negotiations - a fuck up. Cost of fuck ups - a fuck up. Brexit - a fuck up 
Brenda and Sue have seen revolutions, which is why they are marching for future generations. Come and join them this Saturday at the #PeoplesVoteMarch and demand to have a say on the final Brexit deal. Sign up -  
Anna Soubry admits she is going against the will of the people. She's got no morals at all not only the will of the people, her own constitutions voted to Leave. They should protest and get her out an absolute disgrace to politics and Democracy. This is what a referendum means. 
I would like a second referendum I am deeply frustrated at the macho-campaigning of @campbellclaret @acgrayling How can they expect to persuade people if they show no insight into the thinking of anyone who does not agree 100% with their worldview?I fear they harm our cause 
And he is the only reason we're going through Brexit, a man who has  spent his life lecching money from the EU because he could never get  elected in England.  
Great to hear @afneil say twice “There is no Brexit dividend”.The red bus must be buried. And its ghost too.  
I agree. They had the upper hand and backed off in return for a nod and a wink.  Sad. Parliament is the loser - and so is the country if Brexit hardens up. 
Brexit Britain has received a boost from leading accountancy firm KPMG who claim that after a bad, weather-afflicted, start to 2018, “hope is on the horizon.”  
Labour have committed to "Not a single job lost" while seeing thousands of jobs already gone. I feel Labour are waiting for a disastrous Hard Brexit in the hope it'll collapse government & they'll sweep to power. They'll inherit salted earth. 
Since Parliament will not have a meaningful vote, the people should have one instead.Parliament should listen to the will of the people and give us a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
An MP was wheeled through the voting lobbies, high on morphine and carrying a sick bucket, the moment Brexit lost the dignity it never had - great sketch by @tompeck 
It needs to be said that Jeremy Corbyn did a better job of standing out against Brexit today than the Tory ‘pro-Europeans’ 
So Caroline are you saying if every tangible Brexit benefit promised in the referendum proves to be a lie and likely ‘won’ by cheating and Russian involvement, no matter if it hurts our country and your constituents, you’ll still want to leave the EU? #PeoplesVote #DealorStayinEU 
Labour could have defeated the gov’t on Brexit meaningful vote today but 4 voted with the government and 12 abstained. So hard Brexit it is 
What you need to do, Andrew, as well you know, is to decide which is worse: a Corbyn anti-austerity government or a Tory Hard Brexit?  Because your words mean nothing at all. I am sick of this now. Unite behind Corbyn to get the Tories out or go down in infamy. 
Eurotunnel bosses are confident on the arrangements for the Anglo-French border after Brexit  
That Tory Brexit rebellion that was supposed to usher in a new era in cross-bench centrist politics....  
Today's #Brexit vote surely dispels the myth that somehow @jeremycorbyn is responsible for the shambles the Tories are creating. Those attacking him, should do something useful for a change and focus their fire on May and her cohorts! 
Even without that strong opposition, the mood of the country has swung against Brexit. If Labour had been focussing and harnessing that discontent, imagine how much more confidence the Tory rebels would have had to speak out (and actually rebel). Maybe not too late even now. 
Strange, nothing about this from @theSNP, nothing from @NicolaSturgeon, @PeterMurrell, @rosscolquhoun or the usual suspects :EU says Scotland has to follow the majority #Brexit decision as we are one UK :  
Here is Labour MP Naz Shah, being pushed in her wheelchair as she clutches a sick bucket, to vote against the Tories and give Parliament a say on the Brexit deal. And yet some people will still say that Labour is "backing the Tories" on Brexit.  
For those asking who on earth were the #Labour MPs who shamefully supported #TheresaMay and the #Tory government in their attempt to muzzle parliament on #Brexit , I gather they were : @KateHoeyMP@JohnMannMP@gstringermp@frankfieldteam 
So that’s it. The vote on the Brexit deal could amount to:- the no deal Brexit we “negotiated” with the EU27or- the no deal Brexit we didn’t negotiate with the EU27And right now that looks exactly what we’ll get. This is a travesty. 
Today sick and heavily pregnant Labour MPs were forced by the Tories to vote against the Government on Brexit.This is shameful. The Tories still are, and always will be, the nasty party.  
After today’s debacle it is abundantly clear that parliament won’t save us from the Brexit fiasco. See you on Saturday #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Once again the #FBPE brigade's poster boy Dominic Grieve capitulated and voted against a meaningful vote on the final #Brexit deal. And once again their whipping boy Jeremy Corbyn voted for it. At what point do they admit the Tories are the enemy, not Corbyn? 
Iain Macwhirter: Brexit paves the way for Scotland's divorce from UK  
Every leftist on Twitter: Tory rebels are nothing of the sort, they will always put party first and will never oppose Brexit in any meaningful way."Grieve votes against his own amendment"Fuppies: This is a mystery. I cannot understand it. It must be something Corbyn has done. 
LBC's @IainDale is saying he's never seen evidence that David Davis claimed that trade talks with Germany would commence straight after the Brexit' vote. Please tweet this to the lying prick, who has blocked me. It's the first result on Google.  
Tories say £70k Brexit aviation chief 'doesn't need any knowledge of aviation'  
Good to hear Guy Verhofstadt confirm at Home Affairs Committee that his earlier statement about there being no great obstacle to indy Scotland joining EU was simply “fact”. #brexit 
What an absolute little #WORM this creature is! #DominicGrieve a #TRAITOR for all Seasons! #Grieve is a sanctimonious Anti #Brexit #Conservative #MP! We feel sorry for the people of #Beaconsfield! #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @Conservatives @theresa_may #ConservativeParty 
A sad day as we lost the chance to give Parliament a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal by 319 votes to 303. Now, more than ever, we need a #PeoplesVote on the final deal, with an opportunity to Exit from Brexit and remain in the EU  
Despite Jeremy Corbyn busting a gut getting Labour MPs to vote against the government on Brexit today, there’s still a crowd that seem to think it’s still Jeremy’s fault. Coincidentally, lots of them have #FBPE after their username, and haven’t mentioned the Tory rebels. Strange. 
You seem to under the illusion that you have any say in the Brexit negotiations. Last time I looked you were just a mayor not a government minister. 
"There's enough madness around at the moment to make one start to question whether collective sanity in this country has disappeared."　Tory MP Dominic Grieve says "sensible, reasoned argument" about Brexit is being undermined by "vilification and abuse".  
I continue to be concerned about the risks of a cliff-edge, no-deal Brexit which I think would have devastating consequences for individuals, businesses & communities. That is why I voted for Parliament to have a meaningful final vote. I am disappointed by today’s result 
So 4 Lab MPs backed Govt on Brexit and 4 Lab MPs (plus Kelvin Hopkins) abstained. Maj of 16 today. So if all 9 Lab had voted with their whip, May would have lost today.  #Brexitsplitsmatter 
Despite shady backroom deals by the Tories, we CAN still #ExitfromBrexit. Theresa May is hobbling through the Brexit process and YOU deserve the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain. Join our campaign: today: #EUWithdrawalBill 
First WM stops the Scots having any say in Brexit and now they vote to stop themselves.This is pure Gilbert & Sullivan stuff. 
We had victory today but we should remember that 309 UK MPs voted against the Democratic will of the British people. That is totally unforgivable, there must be REMOVED at the next election. #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit  
Brexit vote villains:Antoinette Sandbach, Phillip Lee, Sarah Wollaston, Anna Soubry, Ken Clarke Heidi AllenThe Labour Party The Lib DemsScots & Welsh Nats & GreensBrexit vote heroes:John MannKate HoeyFrank FieldGraham StringerThe DUPBulk of conservative MPs 
'There IS a Brexit dividend': Ress-Mogg DASHES Remainers' NHS denials  
You literally have Labour MPs turning up in wheelchairs, clutching a sick bucket and wearing a hospital bracelet to vote against the Government on Brexit.And some people still have the gall to complain of a "lack of opposition".   
Britain’s economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of Brexit  
This is so Brexit; Parliament votes *against* a meaningful vote for itself on the most complex nation-defining process since the war. Because it’s lost all perspective and the plot. ‘Missed opportunity’ doesn’t begin to cover it.  
Labour MP Naz Shah arrives at parliament in a wheelchair to vote in this afternoon's crunch debate on Brexit. Sources told Sky News the agreement that means ill MPs get "nodded through" by being on the estate was suspended for this vote.  
Today, UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP met Lord Pearson of Rannoch and Lord Stevens of Ludgate at the House of Lords, where they discussed the ongoing rebuilding of the party.The Tories have betrayed the people on Brexit and we need a strong UKIP more than ever.#ForTheNation 
Today MPs were asked:Would you like a #MeaningfulVote on Brexit deal and avoid a Brexit cliff edge?No thanks.We're fine.WTF is going on? #ThedaydemocracyDied 
The night I stayed up and watched #Brexit pass, then saw the immediate flood of regret from protest voters and ppl who were cavalier because they didn’t think it would happen, I knew we were in trouble. The parallels were uncanny. Boris Johnson even LOOKS like a British Trump. 
Govnt win vote on amendment for a ‘meaningful vote’ on the final Brexit deal by 319 to 303. Dominic Grieve accepts last minute fudge to offer backbencher motion to tell Govt what to do re Brexit (which it still might ignore). The rebellion is over, but Brexit still to be secured 
"The compromise agreed today over a “meaningful vote” for MPs at the end of the #Brexit talks isn’t perfect. But it’s a good enough basis for winning a campaign to get a #PeoplesVote" writes @Hugodixon 
The government have defeated #MeaningfulVote by 319 votes to 303 ensuring we can use no deal as a #Brexit negotiating positionThank you to the 4 labour MPs voted with the government @frankfieldteam @KateHoeyMP @JohnMannMP & Graham StringerNo surprises amongst the Tory rebels 
After a week of ‘fighting talk’ normal service is resumed in the Tory Party, as so-called rebels do what Tories do and continue to vote against what they say they believe in...be it Brexit, refugees, kids’ meals anything 
The EU Withdrawal Bill goes back to the House of Lords with the Government able to have the free hand needed to negotiate with the EU. Let’s now deliver Brexit and focus on the kind of Britain we can build in the years to come. 
So by 16 votes Tories get their way on #Brexit - not only because Dominic Grieve caved but also because Labour MPs voted with them. Guess they must hate the common market more than they dislike the Tories! The chaos continues. 
So the magic number that Tory rebels need to defeat the Govt on Brexit now is 15 (today's 6, plus 9 more). Will they have that for the customs union vote next month? That's the biggie.  
The govt defeated the meaningful vote amendment by 16 votes.The dismissive, secretive & unaccountable way this govt has conducted Brexit is unacceptable & unforgivable.Yet too many MPs have inexplicably put their faith in May’s shambolic, destructive & dishonest govt. 
Theresa May will be satisfied at avoiding a Brexit defeat. But forcing sick Labour MPs to troop through the voting lobbies has absolutely shredded any attempt to shake off the 'Nasty Party' tag coined by, er, Theresa May.  
Vote on whether or not Parliament should have a final say on the Brexit deal/no-deal.Ayes - 303Noes - 319Government takes back control from Parliament. Parliament will now only be able to "note" the deal, rather than approve or reject it. 
Govt win Brexit vote by 303 to 319 
"I make no apology for the fact that I do want to stop Brexit... Brexit is a calamity." @thomasbrake speaks out against Brexit. Only the Lib Dems are fighting to give YOU the final say on the deal, with the option to remain. Join our campaign:  
Dominic is worried about how the Brexit deal is going to impact the environment and animal welfare without all the protections we currently have in place.He's marching to demand a #PeoplesVote on Saturday - are you joining him?  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
.@KirstySNP's reaction when Bill Grant says no one is in pursuit of a cliff edge Brexit or no deal. He should probably pass this on to his boss @theresa_may 
Gripping new play about the Tory Brexit rebels  
It seems clear to me that we are being sold a pig in a poke today and there will be no meaningful vote or an amendable motion that might allow Parliament to save the people from the ‘No Deal’ Brexit that the hardliners are determined to deliver. 
#Broxtowe Good Afternoon 52.40% of you voted to LEAVE the #EU and #BrexitYour MP @Anna_Soubry is voting against the Government & her party to accept the Lords Amendment to the #EUWithdrawalBillNO respect for British democracy - NO respecting the EU referendum vote. 
In London to meet @BritishPM - Ireland will not be the collateral damage in Tory Brexit. @moneillsf @MickeyBradySF @OrfhlaithBegley 
For the many not for few - lovely to meet ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ and talk Brexit, Sugar, racism, exercise and a whole lot more with my chum ⁦@DawnButlerBrent⁩  
It’s a moral imperative to stop separating families. Also, must legislate/compromise on broader immigration. Failure to deal w/ complexities has led to instability in Europe, e.g. #Brexit; elections in Italy, Germany. See my remarks yesterday @EconClubNY. 
The key point is the initial Grieve amendment would have allowed MPs to direct the government’s Brexit negotiating stance. The amendment today does not. Common sense has prevailed. 
WATCH | Brexiteer @PhilipDaviesUK exposes the dishonesty of Brexit saboteurs in parliament -"their constituents should know that they are trying to keep us in the European Union against their will!" Support us at  
Ken Clarke says Government unfairly restricting debate over Brexit 
Tom Brake: I want to stop Brexit56% of his constituents in Carshalton voted to Leave 
It has always always always been obvious that it was potential Tory rebels who held the key on Brexit.Why why why have people like @campbellclaret and @acgrayling been fixated on Corbyn? 
Even Brexit-voters think the negotiations are going badly.So we're headed somewhere that won't please ANYONE.Yet Parliament thinks we should go right to the cliff edge before we start building a ladder or turn around.YOU CAN'T TRUST THEM. Take back control!#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Just watching the debate. The ultras of the Tories are 'frit' over the prospect of a meaningful vote; the reality is the whole house is in denial....the EU and the rest of the world knows we've been reduced to a banana republic through a dodgy referendum.  
Faced with a chance to have a final say in the Brexit deal, Tory "rebels" bottle it for the same reason other "progressives" incessantly attack Labour.Their fear of Corbyn is greater than their love of the EU. 
Today, Jeremy Corbyn led U.K. Opposition to a Theresa May imposed Brexit. He needed just one ingredient for success, Tory Rebels to vote with him to stop May. Tory Rebels bottled it & have just raised the white flag 
The really fun thing about this is that now, when Brexit goes horrifically wrong just as Dominic Grieve warned us it would, Dominic Grieve will share the blame.  
But is there this silver lining?Labour will need to think about what its position *really* is on Brexit. It, too, has been kicking the can down the road by focusing on procedure ("meaningful vote" and the "six tests"). It may now need a substantive policy position. 
Brexit coordinator, Guy Verhofstadt, has backed the SNP Scottish Government’s compromise position on the customs union. It’s vital that Scotland maintains its place in the Single Market and Customs Union – to protect our economy, jobs and living standards. #Brexit #brexitshambles 
TWO years wasted already. Gov't are doing a lousy job of negotiating Brexit. Delays, more delays & capitulation. If Gov't falls, so be it, the public have wised up since the last GE & will welcome the chance to unseat Brexit quislings.  
We might just scrape through Brexit with both parties intact but the economy in tatters, and some viewing that as success.I long for a day when people just stand up and say what they feel in their hearts is best for the community that elected them and the country we serve 
And the bitter taste of humble pie for me.An incredibly important amendment on Brexit that Corbyn has pushed hard will fail because the rebels for reasons I do not understand folded. 
Party before people. Always. Brexit belongs entirely to the @CONservatives. 
Brexit has exposed the rank incompetence and awfulness of our politicians. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg says that Grieve is the brightest MP , God help us ! 
How badly does Brexit have to go before the House of Commons will step up and take some responsibility for how it is delivered? 
So that’s it. Tory rebels are going to cave in. No real meaningful vote on the final Brexit deal. We’ll be stuck between a bad deal & no deal. Shame on you. 
Who knew that Labour would come to the Tories aid to support a hard Brexit.... 
GCHQ director reminds us that UK has a strong hand in #Brexit negotiations. Let's use it!!! We should not be supplicants.  
A spineless surrender. There will be no forgiveness for those who so let down the British people at a moment when this country needed MPs of courage and principle willing to stand up for what is right!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE. 
How thing move in Scotland 1979 couldn't get a paltry assembly (or sky would fall in) 1997 Scotland votes for parliament - powerd way beyond assembly.2014 Scotland couldn't get independence.2019+ Brexit dividend is Scottish independence. 
Brexit campaigner Gina Miller accuses news media of 'stifling' free expression and putting owners' interests above readers:  - via:@pressgazette 
There he goes again. The Lords rebels openly admitted they want to stop Brexit. At least they're brave enough to be honest.  
‘@PhilipDaviesUK: Remain MPs still aiming to delay, frustrate and stop Brexit altogether. They can deny it all they want - it’s obvious!  
Starmer: “The Brexit Secretary, once a great guardian of the role of this House now wants to sideline Parliament wines its voice is most needed” 
In parliament on the meaningful vote, Keir Starmer is absolutely destroying David Davis and the Tories on their Brexit Chaos. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Dominic Grieve's attempts to portray himself as the disinterested champion of the constitution have unravelled dramatically over the last few days. His 'meaningful vote' amendment is simply about wrecking Brexit, as his supporters readily admit  
The intention of the remainers is clear. To stop or delay Brexit. They will even collapse the Government if they have to. When the Commons votes today, they must NOT be allowed to ignore the votes of 17.4 million. 
Forgive Brexit voters for worrying that if there’s a “compromise” and Nicky Morgan is backing it then Brexit must be getting further diluted  
Brexit debate underway. We expect a vote about 3.45pm. Time to tweet your MP to support the meaningful vote!!! Otherwise what on earth is the point of Parliament. 
Theresa May lost any claim to decide Brexit alone when she came out with the ridiculous statement: No Deal is better than a bad.No deal IS a deal, a very bad deal and was never part of the Leave campaign, so there’s no authority for it. MPs take control.#MeaningfulVote 
i have a girlfriend yes. shes a tory brexit rebel. you don't know her. she goes to another house. shes real tho 
Another dollop of Brexit fudge with Tory party interests yet again taking priority over the interests of the country.  
Apparently the Govt are so desperate to win today's vote that sick MPs will have to come into the division lobbies to vote, tearing up a long-standing convention.  #Brexit at any cost! 
Wylie: "Their narrowly tailored and delivered messages erode the public forum because they allow some in politics to go to every one of you in the audience and whisper you something. And you don’t know what I’m telling this person versus that person.” 
Today my Labour colleagues and I will be voting to secure a #meaningfulvote on the terms of the final Brexit deal, just as we did last week.This is a crucial vote for those who oppose a calamitous hard Tory Brexit. Let's hope enough so-called Tory 'rebels' vote with us! 
Was nice to see @spaceangel1964 and @nickynoo007 today. I think they're planning a splinter group, 'blondes against brexit'  Anyone want to join 'brunettes against brexit'? 
 @OwenJones84 - a workers brexit ? I’m a worker and will be finished along with many many others if we leave the CU - what “ workers brexit “ will benefit me and others ? - also I can’t see a lot of difference between labour and the tories on brexit 
The Government has conceded the rebel demands that the 'meaningful vote' on the Brexit deal could be amended 
MUST WATCHAAP Punjab Observer @msisodia  making it clear over the alleged Punjab Referendum 2020 Comment by AAP Punjab MLA @SukhpalKhaira "I met @SukhpalKhaira today and made it clear to him that the party cannot even think about a referendum, let alone support it"  
‘Today is #Brexit’s moment of truth. @theresa_may must face down and defeat the Tory Remainer rebels central to the orchestrated plot to reverse the referendumAnd that IS Grieve & Soubry’s game no matter what they pretend’ #EUWithdrawalBill 
Britain is still heading for a bad Brexit deal but today’s significant victory shows why it’s not a done deal. Parliament has reasserted itself and MPs now have the chance to take back control of a botched Brexit process. It is right MPs today have put the country first. 
Tories 'take advantage of sick and elderly Labour MPs' in desperate bid to win Brexit vote 
The Tories gave the PEOPLE the first say on Brexit - it's time they commit to giving the people the FINAL SAY on the deal, including the option of staying in the EU. Agree? Join our campaign:  
Yes: 37% of the electorate (which excluded expats, the young, some millions of resident taxpayers) voted Leave. In your warped sense of democracy (= we’ll get Brexit come what may) this is a mandate. - Dishonest.  
Brexit: ID scheme for EU citizens in UK 'difficult to achieve'“If just 5% of the estimated 3.4 million EU citizens living in the UK do not register by the deadline, this would be a population of 170,000 left without status,” says @NPCthinks 
Surely this can’t be true. Labour MPs saving Tories from defeat and denying the House of Commons a meaningful vote and the chance to avoid a Brexit cliff edge would be inexplicable and unforgivable. I hope it doesn’t happen.  
Sick and ill Labour MPs will not be helped by Tories to vote on Brexit today, the party claims. No word back yet from Govt whips. 
Pretty sure if Remain had won the referendum back in 2016 they wouldn’t have found themselves refighting the referendum over and over again weekly for the following two years. This is nuts.  
Looking for a new job? How about Head of Aviation EU Exit Negotiations? Just two short years after the referendum, the job ad has appeared.No aviation experience needed, but be warned: “You will be required to travel to Europe”.Oddly, not “within Europe” 
Why were you happy for Obama to come here and preach about the Referendum? When his regime held far more kids in far worse conditions. Not expecting an answer because you don't have one do you   
Those who want to champion Parliamentary sovereignty should ensure MPs have a meaningful vote on the final Brexit deal.It’s time to put the country first and ensure we embrace Parliamentary sovereignty.How do MPs do that? Support the #MeaningfulVote today. 
Giving ministers the power to alter laws without sufficient scrutiny isn't democratic.@theresa_may is leading us down the path of a disastrous hard-Brexit. We have to stand up against this outrageous power grab by giving the people the final #VoteontheDeal to #ExitfromBrexit 
Leading Brexiteers including Boris Johnson, Liam Fox & David Davis have all told us that Brexit is about parliamentary sovereignty. They should be supporting the amendment on a meaningful vote and upholding this core principle of parliamentary democracy. @Open_Britain @euromove 
It looks like the regional parliaments of Flanders, Catalonia, the Basque country, Brussels and Wallonia will have more say on any Brexit deal than the UK parliament, which is voluntarily giving up sovereignty to the executive. Strange kind of 'taking back control'.  
At the very heart of the #StopBrexit movement is evidence showing that Brexit will damage our country & already has & that the referendum was not a free or fair vote but was fraud. People were lied to. Two years later the evidence is very strong that Brexit is a disaster.  
A reminder that you have to, at least occasionally, rebel in order to continue being labelled a ‘Tory Brexit rebel’. 
Could it really be that our country's #Brexit negotiators have absolutely no strategy for success other than threatening to leave with No Deal and just assuming the EU won't let us? Could that really be? The desperation today certainly suggests that 
The EU referendum is void. It’s as simple as that. Not just lies & manipulation, but crime, fraud & foreign interference. And the Brexiters carry on trying to trash the country? 
.@thomasbrake outlines the upcoming showdown in Parliament over giving MPs a 'meaningful vote' on Brexit.The Lib Dems are fighting to give YOU a final say on Brexit, with the option of staying in the EU. Add your name today:  
Parliament has had many "meaningful says" in the shaping of Brexit already, voting to give the people a referendum, triggering Article 50 and now debating the Withdrawal Bill.This call for a "meaningful say" is a ruse designed to overrule the British people. Don't be fooled!  
That's because their real goal isn't overturning Brexit, it's about overthrowing Corbyn. 
Don't think there's any difference between Labour and the Tories' approach to Brexit? Read and share this >  
Guy Verhofstadt warns MPs of 'two decade' Brexit ratification: This nightmare will run and run. Time to think again   
The time has come when it’sno longer acceptableto say you are“Scottish and British”#Brexit with its @Conservatives oppression through #PowerGrableaves you with one simple choiceAre you “Scottish”?Or “British”? 
There was a threshold: 40% of the total electorate had to be in favour. (EU referendum: 37% of the electorate voted Leave. That is no mandate.)  
Along with so much else, Brexit is destroying the party system: Tory whips try to bribe Labour MPs with promises they will go easy on them at the next election  
Labour and particularly @johnmcdonnellMP & @Keir_Starmer should take note that former Vote Leave staffer @OliverNorgrove states here that quitting the Single Market could cost between 5-10% of our GDP - which would wreck Labour's plans. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
The UK government is facing a knife-edge Brexit vote in the next few hours. Here's the latest:  
'You'd welcome stopping Brexit!' Remainer Grieve forced to admit Britons still back Brexit  
Health Minister @JackieDP concedes to @afneil that there won’t be any ‘Brexit dividend’ to fund the first 2 years of @theresa_may’s NHS funding boost. #bbcdp 
The clash between @Jacob_Rees_Mogg & Guy Verhofstadt today in Select Committee over the #IrishBorder & #Brexit.JRM was asking a simple Q, but the answer was elusive. 
It’s becoming glaringly apparent that the political shift in the world Trump and Brexit has been manipulated by forces to destroy everything that our ancestors fought for 
Well done to @sdriks for pledging a referendum on Sweden’s membership of the European Union.  
Corbyn won that PMQ's. Theresa May looked angry towards the end. Embarrassing that she still thinks she push Orwellian nonsense about a non existent ''Brexit dividend'' and claim it will provide extra funding for the NHS.The truth is it will come from higher taxes. #PMQs 
It's back down (rebels) or bring down (Government). Either we accept the biggest vote in British democratic history (repeatedly endorsed by the elected Commons) or give in to the unelected Lords to stay in the antidemocratic EU. #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
Journalists asking 'Why doesn't Corbyn ask May more questions about Brexit or Trump?' - you do realise you could also do this, right? #PMQs 
Matthew Parris writing under @Dannythefink @thetimes piece on Bogdanor’s claim that there is something constitutionally wrong about Parliament taking back control of Brexit.“needs to be nailed”  
I watched a 1940’s British movie last night. In it they went to France on holiday. The English people were really excited to have real coffee with cream, white bread with real butter, and...and fruit in bowl. A glimpse of our #Brexit future #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Guy Verhofstadt warns MPs of 'two decade' Brexit ratification  
“You’ve said that the EU would insist on a hard border with no agreement because the “rules are the rules” - but the EU when it has suited it has not always stuck to that position, has it?” says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg to @Europarl_EN's Brexit Coordinator @guyverhofstadt 
Corbyn showed May’s clueless about funding her NHS plans and what taxes she’ll raise when there’s no Brexit “dividend” and economic growth’s slumped #PMQs 
.@thomasbrake has this morning tabled an amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill seeking to strengthen the terms of Parliament's 'meaningful vote' on the Brexit deal.  
Theresa May again scorns Labour for not threatening to leave the EU without a deal, and suggests that it is they who’ll bankrupt the economy. Her #PMQs performances are much like her Brexit policy: a mix of ignorance, incompetence and self-immolation 
The Labour Whips don't need to work on me . I'm voting for the Brexit my constituents voted for. 
The Prime Minister now confirming there will be NO #Brexit dividend. This much we knew! Now how will the #Tories get that on the side of a bus. #voteSNP 
I hope that  @JDjanogly will join other courageous Tories today by voting to give Parliament a real say in the outcome of the Brexit negotiations. 
Not exactly deftly delivered by Corbyn but the wider point on the "Brexit dividend" is wounding for May. She is now associated with the Brexit bus and the £350m pledge, a highly suspect figure. She wasn't before. She's dipped her own hands in the blood. #PMQs 
Corbyn: At the weekend, the PM said about £600m a week more - through Brexit dividend. Our net contribution is about £8,5bn a year. Her plan is over £30bn a year. Figures so dodgy they belong on a bus. Why is PM pushing her own Mickey Mouse figures? #PMQs 
Wonderful scenes here at #PMQs as Theresa May defends her own ridiculous "Brexit dividend" nonsense by pointing out Jeremy Corbyn has said it as well. That's where we are now: I know I'm telling massive lies but it's okay because so are you. 
No, Theresa May isn't giving the NHS a £600m a week 'Brexit bonus’ #PMQs 
Corbyn - ‘her figures are so dodgy they belong on a side of a bus’ - remember that, in fact, is the point - May claiming Brexit dividend to satisfy tory right who might otherwise object to tax rises 
You can have my share of the Brexit Dividend. 
Oh dearTheresa May quotes Brexiteer Jeremy CorbynThere is no getting away from thisTheresa May and Jeremy Corbyn are on the same side when it comes to Brexit#pmqs 
Scot Gov: Hey, so we have an idea how to mitigate the damage of Brexit. Here's our report "Scotland's Place in Europe" and -UK Gov: GET LOST JOCKS!EU Brexit Coordinator: (shuffles in) actually this would solve a few issues-UK Gov: GET LOST BUREAUCRAT! RED WHITE AND BLUE!  
Delusional as ever; Guy Verhofstadt gloats that the EU is MORE popular after Brexit  via @MailOnline 
"Banks won’t be putting out press releases saying they are moving some of their operations because of Brexit because they don’t want the publicity. They are just getting on with it." 
“Surely it stands to reason that there is no Brexit dividend to finance these rises?” @afneil to @JackieDP #bbcdp 
What is Grieve’s mandate to block Brexit? Stood on a Brexit manifesto, voted for EU Ref Bill, voted for A50. Now pulling the rug. Shocker. 
Those MPs considering backing the Government today might also ask themselves why so may Brexiters are working so hard to try to get them to allow a deeply harmful, chaotic No Deal Brexit to occur.In what possible way could that be in the interests of the UK?  
Labour MP John Mann tells Sky he will vote with the Government later. Says the Dominic Grieve amendment aims to "open up the opportunity for all sorts of mischief" on Brexit. 
“Can we agree that none of that can come from the Brexit dividend?” @afneil asks @JackieDP on the extra £7.5bn for the NHS across the UK #bbcdp 
At the heart of the 'stop Brexit' movement is the belief that a collective of people were too poorly informed to make the correct decision for the country. We don't believe that ordinary citizens, now that they are better informed, should be stuck with a decision harming them.  
Death threats 'become routine' in toxic Brexit debate...  
Commons vote on Withdrawal Bill all about whether you trust the government or the commons to put the national interest first on #Brexit. My vote goes to the commons #FBPE 
‘@AndrewRosindell: EU want to derail Brexit. Remoaners and many in Brussels still refuse to accept the will of the people!  
Anti-Brexit campaigner Gina Miller accuses news media of 'stifling' free expression and putting owners' interests above readers 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg grilling @guyverhofstadt in the Brexit Select Committee right now. Rightfully pointing out that the EU follow its own rules when it suits them, but flexible when it doesn't. 
“When Labour MPs vote on the meaningful vote amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill today, we have a huge opportunity: the chance to fight for a workers’ Brexit instead of a Tory Brexit” : Laura Smith MP via @labourlist 
This is an excellent idea. Better yet would be to stay in the EU and pair this with around £5.5bn per year of European Invesment Bank funding for social housing, education, transport, energy and environment investment in the UK that will otherwise go after Brexit.  
The Tories' NHS spending pledge shows how Corbyn - and Brexit - have shifted British politics to the left.  
Today’s vote is about whether parliament has to “take it or leave it” when it comes to the Govt’s #Brexit deal, or if we can make proposals of our own. MPs must have a meaningful say on the most important issue facing our country, which is why I will backing the Grieve amendment.  
Today I will vote to support Parliament having a meaningful vote on the final Brexit deal. We will leave the EU, but we must protect trade, the environment, jobs & workers rights. Taking Brexit forward, it's how, and not if we leave, and that's why todays vote is so important. 
I really don't care what you think of Brexit, the way the Government continues to try and circumvent Parliamentary authority is absolutely outrageous  
"Today Labour MPs should vote for a Labour Brexit: one that protects our economy & workers, respects the EU Referendum result & secures the interests of the country for the many, not the few. Today, that means voting for the meaningful vote amendment."  
The biggest shock about Brexit wasn’t the result, it was the realisation afterwards that we’d only ever been living in an illusion of democracy. 
“The Conservative Party has a lot to answer for in these negotiations. A house divided against itself cannot stand. The result has been a betrayal of the British people." Watch my closing contribution to an Assembly debate on the second anniversary of the EU referendum.  
The UK is in a dark place when the British Prime Minister is so weak because of #Brexit that she is unable to condemn flagrant breaches of human rights by the US president.The Tories shame us all. 
Remain MP admits talking to the EU about plans to frustrate and delay Brexit. RETWEET if you think he should #RespectTheResult 
** Newsflash **Previous Mad Cow outbreak areas linked to brexit vote.  
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP will be on 5 Live in the next few minutes talking about Cannabis, Brexit, Trump, immigration and the World Cup. Tune in if you can. #ForTheNation 
Of course we are marching against Brexit this coming Saturday, but we will also there to stand for values of tolerance, compassion, exchange, cooperation and a good society, which are all under threat on both sides of the Atlantic. That's why we march. 
Fun fact from our poll of English people last month: supporters of the Conservative *and Unionist* Party are by some distance the most willing to sacrifice the Union for Brexit.  
. @joannaccherry asks @guyverhofstadt during the @CommonsEUexit session about progress of the UK’s negotiations on EU withdrawal#ScotlandinEurope #Brexit #Scotland #NIreland #HHRR 
Why our kids need Brexit. Superb trolling - and also true - by Isabel Robeson  
Before @CommonsEUexit @guyverhofstadt makes crystal clear to #DUP that #Brexit puts up a hard border IF UK leaves #SingleMarket & #CustomsUnion not the #DUP red herring of fiscal differences because these exist between #EU member states without hard borders 
Good old Viscount Hailsham, he really really doesn’t want to lose his EU CAP payments now that he can’t claim to clean his moat on expensesHis average earnings from the taxpayer, thanks to the EU, have been £4K per year just for owning land#Brexit will put an end to this  
Before @CommonsEUexit @guyverhofstadt confirms to me that the compromise put forward by @scotgov in #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope that whole UK remain in #Singlemarket & a #CustomsUnion would be acceptable to #EU & solve #NorthernIreland border problem #Brexit 
For goodness' sake, Guy Verhofstadt is having to explain what the Single Market is to the Brexit Select Committee.  
Senior Labour source tells me: "This is the chance for Labour MPs to stand up for their constituencies and reject a Tory Brexit. No Labour MP should want to hand Theresa May and Jacob Rees-Mogg a blank cheque to trash jobs and the economy." 
A handy reminder to all those MPs planning to back demands for a “meaningful vote” on Brexit today: We’ve already had a “meaningful vote” on Brexit.It was on 23rd June 2016.  
REALITY: CEO of Singapore firm confirms London still number one, increasing investment in Brexit Britain. Ignore the naysayers - an exciting global future awaits!  
While the Prime Minister is plagued with cabinet infighting, time is quickly running out to agree a viable solution to the Irish border issue. That is why Liberal Democrats are fighting to give the people the final say on the deal and the chance to Exit from Brexit. 
I still maintain that the best solution for Brexit is to have two Britains as in The City And The City, one in and one out. 
Busy day ahead in London with a number of engagements including meeting with Theresa May to discuss defending the interests of the Irish people post BrexitContinuing to seek security for Billy Caldwell to have long term access to his medication so he can finally return home  
Local associations have had enough of Grieve, Soubry & clique of hardcore EUphile rebels‘Grieve has even upset Remainers in the association ...he’s gone too far’Asked about Soubry the Mayor of @broxtowebc said ‘I’m a Brexit supporter, put it that way’ 
Theresa May cannot let Tory Remainers destroy Brexit – it’s her duty to defeat the rebellion, says @TheSun 
At the very heart of the ‘stop brexit’ movement is a belief that people are too stupid to make decisions for themselves. They don’t believe that ordinary citizens outside of their elitist club have the capacity to make informed decisions about the future of the country. 
What happened to the UK?May's Tories are using a marginal result to leave the EU as an excuse to withdraw from non-EU conventions & dump human rights.Corbyn's Labour is spending all its time organising village fêtes to promote Tory #Brexit to the few.Someone get a grip.  
This week I wrote to 340 MPs who've kept quiet on Brexit. My question is clear - delegate or representative? Which MPs will show a backbone, stand up for their constituents & vote to let Parliament & then the people have the final say on Brexit? #BrexitShambles #WithdrawalBill 
In case anyone is any doubt. MEPs main priority in these Brexit negotiations is protecting citizens. No free movement for Brits living in EU27 is unacceptable for us @guyverhofstadt @BritishInEurope 
Exc - here’s @Keir_Starmer’s note he sent round Labour MPs last night, language aimed squarely at Labour Brexit rebels - “isn’t about stopping Brexit... isn’t about delaying Brexit or tying the hands of negotiators... not about the future of Theresa May or of this government.”  
Serious question to which I've never seen a plausible answer on Labour's power to stop Brexit. How?  
These are actual comments from a Pro trump website. Read them, then literally weep. Then  fight trump and fight brexit before it starts happening here, then in Italy, Hungary and other places. We've turned a dark corner, but we will beat fascism (again).#FBPE 
With every question that Guy Verhofstadt answers succinctly it becomes increasingly evident that the UK has no idea what it has done, what Brexit is, and what it wants.Contrast this performance with David Davis.  
Watching the Exiting EU select committee appearance of @guyverhofstadt who confirms that there would be no EU objection to U.K. staying in EEA & Customs Union.Good to hear, as damn sight less damaging than where we are headed with the Tories hard Brexit atm. 
Anti-Brexit Tories are warned they could face deselection if they side with Labour in crunch Commons vote on Brexit today  
Guy Verhofstadt at Brexit committee says no opposition to @ScotGov single market membership proposals on European side (Of course the big issue is the lack of support domestically...) 
I'm told that Jeremy Corbyn is personally attempting to persuade Labour Brexiteers to vote against the govt on "meaningful vote" today. Last week five voted with govt. Could make all the difference. #Brexit 
Hope .@UKLabour Led by @jeremycorbyn doesn’t support an amendment from an unelected House of Lords proposed by a Hereditary Peer trying to thwart the #Brexit referendum today. The referendum was the meaningful vote! Get on with it! 
#EU Admitting its a shambles as Guy Verhoftstadt says: If an important country like the UK is breaking away. it’s difficult to say 'It’s a success, fantastic.' I don’t look at this outcome of the referendum in this way. It’s a failure it has opened our eyes." 
Shock on MPs’ faces as @guyverhofstadt explains that Britain is heading (based on current red lines) for a Ukraine style association agreement after Brexit 
Will #Labour MPs Kate Hoey, Dennis Skinner, Frank Field, John Mann, and Caroline Flint be wearing blue rosettes when they go into the voting lobby over the #EUWithrawalBill amendment today? #Brexit 
Why is @theresa_may gambling her authority on a fight with her own MPs - over their right to have a meaningful vote over Brexit terms - that was completely avoidable?  
Guy Verhofstadt in front of the Brexit committee: I'm 'puzzled' by the UK's Brexit position  
Vote ‘Ruth Davidson to oppose a second referendum’ they asked. A Tory Council was elected as a result. This is what happens when you put the Tories in power. A Tory vote is never consequence free.  
Security is always a balance between a tyrannical police state and protecting civil liberties (human rights). Right now we have roughly the same human rights laws as the rest of EU. The Treaties, Charter, human rights act.The first 2 go with Brexit and May wants to axe the third 
.@LibDems Spokesperson for Brexit and International Trade @thomasbrake MP writes: 'MPs – Delegates or Representatives?' | #MeaningfulVote #EUWithdrawalBill 
"I've said it once and I will say it again, there is no, THERE IS NO #BREXIT DIVIDEND... So have strength and fight on... Because it's not over until it's over! And we will fight for what we know to be right." #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #EUsupergirl #ThereIsNoBrexitDividend 
PUBLIC SERVICE ANNOUNCEMENTS Brexit Minister David Davis has met with EU negotiator Michel Barnier ONLY THREE TIMES this entire year The Govt is looking for a Head of Aviation for the negotiations, but say “prior knowledge of the aviation sector” is “not necessary”  
Guy Verhofstadt very clear, Brexit has ignited reform in the EU. We would be leaving something that is changing to meet the needs of its citizens.  
The energy sector - like pretty much every other sector - is starting to give up on the government's ability to offer answers on Brexit  
Breaking : Angry over referendum remarks, the AAP Punjab In charge Manish Sisodia pulls up Khaira, Party Chief Arvind Kejriwal refuses to even meet him at his residence. Sisodia warns Khaira, no place for such divisive ideology in the party. 
Daily Briefing: - UK PM to face pro-EU rebels over #Brexit - Macron, Merkel agree on 'new chapter' for EU- Hungary set to criminalise aiding illegal immigrants with new bill 
You also know that Corbyn's ultras are desperate for Labour to be defeated this afternoon because otherwise they will have to admit Labour can stop Brexit after all and Brexit is on Labour just as much as the Tories. 
Disgrace!“If you were in any doubt over whether we should be leaving EU just take a look at the people we are negotiating with & just take a look at 5th column inside our own Parliament inside our media class who are trying to wreck it"#Brexit #Leave #EU 
For too long, our politicians have betrayed us. They've betrayed Brexit, they've betrayed our freedom and they've betrayed our people.But it doesn't have to be this way. On June 23rd, it's our time to remind them what we voted for two years ago!  
Arron Banks blasts the “unpatriotic nest of rats” in the House of Lords who seem hell-bent on blocking Brexit.RT if you agree they should be abolished!  Support us at  
CBI effects looks like, you world wide web technicians have got no shame making photos like this. Hard Brexit Harry Maguire would never do this, he voted Leave.  
Most people, including people who want Brexit, think it's going badly.We know we're moving towards a deal that leaves us with LESS control and LESS money to fix the problems in this country.People did not vote for that.#MeaningfulVote 
CRUNCH BREXIT DAYExcellent article by @bluetrot. Hand wringing & backsliding angering people, with particular reference to fishing in coastal constituencies which @conservatives depend on!MPs must vote to press on to undiluted Brexit or face oblivion 
There would be no need for Parliament to take back control if the government had delivered the cake and eat it Brexit promised. But 2 years on and we're nowhere. Leave lied. The EU doesn't need us more than we need them. It's time for reality to kick in. Let it start today. 
Today is a key day for #Brexit. The meaningful vote amendment is not acceptable - it would positively incentivise the EU to offer UK a bad deal, and turn constitutional common sense on its head. The Government negotiates, not 650 MPs. In truth, Trojan horse for cancelling Brexit. 
Looks like Labour will be handing May the win and Brexit.A few  Lab MPs such as Skinner I believe abstained last week so that will be critical. Unbelievable   
Summary of Scot Unionist position,  like @Douglas4Moray, on Scottish Sovereignty Is Scotland Sovereign?1. Indyref - Yes (got their result)2. Brexit - No (was UK wide vote)Sort of highlights Scotland’s democratic deficit while being PART of the UK 
This incompetent government which still can't decide, 2 years on, what the "will of the people" means is fighting today to deny the elected representatives of the people any say, should their befuddled attempts at Brexit go wrong. That's what's happening in Parliament today... 
If Brexit destroys the Conservative Party, that's your Brexit dividend. 
Sweden Democrats call for a referendum on #EU membership after the forthcoming election 
The real question for MPs today is not about Brexit, it’s actually about whether they want to hand all power to the executive. So all MPs who vote with the Gov today want dictatorship.They are empowering central control and the end parliamentary democracy.  
The problem with this is it assumes an economic shock from Brexit won’t cause a democratic shock. But the gap between voter expectations and the actual impact on their living standards is so vast, it risks creating the most profound democratic crisis. Far better to be honest now.  
"There is no Brexit dividend," said one financial analyst in response to Prime Minister Theresa May's speech promising more money for the NHS "Payments to the EU will fall, but tax revenues will fall more as a result of Brexit."  
Today is a real Brexit test of nerve - not just for potential Tory rebels but for Labour leavers in Parliament as well - who wants to be Labour MP who saves May from a defeat by a handful of votes?  
I never thought in my lifetime that I would see the return of fascism. But like the last time, we will stand up to it and succeed in defeating it. We start with brexit. 
.@DrPhillipLeeMP says there is a requirement to get the "informed consent" of the people on any Brexit deal: "I'm a doctor, informed consent means that you've checked that the patient fully understands the implications of the procedure" #r4today 
That’s why today’s vote in @HouseofCommons matters. Parliament can’t do its job - your MP can’t make sure the final #Brexit deal is in your interests - if it doesn’t have a say. But the principle of Parliamentary sovereignty is even more important than that... 
The people’s “informed consent” to #Brexit wasn’t given in 2016 because there was no deal to vote on. So we simply couldn’t judge at that point what Brexit terms would be in our best interests and those of our country....  
We asked Tory MP @BobBlackman #HowWillBrexitBenefitMe?Although polite his answers were from the Tory #Brexit Book of Myths.I've met many people in my 48 years of existence yet I've never heard a single person complain about the shackles of #Brussels#StopBrexit #SODEMaction 
.English voters would rather lose Scotland than Gibraltar in the Brexit process.  
Thread comprehensively destroying the myth that it is even remotely possible that everyone knew exactly what form of Brexit they were voting for.  
So, the Government is set to lose £10Bn pa in tax revenues from The City because of Brexit - but it’s OK because we’ll all get to help make up the difference by paying our new ‘jumbo Brexit Dividend’ taxes. That seems like a good deal to me!  
This is now real Brexit debate in Cabinet (& Brussels).  Can May persuade her own Cabinet to drop *all*  her red lines and accept ECJ, budget contributions, & (modified) FoM? And will EU27 decide cherry-picking is OK if they get to eat most the cherries? 
It’s Wednesday.And #Brexit is such a futile exercise. Unravelling 40+ years of progress, cooperation and integration. For no gain whatsoever.Simply daft.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
Well, this is a bit awkward - Jeremy Corbyn is still a “friend” of Brexit, anti-EU Labour MP reassures eurosceptics  
'Optimistic' outlook for Scotland's economy, but businesses are still hampered by uncertainty over #Brexit, a @Strath_FAI study forecasts  
Democracy is not a game Ms Jenkyns @andreajenkyns. MPs, you need to please support this amendment to give you a meaningful vote on the #Brexit deal. You have a duty to the country first above all else. Please do what is in the best interests for our country.  
Observation:We employ MPs to decide on things where we haven't already given our opinion. Not to frustrate the clearly expressed Decision of the British People.They are our servants, not our masters.Viva Brexit!  
In the week when the Prime Minister herself cynically has chosen to adopt a Brexit lie as her own, how can we trust this government to do the right thing? Calm, sensible logic please, Commons. #batedbreath #EUWithdrawalBill 
Grim Brexit reading as EU prepares call to speed up plans for no-deal Brexit  via @financialtimes 
Tory rebellion CRUSHED: May poised for victory in Commons Brexit showdown  
UK SMEs are losing £57bn a year - more than the cost of #Brexit - due to the #productivity gap. See how you can increase your business productivity with our new Productivity Blueprint  
Anti-Brexit Tories facing revolt after threatening to side with LabourYes, get rid of Soubry!  
Yet another #Brexit problem : 
Friends! Exactly!Hate Speech - i.e. speech that we on the Left hate - is totally unacceptable!Examples include: "Unlimited immigration has its drawbacks!" "Maybe Brexit won't be a total disaster?" and even "Not everything Thatcher did was wrong!"Talk about Fascism!  
.@emmadentcoad will you be backing Parliamentary sovereignty or siding with May, Mogg & Johnson again? Lords voted by 119 to send “Grieve 2” amend to Commons for Parliament meaningful vote in the event of a no deal Brexit.You’re my MP: constituents want this, today we watch you 
The whole brexit debacle has achieved one good thing and that is before the referendum many remain voters had a rose tinted  view of the eu but now have a clearer understanding of how corrupt & anti-british they are. Remainers moving over to brexit by their droves. 
 If the Tories fail to deliver a proper Brexit they will completely lose the trust and respect of millions of voters. 
Big day today, we'll find out if Parliamentary sovereignty has any meaning to those who campaigned for Brexit on the strength of it.Or if they were, in fact, full of shit. 
UK could lose £10bn a year in City-related tax revenue after Brexit  
@DrPhillipLeeMP says there is a requirement to get the "informed consent" of the people on any Brexit deal: "I'm a doctor, informed consent means that you've checked that the patient fully understands the implications of the procedure" #r4today 
Crunch time is approaching for @S_Hammond.  Will he join those Tories who believe in Parliament ‘taking back control’ and vote today to give Parliament a real say in the #Brexit negotiations. 
Why is it that the MPs who are calling for proper parliamentary scrutiny of Brexit are the ones who are being dragged over the coals? It should be those who are calling for a catastrophic no-deal who are ripped into; no-deal would be economic suicide.  #r4today 
.@DrPhillipLeeMP talking much sense @BBCr4today today’s #MeaningfulVote is about making sure Parliament plays it’s part in securing #Brexit future in best interests of our country 
One of those utterly depressing reads.I know we're supposed to "respect" & "reach out" to Leave Voters but then you read that 80% of them in England think #Brexit is more important than the GFA & keeping the Union togetherVandals - Brexit at any cost 
The Brexit Dividend is like taking out a Wonga loan after you’ve lost all your money at the casino just so that you can pretend you’re still a winner to your wife and your mates 
Tory Brexit rebel Philip Lee insists they are holding firm: "My understanding is that the position taken by colleagues is solid." #r4today 
Imagine being a 19 y.o. dickhead who doesn't care that the UK economy has been failing since the EU ref & still happily supports Brexit.  
Fine Gael rep thinks a border poll should not happen for 35 years and other reps claimed it would be divisive.Partition is divisive. Already we are denied rights, Irish language rights, marriage rights and that's without mentioning the disaster that is brexit #SpotlightNI 
VINTAGE FARAGE VS LORD MANDELSON ON IMMIGRATION.This Labour Lord fights Brexit and wants open borders. For a decade, with Blair, he colluded with the EU to covertly PACK the UK with migrants. Now he sits in the Lords.***WARNING: This clip contains sickening virtue signaling.  
Reminder168 countries7,000,000,000 people (92% of the population)85% of World Tradehave nothing to do with the EU.Viva Brexit! 
Yes, please let's have a *meaningless* vote on #Brexit, in which parliament exerts no influence over government. Democracy demands that we leave this trifling decision to opaquely-funded thinktanks, foreign billionaires and Number 10 policy wonks. 
I don’t think the result of yesterday's EU27/UK negotiations on Northern Ireland got a mention in the UK media. "... serious divergences remain on the backstop for NI/IE. More work clearly needed ...", according to Michel Barnier. #Brexit #fbpe 
After spending 25 years campaigning for Brexit in Yorkshire & £300k of my life savings I would like to thank the Russian Federation for helping me secure a 70% leave vote at the referendum by weighing in at the last moment.  
FR harbour will need it when the 2019 EU discard ban ties fishing fleet up whilst we're still stuck in the CFP after Brexit as part of the transition.Look forward to all MPs (especially coastal MPs) fulfilling their promises to vote down any deal that includes continued CFP.  
Dominic Grieve has been exposed under pressure as little more than a Brexit wrecker, says @HughRBennett 
Despite appearances to the contrary the brexiteers did have a plan for #brexit.They all made sure their own wealth would be protected against the implications of leaving the EU and identified ways to personally gain from it.As for a plan for the rest of country - who cares? 
There is no guaranteed extra money - or ‘Brexit dividend’ - to pay for an NHS funding increase.Other costs associated with leaving are expected to more than offset the savings from ending our payments to the EU budget. #Brexit #nhs 
Simply put, the vote today is NOT about Brexit. It is about the Executive being accountable to parliament. Using Brexit as cover for the right wing coup that is going on is just further manipulation of the political process. Parliament will be irrelevant in future if May wins. 
WRoNGHEADED will run for @edfringr as part of @culture_ireland GB18 - it was a big and brave undertaking by @LizRocheCompany pre referendum and I’m delighted to have written the words - choreographed by Liz Roche, Film by Mary Wycherley - check it out  
Belgium prepares for the collapse of Brexit talks with dogs, drones and a bigger customs force  
“After the military coup in October 1999 Mr Khan supported the army chief, General Pervez Musharraf, even through a heavily rigged referendum. At one point he was dining at home with the general and being tipped as a potential prime minister.”  
Trump is paving the way to foster and legitimise fake news. Our Govt and PM are no better #BrexitDividend But WE are better than Trump. WE are better than a Brexit based on lies and dishonesty. We must allow our Parliament a #MeaningfulVote #democracy 
Foster + Partners hints at possibility of leaving London over Brexit @fosterpartners #Brexit  
If Jeremy Corbyn backs #Brexit, then he must seek a trade deal with President Trump and thus enable both American domestic and foreign policy.Qui cum canibus concumbunt cum pulicibus surgent.If you lie down with dogs....#MeaningfulVote 
If your Scottish and you are not sure about independence read this thread. Its Clear that thier UK is about to walk off a cliff and  drag Scotland with it. It's time to bail out and choose new friends. #powergrab #indyref2 #Independence #Scotland #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
The government ‘s answer to a petition requesting a referendum on abolishing the House of Lords is NO. It even says reform of the House of Lords is not a priority. And after all that has happened recently...I just hope Frank Field’s motion is supported in the Commons anyway. 
The #FBPE community now under constant attack from fake accounts, @JuliaHB1, Corbynistas, @paulmasonnews his communist friend the very confused @AaronBastani and many many more.We must be leading the #Remain conversation, why else would they bother?#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
“It is worth reminding that on the 11th Feb1961, Nigeria conducted a referendum for the people of Southern Cameroon to determine whether they wish to be part of Nigeria or merge with the Francophone northern Cameroon." This referendum was successful! 
Biafra At Last As IPOB Announces The Printing Of 40 Million Referendum Materials To Be Distributed, And Date Announced Soon, Pledges Peaceful Process, Remind Nigeria Of the Previous Referendum Held In The Country,  
The head of Texas secessionists at @TexasNatMov says they "worked very closely with some of the folks in the [Brexit] Leave campaign," doesn't specify who:  
Once again the foolish speak about #Brexit as Jim Allister talks that we can’t have it both ways. Oh but we can. The EU has offered ‘Special Status’ which allows free trade with both EU and Britain. Why does @duponline continue to block this common sense agreement? #SpotlightNI 
Washington DC passed a referendum mandating that tipped employees receive the full minimum wage (rather than relying on tips). The measure passed easily in African-American precincts while failed in the more high-end suburbs in the east.  #DCision18 #DCprimary #Initiative77 
That’s again why I say it’s dangerously ahistorical to say voting is single most powerful thing we can do in response to a genocidal white supremacist state. The Voting Rights Act of 65 (which has since been gutted) was result of mass civil disobedience, not a referendum vote 4/ 
Why am I against Brexit? Because I want a just society. I want an end to austerity, an end to neoliberalism.  I want the UK to finally rejoin the socially advanced and aware societies of Europe. Britain is broken, yes. But Brexit won't fix it. It'll only make everything worse. 
#OFOC is a giant conspiratorial secret weapon by the Tories to attack Jezza.....because he’s voted with them or abstained on every big #Brexit decision in the last 2 years? Yes, that definitely makes sense.  
Some countries are pushing forward with drug reform and not waiting for expensive and predictable referendum...  
He said none of the groups can attack Theresa May.B4B was founded on mobilising tactical votes to defeat her in GE2017 - and did superbly well.And all our groups have repeatedly attacked May & govt on Brexit - & pushed for her defeat in Lords & Commons votes. 
Absolute BS.@OFOCbrexit are hard working kids campaigning to #StopBrexit challenging both the shambolic #Tory government AND #Labour's equally damaging pro #Brexit stanceWhen #Jezza stops backing Brexit, the #Remain movement will start backing @labour 
I cannot talk anymore about Trump and even Brexit..its exhausting,.,mankind  has lost  the fucking plot..hatred appears to be  the new rock n roll.,,the new normal.. I cant bear it anymore..just  music from me now on..thats what makes me happy..peace xx.. 
Few Leavers will like Brexit because most won’t get the #brexit they wanted. No Remainers will like Brexit because they don’t want to leave and think it will be disastrous. No one gets what they want and the U.K. is damaged. Why are we doing this again? 
Trump's decision to pull the US out of the UN Human Rights Council, is crazy, but for once, Brexit is even crazier:The US has a written constitution so despite withdrawing from the international human rights community, there are still limits on how bad it can get.The UK doesn't 
Brexit: No 10 will not accept 'meaningful vote' amendment.So we need to make sure there are enough rebels to pass it.Please write to your MP to ask them to support a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal.Act now - voting is today.RT to spread the word  
Until such fucking time as 100 fucking% of the electorate are 100 fucking% in favour of fucking #Brexit then fucking Brexit ain't the fucking will of the fucking people. Fucking Brexit is the fucking will of the fucking Brexeratti who will fucking benefit at our fucking expense. 
I guess I must be the elite because I want access to food and medicine post Brexit  
The myth that has made Brexit possible is the same as that makes Britain the most corrupt country in the world. The idea that the world loves us because we are so amazing. It's not true. 
I have a question.Before that referendum, how many MPs received messages like this?Fgs #StopBrexitSaveBritain. 
Shining a light on the charlatans and making the clowns look silly is the point of tweeting about Brexit. 
Wilshere and Noble in the middle at West Ham would be perfect, wouldn’t it? The world’s most Brexit midfield at the world’s most Brexit club. Absolutely dogshit. 
And of course, the Heritage Foundation enlisted #CambridgeAnalytica for "contract for data analytics" from late 2015 to June 2016...... and again in November 2016: 
All you people who shrugged and said 'meh.Trump. It won't be so bad. There's not much he can do."I hope you are f***** prostrate with guilt. And all those who shrug and say 'Brexit won't be so bad."Thanks. You are enabling our descent into Trumpland, Home of the LIAR. #StopBrexit 
You should hear what those 'decent young people say about the Labour majority who respect and support Corbyn and Starmer. And btw, why not attack the Tories. Y'know, the ones in Govt, doing the negotiating, & trying to deliver a hard Brexit #justsayin 
SABOTEUR: Trying to destroy post Brexit relationships is surely unacceptable for a UK politician? As is putting personal agenda ahead of the interest of your country.  
In Scotland and can't make the Peoples March in London, then don't despair you can Join March against Brexit in Perth on Sunday. See you all there  
So let me get this straight. @UKLabour official position is now PRO Brexit . Just so we can all be clear. And stop bullying you big bully.  
Sad that so many fearless independent journalists were happy to politely accept the idea of a ‘Brexit dividend.’  
This piece is accurate and critical of both sides in the Brexit negotiation @CER_EU 
And note: #Brexit is *still* ridiculous. And should be reversed.But doing so is not going to solve the UK’s problems - because they are deeper, graver, and more complex than most people realise.  
To anyone who thinks #Brexit is just an aberration, and can be fixed, or reversed, and the UK will return to “normal” - you need to think again.The UK has changed, irreversibly. The BBC has changed. Politics, parliament and government are deeply altered.What *is* normal now? 
I'm going to march for a #PeoplesVote on June 23 to demand that the people have a say on the final Brexit deal - will you join us?  @peoplesvote_uk 
If you voted for #brexit you may have voted to give the NHS more money but your vote has made this lady's life an uncertain, unpleasant hell. You voted for that, yes you did.  
I can’t see how avin a profile picture of achecroft and Brexit Gallagher is gunna make ya feel any better mate tbh.  
1/ When Theresa May attacked "citizens of nowhere" she was launching a nationalist attack on universal values and rights, because they belong to no particular nation or people. Hence her contempt for human rights and the ECHR. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Wednesday's Guardian: "GCHQ chief warns Europe of need for Brexit security deal" #TomorrowsPaperToday #bbcpapers (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
My grandmother & her twin sister fled Belgium twice when Europe was torn apart by violent Nationalism & Fascism in two of the worst wars in human history. I oppose Brexit and anyone of any party who would throw away the hard won framework for peace and cooperation that is the EU 
An appalling tweet that resembles the fascist propaganda seen in the 1930s.Dominic Grieve is rare breed of politician who has put his country before his party. He is one of the only Tory politicians who has the intellectual rigour and integrity to actually think Brexit through.  
McDonnell & Abbott voted for parliament to have a meaningful say on the final Brexit deal. Greening promised @OFOCBrexit she would too, but then voted against.So @Femi_Sorry, I'm genuinely interested, why was it McDonnell and Abbott, not Greening, that were targeted yesterday? 
Let's achieve 100,000 signatures for a debate in Parliament.Please sign and RT petition here #Brexit #bbcdp #bbcqt #Conservatives @LeaveMnsLeave 
Good to see mainstream voices starting to talk about the likelihood that Scotland might not become independent via another high-stakes referendum -other legitimate routes need to be in the mix  
We knew what we voted for.We voted for #Brexit Please RT if you agree. #bbcdp #BBCQT @richardm56 
Don't worry, Jeremy Corbyn is still a 'friend' of Brexit, anti-EU Labour MP reassures eurosceptics  
Further away you go from London, the more confidence there is in UK economy. This - from ceo of a Singaporean real estate firm earlier today, is a classic of the "despite Brexit" genre.   
Pleased to sign this agreement with @Leuphana_Uni - establishing our European Centre for Advanced Study in Germany as a joint venture. Collaboration in EU will continue post #Brexit for @UofGlasgow 
How did you vote in the Brexit Vote? And if there was another vote tomorrow how would you vote?Please RT for more insight. Thank you! 
If Grieve 2 is not passed by the House of Commons there may not be time for similar amendments providing “amendable” resolutions to future Brexit Bills, says senior Commons expert. Best back Grieve 2 to be sure of it  
What I really think of the #FBPE brigade (minus a few very rare exceptions), and why I wholeheartedly support Jeremy Corbyn's position on Brexit.  
Lead remain MP Dominic Grieve can't keep his story straightThe truth is amendable motions would either collapse the government or create legislative chaos with a zombie governmentMPs MUST vote with the government tomorrow#Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
I hope @sarahwollaston will be joining other committed Tory Parliamentarians tomorrow and voting to give Parliament a real say in the outcome of Brexit negotiations. 
Hey look, a punishment beating for young anti-Brexit campaigners from the doctrinaire extreme left. @OFOCBrexit and @Femi_Sorry are worth ten thousand of this posturing clown. Follow them, back them. 
Why do @OFOCBrexit go after John McDonnell but not the Tory MPs that could actually soften Brexit? Because they’re propped up by, and exist to defend, the establishment.  
At their request, a year ago I did a 45 minute interview with them as a putative guest. I was careful to emphasis my nuanced position on Labour and Brexit. They weren't interested. They don't want thoughtfulness. They want hatred as spectator sport. 
I don't give a fuck about the pound to euro rate. The sooner we get out of Brussels and their mafia set up the better. We will take off when we drop these leeches! Fuck Merkel and her syndicate!  #Brexit 
“There is no Brexit dividend and an NHS funding plan that relies on such a source would be literally worthless. The Prime Minister should apologise for misleading people about NHS funding”[.@martinmckee ] 
Tory rebellion CRUSHED: May poised for victory in Commons Brexit showdown Looking like #Soubry and #Grieve will be defeated - they should both have the whip withdrawn & expelled from the Tory party @BeaconsfieldCCA 
There isn’t second-class european citizen. Follow « action for expats », we have obtained the first and the only hearing (before March 2019) concerning brexit before european judge : 5th July at Luxembourg, HarryShindler and all british expats ! 
I'm Irish - Corbyn's brexit would see my country slide back into a deep recession, a the return of both a hard-border and bloodshed.You're a sham of a socialist if you're happy with that 
If England left FIFA and went to play in their own tournament would it be:1. A great success because they are British and would win the cup all the time2. A huge fail because the chumps would be sitting on their own with no-one to play withSee also Brexit.... 
Brexit has made us so weak we feel we have no choice but to roll out the red carpet to a man who may well be a fascist. 
Sweden call for SWEXIT referendum to allow citizens to express how they feel about EUSD Leader Jimmie Åkesson:#EU is "large web of corruption: no one has control over anything”"We pay an enormous amount of money & get overwhelmingly little back"#Brexit 
Swedish Populist Leader Calls for Referendum on EU Membership in Next Four Years   
Brexit negotiations about to get very much worse before they get better. Sadly, the option of hibernating til 2030 is not available.#badbusiness 
I want to #Remain in the #EUI know #Corbyn can't do a thing about it unless the #Tories revolt. Which they don't and won't.70% of #Labour constituencies voted #Leave.I want the #ToriesOutI believe in campaigning on more than #Brexit.The #NHS needs Labour unity.#FBPE 
Tomorrow's front page: UK Leave voters would rather have Brexit than keep the United Kingdom together + Scotland's security 'at risk' after Barnier says we can't be part of key agencies  
Maybe they want to stop Brexit because it’s bad for Britain? I don’t care who funds it, if it works it’s good. 
Yes, exactly what the Brexiters want. Low taxes = no money for health, education, welfare, environment, employee & consumer protections: “Make the UK a low-tax haven and attract business post-Brexit - The Independent  
Brexit was the biggest con ever pulled on the U.K. public The Tories got a U.K. power grab and protected their offshore tax haven bank accounts at the same time! So welcome to the Tory dictatorship state!  
After watching the Judicary and Oversight today, We MUST do everything we can to help Dr. Ward get elected. Today was a referendum on what is going on Washington DC. #TeamWard #AZSen @KelliWardAZ #MakeAmericaGreatAgain #KeepAmericaGreat #MAGA #KAG #BuildTheWall #BuildThatWall 
40. Consistent with the Freedom of Movement debate during the campaign including people such as Vote Leave Campaign Committee member Frank Field, the Remain campaign’s George Osborne, and “the most trusted man on Brexit” Martin Lewis.  
Yes, it was a big error. But,anyway, nobody, how skilful and well’prepared, could get something really good for the U.K. after Brexit. Exercise was to get as much limitation of damages as possible. All options worse economically and for the political status of U.K. in the world.  
We are going to lose our access to the European Arrest Warrant, my fucking god the benefits of #Brexit just get better and better, I'll say it again on March 29th next year will the last person to leave Britain please turn out the lights #StopBrexit #ToriesOut #bbcnews #SkyNews 
If it's Labour MP's who vote down safeguards against a 'No Deal' Brexit, it would be the darkest of days for our movement.Take the North East. Condemned to 16% less wealth, devastated. Jobless, hopeless, helpless. Child poverty like we've never seen, misery and endless poverty.  
This is a very important thread proving, in so far as one can on twitter, that those who say the Brexit vote endorsed one model or another are wrong. Strangely enough a choice for government / parliament / whoever has sovereignty today....  
What if all the people who didn’t vote for Trump teamed up with all the people who didn’t vote for Brexit? That would be a US-UK ‘special relationship’ to be proud of. 
Exc: ERG note on tomorrow’s vote and how hard brexit Tories should behave - and why.Can’t see any particular surprises but gives a flavour of their arguments to be used tomorrow  
With what, dear Jeremy, with what?There's a hole in your Brexit bucket.  
30. Consistent with David Campbell Bannerman MEP Co-Chair for Conservatives for Britain, and someone who Vote Leave described as ‘key personnel’. David wrote that “the agreement on what is the best form of association will follow the referendum and a Brexit result”.  
MPs are being intimidated and threatened to try and persuade them how to vote. This is where Brexit has taken this country.Please can all good people stand up and say this is not acceptable. I don’t care wether you voted leave or remain, just some acknowledgement of right please  
BBC News - UK 'can't keep European Arrest Warrant after Brexit'  Did UK Gov consider this last week when they voted to ditch the EU Charter of Fundamental Rights? Do they EVER look one step ahead? #BrexitShambles 
Science is a fundamentally collaborative & global enterprise & the UK should seek arrangements that create the lowest possible barriers to practising scientists seeking to move across borders #TogetherScienceCan #Brexit  
These are only the recent #TrumpRussiadevelopments, plus:~Wilbur Ross~Cambridge Analytica~Pro-Leave #Brexit campaign ties w/#Russia 
Brexit: Lib Dems warned Brexit would weaken Britain’s fight against crime. Tories denied it. Now it is happenning. #Exitfrombrexit @LibDems  
another predictable casualty of hard Brexit I warned about during campaign  
Productive meeting with @sajidjavid. Both the UK & the EU have a duty to mitigate the damage of #Brexit for citizens.  
Give over. Jeremy Corbyn doesn't share platforms with Tories. And his whole leadership of the Opposition is about representing ordinary people on every issue at every level, not about trying to overturn a legitimate peoples' referendum because you don't like the result. Nice try.  
Best thing about the way Saturday’s @peoplesvote_uk march is shaping up is that it is so not the metropolitan elite but people from all walks and all parts of the country, real people with very real worries about Brexit  
British fruit-growers say they are short of pickers this summer: I can’t imagine how this could possibly have happened. In other news: BREXIT MEANS BREXIT SHUT UP REMOANERS etc etc 
Hey @carolecadwalla I've fixed your latest rambling, incoherent anti Brexit tweet. Makes much more sense now.#Brexit  
Polling suggests Leave voters would rather lose Northern Ireland than give up the benefits of Brexit  
Tomorrow's Commons vote on whether it should have more control over the outcome of Brexit could be won by Theresa May because of the 10 - 15 Labour MPs who will support her.Incredible but true. 
And, if true, deeply wrong.A50 before there was any kind of strategy and now voting down a meaningful vote - rendering Parliament meaningless.... Brexit will break the UK in every way it is possible to break it. 
It’s not just America though. It’s happening in Europe too. Whatever the politicians say the Brexit vote was largely motivated by immigration. It’s very sad. 
When lies come to dominate politics voters cannot separate truth & falsity, and reason & facts lose their power to persuade. So the lies of the #Brexit right are effectively immunising a large part of the electorate against the facts & reasons presented by Remainers. #StopBrexit 
“Of the #ProportionalRepresentation systems that will be part of a BC referendum this fall, MMP is likely the most familiar. ... The 2 others – RUP and DMP – are less known. However, proponents say both would be clear upgrades over BC’s current system.”  
The inconsistency with the so called #Brexit rebels is astounding @Anna_Soubry said in 2017:"You can’t vote for a Referendum & then renege on delivering the result because you don’t like the result”She then goes on to challenge the government with her buddy Chukka  
We can get through Brexit if we’re high, says Hague 
Always a pleasure to catch up with @DavidDavisMP. A friendly, but frank exchange of views on #Brexit progress ahead of #EUCO. 
The UK will not be able to take part in the European Arrest Warrant after Brexit, Michel Barnier said today  
Even her own MPs have called it "tosh" so why is she using the term 'Brexit dividend' in advertising?  
Remember when Vote Leave said:  "EU citizens will be treated no less favourably than they are at present" during the referendum?Another great piece by @AdamBienkov & @tpgcolson looking at the reality of EU citizens' #citizensrights via @Politicsinsider 
Congratulations, Ken Clarke, on 48 years in the Commons! Now, think really hard, how do you think Ken would best like to celebrate? Wouldn’t it be great if Ken’s 50th anniversary saw us booting Brexit out?!#StopBrexitForKenClarke#StopBrexit 
“Genuinely, what we can’t accept is something that would undermine the Government’s obligation to deliver the result of the referendum and implement it” Theresa Villiers on Grieve’s attempts to thwart #Brexit#EUWithdrawalBill 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: EU warns bloc to step up NO DEAL preparation as little progress made  
Tory voters (and MPs) are predominantly English nationalists before they are British unionists. There’s absolutely nothing wrong with this, I might add, but we may as well start to admit it. #Brexit  
If May thinks standing up2Grieve now is"too risky",just wait 4the truckload of sheet that will fall on her head,week after week as EU/Remainers extract their pound of flesh.Democracy matters more than egos of fanatical Remainers It really is Brexit in full or electoral Armageddon 
#Brexit: The govt “cannot accept” a Lords amendment giving parliament a “meaningful vote” on a Brexit deal, and will re-table its rejected version, Downing Street has said, setting up a final showdown with Tory rebels on the issue this week 
NEW - Canadian ETHI Committee release interim report on investigation into Cambridge Analytica, SCL & AIQ. The conclusion is clear "The integrity of our democratic processes as well as trust in our digital economy are both clearly facing significant risks” 
IFS Forecasts About Brexit Consistently Wrong  
Defeat for May as Lords vote to give parliament ‘meaningful Brexit vote’ - surely the most meaningful vote is a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal  
Brexit Britain 2018:Speaking another language = traitorLiving abroad = traitorExpressing opinion = traitorForeign roots = traitorDoing your job = traitor#StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
We have just published a joint statement with the UK outlining the progress that has been achieved in the #Brexit negotiations since March.Learn more →  #Article50 
Northern Rail to be handed Brexit franchise thus ensuring it never arrives. 
Enoch Powell warned of the true nature of the EEC (EU) & advised us to steer well clearTed Heath took us in without a referendum in 197345 yrs later we're finally heeding the wise words of EnochWhen we #LEAVE we should raise a glass to John Enoch Powell 
The Parliamentary arithmetic means, if May is to be defeated on Brexit it has *always* been about potential Tory rebels. Will enough put country before party? Will they be able to look their children and grandchildren in the eye? We will see. 
You can watch my #Brexit evidence sessions to @CommonsEUexit &  @CommonsHomeAffs live from 09:15 GMT & 14:30 GMT tomorrow. MEP's, who after all will have a meaningful vote on any Art.50 deal, have a duty to be transparent.  
BREXIT was a violent, thrilling, long overdue reaction against government by a smug unelected elite. The House of Lords instinctively knows which side its on.  A fetid remnant from our undemocratic past. These arrogant deadbeats are constitutional zombies. They need to be buried. 
Today marks a step forward in these negotiations - we have agreed a number of separation issues and the #UK has engaged on others. But we are not there yet: serious divergences remain on the backstop for NI/IE. More work clearly needed:  #Brexit 
Swedish Populist Leader Calls for Referendum on EU Membership in Next Four Years   
7yo: if britain leaving the european union is called brexit, then is scotland leaving the united kingdom called ... skexit?Me: no, I don't think they have a portmanteau for that7yo, miffed: well, they should hire someone to make one 
... but we'll still be rolling out the red carpet for our premier trade partner on July 13 like it's all just hunky-dory? Come on, @theresa_may - if Brexit means Brexit then sexist racist misogynist fascist means sexist racist misognynist fascist. #NoTrump 
If only there’d been VAR for the referendum 
On Russian interference in #Brexit referendum, Govt. is shutting its eyes & putting hands over it’s ears & saying it’s ok we’ve not heard or seen any evidence that would suggest it!Cannot think of any other situation when a UK Govt. wasn’t interested in external interference.  
The responses by this account in this thread are, by some distance, the most shameful I have seen by a Brexit supporter in a long time considering what they are responses too.  
The EU is 'seriously considering' the possibility of a No Deal Brexit. Good - No Deal is better than a bad deal! Theresa May and her Government must now aim for a No Deal scenario, where Britain is truly free from all of the EU's shackles. 
Our world is hitting a brick wall. Everything that’s happening - this, Trump, Orban, Brexit, Erdogan, etc etc - the rise of the far right like a blocked sewer overflowing suddenly - is unspeakable. There is only one thing to do: stick together & fight it.  
Would-be Brexit-stopper Dominic Grieve on Sunday:"We could collapse the Government."Would-be Brexit-stopper Dominic Grieve today:"No-one is talking about collapsing the Government."One does at least like one's perfidy to be consistent. . . . 
And if we, in a referendum,vote to abolish the House of Lords, their Lordships will reject it & will say we are all thick and did not know what we were doing.  
America is becoming Germany in 1938, meanwhile we have both shoelaces tied together with Brexit and will welcome Trump with open salutes. 
Details of Saturdays march #brexit #dfla #veteransagainstterrorism #tommyrobinson 
Thank you people of Britain...most of you think Theresa May is being dishonest about NHS funding.If there really was a Brexit dividend, there'd be no need to raise taxes to fund the NHS...but there is no dividend. Brexit will do nothing but cost us jobs.   
At what point are we holding a referendum to change the national anthem to the Benny Hill theme? 
And the mask is off..So bloody predictable. Full socialist control freak mode Get us out Mrs May!Get. Us. Out !! #Brexit   
#Petition: Protect UK #Citizens' existing Freedom of Movement rights in #Brexit negotiations : 
It’s just a disaster, the EU isn’t going to give in and therefore the position of the UK is hopeless. But apparently people knew what they voted for, the mantra Brexit means Brexit and other such nonsense comes back to haunt the government.#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
It is a funny world when Sky News appears far more honest than the BBC in Brexit related matters. 
Nigel Farage - "What you are seeing here folks is a wilful deliberate attempt to subvert the referendum result. The biggest democratic exercise in the history of this country." #Brexit  
Draft EU Council conclusions on Brexit for next week’s Summit widely leaked as usual - “concern that no substantial progress has yet been achieved” on Ireland backstop.- All member states and stakeholders should “step up preparedness” for all outcomes, ie including No Deal  
Eurosceptic leader Jimmie Åkesson has called for an EU referendum in #Sweden."We pay an enormous amount of money and get overwhelmingly little back. But the main reason is ideological: we should not be in an ideological union." 
The idea that a second referendum defeat would somehow kill off the independence cause is nonsensical. Support for independence will rise and fall depending on how Britain is treating Scotland within the union, not when we last had a vote. 
The EU is 'seriously considering' the possibility of a No Deal Brexit. Good - No Deal is better than a bad deal! Theresa May and her Government must now aim for a No Deal scenario, where Britain is truly free from all of the EU's shackles. 
Unforeseen consequence of Brexit part 493: We will now be forced to make nice with psycopathic fascists for trade purposes because we have disallied ourselves with countries whose values are more in keeping with our own. #trumpvisit 
I'm getting so tired of saying "I told you so" after every Brexit disaster that I'm just going to get some cards printed with it on. I just hope the muppets can read. 
Very useful infographic on Europe's defence tehnological and industial base, showing companies' and states' shares put together by @IISS_org as part of their paper series on #Brexit and #Defence  
Look at America. Look at what Trump's doing to it. And then open your eyes and realise that Brexit is designed to deliver the same thing.#StopBrexit 
Oh believe us, we wouldn't miss this for the world.  We hope to livestream it, as he's the best #Brexit recruiting sergeant ever.  
While Britain is trying to avoid a trade war with Trump, here's a little update on another much-punted post-Brexit alliance. Remember India? Priti Patel said Brexit would be "a boost to India-UK ties".Well, its not quite working out like that. [thread] 
.@theresa_may hates "Grieve 2" amendment of #EUWithdrawalBill on basis it undermines her threat to rest of EU of no-deal Brexit. But draft conclusions for June EU summit urge EU members to "step up" preparations for "all [Brexit] outcomes", including no deal. Her bluff called 
The House of Lords is out of control. This archaic unelected chamber has once again insulted the 17.4m people who voted Leave by trying to frustrate the Brexit process. This is intolerable. There must now be a referendum on abolishing the Lords. #AbolishTheLords 
Brexit exposes the limits of Jeremy Corbyn’s radicalism  
Sometimes those of us fighting #Brexit can lose sight of the evil behind it. We have a duty not only to save our country from ruin but also to save our continent from the threat of fascism. Soon the parallels with the 1930s will be undeniable. We must speak out & #StopFascism. 
Mississippi’s Republican governor is ensnared in post-Brexit lawsuit  
Labour's @tom_watson has reported Number 10 to the advertising watchdog over "Brexit dividend" claims.  
POLL: Most Brits Says Brexit Too Slow, Believe Irish Border ‘Deliberately Exaggerated to Suit Political Agenda’   
Meaningful vote for parliament is key to stopping ‘no deal’ Brexit  
BIAFRA: CALL FOR REFERENDUM IS NOT CALL FOR WAR - IPOB: June 19, 2018 IPOB PRESS RELEASE We…  
IPOB vows to convert 2019 poll to referendum - OrientDailyNews  
Can we stop calling it Brexit (seeing as though Scotland and NI are being removed against their will) and start calling it what it really is....Wangxit 
It's wrong to say the media forgets that Obama meddled in Brexit and Israel elections They haven't forgottenThey just don't care 
Corbyn also believes in the Brexit dividend fantasy. A Brexiter through and through: ‘Jeremy Corbyn vows to use 'funds returned from Brussels' as he pumps £8BILLION into public services after Brexit’  
These past few days have proven to be a dark time for #devolution but they say the darkest hour comes before the dawn. Maybe that new dawn will come when Scotland has full powers within its control, which really will be the early days of a better nation #PowerGrab #Brexit  
Award winning journalists speak to @TheCommonSpace on why charges of ‘misappropriation of funds’ during the #CatalanReferendum are bogus @ClaraPonsati #July30th We still urgently need you to support        
Conservative blogger and Brexit supporter, Robert Barnes has written exclusively for Get Britain Out. With the Lords continuing to place obstacles in the way of Brexit, rebel Tory MPs must NOT follow suit on Wednesday! 
There is a running total showing more than 100,000 job losses. This is not a jobs first Brexit but a jobless #Brexit. #costofbrexit 
Look forward to standing and marching side by side with the many thousands of you who believe reckless politicians should give real people a vote on the final options of Brexit - with no interference from bots, dark money or propaganda. Share & support #PeoplesVote this Saturday 
The Government cannot give any more concessions to the rebels - it has already given in to all of their demands except having the power to block Brexit outright. They must stand their ground - MPs who respect the referendum result will back them.  
I was very interested when I saw this little factoid about Rees-Moggs’s mate making a killing on #Brexit fluctuations on the day of the referendum. I dug out something I tweeted that day, almost two years ago. Please share. It would be good if this got some attention.  
Well, it seems that people who crave #Brexit also want to self destruct the United Kingdom.What would England do when it finally realised it had no friends left to the west, to the north, to the east and to the south?Truly shameful. #StopBrexitSaveBritain #FinalSayForAll 
The #SNP can't name a single power that the Scottish Parliament currently exercises but won't continue to do so after #Brexit. That's because there are none, their only plan is to create divisions between Scotland and Westminster as they try to push through #indyref2. 
Patriots. eh. 'Asked A) Leave the European Union or  B) Keep England, Scotland, Northern Ireland and Wales together in the  United Kingdom?” 63 per cent of Leave voters chose Brexit over the Union.' By @alexmassie 
The UK will not be ‘kicked out’ of EAW after Brexit. It is a law that applies to member states not third countries. Why is there surprise ⁦@BBC⁩ - why use language of blame rather than accuracy 
Struck how Grieve referred to #Brexit as an "idea" - as in a mere thought, or just a proposal - and not a specific course of action which has already been decided on, by the largest vote for one specific course of action in British political history.  
Bloomin' Brexit - why it's so important to get it right:  #MeaningfulVote 
UK will be out of the European Arrest Warrant deal after Brexit. Michel Barnier said “we know that the UK is not ready to accept the free movement of people, the jurisdiction of the court and the Charter of Fundamental Rights.This means that the UK cannot take part in the EAW." 
And yet, when we had a referendum on separating children's limbs from their torsos and crushing their skulls you voted "Yes".  
UK 'can't stay in European Arrest Warrant after Brexit'  
Parliament is supreme. It is taking a huge bashing not from the Lords but from its own members and the two political parties which control it. Driven rabid by Brexit to the point that MP's cannot follow their instincts on the greatest matter of conscience. Well done.  
.@ScotGov has pointed out  this danger repeatedly.   @GovUK position has been to wave away objections with a shrug.   Now reality strikes and Scotland will be severely disadvantaged .......UK 'can't stay in European Arrest Warrant after Brexit' - BBC...  
Many of the parliamentarians supporting Tory Remainer Dominic Grieve’s amendment are absolutely clear about its purpose - to ensure MPs and peers have the power to obstruct #Brexit  
- Obama told British voters to vote no on Brexit- Obama endorsed Macron - Obama used US taxpayer dollars to prop up Netanyahu’s opponents in the Israeli electionsPretty concerning or not so much when it’s Obama?  
So many Leavers think the competition and low prices that they've enjoyed so long will continue after Brexit. They don't understand that it was the single market which promoted that competition. Through freedom of movement for services and countless other directives.#FBPE 
New polling from @LordAshcroft shows that a big majority of the public thinks the Irish border issue is being deliberately exaggerated by politicians. Time for them to stop squabbling and deliver Brexit!Support us at  
This should have a sobering effect on those who think another referendum would reverse Brexit. A majority of Leave voters would choose the break up of the UK over remaining in the EU  
I understand that @MichelBarnier has said the #UK will be kicked out of the European Arrest Warrant after #Brexit...Many thanks, Barnier - you've just made my day! The #EU Arrest Warrant is iniquitous, doesn't respect our legal traditions and we are #BetterOffOut. 
The government could be set to hand Spain access to Gibraltar airport according to a new story in the Sun.   There is no price the Government won’t pay to ram Brexit through. Please share 
Never give upNever shut upNever sit downNever back down.Never walk awayNever turn your faceNever stop shoutingNever stop caring.Never let them winNeverEverLet them win.#stopbrexit #peoplesmarch #fbpe #brexit #Torylies #democracy #IamEuropean  
The plain truth of the matter is that Leave voters think Brexit is more important than the survival of the United Kingdom. We might wish it otherwise; this is how it is.  
Breaking: Draft conclusions from June EU summit says "no substantial progress" made on Irish backstop and calls on member states to "step up preparedness at all levels and for all outcomes" - ie for a no deal Brexit. They run to FOUR paragraphs: EU leaders have other worries 
Incredibly pleased that @thatginamiller will be addressing the crowd on Saturday as she adds her voice to those demanding a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal!Sign up to march with her and thousands more here:  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
The German judges tackling the case of @KRLS Puigdemont will receive key doc from the Spanish Ministry. It proofs that NO misuse of funds existed to organise the Catalan independence referendum of 2017.  
More than 150 Max Planck Directors write to share their view on the importance of securing a strong #Brexit deal on science and innovation to support European science  @maxplanckpress 
Germany financial CRISIS: IFO slashes German GDP growth over Brexit, Trump and Italy  
Gerard Lyon from Economists for Free Trade explains how, despite the scaremongering, the Brexit Dividend is real and can be put to great use. 
Four days to go until the biggest march since the referendum! Are you ready? Decided who you are bringing with you?Make sure that you remind all of your friends to RSVP here: 
#Brexit news article template:UK is leaving the EU but wanted to keep THIS membership benefit.EU have said "no, that is not what leaving the EU means."UK is shocked and appalled at this totally unreasonable development. 
While Theresa May is leading the Conservative Party, I have zero faith the Brexit we voted for will be delivered.We’re bringing UKIP back, both as a Brexit pressure party and as a guardian of free speech.Join today and retweet if you agree! 
I asked the Brexit Minister what ScotGov was doing to prepare for the 80+ new powers coming to Holyrood after #Brexit.  His answer: Who wrote your question for you?Patronising, pathetic and clueless.  The #SNP have no idea how to use the scores of new powers coming to Scotland. 
Take it from the Swiss, the #Brexit referendum wasn't legitimate. This is the democratic reason why #Brexit must be stopped, and why, because our MPs are too spineless to do their duty, we need a #PeoplesVote June 23 #PeoplesVoteMarch. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Stephen is a doctor and cancer researcher who's worried about the impact the Brexit deal is going to have on the NHS. He'll be marching to demand a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal this Saturday - will you march alongside him?  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Polls by @IpsosMORI show that 4/10 people think Brexit is turning out worse than expected. Only 34% say they’re confident in @theresa_may to get a good deal for Britain in negotiations with the EU, while 63% are not. Just 9% say it is going better than expected. #ExitfromBrexit 
 Brexit Dividend-You'll get charged to see your doctor.#YouYesYet SCOTLAND 
Scotland's Brexit Minister @Feorlean has updated the @scotparl on the #PowerGrab. Read the statement in full here. 
Brexit may be forgivable; the Brexiteers are not.  
MSPs aren't allowed to directly call each other liars in the chamber, which leads to some fun linguistic gymnastics when they want to do just that...Mike Russell just said members who deny there's a Brexit power grab are "unfortunately not indicating what is true" 
Met with Chris Morgan, Head of a Railway group for Dore & Totley station (South-West of Sheffield). His main worry is that the investment needed in northern and especially rural rail services, would be delayed due to the uncertainty from Brexit. #FailingGrayling #NorthernRail 
All the rights EU citizens in the UK are set to lose after Brexit  via @BIUK_Politics 
and - everything happening in the Cambridge Analytica scandal and developments in UK/Brexit investigation, plus Canadian hearings, which Americans aren't really tracking, but should. 
Lord Hailsham says he is against Brexit. Given we had the referendum, I’d say that’s a moat point. 
Hope so! ALL Tory MPs were elected on a manifesto to implement full Brexit. This tiresome back and forth has got to stop. Whatever you views on #Brexit it cannot be good to send our PM into negotiations unable to properly negotiate. #EUWithdrawalBill 
 Watch now: Scotland's Brexit Minister @Feorlean is making a statement to the @scotparl on the EU Withdrawal Bill and #PowerGrab.  
Tom Watson has started a trend for honesty in politics. So we hold this lot to account:"Weapons of mass destruction" Blair"We will use the Brexit dividend to pay for public services"Corbyn"Free tution fees" Corbyn"Borrowing pays for itself" "Taking PFI in-house" McDonnell  
Ending our access to European Arrest Warrant makes it harder to catch criminals here and in EU. Tories' chaotic Brexit is putting our safety as well as our prosperity at risk.  
The concept of a brexit “dividend” ignores the need for UKgov to replace EU funding. Scotland voted overwhelmingly to remain within the EU, the UKgov must ensure that our public finances are in no way detrimented as a result of the UK’s exit.   
Now we see Trump trying to topple Merkel we must be entirely clear that an alliance linking the most ruthless kleptocrats, nationalists and Putin is engaged in a war to destroy democracy. And our government is part of this Kleptonationalist axis. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
You're invited to the Big Brexit Party!  I'll be performing alongside some amazing musicians and artists celebrating Brexit and #DemocracyWeek  Tickets:  
Tsipras regrets 2015 referendum, expresses full obedience to EU anti-worker reforms #Greece #Tsipras #Grecia #Syriza 
Remainer Grieve forced to admit Britons STILL back Brexit  
Brexit deal unlikely until year-end as officials revise expectations - whenever the final Brexit deal is decided, there needs to be a #PeoplesVote on it 
What is important is not that Trump is lying about the crime rate in Germany, but that the US President is trying to topple Merkel to the benefit of the German far-right, and Vladimir Putin. Trump is stepping up the Kleptonationalist war against democracy. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
“The Tory govt in Westminster, which the people of Scotland didn’t vote for, is using #Brexit which the people of Scotland also didn’t vote for, to attack devolution which the people of Scotland DID vote for.” - @RichardLochhead That about sums it up for us. #ScotlandCan 
Sweden Democrats call for in/out EU referendum  
People are being harried into little boxes, micro-segmented. You talk about the whole world and people only see a piece of Brexit, or a bit of Trump. It’s making all concepts of discussion around our collective futures very difficult. Human nature exploited flawlessly. 
Don’t bank on the shiny new #trade deals promised by the #Tories to diminish the economic pain from #Brexit - we will lose the trade deals we have, and not get better ones, @GeraintDavies points out: 
This morning it was announced that Britain could lose access to EU-only police databases after Brexit. @BestForBritain champion @VirendraSharma responds here: Please RT 
Brussels is not a rational actor: Barnier on security cooperation ”trust is founded on an ecosystem based on common rules... if you leave this ecosystem, you lose the benefits.”The EU relies heavily upon British intelligence. The idea we can’t be trusted post-Brexit is obscene. 
Barnier: UK will lose access to EU security databases after Brexit Barnier tells May "trust does not fall from the sky".Think he needs to start at a lower level by explaining the meaning of the word first. 
It's now or never to secure a hard Brexit. Conservative ministers take note, writes @JLongworthLML 
If by editing a video my opponents want to potray me as pro 2020 referendum,then what do Sukhbir,Majitha n Harsimrat  have to say about Mr Gk President Dsgmc,who says those demanding Khalistan are within their rights?plz hear the clip-khaira @AAPPunjab @ZeePunjab @News18Punjab 
That government report says FIFTEEN YEARS after Brexit, even taking into account the lack of contributions to the EU, tax receipts would likely be £20-45bn LESS PER YEAR. That’s £25-40bn that can’t be spent on the NHS, roads, schools and defence. That’s your ‘dividend’. 
Actually they are not facts.It would be a good idea to understand the concept of growth. So far we've lost about 2% as a consequence of Brexit, and we haven't even left yet.Brexit is loss-making. Tax revenues will fall far more than any money saved. 
Brilliant news if Britain is to be excluded from the European Arrest Warrant system, which extradites UK citizens to face deeply corrupt police and courts in southern and eastern Europe:  #Brexit 
This is an idiotic statement. Every single estimate says that the UK economy will do worse after Brexit, and that the government therefore will have less money to spend on services. 
Why isn’t there greater outrage about Russia’s involvement in Brexit?This scandal should cause uproar but the BBC and Labour just change the subject 
Ineos are desperate for Brexit and access to frack unopposed in Scotland. Independence is the only way  to keep these arseholes out!  
Brexit rebellion: Theresa May faces judgment day after defeat in House of Lords  
.⁦@theresa_may⁩ wants to block “Grieve 2” amendment to #EUWithdrawalBill on basis it would give MPs draconian “justiciable” powers to direct her Brexit negotiations in event she fails to do Brexit deal by Jan. But Tory leader of Lords Evans said Grieve would not do this!  
It's not complicated:Brexit under Tories Austerity skyrocketsBrexit under Laboura) Labour doesn't have the resources to replace lost trade AND deliver manifestob) Labour would be blamed for the damage from BrexitWe're the ones PROTECTING everything Corbyn stands for 
I would like to see Theresa May make a public statement in defence of all MPs to be able to do their job without fear of violence or worse.That would require principle. It would require pissing off that sector of society which the succubus of Brexit feeds on.So she won't. 
Damian Green absolutely right not to endorse his friend Theresa May's claim that there will be a 'Brexit dividend'.But wrong to say "we don't know" if there will be one or not. We do know. As the head of the IFS and the Govt's own analysis has made clear, there won't be one.  
I don't understand @LordAshcroft's role in the Brexit/Mississippi alt-right mash-up. Anyone?  
1. It's never been a partnership2. It's always been an imperium with Scotland an exploited asset-stripped colony3. Now May's declared vision is a post #brexit Greater English Reich within which Scotland, stripped of its identity will be wholly subsumed#DissolveTheUnion #SNP 
Let's be clear, 'grievance' is a political trope. It is a prejudice alarm. Scots indy supporters are apparently nippy, whiny, grievance-mongers. We should be grateful to unionists, who are obviously kind, considerate, intelligent and so much better than us, brexit notwithstanding 
Dear @theresa_may I understand there is a #Brexit dividend to be paid for the NHS. As a former tax payer for decades, I assume I am eligible to participate in the scheme. I live abroad, so don't use the NHS, please therefore send me a cheque for my dividend. I'll pm the address. 
By letting them use the Irish border to block Brexit, "we're allowing the tail to wag the dog.. we're allowing the whole of our agenda to be dictated by this folly." - Boris.Remember the referendum was conducted in Britain and not in Eire?#Brexit  
#Catalans still remember King #Felipe's speech on 3 Oct 2017 2 days after the Yes vote in the indy referendum won a resounding victory. Departing from his role as constitutional monarch he announced Armageddon.Our leaders are in exile or pre-trial jail. 
Michael Glackin: 'The SNP has been living on anger since it failed get its way in the 2014 independence referendum. Its mantra now appears to be if there is nothing to be angry or complain about, then simply invent something.' How true. How very, very true. 
 WATCH: The people of Scotland are watching and they see through the SNP’s stunts. They simply see the SNP as standing in the way of the national interest as part of their obsessive desire for a second independence referendum. #SewelDebate #indyref2 
UK based "feminists" linked to the US evangelical movement were planning on holding talks in Ireland about the dangers of trans people. The goal being to fracture and derail the pro-repeal side in the precious months before referendum. Irish feminists weren't having it though. 
SWEDEN: Polls show the Swedish Democrats are less than 2 points behind the ruling party.They've promised an In/Out EU referendum if elected...Look out Brussels! 
In the Commons, Labour MPs have tried to tell ministers that there's no "Brexit dividend", so where's the money really coming from?Each time, ministers have been able to dodge the question by saying: If there's no Brexit dividend, how come Corbyn says there is one? 
Trying to separate the T from LGB also removes some of the most dedicated fighters for LGBT rights. Hell, they even tried this approach in Ireland during the run up to the referendum on repealing the 8th amendment: Trans people used as a wedge issue to undermine women's rights. 
Do not sit on the fence, join Scottish Independence Parties show Westminster they can not use Brexit to grab powers back 
MPs overwhelmingly backed a referendum on the UK's membership of the European Union. MPs also voted in said referendum, and MPs also voted to trigger Article 50.How many more 'meaningful votes' do they want before they get the message and we actually Leave ??#Brexit 
Only FOUR days before the #PeoplesVote March - if you also support people voting on the final Brexit deal, join us on the 23rd June:  
Michel Barnier just said UK government needs a dose of 'realism' about what is possible after Brexit !!..So true..We will be losing our best and most rewarding trading partner for absolute ZERO gain !! PLUS A HUGE BILL !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
Scottish finance secretary @DerekMackaySNP has written to @hmtreasury re extra money for Scotland as part of NHS funding announcement. Like many others, not convinced by claims of Brexit dividend...  
Why is Mississippi’s governor so tight with so many leading Brexit figures?  
Thank you to 'anonymous' who sent me this lovely card. Great words, "Hurrah for Brexit... God Bless us all, and God Bless Brexit, Democracy in action." Here, Here! #Brexit  
SWEDEN: Second largest party calls for in/out EU referendum. Where Britain leads, others will follow! 
Hope for Sweden, the Swedish Democrats @sdriks - polling super high. No to mass immigration. Yes to referendum on EU. No to the Muslim mafia  
Brexit is a difficult issue that needs to be handled delicately. Ultimately, it concerns people & their families. We have a duty to get it right. But let's also be clear. Change will happen. Our role is to reduce the turmoil where possible.  
Just putting it out there, if you're a Brexiter opposing the idea of a customs border in the Irish sea but also advocating post-Brexit free ports, which would also create a customs border within the UK, I see you. 
If it has to be a referendum then it has to be a blockchain vote!! Paper ballot is too open to cheating!!  
Unless their position evolves, the red lines of the UK today only allow for one type of relationship; that of a third country. The @Europarl_EN has outlined its proposal for a close association agreement, now it's up to the UK to ask for one. #Brexit  
“I don’t believe in Brexit. I think it’s a national calamity. But what I believe above all is that the House of Commons should have a decisive say one way or another”- Great speech by Lord HailshamWrite to your MP now asking them to support the meaningful vote amendment.#FBPE 
It is clear the Govt’s Irish border proposals are simply unworkable. But given that the plans were a fudge to keep David Davis and the DUP happy, this is not surprising. Brexit simply will not live up to what the Leave campaign promised. 
Hmm ... So it looks like we're actually funding our Brexit dividend through higher taxes. Which of course means we could have had it without ever leaving the EU.  
Brexit logic at work. Make us safer by leaving security cooperation structures.  
The Tories have opened applications for London Mayor and  co-founder Richard Tice is running. We wholeheartedly endorse his candidacy - he helped us win Brexit with Arron Banks & Nigel Farage  
Ben Bradshaw - The Royal College of nursing & the nursing & midwifery council are so worried about the impact #brexit is having on the existing staffing crisis in the NHS that they are now calling for a #PeoplesVote. This dogmatic #HardBrexit is doing untold damage to the NHS 
.@thomasbrake – Hague’s remarks show why “Putin and his proxies in Britain are so keen on Brexit”  
Constant stream of military announcements now coming from the EU.Virtually unreported in the UK, despite being stuck in it now and after Brexit.@Facts4euOrg did this top-rate exposé of one such announcement, the EU military intervention fund:  
Legalising cannabis is about to become another Brexit dividend. The Dutch have agreed to provide the R&D for free & Boris has negotiated it brilliantly with Barnier over a joint in Amsterdam 
This Saturday, thousands of people from all walks of life will be marching on Parliament to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Join them now & please RT this:  
IFS Brexit forecasts have been consistently wrong   
Ken Clarke, Dominic Grieve, @Anna_Soubry and other "rebels" are not undermining the govt, they are trying to save it. Its not the rebels who will put Corbyn in No10, its the hard brexiteers who will if they get their no deal brexit as the tories will be blamed for the destruction 
Worrying for Cheshire where where this is an important sector ——>Brexit threatens UK life sciences dominance via @FT 
'You DON’T believe in the will of the people!' Robinson TEARS into Grieve in Brexit debate  
Astounding finding: 63% of Leave voters are willing to see the UK split up to make Brexit happen. pic.twitter.com/MgHKaJxplh 
Pound heads lower. Brexit Britain, devalued  
This is almost right. But not quite. It should say, "Taxes will rise MORE to pay for NHS boost" - because the  annual cost of Brexit is over 10% of the NHS's annual budget and taxes will also have to rise (or borrowing rise or public spending reduced) to cover that 10% cost.  
NFU president @Minette_Batters to meet PM to make case for a strong British agriculture industry post #Brexit Theresa May, please listen and do more to #BackBritishFarming 
As those pushing for a Brexit that will almost certainly negatively affect the UK are seen doing things like moving abroad; protecting their assets; lining up to profit from EU withdrawal; or prioritising their own career interests, it looks more and more like contagion. 
We can get through Brexit if we’re high, says Hague  
Trump is trying to bring down Merkel while the UK brexits and Putin smirks. There is a kleptonationalist war on our liberal democracy, and our government is on the side of those trying to destroy democracy. Defend democracy #StopBrexit! #Brexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Do you support @jeremycorbyn but want a re-think and a member led decision on #Brexit - Join our rally this Thursday at Congres House. Free tickets here:  
Truly breathtaking financial idiocy from @jacob_rees_mogg If je approached his clients with a trade as stupid as Brexit, he would be greeted with howls of derision  
The IFS receives £1 in every £10 from the EU. It was a disgrace in the Referendum and is doing the same now. Government should cut its ESRC grant  
I voted Remain but this needs to be said again and again: 'Stop Backing Brexit' means 'Ignore The Result Of A Democratic Referendum Which Voters Were Told Would Be A Binding Decision'. The type of people who take this elitist approach are largely responsible for Trump and Brexit.  
The UK will be barred from accessing the EU's police databases after Brexit, Michel Barnier said the UK would not be granted access to the European Arrest Warrant, or be allowed to attend meetings of Eurojust or Europol. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Tory traitor Grieve says we'll all die from starvation if we have a #Brexit no dealWe had all these ludicrous scare stories before we rejected the Eurobefore the Millenium & before Brexit voteThese politicians must think we're fools.We're not going to listen to their nonsense 
This is literally what #Brexit is: giving up £100 in benefits to save £10.#Brexit is bonkers!  
Corbyn’s #Brexit - For The Few Not The Many. Instead of hollow words, he should deliver on what he promised at Glastonbury - to stand united against the Brexit fiasco the #Tory Government is creating. More here: 
It is almost chilling to hear one of our Cabinet ministers itch for 'chaos' and appear to admire Trump for the path of destruction that he so often leaves in his wake. It is clear that, when it comes to Brexit, Johnson doesn't understand what is truly at stake. 
To that dick @Nigel_Farage the heap of shit that is #brexit is not down to the "handling" of brexit negotiations it is because it was always a fucked up fantasy from the start. That is why we are here. That is why the country is falling apart, because of fuckers like you. #FBPE 
I think that MPs should respect the result of the EU Referendum. Is that a form of 'radicalism'?  
IFS record on Brexit so far...  
IFS Forecasts About Brexit Consistently Wrong:  
Remainer Lords sneered at Brexit as if inspecting an orf sardine at the club:  
From Barnier's crime speech- it sums up the govt's #Brexit problem. UK says let’s have bespoke arrangements which will benefit both of us (and satisfy our red lines). EU says you don’t understand: we are a legal and institutional order and we can’t. Then repeat ad nauseam.  
NEW: Britain will be LOCKED OUT of EU crime databases after Brexit warns Brussels in dramatic new blow 
Barnier just confirmed Britain is set to drop out of the European Arrest Warrant after Brexit. As I reported last month, MEPs like @SebDance, @juliegirling and others are furious that May is putting her ECJ redline before continued EAW participation 
Tory rebels must ready for battle, with huge pressure likely from whips, Brexit press and social media trolls ahead of crunch vote tomorrow. 
“There is no Brexit dividend,” said one financial analyst in response to Prime Minister Theresa May's speech today promising more money for the N.H.S. “Payments to the E.U. will fall, but tax revenues will fall more as a result of Brexit.”  
Hi PeterI am Corbynite.I want a second referendum.I think the hyper-aggressive approach of @campbellclaret @acgrayling and others is counterproductive to the cause of a second referendum.I also think Corbyn/Starmer are our best chance of actually getting one.Best wishes,Tom  
If we had a referendum, given all the Remain campaign claimed last time just what could they threaten this time? The world will split in two if we vote Leave again?Oh hang on - how about Brexit didn’t count as we didn’t have VAR? 
Imagine being a DUP voter and knowing all your closest allies in the rest of Britain would "give you back to the Irish" in a heartbeat if it meant a more convenient Brexit.  
Theresa May says the extra cash she’s promised for the NHS comes from a "Brexit dividend."There's just one catch - the Brexit dividend doesn't exist. @FactCheck investigates. 
"If there was a referendum on Irish unification tomorrow, how would you vote?"- 49% for Northern Ireland to stay in the UK- 44% for Northern Ireland to leave the UK and join the Republic of IrelandResult from new poll by @LordAshcroft  
why did you move Somerset capital to Dublin if Brexit is great then you victorian arseflute 
"Patrick Minford and his team at Economists for Free Trade have calculated a post-Brexit dividend of £135 billion just between 2020 and 2025, with a further £40 billion a year from then on" - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg  
The Tories have opened applications for London Mayor and  co-founder @TiceRichard is running. We wholeheartedly endorse his candidacy - he helped us win Brexit with @Arron_banks & @Nigel_Farage!Support us at  
The fact that Barnier is demanding the UK remain subject to the ECJ on certain issues shows he is still in denial over Brexit. Other third countries are not subject to the ECJ.  Why should we be? 
The Bank of England succeeds in slowing money and credit – nothing to do with Brexit. Given this it is not surprising the UK economy has slowed. Similar action is not being taken in the USA or the Eurozone.  
Households 'could be up to £1,000 a year worse off after #Brexit' with poorest households hit hardest.So much for PM May helping those that are just about managing. She's making them much poorer.Still...will of the people and all that  
What's obvious is that the OBR and IFS have projected lower government revenues as a result of Brexit. You are surely aware of this since (by analogy) your outfit set up in Dublin on the basis that hard Brexit could "increase costs". Please stop misleading the public.  
Remember when 400,000 people petitioned against selling off half our power companies. Then 67% opposed the sales in the referendum. Yeah. They still sold them. 2,000 signatories wanting to save each road? Roads that were not funded under the last Govt anyway. #Priorities 
Theresa May's 'Brexit dividend' lie has been reported to the Advertising Standards Authority.  
When my grandkids ask me "Grandad, where were you 23rd June 2018?" I will be able to tell them I was in London, marching to stop the #Brexit that would have ruined their lives. Where will you be?Please, for the sake of your children, join us.#StopBrexit #BrexitDividendMyArse 
This is a @PeoplesMomentum member, saying that unless Jeremy Corbyn supports a #PeoplesVote, he's screwed.Because if he's PM of Brexit Britain he gets the blame. 
And if there were a unification referendum tomorrow…?  
Pls RT this article which shows that Corbyn agreed there was a "Brexit Bonus" and even explained how he planned to spend it. He now accuses Mrs May of all kinds of wickedness on the basis that the Brexit Dividend does not exist. Which is it Corbyn?  
If investing £10 earns me £15, and I choose to no longer invest that £10, then I am not £10 up I'm £5 down. Basic maths lost on some of #brexit brigade. When did the #tories become so anti business ? 
I'll be very disappointed if she didn't write: "Brexit means Brexit"  
The Office of Budget Responsibility have estimated that Brexit will cost Britain an additional £15bn a year over the next 3 years.So there’s absolutely no Brexit dividend. It’s completely bogus.  
Rees-Mogg:“EU is backward-looking project based on an economic model of 20th century.It is neither democratically legitimised nor democratically controlled.It does NOT represent the British people.And it does NOT represent European people."#Brexit #EU 
The Brexit dividend is obvious, if you spend less on one thing it is available for something else.  
Come on the No side I implore you!! Sit up and listen. Please get your heads out of the papers and off the telly and actually research!! Already hit one of you with the facts of a hard Brexit this morning!! Believe me Scotland will pay the highest price. They will destroy her   
What worries me most about Trump, and to a much lesser extent Brexit, is that history suggests people don't generally respond to realising they've been lied to by turning on the liars, they respond by choosing to believe ever bigger lies. 
The cry that we 'have no money' is absolute nonsense. £155 billion in tax reliefs...shall we start there? Corporate welfare, there's another. Stop spending billions on Brexit. Tax corporates like Amazon properly. Collect the annual £36 billion in unpaid tax. Stop tax avoidance... 
Financial Times: "Spain seeks to silence ‘black legend’ critics".Instead of trying to silence the Catalan pro-indy movement, the Spanish Government should behave like a developed country: liberate political prisoners and negotiate an agreed referendum.  
tick-tock, tick-tick: ministers had hoped to wrap up Brexit negotiations by October, now looks likely to slip to December...  
Why no mention of the word BREXIT in discussion of why Hammond says there is no more money after the cut for the NHS from 3.7% to 3.4% annual increase? There is only money for (a) pretending to cover Johnson’s lie and (b) Brexit. 
 The Liberal Democrats have 6 times more peers in the Lords than they should do, and use them to damage Brexit negotiations. Yet, not long ago, they agreed that the House of Lords was "rotten to the core". Never trust a Lib Dem!  
So even the right wing press accept taxes will rise for the NHS & the Brexit dividend is debunked.YOU will pay for it!NOT the rich who had tax cutsNOT corporations who had tax cutsNOT tax dodgersNHS money will go to CEOs, PFIs, shareholders all feeding in the Tory trough. 
UK head of US pharmaceutical giant Pfizer in the FT today: "The UK pharmaceutical industry and the patients who rely on it are under serious threat from Brexit” 
It's disgusting what Trump & fascist right are doing to America...but the chilling thing is, if we had this situation in the UK, some of our brextremists would be saying similar things.I fear Trump and Brexit may only be the beginning of our decline. We must call a halt.  
Good. The ‘Brexit dividend’ argument has folded.There is no Brexit dividend. Any NHS boost comes from taxes.  
Referendum to remove article on Women’s role in the Home to be announced by Government today.  
READ: To win the working class Northern vote, the Conservative Party must change its attitude and tone. My latest Con Home piece: #Brexit #Conservatives #workingclass #northern 
I see Corbyn ultras, upset by a little dissent at Labour Live, trying carve out a place where being anti-anti-Brexit is completely different to being pro-Brexit. 
The ‘Brexit dividend’ argument has folded. Even with tabloids & Farage. Good.  
PARLIAMENT MUST HAVE A MEANINGFUL SAYBut what about the EU Referendum Act 2015, followed by the EU Referendum 2016, the Notification of EU Withdrawal Act 2017, triggering Article 50 and the EU Withdrawal Bill 2018, which MPs voted for? ANOTHER MEANINGFUL SAY 
Dear @theresa_may;I’ve taken the day off after we withdraw from the EU to collect my Brexit dividend.I can’t wait! Where can I pick mine up? Or does it get transferred directly into my bank?Really excited to start spending this on the high street 
..            THIS.               IS.           MAY’S.           BREXIT .              NOT.              THE.         PEOPLE’S.              NOT.     PARLIAMENT’SWe learnt this in court last week. 
Right-wing Sweden Democrats call for referendum on Swedish EU membership after 2018 election  
Leaflet given out by a Tory at Westminster tube just now - £20bn for NHS ‘funded by the Brexit dividend.’ So the Tories intend to fight the next election on lies as Boris & Farage fought the referendum  
According to Labour, I'm now apparently "the voice of Big Business" which is a stretch given I'm struggling even to be the voice of my own little business which might well be ruined by Brexit. 
If you read Matt Ridley in the Times today his position is that Grieve and Hailsham are destroying Brexit by taking no deal of the table. I don’t understand why some still believe that the EU is moments from rolling over. 
An uncomfortable truth for the deluded @duponline is that 2/3 Brexity loons would rather cut Northern Ireland loose to get the Brexit they want according to polling by Lord Ashcroft.  The DUP have been used by English nationalists. How pathetic are they.  
Nigel Farage will keep his £73k EU pension, Nigel Lawson has applied for a French residency card & City firm Jacob Rees-Mogg helped found has launched a new investment vehicle in Dublin amid concerns about being cut off from European investors. Who says we’re not ready for Brexit 
I hope we get to bring in some toys & watch videos on the last day before Brexit 
Our Future, Our Choice are anti-Labour.The only person with the power to call a 2nd referendum is Theresa May - OFOC would rather spend their time attacking Corbyn at every opportunity (he doesn’t have the power to bring a 2nd referendum) rather than pressure the Conservatives.  
Summary1. Brexit was never really about immigration.2. That was just Remain's attempt to smear Leave voters as racist.3. Of course, the level of immigration is a problem:4. It's far too low.5. So Labour must now aim to get it up to the tens of millions.6. That's all, folks!  
Senior Labour MPs accused of 'being in the pocket of Jacob Rees-Mogg' over Brexit stance - Sky News  
Jeremy Corbyn, take note: leftwing remainers won’t stay silent on Brexit | Zoe Williams - the guardian  
DISGRACE: Lord calls Brexit 'a national calamity' and demands MPs vote on final deal.These people don't believe in democracy. They'll end up on the wrong side of history. 
Sweden may hold #EU membership referendum  
Theresa May reported to the Advertising Standards Agency by Tom Watson over misleading claims that a huge cash boost for the NHS will be partly funded by a Brexit Dividend.Nothing has changed.  
Spot on from @zoesqwilliams, and heartbreaking for many of us who have stuck by Jeremy when the tide was against him because we thought he'd help working people. Now we all know any Brexit will harm working people he's deaf to our cries.  
The Brexit hypocrites: from Farage's EU pension to sellout Corbyn  
Marvel Supervillain idea: Captain Brexit. Everything he touches turns to shit and he leaves poverty and misery in his wake. Followed loyally by his #Brexit soldiers who refuse to see the truth (even when they are beaten with it every bloody day). Oh for an #IronMan to save us all 
An unclear referendum allowing Leave to never stop talking about the Norway model & the UK retaining all the advantages of the EU which was never available isn't democracy. An informed ref on the final deal is democracy.  
"EU REJECTS MAY’S 'DEEP & SPECIAL PARTNERSHIP'” - How yesterday's EU security announcement blows lid on PM's failed #Brexit strategy:  
Brexit voters would rather cut Northern Ireland loose than stay in customs union, poll finds 
My new polling on Brexit, the Border and the Union reported in today’s @Telegraph 
The #Mayo byelection should be a referendum on saving the ABC. #auspol #thedrum 
Well said @tessmillsy! Membership of the European Union will provide a platform for a radical and reforming @UKLabour government. #Brexit will sharpen austerity and hit hardest those who have least.   
Robert Shrimsley argues that when Theresa May opted for the polarising phrase "Brexit dividend" she gave up all hope of broadening her appeal, and went for a shore-up-the-base strategy:  
Your daily reminder that Jeremy Corbyn also claimed there would be a Brexit dividend. Choose your liar.  
Labour attacks on remainers getting vicious beyond belief now. Apparently if you support remain you’ll be responsible for “unleashing illegals wars”.Only one reason for this: it’s to cloud the fact that labour supporting hard #brexit devastating most vulnerable communities.  
PM is a magician. She tricked UK&EU into thinking Parliament decided to leave EU, only now we know for sure PM decided. That decision relied on the advisory referendum and all gov analysis showed disaster for UK.  
“Sadly today our fishermen and anglers are no better off.”Yup, because Brexit is rubbish.  
Theresa May's interview on Brexit has an eerie resemblance to Joseph Goebbels, says @mrjamesob  
Theresa May has just been reported to the advertising watchdog for claiming a Brexit dividend will pay for extra NHS funding. Boris Johnson has even used #BrexitDividend in a tweet. Blatant dishonesty may keep Mail readers happy, but the British public are sick of being fed lies. 
The far left attack on FBPE, OFOC and FFS is pathetic @paulmasonnews. They're not Soros, Tory or Centrist funded plots. They're just ordinary people who want their voices to be heard on Brexit....like the majority of Labour Members and supporters. 
If you have a reasonable, patriotic Tory MP, today is the day to email about who will have power if Brexit negotiations go wrong.Last night a Grieve II Am was passed in Lords. Please ask your MP to support it.You can find some text in this template:  
Jacob Rees-Mogg is still pushing the invented Brexit numbers produced by disgraced economist Patrick Minford - claiming that there is a potential Brexit Dividend of £135bn. The Insititute for Fiscal Studies say this number is utter rubbish... #BrexitShambles #r4today 
EU leaders will face migration, the Eurozone, Brexit, a trade war with Washington and much more at their upcoming summit  
And we should hear today whether the Court of Appeal in Amsterdam will refer to the Court of Justice in Luxembourg the question whether we can keep our EU citizenship rights if we Brexit. We won first time round. 
Diplomatic illiteracy is the defining pathology of May’s leadership - @rafaelbehr on the rolling shambles that is Brexit, & why May is making an already difficult situation so much worse.   
EU is seriously considering warning that a Brexit with no deal is a real possibility, sources say  
The High Court will today hear @GoodLawProject's claim that the Electoral Commission mismanaged the EU referendum and Vote Leave cheated.  
Gibraltar should have the choice of electing an MP after Brexit, says @cmackinlay 
Morning! Talking Thomas Markle, Brexit & space on @GMB in a mo with a @toryboypierce whose views are from an alien planet 
Dear Soubry, Grieve at al. It is clear you are trying to stop Brexit under the guise of giving Parliament a say (not that you gave a shit when Parliament was a rubber stamp for Europe). You may well succeed, then what? What do you boffins think happens then? 
Brexit is turning into the road trip from hell  via @bopinion 
My latest podcast interview: a front-row seat at the battle for Brexit, two decades in national newspaper journalism, whether Theresa May can cling on… and could Corbyn actually win?  
For vote later this afternoon, Senator @corybernardi has moved to commemorate the sovereignty win that is the 23 June anniversary of #Brexit, also seeking Aust. trade deals with newly-independent Great Britain and its former partner, the European Union #auspol 
Follow live updates from Westminster as Theresa May faces another Brexit defeat in the House of Lords  
Some media were touting this byelection as a referendum on Trudeau's handling of the trade/ tariff situation. Now any bets those same media will change their approach. 
Mississippi’s Republican governor is ensnared in post-Brexit lawsuit  
For everyone who feels despondent after hearing about the evil and sadistic policy in ICE. Remember, in 1988, Chile had to defeat Pinochet in a referendum.Here is some hope:  
The real cause of Trump-Brexit disaffection is not too much change, but too little. We need to radically reduce the restrictive effect of precautionary regulation and promote a new regulatory culture based on permissionless innovation.  
Not sure how Gabe Kapler could be blamed for tonight. Dominguez and Hunter weren't available and if Knapp catches the ball, they still would have gotten out of the game. Every game can't be a referendum on the manager, at some point players have to execute. 
According to his new father-in-law Prince Harry favours Brexit or at least ‘is open to the experiment’. So, too, is the Queen. Thank God for the Monarchy.The rest of our ‘elite’ we can well do without—the Lord Haw Haws, our champagne socialists, the BBC and our top civil servants 
the reason it seems like the UK has more TERFs than anywhere else is because we’re getting ready for a post-Brexit economy in which they’ll be our chief export 
Tories and brexit repeatedly make me feel ashamed to be English. Wouldn’t blame you for voting for independence but can you annexe the north east when you do? 
"[M]igration will be seen by future historians as the fatal solvent of the #EU." Immigrant overload, not Brexit, heralds the end of the European Union  by @nfergus 
If the UK is not give the choice to walk away “no deal” pay no money over, then we have nothing to trade with.What is there left to negotiate with. What ever we do now we can’t get a good deal.THE 17:4 who voted for BREXIT HAS BEEN SHAFTED BY OUR OWN CONSERVATIVE PARTY.REBELLION 
Sad little idiot... They don’t care about Brexit it’s always been Chuka’s wish to rid the party of Jeremy.... sad sad RW losers 
#LordTrue tells #ViscountHailsham: "People outside #Parliament are getting a little bit tired of the #Parliamentary games... They want to  know when they're going to get #Brexit, when it will be delivered and when it will be done."  #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome 
This is my concern now, completely. Brexit is being led by disaster capitalists who profit from deregulation and chas, allying with left wing vanguardists who believe in socialism in one country And both groups are text-book definition elists.  
The reason I want to #StopBrexit is because I respect my country more than I respect a vote that will do my country harm. You ask 'what will Brexit do for me?'I ask 'what will #Brexit do to my country?'Brexit cannot be allowed to harm our country to benefit the few. 
The Commons must take note. Wednesday will bring the most important vote in a lifetime. Our system makes life too easy for extremist minority governments and as Brexit is showing it's a recipe for disaster.  
Brexit has been a project of the hard/far right from the outset. The ultra-rich who bankrolled & promoted it won't be the ones who suffer its worst consequences. 
Labour will shout 'Tuition fees' and expect nobody to ever vote Lib Dem again but it's OK for Corbyn to shout BREXIT and still expect your vote. If you DON’T want Brexit support the Lib-Dems. They are the only mainstream party that will deliver on this. Corbyn won't.  
@guyverhofstadt  This is utter piffle. The 2016 UK EU Referendum vote excluded 5 million voting-age UK citizens, and was ALSO tainted by electoral crime, and massive voter manipulation. No honest or ethical MP would accept the 2016 leave vote now 
A Brexit straitjacket is too high a cost for UK to stay in single market  via @telebusiness Precisely. 
The left didn’t turn its back on communities in the 80s that were left to rot.In many areas Brexit will devastate what lifelines remain.It is utterly incredible to me that supposed left-wing commentators help spread the hard-right’s message that being anti-Brexit is elitist. 
Brexit was won largely on the back of middle class southern Tory votes - to now spin it as overwhelmingly a working class northern thing just ain't true.Young working class people in particular (those who voted) voted by a large margin to remain#Brexit is a right-wing project 
Top Doctors And Health Professionals Slam 'Brexit Dividend' And Demand Vote On EU Deal. 
I don't want Brexit.Please RT if you want to #stopbrexit 
Most of those Labour supporters who are also anti Brexit are regular people -not elites - who see that #Brexit is an ultra right-wing Tory project, turbo charged with racism and anti immigrant sentiment. 
Mississippi’s Republican governor is ensnared in post-Brexit lawsuit  
Paul, I've been a fan of some of your work for some time. Always liked Jeremy Corbyn and the principles that he has held for so long.But mate, many many people who are anti #Brexit are Labour supporters and of the left. Yeah some criticize Corbyn but that's okay - it's lobbying 
Ummm, I live in a council house, work bloody hard for very little pay. Voted Labour up to last GE, not now. Brexit is a con, sold by millionaires with no morals. Do I support Brexit - no. Do I support a #PeoplesVote - damn right I do! 
Mississippi's GOP governor has been buddy-buddy with Nigel Farage for a couple years—and a new lawsuit shines light on the strange relationship between Brexit financiers and Ole Miss.  
This is sweet. It seems that in her zeal to be rid of the jurisdiction of the #ECJ ⁦@theresa_may⁩ could ensure the UK is bound to the European Court of #HumanRights & the #ECHR in perpetuity #Brexit  
Brexit: ill-equipped to understand - poor journalism means none of us go into the future fully equipped to understand the implications of "no deal", while charlatans such as Minford can peddle their wares without fear of challenge...  #Brexinfo. 
For the record, no one *wants* another referendum, but Brexit has paralysed our democracy and most politicians are too scared to stop it, even though they know it will be a disaster for our country.If they won’t stop Brexit, we’ll have to do it for them.  
The real story isn't the non-existent Brexit dividend ... it's the fact that Theresa May's birthday present to the NHS (less extra money than the historical average increase after 8 years of austerity) is conditional based on the NHS undergoing "reforms" ... hello privatisation. 
James O'Brien Compares Theresa May's Words On Delivering Brexit To Hitler's Associate  
In 2014 Scottish opinion was divided roughly in three. The status quo, more devolution and full independence. Now the first two are off the table, devolution is dead & Brexit means change & uncertainty. Holyrood is fatally undermined only Independence will protect Scotland now. 
Says snivelling Putin stooge Arron Banks. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
It is your duty @andreajenkyns to act in the national interest. As the govt's own impact assessments show #Brexit in any form is economically negative, reinforced by virtually every credible economic body in the world, you should be concerned with the well being of the majority. 
Anna, Paul is clearly getting to you. He speaks for many in the party that are absolutely sick to the back teeth of your dishonesty. You know what you are trying to achieve is a reversal of Brexit. You are scheming. You know it. We know it. Stop lying. 
He should be excluded from the UK as not conducive to the public good. He has already started a trade war with us. We will not get any kind of "Brexit Bonus" from him. He treats us all with contempt. We shouldn't let him anywhere near the UK.  
‘we may look back on this announcement as the moment when the PM abandoned any idea of changing the debate & instead adopted the cynicism & deceit of the Brexit evangelists..notching up non-existent successes from her as-yet undefined Brexit’  
There must have been a meeting at the Morning Star office.There is no good Brexit.Brexit is a nightmareIt is time to #StopBrexit 
The inability of some on the Labour left to understand why some people - including many of their own members - are passionate about the damage Brexit does (and not just economic damage) is a serious weakness.  
For goodness sake?! WHERE IS YOUR OUTRAGE AT THE CORRUPT BREXIT CAMPAIGN?! Do you REALLY HATE LABOUR VOTERS THAT MUCH?! How dare you?!  How DARE YOU?! I simply cannot fathom you attacking Remain and IGNORING leave corruption?!Do you WANT Labour votes or not?!   
Fantastic visit to Brussels as part of our inquiry into Trade and Brexit. Many thanks to all who helped us out today. Lots to think about.  
Additional funding for the #NHS is good & necessary.But yesterday it was to be paid for by a #Brexit dividend.There is none.Today it's to be paid for by taxation.Unspecified.Tomorrow?History suggests Theresa May can be relied upon only for untruths & U-turns. #NewsNight 
#Newsnight calling Theresa May's latest lie a "highly disputable Brexit dividend" gives it some sort of credibility. It's a lie. Rubbish. Pish. Bollocks. Bullshit. Call it what you like. It just doesn't exist. 
The inconvenient truth for May and Corbyn is how much money we would have to spend on the NHS - and how many more great people would want to work for it - if it were not for Brexit. 
I'm thinking it's seriously time the SNP make a decision to walk away from Westminster and force a referendum.  If we don't,  they have us where they want us. Come on @NicolaSturgeon  radical action seems to be the final resort to this power grab of our parliament. 
Whatever Brexit emerges - hard, soft, customs arrangement, partnership, Max Fac, EEA, EFTA, Single Market, FTA, vassal state, zero tariffs, No deal, Red, White and Blue Brexit, every Brexit is a worse deal than we already have.Time to march #PeoplesVote 
I notice the use of astroturfer again this evening - do you all get some crib sheet of snappy phrases? Look at the  funders of the Tory Brexit project, which your party is supporting, before you start fling the word elitist around. See you on the March Saturday.  
For the record, I'm not convinced about the argument for a second referendum. PLP thought they could easily beat Corbyn with a second leadership election, but they were proved wrong. 2nd ref could bite us in the arse. What then? 
Parliament delegated the decision via a referendum. The binary choice was clear: Leave or Remain.Leave equalled leaving the single market, customs union & ECJ.We voted Leave.Any attempt by Parliament to now keep us in equals a full blown constitutional crisis.That simple. 
The Brexit dividend ... By opting out of all Brexit coverage, this summer, at last, I’m going to find time for this.  
These stupid southern cunts who call Jordan Henderson shite, can all get in the fucking bin.Blind West Ham Mark Noble Shagging Jelly Eel Brexit Bastards 
Disappointed to see people I thought of as allies stooping to this. Running old Tory attack posters aimed at Labour's leadership is not the way to win party members over to your argument. Better to target the Tory rebels, who actually have the power to stop Brexit.  
On the Tory side there is a systematic, aggressive attempt to subvert the free will of MPs and stop them putting country before party by voting for the Grieve 2 'meaningful vote' provision on Wednesday. We were told Brexit was all about parliamentary sovereignty -it appears not.. 
DISASTROUS first match for England, who cannot afford to offend any Non-EU nation that we might need to trade with post-Brexit by beating them. We can only hope the campaign gets back on track. 
How fucking stupid are people in this country believing that a) #Brexit will generate money and b) that the Tories will protect the #NHS?   #itvnews 
proud so many in my old profession see the mistake of hard Brexit  
Dug this out of a hole in my yard - someone left it for years it’s now mine .. I was thinking about putting a sign on it and transporting it around on one of my trucks ..“ the brexiteers offered me a rolls Royce but I ended up with this “ - is this my brexit dividend ?” .....  
"You shouldn't make the point that the Brexit dividend is not a Brexit dividend because the public won't care whether it's true" is the worst take ever. Yet it is everywhere. 
I think if Parliament doesn’t deliver Brexit it’s going to unleash dark forces that it wouldn’t believe.We’re already seeing it on the continent and arguably in the US.As a Brexiteer, this worries me greatly.Grieve and Soubry need to think very carefully about their positions. 
Brexit needs strong leadership & May simply can’t provide it.May has surrendered in Brexit talks making too many absurd concessions & has let the remainer rebels walk all over her.We need a Brexiteer PM to put remainer rebels in their place,stand up to the EU & reform the country  
‘Mr Hammond’s allies said that higher taxes and more borrowing would take the strain; the “Brexit dividend” touted by Mrs May is seen by the Treasury as little more than political spin to appease pro-Brexit Tories.’ #Fancythat  
Oh, for goodness sake, Paul?!  Where is my cheque then please?! *** IT IS NOT 2016 ANY MORE! ****TWO YEARS* have gone past and *STILL* Brexit is a train crash! People are waking up! Your “will of the people” nonsense doesn’t wash any more.BREXIT IS A CON!  
Thanks to the #FBPE for all the RTs - we are now a serious counterbalance to the Brexit press - well done!  
There is less than a week until the #PeoplesVoteMarch! We hope you guys are as excited as we are. Make sure you spread the message, bring your friends and family and let us all demand a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
Lords vote to give parliament a 'meaningful vote' on Brexit deal in blow to Theresa May  
I’m proud to have co-signed this letter.@martinmckee @trishgreenhalgh & colleagues are #experts. I realise we’re unfashionable these days but we do know stuff. #StopBrexit #nhs Top doctors slam 'Brexit dividend' and demand vote on EU deal in open letter  
Let me make this absolutely clear. Anna and the other rebels do not want to stop Brexit. All they want to do is keep us in the EU. Let’s not get confused, they respect the referendum result and agree Brexit has to happen, they just don’t believe we should actually leave the EU.  
The Prime Minister must know the Brexit Dividend is nonsense. To stand up and say it must mean she’s in trouble. #BrexitShambles 
Is it too late to put @GarethSouthgate in charge of Brexit? 
Jeremy Corbyn, take note: leftwing remainers won’t stay silent on Brexit | Zoe Williams | Opinion | The Guardian  
Defeating #Brexit and the damaging simplistic populism which gave rise to it is the most urgent priority of our generation. But we also have the transform our country to create a fairer, more equal, more green society otherwise populism will inevitably return 
'proud, again ...' this suggests you had lost the pride for some time. Given coverage of Brexit, this is an unsurprising welcome admission. well done. Admitting the problem is the important first step to solving it ...  
Government well defeated again in the Lords  !!...Lord Hailsham described Brexit as a "national calamity"...Quite right sir !!..If only the PM and her idiot Brexiteers could see what a calamity Brexit would be for the UK !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
At the moment proposed arrangements post Brexit leave the Westminster Govt holding all the cards. @ScotParl can be overridden anytime - on GM foods, Sunday opening, minimum pricing, animal welfare, fracking and on and on. That’s the #PowerGrab Competence isn’t the same as power. 
Delighted to join @trishgreenhalgh @ClareGerada @SimonCapewell99 @louiseckenny @mikegalsworthy @TamaraHervey and others  in @HuffPost refuting ‘Brexit dividend' and demanding vote on EU deal in open letter  
Paul Drechsler CBI President on @Channel4News , no Brexit divided. Is the #BrexitDividend fake news? "I think it's a modern way of communicating that perhaps doesn't put all of the facts on the table in a way that reflects reality"Oh, bravo Sir, bravo!!!#BrexitDividendMyArse 
Parliament having a meaningful vote deal or no deal won’t stop #Brexit I thought you voted to #TakeBackControl & make the UK parliament sovereign? 
The paranoia is palpable. They really would go the full dictator to protect their rarified Brexit from parliamentary or public incursion.  
Brexit is an exercise in constant, complete contradiction.Let's leave the EU to get trade deals with India!Let's take concrete steps to alienate India!This whole cake, eat it & stuff the crumbs in everyone else's face thing is getting really boring.  
A humiliated Mundell sits paralysed as Lidington takes his place at the despatch box. This weak and feeble Secretary of State for Scotland must resign.#Clause15 #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill #SNPwalkout #DissolveTheUnion 
One party was against Scottish devolution in 1997. The same one that didn't oppose the #Brexit #PowerGrab: the Scottish Tories. 
Majority think Theresa May's 'Brexit dividend' for the NHS is dishonest Sky Data poll finds  
SNP supported independence in 1997.  Key shift had occurred in its attitude, recall 1985 ‘Lorraine Mann Question’ asking party leaders for SECOND choice. Salmond said devo. In 1997 referendum, SNP campaigned Yes/Yes: 88% of SNP supporters voted Yes/Yes cf 81% Lab and 10% Cons. 
David Lidington says that the Tories have tried to work constructively with Scotland? I am unsure whether or not he is grounded in this reality or if in a tory reality co-operation means subjugation by ignoring opposing views and do what you want. #DevoVsTories #Scotref #Brexit 
Brexit England does it again. 
Or, here’s a thought, ditch Brexit and don’t raise taxes.  
proper brexit winner 
Can’t believe Brexit won the World Cup already 
TEARS DOWN MY FACE, CARLING IN HAND. DREAMING OF A HARD BREXIT. FOOTBALL IS COMING HOME AND THERE’S NOTHING YOU CAN DO ABOUT IT 
This tweet of @Anna_Soubry's didn't age well, did it?  #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
BREXIT MEANS FUCKING BREXIT IT'S COMING FUCKING HOME YA BASTARD 
"I look forward to putting [Tory] jeering faces on leaflets in the next Independence referendum".  
@joannaccherry “I look forward to putting photos of jeering Scottish Tory MP faces on Yes leaflets at the next Independence referendum”Have you read the Obscene Publications Act? 
No, ‘taking back control’ was the entire premise of #Brexit, which over 17 million of your fellow country men & women voted for. The arrogance of dismissing our reasons & reframing them in your own opinion is appalling. The rudeness & condescending tone repeatedly shown is vile.  
I was recently accused by a fellow Tory of being a revolutionary, not a conservative, on account of supporting #Brexit. Well, if restoring the UK’s independence makes me a revolutionary, so be it. 
There is reason why Paul Mason, Matt ZC and Aaron B are being so vicious against the #PeoplesVote campaign: it is putting pressure on @jeremycorbyn to abandon his support for Tory Brexit and a cut in workers’ rights 
Our Westminster leader, @LSRPlaid says Westminster's contempt towards Wales makes the case for independence. #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit #PowerGrab 
England players holding a mini referendum there to decide who takes the free kick. 
“There is no Brexit dividend,” said one financial analyst in response to Prime Minister Theresa May's speech today promising more money for the N.H.S. “Payments to the E.U. will fall, but tax revenues will fall more as a result of Brexit.”  
Post-Brexit Free Ports Could Create 150,000 Jobs in Northern England, Add £9bn to British Economy   
.@GavNewlandsSNP making excellent speech emphasising that since 2015 as 3rd party @theSNP have played the #Westminster game but the events of last Tuesday were a game changer #PowerGrab #Brexit 
Douglass Ross banging on about "How many powers will the Scottish Parliament have after Brexit, blah, blah blah? It't NOT about the number of powers, it's what the Tories are going to do when they have those powers that's the problem! Solution: #DissolveTheUnion 
.@theSNP Chief Whip @GradySNP making a very good speech pointing out that @ScotTories are the only party not to sign the #ClaimOfRight for Scotland. That is how much the Tories care for the will of the Scottish people #PowerGrab #Brexit 
How much more obvious could it be that Remain is the side of intelligence and reason, and that Brexit is the side of ignorance, fanaticism and despotism?We HAVE to stop this thing, and those who want it. We MUST. Our very freedom and rights are at stake.  
Sign onBrexitJohn TerryMurderersToriesDrumsChelsea Football ClubGod Save The QueenHe’s one of our ownMillwall Football ClubFeed the scousersRio Ferdinand. Always the victimWembley. Gary NevilleThe whole fucking establishment.Fuck them. Scouse, not English #LFC 
It is telling that Dominic Grieve has effectively admitted that he would rather see the Government topple than allow Ministers to deliver the referendum mandate of taking back control of our laws, borders, money and trade  
I switched over to BBC Parliament for literally two seconds and I heard a Scottish Tory MP saying "unwanted referendum".  These people are truly obsessed.  They eat, drink and sleep independence referendums. 
Theresa May suffers ANOTHER embarrassing defeat on Brexit as party splits burst open in House of Lords  
Dominic Grieve, Ken Clarke, Anna Soubry and their band of Rebel Remainers are disloyal and do not respect democracy, says Dr Ogilvy. #Brexit  
If only there had been some sort of recent attempt to reform the House of Lords! I’m sure it would have been supported by all those now criticising it over Brexit   
Thank you to all the peers; Liberal, Conservative, Labour and Crossbencher, who voted against the Government on the #EuWithdrawlBill. It comes to something when only the Lords are acting to prevent a Hard #Brexit!   
Now Corbyn has proven without a shadow of a doubt that he is not only Pro Brexit but also against free speech and democracy if you want to remain in the  EU. The time is right to switch to the Lib-Dems.  
We have already spent the equivalent of decades of EU payments supporting the economy since 2016, we are losing billions in revenue due to slowing growth, Brexit inflation and currency fall means even less money. #ThereIsNoBrexitDividend Andrea is lying. 
Dear #FBPE'rs. Please note. Brexit cannot be stopped or even minimised while the Tories are at the helm. Know your target. Get them out.  Then let's worry if or how Brexit will or won't happen. (NB if you keep attacking Labour I will know you're fakes).  
 The agenda for this week’s round of #Brexit negotiations @EU_Commission is now available on our site: 1) Ireland/Northern Ireland, 2) framework for future relationship   
Just a reminder for the unelected Lords that the people and the democratically elected Parliament (mostly elected on a full Brexit manifesto) voted to implement the referendum. Time to stop fighting democracy. #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
#Bollox2Brexit #SupportTheLords #Brexit Well done all of you. Full of energy & smiles.  
PLEASE RETWEET this to send a message to Tom Watson and his colleagues that we are all sick to death of these games being played, while we have the CRITICAL business of Brexit to deal with. It is an insult to us all.    
Indian students excluded as UK visa rules relaxed for Serbia, China and Bahrain.Sends completely the wrong message to our friends and allies of old in Brexit is an opportunity for us to strengthen  relations -  This needs reviewing. Now. 
Mary McAleese has 'no intention' of going to confession after voting Yes in abortion referendum 
Lords vote to give parliament a 'meaningful vote' on Brexit deal in blow to Theresa May  
The state of this...#Brexit #EUwithdrawalbill #BrexitLordsBetrayal 
So apparently the Scottish tories think the SNP didn't campaign in the 1997 referendum!  @PM4EastRen 
The Lords are soon going to regret all these out of touch moves to block #Brexit. There's no need for a #MeaningfulVote on the final deal as the British people have already given the government the instruction to deliver our exit from the EU! #EUWithdrawalBill #RespectTheResult 
There's Ian Murray backing the Tories, quelle surprise.  Helping frigging Brexit when his constituency voted Remain.#DissolveTheUnion 
SCRAP THE LORDS: Labour MP calls for 'elected senate' to replace peers after Brexit BLOCK  
Brilliant, just brilliant. Daisley is fast becoming the voice of the Scots majority. The myth of the SNP’s Brexit ‘power grab’  
The simpletons seem rather upset with the #HoL today.Can someone please explain to them how our system works, as they appear to be living in the dark.#FBPE #Brexit #SupportTheLords 
Brexit England take their chances. Just saying..... 
trapped on brexit island and england are reigning world cup championsthe living nightmare of 2019 
Top doctors slam 'Brexit dividend' and demand vote on EU deal in open letter  
I’m not one for blue on blue, but @Anna_Soubry & Dominic Grieve are doing irreparable harm to our party by threatening to bring down the government in order to subvert the democratic will of the peopleHonour the manifesto!#Brexit #EUwithdrawalbill #BrexitLordsBetrayal 
Technically a 'Brexit Dividend' does exist, as a minus amount. #StopBrexit 
"We may disagree with Julia Hartley-Brewer and Guido Fawkes on Brexit, but we are in full agreement with them on the 'being massive Tories' issue."  
Wonder if Arron Banks has blocked @guyverhofstadt over calling him a fifth columnist, he's a bit sensitive at the moment and reacting badly to any criticism.....do your bit, retweet it at every opportunity!!! 
Exclusive: Top doctors and health professionals slam 'Brexit dividend' and demand vote on EU deal in open letter  
#EUWonderWoman  #glitter #SoGlam  because the #EU is wayyy sexier than #Brexit  #StopBrexit #WeAreEurope 
You have to love the hypocrisy of @UKLabour.Here is @JonAshworth claiming there is no #Brexit dividend to help fund the #NHSBut @jeremycorbyn is on record as saying there is. Hit RT now to share the sheer hypocrisy of #Labour. 
New Lords defeat for government on Brexit 'meaningful vote' amendment  
A chaotic, no deal Brexit would cause an economic shock. But ‘no Brexit’ would cause a democratic shock. Both are bad options that this country should try & avoid. I fear, though, that the democratic shock would be even more difficult to recover from 
PLEASE RT. If the Lords, full of cronies and corruption, bring down Brexit I suspect they'll soon be abolished. They don't represent Britain, they are on a gravy train that disgusts most people. #Liberty 
The rise in NHS England funding is lower than the average over the past 50 years and doesn't address social care funding.NHSE has faced austerity for 8yrs and is almost £1 billion in debt. As for the Brexit dividends?   
Totally agreeThere is no brexit dividend. Also There is No Brexit Benefit.  There is no such thing as a Jobs First Brexit.  Brexit will make us all poorer and interferes needlessly in the lives of millions of families.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #FinalSayforAll 
Theresa May says the extra cash she's pledged for the NHS will be partly funded by leaving the EU.But @FactCheck has found no evidence of the "Brexit dividend" 
The craven opportunism of the leadership of both major political parties over Brexit threatens our  future. Please don’t just sit on your hands and moan.  join us this Saturday for a huge demonstration of national outrage. #PeoplesVote 
Tory MP Douglas Ross wrongly claims that the SNP opposed devolution in 1997.  I appreciate he was little more than an embryo at the time, but the SNP campaigned for a Yes vote in the 1997 devolution referendum, and Alex Salmond was one of the main Yes speakers in the TV debates. 
I am a member of Labour and Unite I voted Corbyn three times, twice for leader and at the GE. Someone needs to explain to me in what way the referendum was ‘democratic’ and how 40 years as a lorry driver makes me ‘elite’. Brexit was/is a far right coup which I will never support. 
Jeremy Corbyn, take note: leftwing remainers won’t stay silent on Brexit | Zoe Williams  
House of Lords just sent strong message to Commons that we can't allow a few ministers to override Parliament and force through No Deal Brexit. Majority of 120 with 22 Tories voting to ensure Parliamentary sovereignty is protected if there is no Brexit agreement 
Pleased that @UKHouseofLords Just voted to give Parliament a proper say on the outcome of Government Brexit negotiations. This is important for our country, democracy and so that all our people’s interests are represented...  
He is. Forced to stand down in disgrace over his expenses and now dictating Brexit which he thinks is a ‘national tragedy’.  What a poster boy he is for the Remoaners  
Majority think Theresa May's 'Brexit dividend' for the NHS is dishonest, Sky Data poll finds - Sky News  
Can’t believe the arrogance of Lord Hailsham to try and block Brexit because he “doesn’t believe in it”. We had one vote each on this one. 
Theresa May has been trying to play both sides in Brexit. She has been telling remainers 1 thing & then brexiteers another. May can no longer sit on the fence pretending to deliver Brexit when in reality she is selling us out & tying the UK to EU control. It is now decision time!  
I'm French with a French passport, what are you gonna do about it? My children and my grandchildren are Scottish with British passports, you explain to them how your Brexit is going to affect their lives in this inhumane, xenophobic and despicable Tory #BrexitBritain .  
Viscount Hailsham: ‘I don’t believe in Brexit. I think it’s a national tragedy.’ Me on the Lords: "I don't believe in the Lords. I think they're a national disgrace" 
Peers cannot seriously imagine they’re blocking Brexit.  All they are doing is making it more likely the terms of disengagement are less favourable to the country.  Our supposedly wise, disinterested Establishment has ended up behaving as a petulant child.... 
What an absolute disgrace, your deliberate delight in the attempt to undermine Brexit speaks volumes Anna. The Lords need abolishing.  
"There isn't a Brexit dividend... there is literally, arithmetically, no money."Maybe someone should tell @theresa_may? 
BREAKING | The unelected House of Lords has voted for the "meaningful vote" amendment, which could give our Remoaner parliament a veto on Brexit. The battle for British democracy is far from over!Help the fight back and support us at  
The Government has been defeated in the House of Lords over plans to give MPs a "meaningful vote" on the final Brexit deal 
Peers vote by 354-235 in favour of the 'Grieve 2' amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill giving Parliament the power to prevent a no deal Brexit. A big majority! 
Here's my letter to the ASA calling for an investigation into Theresa May's misleading advertising over "Brexit dividend" to fund NHS crisis.   
The Lords back the Grieve/Hailsham amendment, that the government agreed then reneged on, guaranteeing Parliament a true meaningful vote on the Brexit deal.Well done to the Lords for upholding democracy and ensuring the Government’s promise is delivered. #FBPE. 
Grieve 2, giving Parliament a meaningful vote in the event of a #Brexit no deal,  wins by a majority of 119 in the Lords. 
Lords voted by majority of 119 to uphold parliamentary sovereignty over Brexit & support Dominic Grieve. Happy day 
Brexit ping pong latest: Lords defeat Govt to back Grieve's compromise amendment for a meaningful vote; 354 v 234. A veritable thrashing. 
Government defeat on Lord Hailsham's amendment: peers vote 354 to 235 to send the bill back to the Commons demanding a 'meaningful vote' on the outcome of Brexit negotiations. 
Breaking. Govt defeated over Brexit in Lords AGAIN. Showdown now looms in Commons. It's make-or-break time for Tory Remainer rebels. 
"I don't believe in Brexit, I think it's a national calamity."Tory peer Viscount Hailsham reacts after being accused by a fellow Conservative of trying to "destroy Brexit" with his amendment to the government's EU withdrawal bill.  
Theresa May knows Brexit will cause a drop in tax revenues ....so she prepares people for tax rises and dresses it up as for heath. (All depends on political mood swings in England - Scotland's taxes rises or fall regardless) #bbcnews 
Theresa May reported to advertising watchdog for claiming 'Brexit dividend' will pay for NHS funding  
I was A Union Convenor a decade then a Senior TU Official a decade, if Brexit happens half of my membership across Automotive,Food & Drink, Chemicals and Engineering would be wiped out within months. That's a genuine Socialist concern nothing plastic about it :( 
Retweet if you also believe Theresa May is being dishonest about a ‘Brexit Dividend’ for the NHS.  
The NHS is getting more cash - £20 billion a year more by 2023.But despite what Theresa May has suggested, @FactCheck has found no evidence that it's thanks to a "Brexit dividend." 
Brexit deal unlikely until year-end as officials revise expectations  via @financialtimes. Mrs May face reality Brexit is bust, finished, dead. No good will come from pursuing this folly. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
High drama as Tory peer Lord Robathan accuses Viscount Hailsham of wanting to "sabotage #Brexit".Hailsham is not remotely intimidated by these Daily Mail-style bullying tactics: "We are the High Court of Parliament. We are not party hacks." 
So the same award given to Winston Churchill and David Stirling. Perhaps do some basic research before tweeting like a Brexit troll. 
My son ( 4 months old) has just said he wants Tunisia to win as he hasnt forgiven England for Cromwell, the famine, the Black & Tans, partition, BSE & Brexit. So proud. 
Majority think Theresa May's 'Brexit dividend' for the NHS is dishonest, Sky Data poll finds The majority of the people (those with the "will") think that May is a liar. 
The pro EU Labour MPs that want Jeremy Corbyn to stop Brexit are majority Blairite MPs that look for every opportunity to undermine Corbyn at the moment Brexit is their excuse. 
Theresa May reported to advertising watchdog for claiming 'Brexit dividend' will pay for NHS funding 
I would like a second referendum I will go on the march this weekendI am a strong supporter of Corbyn’s LabourI resent others, who also want a second ref, making absurd, nasty attacks on Corbyn’s Labour, like this oneI trust the march won’t be like this. If it is, I’m off  
More youth groups mobilising against Brexit:‘The National Campaign Against Fees and Cuts (NCAFC) said it would join anti-Brexit demonstrations the National Union of Students (NUS) is organising... and establish a “radical, leftwing, pro-migrant bloc”.’  
That "look at all the countries we could have deals with" Brexit argument gets weaker every day  
Lord Lawson - "Brexit is not unworkable at all. #Brexit will be a great liberation politically and economically."Most of the world is not in the European Union; most of the world trades with the European Union."  
Majority of those surveyed by @SkyData do not think there will be a "Brexit dividend" - touted by Theresa May to help fund the £20bn pay increase  
Billboard campaign targets Labour MPs failing to oppose Tory Hard Brexit  
Disappointed at the inaccurate way Govt is talking about the #Brexit dividend. If we’d stayed EU members Brussels would have sought an even bigger contribution from UK taxpayers. It would probably have meant billions more for the EU and less for the NHS. 
Conservative peer Lord Robathan asks Viscount Hailsham whether his motive is to "sabotage Brexit" and whether he's had talks with other parties.Viscount Hailsham: "We are the High Court of Parliament. We are not party hacks."  
Peer gets up and accuses Hailsham of trying to sabotage Brexit. Groans all around. Someone sat next to him calls him an idiot. Peer looks across. "That is not a parliamentary gesture." 
Criticised for consulting with Opp front benches Hailsham: “This is the High Court of Parliament and we are not party hacks..perfectly true I don’t believe in Brexit..a national calamity but what I believe above all is that the Commons shd have decisive say one way or another”. 
Jeremy Hunt left seething after the ‘Brexit dividend’ blows up in his face.By @wrightismight 
"You are an idiot" shouts a Lord at Lord Robathan when asking Hailsham after he asks him whether he is planning to blow up Brexit. And Hailsham tells Robathan that Lords are "not party hacks" 
"The attacks on Mr Grieve in last week's press, especially in the Daily Mail, were disgraceful" says Lord Hailsham, in arguing for Grieve's amendment to give MPs a more meaningful "meaningful vote" on Brexit 
An unelected body, the House of Lords is appearing contemptuous of both the referendum result and the manifesto commitments of both main parties at the last general election, says former Brexit Minister @DavidJonesMP 
Work: sacked offEngland top: onRay bans: on Carling: sunkBrexit papers: signedWorld Cup: coming home  
The Brexit hypocrites: from Farage's EU pension to sellout Corbyn | Hannah Jane Parkinson  
WATCH: Theresa May is being dishonest with the British public over Brexit & the NHS. There is no Brexit dividend, only a Brexit deficit. Please RT this so everybody knows it:  
There seems to be a belief that if we fail to get a deal with the EU that things will carry on exactly the same until we sort ourselves out.They won’t..Brexit does actually mean Brexit.Do not complain about being treated like a third country if you voted for this. 
.@tom_watson complains about @theresa_may claim that there'll be a Brexit dividend to Advertising Standards Authority, after she tweeted graphic claiming existence of said dividend. He'll find it harder to prove that's an advert than he will to disprove existence of Brexit divvy 
The haunted face of a woman who knows her infamy is assured as the Prime Minister who knew she was harming her country but a toxic combination of weakness and desperate ambition prevented her doing the right thing. That will be her personal Brexit dividend.  
We’re at Westminster Hall where MPs are about to debate an overwhelmingly popular e-petition to have a referendum on abolishing the House of Lords 
I’ve reported Theresa May to the Advertising Standards Authority for using misleading advertising to suggest that there will be a ‘Brexit dividend’ to deal with the NHS crisis.  
Packed day of Brexit meetings in Brussels. Hoping to be back home in time to watch the England World Cup game! 
Tory leader of the Lords Baroness Evans just called Hailsham a "Vice Count". I know she and @theresa_may don't want to give MPs a meaningful vote on Brexit that could bind the PM's hands, as desired by Hailsham, but that kind of name calling seems OTT 
Children are being held in camps by some of the worst criminals on Earth. This whole thing is disgusting, and I wish I could say I was shocked by how little the American people talked about it. But after being verbally congratulated on Brexit several times, I was not surprised.  
Ditching a vote on critical environmental protections after Brexit so Lords can watch the football? This is no way to run Parliament... 
The missed penalty kick was a statistical blip that says nothing about Messi as a player, and it was a total referendum on who Messi is as a person.  
The Swiss have just voted in a referendum to abandon nuclear and switch to renewables  @LeoHickman  
"Brexit will be a great liberation politically and economically!" Lord Lawson tells Lord Adonis   
. @thomasbrake just began his speech at #FutureEuropeFutureYou conference, saying "I call myself the #LibDems ANTI #Brexit spokesperson, and I agree with what Madeleina said about #Brexit in her song - what an infinitely stupid idea!"  #StopBrexit #IamwithMadeleina 
How do we break out of Brexit?  
So Theresa May does not know how much, if anything, the “Brexit dividend” will be, cannot say when, if ever, it will materialise, cannot say where the rest of the £20bn will come from & does not know when patients will see any improvement in services. That’s cleared that up then  
I would urge all you Brexiteers out there to keep using and referring to the “Brexit Dividend”, it really winds the Remainiacs up, you can hear the heads exploding & see the desperation to prove that it doesn’t exist. Hilarious. 
Ultra-Remoaner Tory MP Anotinette Sandbach got into trouble for reporting OAP to the Police for sending her a polite email criticising her #Brexit views.Now says non-constituents who email her might be reported to Cops as well.MP is wasting Police time. 
Sweden: 'Sweden Democrats call for referendum on Swedish EU membership after 2018 election' 
I have heard @capt_amarinder threatening to register a sedition case agnst me on 2020 referendum,will he first register case agnst his Mla Sikki for participating in Sarbat Khalsa in 2017 ?I dare him to produce a shred of evidence that i supported 2020 he’s welcome to act-khaira 
The motives are clear - 'Knavish tricks are designed to wreck Brexit'  
FactCheck: The NHS funding boost is not a Brexit dividend  via @FactCheck 
EU collapse in one picture: - RED: 'no more migrants' government (Sweden: anti-migrant party 1st in poll, Slovenia: populists just won election)- ORANGE: 'no more migrants' government (less strong, supportive to RED countries)- YELLOW: not in the EU (UK = Brexit)  
Watch this shocking footage of Jasmin Beckett, Richard Brooks and their fellow anti-Brexit protestors being physically removed from #LabourLive. Warning: it's extremely graphic and disturbing. I hope someone's set up a crowdfunder to fight this injustice. 
These are the ppl Theresa May calls, ' Our dear friends in Brussels' ; EU threatens to ground ALL flights after Brexit  via @MailOnline 
The Dutch Rabobank worked it out months ago.  Brexit is a bizarre form of Hara Kiri. Nobody has any idea why the government pushes on with it. #FBPE#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Theresa May has pledged an extra £20 billion a year for the NHS, which she says will be partly funded by leaving the EU.But @FactCheck has found no evidence of a "Brexit dividend." 
THE SPECTATOR ON NHS SPENDING: The ‘Brexit dividend’ for the NHS is Theresa May’s new Magic Money Tree  
Will Dry: "The most important thing is bringing down this awful Tory government. To do that Labour must take a stand against Brexit." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @Will_DryOFOC | @Femi_Sorry | @OFOCBrexit 
May proposes a ‘backstop’ Brexit without an end date, Tory Brexiters wanted a fixed exit date ‘backstop’ Brexit. So she settles on a partially indefinite, partially definite ‘backstop’ end date, ushering in the era of hokey-pokey Brexit 
Around 80% of Labour members want a second referendum according to some polls. You calling 80% of Labour members astroturfing Tories? Seems like a fucking weird tactic if you still want to keep them as members, Paul.  
Football: readyCarling: coldHart: at homePacket: sortedShirt: on Mrs: awayBrexit: soft#ThreeLions 
So there we have it....the #BrexitDividendMyArse is most likely to be found hanging out with the Brexit unicorns, amongst the money trees somewhere over the rainbow!  
One part of Labour Live I've not seen mentioned, the lovely @johnmcdonnellMP was doing a media interview while one of the stop Brexit extremists kept sticking "bollocks to Brexit" stickers on him. Despite sharing the sentiment, this is pathetic behaviour from a tiny minority. 
The government continues to act like the 'Ministry of Truth' by repeating its false assertions about the Brexit Money Tree. Brexit is already shrinking our economy, meaning we will have less, not more, money to spend on our NHS. Please RT.  
I support PR because I support greater democracy. When people say 'but that means parties like UKIP will get greater representation' I say, so be it. That's democracy. That's why I respect the Brexit result despite voting remain. I'm a 'democratic' socialist. 
The "Our Future Our Choice" (OFOC) anti Brexit/Anti Labour Billboard vans campaign is supposed to be funded by "Crowdfunding". The funding target was £40k. They raised only  £12k from just 347 people. Meanwhile they get office space from Peter Mandelson's group. Astroturf  
Grassroots @PeoplesMomentum activist @alenaiv85737264 has started this brilliant petition:  calling on Momentum to hold a vote of its members on stopping Tory Brexit. If we can get 4,000 names on it, the vote will happen: Share it now, and sign if you can 
OFOC & FFS attacking Labour instead of the Conservatives is puzzling. Especially as the membership’s loyalty to the leadership far exceeds attempting to stop Brexit being a priority. We elected Corbyn leader twice, the second time against a guy saying he’d whip against Article 50 
Cop a load of this!!! The permanent damage of Brexit - it will make your hair stand on end  - and then you should get VERY angry!!  
Baroness Wheatcroft is a total disgrace.She tells the plebs they didn't know what they were doing when they voted for #Brexit.The Tories made her an unelected Peer on £315 a day but now she is going to knife them and possibly bring down the Tory Gov.  
I may just have given a strip of #BollockstoBrexit stickers to a group of school kids (in pinstripe red blazers) who were chanting "BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT"  and their teacher may have come out and yelled at them And I may have scarpered the scene  #TroubleMaker 
Once again unelected peers are considering using parliamentary procedure to block Brexit when they vote on the Withdrawal Bill tonight. When are they going to #RespectTheResult?  
*Brexit is not just a mess but fundamentally illegitimate.* So far few journalists like @NickCohen4 are calling it out. @vincecable has done so. Pls support Vince with hashtag #IsupportVinceCable. @thomasbrake @joswinson @Wera_Hobhouse @EdwardJDavey @BenPBradshaw @catherinemep 
People say that with Brexit, nobody knows what's going to happen, to those people I say: "Nope, it's simple", check out this handy flow chart to work out what's going to happen next.  
Abolishing the National Insurance upper earnings limit proposed by @NEF to help fundNHS is better than May's phantom Brexit "dividend". Hits top 15% so 85% escape  
I'm not taking a position on Brexit, but if leaving Europe means that Britain is now stiffening its spine, that is good for civilization. More on London's increasingly principled opposition to UNHRC's anti-Israeli bigotry:  
If Corbyn became PM, he would destroy UK with a seductive but flawed ideology. As it is, he is not PM but is destroying UK by enabling Brexit. Many Labour MPs know this. They could rebel. They could leave the party. But they don't. #IsupportVinceCable #IsupportDominicGrieve 
Well I suspect no one will be surprised to hear that it looks like it’ll be the poorest in society paying the bill for the incompetent, heartless Tory Brexit fiasco. And of course that the ‘Brexit Benefit’ is harder to find than Nessie  
If Brexit ends up forcing us to give prisoners the vote, a lot of people’s heads are going to explode.  
I voted Remain. The intransigence and intolerance of the #FBPE brigade are making me wish I hadn't. If their intention is to turn Corbyn-supporting Remainers into Brexiteers, they're doing a good job. If their intention is to stop #Brexit, they're making a right Horlicks of it.  
What would you call @vincecable for wanting protect UK from a corrupt Brexit? I'd call him a hero. This Brexiteer calls him a traitor. So is he in favour of Russian interference, electoral fraud, Leave lies, self-harm, breaching constitutional requirements? #IsupportVinceCable 
They keep lying saying it is the result of a (inexistent) law by Democrats. The UK government site says more money for NHS comes from the Brexit dividend. Official UK projections say there is no such dividend. Governments lie knowingly in our older democracies. A rotten culture.  
BREXIT REALITY  - - The 'Brexit Dividend' in a nutshell...  
@Arron_banks clearly crapping himself as the truth emerges about his lies, deception, cheating and collusion with Russia in their interference in the referendum.Still, he hasn't done a Dominic Cummings yet and deleted his account...YET. 
Any thoughts about the phrase ‘Brexit dividend,’ Jeremy?  
Here's the IEA's Chief Economist arguing there *is* a Brexit dividend. But shyly to admit, as he does (tweet 6), that "the consensus" is against him is to praise his view with too faint damnation.True Believers aside *everyone* is against him.  
If Corbyn had fought the 2017 GE on an anti-Brexit platform, the Tories would have a healthy majority with which to push through the hardest of hard Brexits. You should be thanking Corbyn, not slagging him off.  
Meghan Markle's daddy is trash. He ditched his daughter's wedding, had her pay his bills after he went bankrupt because she was "successful" and can "afford it", and now he's whoring off her media attention by telling everybody his new son-in-law supported Trump and Brexit.  
House of Lords gearing up for debate & huge vote on Brexit & parliamentary sovereignty, which Theresa May wants to abolish in the name of ‘government sovereignty’ 
Oh Jesus! I've just realised what this brexit dividend for the NHS is all about. God I'm slow. They're going to use it if we have a people's vote. They'll say If we don't leave, the NHS won't be given the extra money 
. @theresa_may a small but crucial piece of information for you to know... @10DowningStreet THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.  #StopBrexit #ThereIsNoBrexitDividend #EUsupergirl 
The No 10 website is a government, not a Tory party site. Government sites should not carry knowingly statements which are false. The Government know that there is NO Brexit dividend. The machinery of Government is being misused, abused and brought into disrepute.  
Your daily reminder that Remainers do not "want Brexit to fail". We simply know it WILL fail. Because we've done the maths and read the rule books of the WTO and EU.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
About 20% of Labour are cheering the hard Brexit Tories along. These "Lexiters" deserve all the criticism they get. 
Brexit has seen the UK Government’s contempt for Scotland laid bare  by @holyroodmandy pic.twitter.com/b5Q5ToNjaf 
Remember this?"Prisoners could help fill post-Brexit workforce gap, says minister."... You know, just like those forced labourers under the Nazis.#StopBrexitStopFacism#PeoplesVote 
We're at @SODEMAction today with the wonderful @albawhitewolf - rocking the message that Brexit can and MUST be stopped! Grab your pink tees and join us on Saturday as we demand a #PeoplesVote to #STOPBREXIT#WomenAgainstBrexit #ResisterSisters #Resist 
Well look at this... you know that tweet from the PM? The one claiming that the "Brexit Dividend" will be used to pay for the NHS?It's only had 94 likes and 74 retweets - but over 1300 replies. And most of them are saying "There is no Brexit Dividend"#ThereIsNoBrexitDividend 
Working on a new banner for the anti-Brexit march on Saturday. Oh - and it IS an anti-Brexit march. Don't believe any tripe about it being merely about the kind of 'deal'. For me, it's #StopBrexit or bust. 
Tory MP Antoinette Sandbach, who reported an OAP to the police for politely criticising her views on Brexit, has updated her email auto-reply threatening to call the cops on all non-constituents who contact her:  
Has @jeremycorbyn condemned Theresa May's shameless lie about a #Brexit dividend?#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Competition time. When talking to Zeit last year which country did @Nigel_Farage miss out on his list of countries that Brexit would benefit.... clue... it begins with a U  
EU threatens to ground ALL flights after BrexitWe could do the same with all EU flights & Airlines. Silly petulant move by Prospect Fear EU bullies, showing their TrueColours!  
After PM's speech with no wifi here's short version - 1. NHS getting a lot of extra £££ in exchange for reform 2. PM won't say who specifically is going to pay 3. No 10 stands by claim that Brexit dividend can be source of some of £££, uncertain at best, misleading at worst 
Will the #BrexitDividend be enough to fund an extra £20bn per year in NHS spending? The UK will no longer send £18bn to the EU, but the cost of Brexit could leave a shortfall of £38bn  
NEW: Lord Sewel - the man behind the Sewel Convention - backs UK government on Brexit powers row. Tells @BBCScotlandNews Brexit is a major adjustment and Westminster needs power to move ahead without consent. Argues there's no constitutional crisis. 
I know I owe you £10,000 but it’s OK, I will pay it with the Brexit Dividend. Either that or by selling photos I’ve taken up women’s skirts. 
My experience is that the second a Labour Supporter begins to allow for the possibility that Labour May be complicit in Brexit the journey is pretty short before they realise that this is undeniable.#stopbackingbrexit #fbpe 
In case you missed it."Jaw-dropping" £300 billion negative swing in foreign investment flows since Brexit  
I've suspected for a while that Brexit might actually stop May from leaving the ECHR.  
'Brexit was never really about immigration, and it's time Labour talked about that' | @ChukaUmunna 
“I have got quite bored of the forecasting world over the last few years. The Treasury, under George Osborne, said the world was going to end if the British people we voted for Brexit. It didn’t” @Annietrev #bbcdp 
There is no #Brexit dividend.However, there will be #Brexit bribes and #Brexit taxes. #Brexit bribes will be when the government relaxes austerity to pay for things. #Brexit taxes will be how the government will make the public pay for the #Brexit bribes. 
BOOST: Brexit means May can pump shed loads of cash into the NHS, top economists say.@Econs4FreeTrade think it would even leave £5bn left over for tax cuts! 
Federalism or decentralisation is only ever mentioned when Scottish independence gains support. It's all lies. Michael Gove said Scotland would get immigration controls post-Brexit, which has now been rejected. Gordon Brown's 'Vow' has also failed to materialise after four years. 
Brexit: Brussels bars aviation chiefs from preparing for no-dealWell done Barnier, you've just turned millions of moderate Remainers AND moderate Leavers into determined Leavers.  
"It's misleading and it's nonsense... There is no Brexit dividend - quite the opposite, it puts more pressure on our public finances." @normanlamb rips apart the Government claims of a Brexit dividend going to the NHS.  
The Tories will use Brexit to pile debt into Scotland. £5 Billion to leave EU, £2 Billion that they will borrow to give us for the NHS that we will need to pay back. It’s all a con. Independence is far cheaper option #DisolveTheUnion 
Protesting against Brexit outside the House of Lords - giving strength to those fighting for a meaningful vote on the final deal! #ExitFromBrexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote Remember to march with us all on Saturday! #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Given Lord Lawson's comments on Sky News today, this remains as relevant as ever. #Brexit  
Hearing  Johnson sing Trump's praises makes for disturbing listening. What is more disturbing, however, is Johnson's trivialisation of a matter as serious as Brexit. The monstrous combination of Trump, BoJo and Brexit would be the stuff of nightmares. 
If the Brexit bus was honest.  #BrexitDividend. 
So where we are is Theresa May has crossed her toes a “Brexit dividend”, against all odds, will materialise & if not she will search end of every   in November whilst Jeremy Hunt prepares for worse with warnings NHS chiefs will have to meet "very ambitious" efficiency goals 
Given the working age population overwhelmingly voted remain, I wonder how the electoral dynamics of them paying more tax to fool pensioners into thinking there is a brexit dividend is going to work out? 
Andrew Marr leads Tory sycophantic dribbling media as Deranged Magic Money Teereza is mocked for doubling Brexit Bus Dividend for the NHS as the OBR and entire country screams “THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND” Theresa May you absolute LIAR!!!!!  
You can't dispute the fact that we'll keep the vast sums we used to send to the EU - @HughRBennett on the Brexit dividend  pic.twitter.com/bLc9Q4Z5lK 
Many voted Leave because they thought meant more cash for NHS. Plausible but wrong - money paid to EU supports dozens of reg bodies Britain must  replicate & pay for solo after Brexit, plus growth will be lower. It’s tragic to see blatant lies coming from great office of state  
Unelected Patience Wheatcrofttells the plebs they didn't know what they were doing when they voted for #Brexit.The arrogance of these Peers is breathtakingThe sooner the House of Lords is abolished the betterWheatcroft was put in the Lords by the Tories & now she knifes them. 
Just heard our actual Prime Minister lie on TV. There is no such thing as a Brexit dividend. Pretending there is one is a lie. It’s a fiction and fabrication designed to deceive and mislead. It’s a lie. She is lying to us. Don’t fall for it. pic.twitter.com/2tEJWn2ggT 
How can a man live in France and Vote in the HoL on 'brexit', and yet his fellow 'commoner' UK Ex-Pats couldn't even Vote in the referendum ? 
I've found something funny about brexit. Haha funny.The Tories, the party of tax cutting, is going to have to go against everything they stand for and put up taxes.Christ...what are the Tories even for, if they don't cut taxes????  
I don’t want Brexit, but most of all this country needs the Tories run out of office, can’t people just unite on that? 
Jeremy Hunt left seething after the ‘Brexit dividend’ blows up in his face.By @wrightismight 
This is all pie in the sky. There is no Brexit dividend. The Labour manifesto set out how it would fund the NHS, rather than resorting to fantasy.  
"I'm ever so sick, papa""The Brexit Dividend will kick in any day now, you little remoaning fucking traitor" pic.twitter.com/uFLaFalIkH 
Y'know, I seen me a mermaid once.I even seen me a flying pig eat a unicorn.But I ain't never seen no #Brexit fucking 'dividend'#Brexit #BrexitShambles #BrexitDividendMyArse #StopBrexit#dontbrexitfixit 
The Govt.'s NHS spending pledge is inadequate & completely ignores social care, public health & prevention. No clarity on where money is coming from with no Brexit dividend. Cross-party involvement and careful planning needed for a genuinely long-term solution.  
The "Brexit dividend" would be better known as the "Brexit deficit" - how will the government fill the black hole that results?  
ICYMI: Cowardly of Scottish Tory MSP Miles Briggs to neither repeat nor challenge PM’s ‘Brexit Dividend’ this morning. And he's unable to explain where the money will come from to deliver on their NHS cash promises.@ScotTories totally spineless, again. #BBCGMS #FullGoldfish 
When even Nigel Farage doesn’t believe in the “brexit dividend” you know the game is up.Brexit truly is the “emperors new clothes” & we’re just waiting for the adults to admit it.  
Imagine being brazen enough to knowingly tweet an abomination of lies like this. Once again, "There is NO Brexit dividend" - The IFS.  
The only campaign worse than ‘remain’ in living memory is the ‘campaign’ for a second referendum. For something which is relatively plausible it has just completely alienated anyone it needed to build bridges with. Worse than useless. 
"The #Brexit dividend does not exist, it's like the Loch Ness Monster...so this is a political stunt and nothing more in my opinion." - Ulster University's @deirdreheenan tells #BBCTalkback she's not impressed by the government's NHS funding claims. 
This Caller Insisted The Brexit Dividend Exists To James O'Brien... It Didn't Go Well - LBC  @dontbrexitfixit @thesilverfox971 @MutliRaceMan @ThatTimWalker @HowarthJudd @BrexitBin @TheStephenRalph @David_T_Evans @City_Livery_SM @PatrickBHenry @MarieAnnUK 
Not saying she’s in cloud cuckoo land but if England win tonight Theresa May will probably claim it as a Brexit dividend.  
If @Conservatives had any sense their wiser heads would rescue their party from the Brexit zealots who control their party. With someone like Dominic Grieve as leader. They won’t. Unfortunately @UKLabour also need to be rescued from life-long Brexiters. 
Important day in the Lords as a we try again to change Withdrawal Bill to reflect need for parliament to have final say on government increasingly unhinged & deluded #Brexit negotiations #FBPE 
Today's Brexit Dividend earworm: "The lies on the bus go round and round, round and round, round and round" 
Do all those demanding a greater - more meaningful - Parliamentary role in Brexit not see irony in their position when the @EU_Commission negotiates treaties on behalf of member states in a process of secrecy presenting @Europarl_EN with take it or leave it vote at end?  
Why can't Brexiteers read this and stick to the facts. The NHS needs more resources that much I know as a former medical employee and now patient but this will not be funded through a Brexit dividend but in spite of Brexit and its OBR predicted associated costs to the UK economy.  
WATCH: @PaulWilliamsMP calls out Theresa May's 'baloney' Brexit dividend.There is no Brexit dividend, only a Brexit deficit. Please RT:  
All the main aspects of leaving the EU were fully debated in the referendum; customs union & trade deals, single market, subscriptions, ECJ, free movement, fisheries etc,  The country voted out. "Soft" Breixt is fake Brexit. A construct of the defeated political establishment. 
If only BBC Scotland had someone who could look into this 'Brexit dividend' claim and determine whether Scottish Tory boasts of a £2bn 'windfall' for Scotland were credible. Once the facts were established they could be covered on Reporting Scotland, GMS, Newsdrive and online.  
Referendum is imagination of people abroad. Everybody knows there is no referendum in Punjab. We want peace in Punjab, peace means stability, peace means everything should happen normally: #Punjab CM Amarinder Singh on AAP leader S.Khaira's remark on Referendum 2020 (Khalistan)  
This is the problem isn't it. People have faith in Brexit with no facts to back up their faith. This is not how the real world works. You can't just believe something and it will magically come true. This country is playing Chicken with reality. And we all know which will win. 
OPINION: Everything I know about history tells me Scotland's next chapter will be independenceHistorian Siobhan Tolland argues that Brexit is an English crisis in the denial phase of UK imperial decline & that the tide of history is heading towards indy  
In case you were wondering what was going on with Scotland and Brexit.  
Is anyone seriously going to believe in the £20bn NHS Brexit dividend #SaveOurNHS now @theresa_may 
Esp as Brexit "dividend" is a negative!! - on UK Gov's bad choice path, of about 6% damage to GDP.  
Why Remain rebels should call it a day on their Brexit veto, writes @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
I am pleased that the idea for a hypothecated new Health Tax seems to have been dropped. I am also pleased that those of us who argued a substantial part of the Brexit dividend should be used to meet increased future health costs have also been persuasive. 
Billboard campaign targets Labour MPs failing to oppose botched Brexit  
Our Future Our Choice  supposedly a "youth campaign to stop brexit", looking pretty astroturf here - their big event is not members doing stuff, it  is paying for two anti-Labour  billboard vans - one to drive around John McDonnell's constituency, the other Diane Abbott's.  
Doubtless some time in the future the Express will be forced to retract this lie & will post a little apology somewhere around page 6. These #Brexit lies are unparalleled in post-war British politics. They have already wholly perverted #Brexit democracy.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
May's attempt to appease the Brexiters by portraying the NHS funding boost as (partly) a "Brexit dividend" appears to have fooled absolutely no-one except the Brexiters. But as they were the only people she needed to fool, it could be viewed as a success. 
.@adamboultonSKY  challenges Nigel Lawson about applying for permanent residence to live in France.. A lot of people are saying you're not practicing what you preach.. you think #brexit is a great idea but you're not going to live through it#StopBrexit #FBPE @Andrew_Adonis 
There will be a Brexit dividend - but only with a clean break from the EU, says economist @DrGerardLyons 
Me seeing girls still wearing yes badges nearly a month after the referendum vs me seeing fellas suspiciously still wearing yes badges nearly a month after the referendum  
As @johnmcdonnellMP says...the Brexit Bonus does not exist!  
Ha!Theresa May has united the Country.YEPUnited in sheer disbelief at her disingenuous claim of a Brexit dividend to fund the NHS. 
Meghan Markle's father, Thomas Markle, has revealed that he had phone conversations with Prince Harry about Donald Trump and Brexit. (via ITV)  
#bbcdp Yasmin Alibhai - Brown on Skynews trying to derail Brexit. Got James I love myself  O’ Brien talking rubbish about Brexit every bloody day. Now got that halfwit Stephen Kinnock on Daily Politics another one trying to stop Brexit. Brexit won put some Brexiteers on FFS.  
So there we are. Former senior Tory advisor confirming this isn’t about a ‘Brexit dividend’ but trying to make up for years of cuts & squeeze which have pushed the NHS to the brink  
When you look up the meaning of the word 'Hypocrite', Lord Lawson is the name you will immediately see.. The man has no shame!! #EU #Brexit  
Just wait 'til Aussies find out how much of their produce the EU wants to exclude from the negotiations for a trade deal.Distinctive & original #Brexit research & news:  
“Theresa May squanders remains of threadbare credibility with barefaced NHS Brexit “dividend” lie”  
A report has found that in the best case scenario, Brexit barriers would cost every family £250 every year.In the worst case scenario, Brexit will cost every family £1,000 a year. 
Hi @BolshieBear - A #PeoplesVote  on all options, then we draw a line under Brexit - whatever the outcome so this zombie Parliament can do what WE pay them for - dealing with domestic causes that led to Brexit.  Please join #PeoplesVoteMarch this Saturday 23rd, 12.00, Pall Mall 
NEWS! People who believe in ‘Brexit Dividend’ urged to avoid people selling magic beans  
Erm, yes, that's sensible. Let's fund the NHS with an extra £20bn paid for by a non-existent Brexit dividend. Then the next day let's get the Health Secretary to admit the cost will in fact be met by tax increases. Yes, let's run with that. 
2/2 Tories opposed Scottish Parliament in 1997 when 74% of Scots voted for it. They never believed in it. Brexit was their chance to strike 
Theresa May’s credibility is in tatters after she dishonestly promised to pay for NHS spending partly via a “Brexit dividend” that doesn’t exist. This after last week double-crossing Tory MPs on a "meaningful vote". 
Sweden Democrats Calls for Referendum on EU: DI Reports 
Shambolic scenes this morning as even the Health Secretary has to admit that it’s unlikely the Brexit dividend actually exists. Where will the £20bn come from then? Could it be that tax rises and borrowing will fund our NHS after all? 
Let's be honest:• FBPE wants to ignore and overturn the EU ref.• The Tories want Hard Brexit. • Labour is the only Party that is respecting the result of the EU ref whilst trying to protect us from it's negative effects. Wow, looks like Corbyn's a Centrist, after all! 
Gareth Southgate’s modest expectations management of England’s World Cup prospects has been a wholesome relief from the usual bombastic hype. The banner of insular, unrealistic    over-optimism has now been taken up by England’s Brexit Team & it’s top striker (og) Boris Johnson 
This isn't to deny it is an important issue or to say that no young people care. Evidence shows we do care. But I just wish the millions being wasted asking Jeremy Corbyn to overturn Brexit would be spent on housing campaigns or mental health campaigns where it would be useful. 
I'll say it again: young people across the country continue to deny that Brexit is one of their most important political concerns. Why? 'Cus the young are mentally exhausted, get paid shit wages and get charged extortionate rent. Please stop saying we love the single market! 
Lord Lawson on @SkyNews: It will be a major disaster if the British people’s verdict in the 2016 referendum is thrown out  
Brexit Dividend = Spending money you don't have, to celebrate a deal you haven't done, to placate voters angry at not getting what they wanted... 
There is only INDEPENDENCE - nothing else makes sense, regardless of whether Brexit is on or off, hard or soft. #DissolveTheUnion 
Why can’t Theresa May be honest about Brexit? @InFactsOrg Liar, liar, pants on fire. Why on earth would the EU trust anything May says? 
Minsk taxi driver:- If he [Lukashenka] makes Kolya [Lukashenka Jr] his successor, there will be a revolution here, like in Armenia.- And what’s then?- Then we’ll hold a referendum and ask Putin to take us in, like Crimea. 
John Ashworth, (18.6.2018):  "No one credible believes Theresa May’s claims that her offer can be funded from a “Brexit dividend"". Jeremy Corbyn, (26.2.18): "We will use funds returned from Brussels after Brexit to invest in our public services". 
Straight to the point - loving the @FT this morning @PickardJE  #ThereIsNoBrexitDividend #Brexit @Open_Britain @WalesForEurope 
Incredibly concerning - High Brexit import tariffs and regulatory barriers could cost families over £1,000 each as consumers would pick up the cost of disruption in businesses and supply chains.  
"It isn't enough, quite frankly."Chief Executive of the Health Foundation, Dr Jennifer Dixon, says the government's pledge of a £20 billion NHS boost after Brexit will "stem deterioration", but won't modernise the service.  
Sky News, Lord Lawson talking Turkey. “Most of the world isn’t in the European Union”.I’m grateful for his insight, my Brexit education is now complete.#FBPE @SkyNews 
The Labour Party don’t want Scotland to get a deal over the  Brexit/Devolution  Power Grab As it would give them a Red Face over their Capitulation in Wales               Still doing the Tories Dirty work for them  
There. Is. No. Brexit. Dividend.  
How would you like to increase funding in the NHS and other public services?1. Tory Plan: Brexit Pixiedust & 2%+ Tax/NI Increases On Every Tax Payer.2. Labour Plan: Tax Increases On Those Earning Over £80k, Close Tax Avoidance Loopholes, Reversing Corporation Tax Cuts. 
If we stayed in the EU we would benefit from the outcome of the trade deal that will come from these negotiations.If we #Brexit we won’t.We need to #ExitFromBrexit to maximise our opportunities for trade deals.#PeoplesVote 
Walking through Barcelona this morning with a big smile on my face, listening to @mrjamesob on his @LBC radio show imitating aurally the potential sound of #Brexter politicians going #FullGoldfish . Humour aside - James is revealing #Brexit to be bogus and a complete con. 
Theresa May’s party took us into a referendum that Scotland didn’t want and is now leading us into a Brexit we voted against. And the SNP is right to stand its ground.                       -You Just Can’t Trust a Tory-  
Not only did Corbn give a speech claiming there would be a Brexit Dividend to invest in the NHS, he pre-briefed the line to the Sunday Mirror.  
Could this be the reason she is taking the country to destruction via a hard #Brexit ? Couple this with the info @J_amesp and @carolecadwalla have been revealing for over a year and you get a sense of why. 
Tories.There is a Brexit dividend but there is no Power GrabThere is a Brexit dividend but there is no Power GrabThere is a Brexit dividend but there is no Power GrabThere is a Brexit dividend but there is no Power GrabThere is a Brexit dividend but there is no Power Grab  
Disappointing to see @suellaBraverman adopt the dishonest #Brexit fallacy that we pay £10bn dues to EU for 0 in return. What we get is worth £100bn & includes frictionless trade, 40+ essential govt agencies like EURATOM & schemes like Erasmus. Where will the £ for THAT come from?  
East Renfrewshire Tory MP Paul Masterton is backing BREXIT. 39,345 people in his constituency want to remain in the EU. 74% of his electorate. It is Mr. Masterton that is failing - not only Scotland - but his own constituents. Another one of Ruth's Rubber stamps for Theresa.  
So the IFS says the OBR has said public finances £15bn worse becase of #Brexit vote. Neither of them know. They're just comparing pre-referendum forecasts (dodgy) with current forecasts (dodgy).  
All this bollocks about a "people's vote" on Brexit... who are we thinking voted the last time? Badgers? 
Govt funding for #NHS = fantasy finance. Why do they keep lying to the good people of Britain?  There's no magic money tree, there's no Brexit dividend. Stop manipulate the public!NHS cash: questions that gnaw at  May’s funding plan  via @financialtimes 
Not true. Remainers (and economists) are saying the money isn’t coming, as claimed, from a Brexit Dividend. Because there is no Brexit Dividend. Very different from what you’re claiming. 
One thing that Brexit has done is show everybody what our politicians think of the opinions of ordinary people. 
If we do not leave the EU, there are over 17 million of us looking for a new party to back, and it will NOT be the labour party or the tories. It will be a party who WILL deliver Brexit, even if that is the ONLY thing they do, or the only thing we agree with them on, 
Women of the UK, this is for you. If you want your children to have the same rights and freedom we had, we are going to have to fight for them. Be part of the UK Freedom March in London this Saturday ...#Brexit #FreeSpeech #FreeTommy 
‘No deal’ Brexit would cost UK households £1,000 “weekly grocery shop up by £5.50, family meal for 4 at high st chain up £9 and a pair of trainers to cost £6.75 more”  
Good on @Anna_Soubry to call out her PMs lie about the #Brexit dividend. May has zero credibility.  
The government is currently arguing that the Brexit dividend of at least minus £27billion will fund an increased NHS spending of £20billion and nobody is really questioning their maths 
Poll: what type of #Brexit do you want? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Pretty sure the intent of this poster is not really to rally support for another referendum or to campaign against Brexit, it is intended to undermine McDonnell & Corbyn within the Labour party.  
For anyone who doubts the deep affection of the Brexit campaign for Putin, here is a handy compilation of Leave EU's love letters to Putin 
so even Farage doesn’t believe in the “Brexit dividend”? (Hat tip @SarahRosemary3) 
Hunt admits 'Brexit dividend' won't be 'anything like enough' to fund PM's £20bn boost for NHS - Politics live  
Because the BBC rules, probably rightly, don't allow you to be opinionated in work *outside* the BBC and at this peculiar junction in British political history I couldn't wind my neck in on Trump & Brexit in my day job on @LBC.  
Just out in #openaccess! My piece in @NPEjournal on the UK's post-#Brexit trade policy and the role of experts, emotion and spatial imaginaries (notably of the #Anglosphere). Read it here:  
Hmm. Interesting/confusing. How does this work, @andywigmore & @Arron_banks? You were both Belizean diplomats while organising/funding the Brexit campaign. It's being suggested here, that contravenes Vienna convention. Anyone?  
BBC News - Brexit barriers could cost households £1k each, report argues  
Can we have a sweep on the first Corbynite to begin to peddle the line today that Labour will enjoy a Brexit dividend, but the Tories won't. 
'The decision taken by the Prime Minister was NOT backed up by due diligence: there were no impact assessments, no consultation. #Brexit in its current form would create executive rule – in effect, a dictatorship.'  #stopbrexit #EUWithdrawalBill #article50challenge #Parliament 
Kensington Palace is refusing to comment on Thomas Markle’s claims that Prince Harry told him to “give Trump a chance” and that the sixth in line to the throne was open to Brexit. 
#IsupportVinceCable Evidence mounts of Russian interference in EU referendum, as in US election. Corbyn doesn't want to know. He wants Brexit. Gov't conniving to push it thru w lies, intimidation. More of us are daring to say, unimaginable as it seems: *treason* Pls support Vince  
When Remainers challenge the future Brexit dividend, they highlight the absurdity of the exorbitant amount of cash we wire to Brussels each week. I'm not sure it'll boost support for their cause. 
Seeing as how Theresa May is giving us #NationalStephenLawrence Day and #Windrush celebration day, why hadn’t she made 23rd June a #UKFreedom day? I’ll tell you why. She has no belief whatsoever in Brexit. 
Think of the 'Brexit Dividend' as the Brexit Bus mk2:1/  
T May's NHS move enrages Remainers (who want Brexit to fail) and the Left (which wants the NHS to fail under the Tories) and makes low-tax Righties uneasy. Voters, meanwhile, quite possibly think 'hmmn, yes, that's sensible'. 
Monstering of Grieve:1. honest TV answer2. Guido selective quoting3. Hard Brexit MPs amplify4. “Traitor” & violent threatsAnd he’s a white man. Imagine what Anna Soubry’s inbox looks like. And then Diane Abbott’s.  
Cabinet should minute its apology to the British people for the Prime Minister lying about the Brexit dividend  
Me, loading £100 worth of stuff from ASOS into my checkout: “It is actually okay because of the Brexit Dividend.” 
Incredible, too, to think it's a dyed-in-the wool Labour man like Dennis who wants to hurt the poorest in our society by imposing Brexit upon them, and it's Ken - a One Nation Tory - who wants to spare them it.  
Pleased Theresa May is finally talking about NHS funding, though there is a total lack of clarity about where it will come from, what she has proposed is below 4% felt to be minimum to make improvements, & dressing it up as a Brexit advert is disingenuous at best.#BrexitDividend 
Peter Schrank on Theresa May’s extra £20 billion Brexit dividend for the NHS - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Never underestimate speed with which country’s constitutional values can change. Brexit involves huge power grab by executive from Parl. Exec more willing to lie than any previously.  Norm becomes massively more powerful PM, uninhibited by truth. 
2. Meeting is to discuss NHS announcement generally - would be worth being fly on wall to hear if Hammond says anything on the supposed Brexit dividend that Treasury doesn’t believe in 
"It is also emphatically not a Brexit dividend."The Brexit dividend does not exist. Please RT so everybody knows:(£)  
Labour in govt substantially increased investment in the NHS via a national insurance rise & produced a detailed credible long term plan. Yesterday we were told ‘Brexit dividend’ now it’s tax rises not yet worked out. This Tory NHS offer is a shambles   
No Iain. I think remainders are saying the money won’t be from Brexit. See any of today’s papers.  
So typical! The ‘£20 billion over 5 years’ is a CUT in cash for the NHS - because Brexit is making the UK poorer!  
Summary:1. I oppose Brexit.2. And so, as a member of the Lords, I'm just doing the job I've been unelected to do.3. Namely, to overturn a democratic vote to leave Our EU.4. Yet the Daily Mail claims I'm "an enemy of the people"!5. Talk about disrespect!6. That's all, folks!  
Dominic Grieve and his followers need to think about the consequences for Britain if they keep blocking Brexit  
A lot of people have told me recently that Brexit is dead. 1) It’s not. 2) Even if it dies tomorrow the damage it has already done to so many lives can never be undone.  
We asked Sinn Fein's @moneillsf #HowWillBrexitBenefitMe?Her reply was short and to the point. The people of Ireland do not want #Brexit.Neither do we.#StopBrexitSaveBritain #SODEMaction 
I’m head to head with Lord Lawson on Sky at 1010. I will ask him to disown the lie of a Brexit dividend, as Mrs Thatcher’s former Chancellor  
Govt comms service (GCS) ethical guidance provides statements should not be – or liable to be – misrepresented as being party political. Describing NHS increase as Brexit dividend is party political. Min Code (para 6.3)requires compliance with GCS code. PM/ Health Sec in breach. 
I'm often critical but John Humphrys forcing Jeremy Hunt off the absurd Brexit dividend claim on @bbcr4today just now was well and forensically done. 
Dear .@theresa_may I invite you, as PM, to take part in a live [rather than pre-recorded]  television interview on NHS funding & your so-called magic Brexit Dividend. I’m sure the public are keen to understand exactly what you mean. Many thanks. 
Separately, the former president has revealed that she voted yes in last months referendum on the Eighth Amendment with a "heart and a half" and has no intention of going to confession for it. Ms McAleese said she had met Savita who was a "beautiful" woman  
'Theresa May has ruined the remains of her credibility with NHS Brexit “dividend” lie' 
May double-crossed Grieve over Brexit – this is a constitutional crisis | Andrew Adonis  
.@Jeremy_Hunt on @BBCr4today claiming unconvincingly that there will be a #Brexit dividend to pay for extra NHS cash. I am pressing the UK Stats Auth to clamp down on these bogus claims. 
What type of Brexit do you want?#mondaymotivation #itscominghome 
Democracy is the Will of the People, right?Which is a better reflection of the Will of the People:A vote where people can see the deal they're signing, or one where they can't?So which would be more democratic:The 2016 #VoteInTheDark Referendum or a #PeoplesVote on the deal? 
Wow!!!! This Theresa May NHS Brexit Dividend is an absolute Basketcase not only is there no £20Bn for the NHS the Tories have got to find £38bn extra.. FFS!!! From SkyNews  
I expect this from Boris Johnson but Theresa May spouting the same NHS lie shows she's adopted full blown Trump style fake news in her desperation over Brexit. Even her own MPs don't trust her now. Neither do EU negotiators. Why should we? #PeoplesVote 
Hey, Mr DJ,  Turn that record off, it's broken.Have some respect for the people who follow you. You're celebrating a Brexit dividend that you know doesn't exist. 
Isn’t getting Thomas Markle to talk about Harry, Trump and Brexit taking advantage of his naivety all over again? 
This is good. @anneapplebaum explains the Bad Boys of Brexit’s Russian gold deal to the US. Key paragraph on the man in the middle: @nigel_farage 
An unelected body, the House of Lords is appearing contemptuous of both the referendum result and the manifesto commitments of both main parties at the last general election, writes former Brexit Minister @DavidJonesMP 
While the magic money forest is being pruned without any notion of fiscal responsibility can I please push you to as a minimum fund schools as you had promised in your manifesto instead of the cuts we see across education, we need investment in skills #brexit @PhilipHammondUK 
What’s that, Skippy?!  There’s a new fleet of Brexit buses? And they’re headed this way?! #BrexitDividendMyArse#BrexitDividend#BrexitTax#ThereIsNoBrexitDividend#ThereIsNoDividend#Brexit#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote#FinalSayForAll#PMQs#bbcdp#bbcqt 
Hi @mrjamesob please tackle this NHS Brexit Dividend lie today. Then maybe half an hour on football 
"our analysis shows that any scenario will increase costs for UK households"This is exactly why so many are calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT  
Theresa May now lost ‘one nation’ Tories who have rumbled her as the Anthony Eden of Brexit  
The Tories own figures point out Brexit will cost the UK economy around £15 billion a year, so the fact they're trying to push this extra NHS funding as a Brexit dividend isn't just farcical, it's totally and utterly false. The hard-right now control the Conservative party. 
Is the "Brexit Dividend" the most blatant lie of the lot? The Govt's own figures show that leaving the EU will cost us many billions a year.  This is really desperate stuff from May.  The wheels are coming of that red bus.  
Theresa May has brought the country together........For the first time ever we are all aligned; public journalists, economists, civil servants, TV presenters, rival parties, even her own MPs all agree...there is NO Brexit Dividend, she is 100% lying and completely isolated. 
This is what your face looks like when it's 7.20 on a Monday morning and your boss has asked you to explain a Brexit dividend that simply doesn't exist.  
As many of you know I have long since expected that people will be sent to the "picking fields" to make up for shortage of foreign workers post #brexit. Well here it is masked as "improving prisoner job prospects". It was always going to be spun as that.  
After a weekend of Theresa May talking about a "Brexit Bonus", BBC (Yes- BBC!) Shows what it will be - MINUS billions under any Brexit scenario. 
Tory MSP Miles Briggs all over the place on GMS in trying to “defend” TMs spin re  ‘Brexit dividend’. Reality, on the day BCoC downgrades UK economic forecast, is Brexit will cost at least £15billion. 
Theresa May is politically bankrupt after lying about a Brexit “dividend”  
The government plans to announce £20bn extra funding for the #NHS today. This means higher borrowing or higher taxes - as @PJTheEconomist tells the BBC, there is no Brexit dividend  
The power of parliament is literally:1. the entire basis of the British constitution 2. The entire basis of the #brexit referendum It’s almost like Theresa May believes everyone is stupid.  
Monday briefing: NHS windfall is 'Brexit dividend tosh', says Tory MP  
BREAKING NEWS: Thomas Markle, father of Meghan, reveals exclusively to @GMB that Prince Harry told him he is ‘open to the experiment of Brexit’ and thinks President Donald Trump should be ‘given a chance’. We’ll be speaking again to Thomas live in a few minutes.  
Dacre & now David Dimbleby (host of Mr Farage 32 times on @bbcquestiontime) going. If Humphrys, @AndrewMarr9 & @afneil retire, we will reform #BrexitBroadcastingCorporation in time to have an impartial BBC and a rational Daily Mail for next referendum. It’s coming together ...  
Brexit is also voluntary austerity   
Well done Frank. The House of Lords signed its own death warrant over Brexit and it needs to be put down. You may not succeed this time but it’s now inevitable. 
You know what, if you’re still falling for the idea that there will be a Brexit dividend, fuck you. There’s no helping you. All the info is out there & you choose to ignore it. You’re a fucking moron. 
#Brexit: Amazing record of myths collected by @EUlondonrep! Could deserve more than 300,000 views for a UK population of how many? ... Share #MondayMotivation for exposing lies, upholding truths, informing thinking... #BrexitDividend 
.@theresa_may lying to us about a Brexit dividend, pledging more money for the NHS, and demands from her MPs to fix the housing crisis... I smell one thing: a General Election. 
This article is massively unhelpful for @The3Million and @BritishInEurope.  Theresa May is refusing to ask for free movement for Brits in Europe even though many British careers and families will be wrecked without it.  #Brexit  
Brexit power grab will 'haunt Tories for a generation like poll tax' - @IanBlackfordMP: 
Brexit is austerity without end & will ultimately discredit the Conservatives. And btw, rows about political lies are never pointless. Truth wins in a democracy, given time. Your ‘Brexit dividend’, on top of the £350m a week for the NHS from Brexit, is shameful & seen as such  
Prince Harry spoke to Thomas Markle about #Brexit. His father-in-law tells @GMB Harry thinks Brexit is ‘an experiment’ that ‘we have to try’. All a little too close to the political debate for the Royal Family ...  
“It is also emphatically not a Brexit dividend ....but is as mendacious as the lie on the big red bus”   
Paying for sovereignty we already hadTaking back control we had all alongEnforcing borders we already enforced Paying a #BrexitTax for something we could've had all alongExplain again why #Brexit isn't a con?#ThereIsNoBrexitDividend 
This is why @KensingtonRoyal won’t welcome Thomas Markle’s interview on @GMB. He’s talking about his conversation with Prince Harry about Donald Trump and Brexit   
Prince Harry is open to Brexit and wanted Trump to be given a chance - extraordinary Thomas Markle live interview NOW on @GMB with @piersmorgan & @susannareid100 
The history of liberty is a history of resistance - Woodrow Wilsonc @PicPublic #history #brexit #dogsoftwitter 
Andrew Marr leads Tory sycophantic dribbling media as Deranged Magic Money Teereza is mocked for doubling Brexit Bus Dividend for the NHS as the OBR and entire country screams “THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND” Theresa May you absolute LIAR!!!  
JUST IN - Antiguans & Barbudans to go to the polls again on November 6th to vote in a referendum - some eight months after its General Elections; vote is to determine if Antigua & Barbuda should make the CCJ the nation's final court of appeal  
#UPDATE Ivan Duque wins Colombia's presidential election after a campaign that turned into a referendum on a peace deal with FARC rebels he pledges to overhaul  
"a supermarket chain with annual takings of £10bn would see profits fall by a third. Prices would need to rise by 2.3% to compensate....."BBC News - Brexit trade barriers could cost UK £27bn, report argues  
 #TheRainMakers  @realDonaldTrump being a racist is the worst thing you can say about somebody.  It is such a charged accusation.I think people should be very careful before they level that accusation at others. #MAGA #KAG #Brexit #EndEU 
The feeling of betrayal over Brexit is already making for some ugly politics  
Next election will be a referendum on the ABC! LNP out! #auspol 
PM May's Brexit plans set for defeat, teeing up Wednesday showdown  
Found some coverage of explosive new Brexit-Trump-Russia revelations in ⁦@washingtonpost⁩ thanks to @anneapplebaum⁩’s column but not a word in @nytimes. 
April 5th 2016. A debate between Vincentè Fox & Nigel Farage at the University of Maryland in the US. Farage flew to the United States right in the middle of UK Referendum on the EU ie; Brexit. I have questions @LouiseMensch@thespybrief@JamesFourM 
Brexit: misdirection - In days gone by, politicians at least pretended to believe their own lies. But when blatant distortion on NHS funding becomes the norm, politics ceases to function. Mrs May's misdirection is a wholly destructive force...  #Brexinfo. 
Despite multiple denials, Roger Stone has finally admitted to  a 2016 meeting with a Russian operative. Despite multiple denials. Nigel Farage was 'hooked up' with Donald Trump in 2016 by, Roger Stone. The source of this info? Roger Stone. Small world 
Yes indeed @IanDunt The lie that the people decided brexit in the referendum was exposed in court 3 of the Royal Courts of Justice last Tuesday.  
18/Anyway, to conclude: don’t any of you armchair campaigners, generals and revolutionaries - who are courageously tweeting about Brexit dare to criticise Dominic Grieve for lacking courage. The guy is an absolute hero.// 
11/..but have a look at what they have done with this edited clip (NB: I’m breaking my own rule here of never retweeting Brexit liars and zealots, and AltShite sowers of polarisation- but this has to be seen to be believed):  
9/...the Brexit machine hates Grieve. He is dangerous to what they are trying to achieve. They know he is reasonable and convincing and extremely careful in what he says. He doesn’t grandstand or bluster. He makes few mistakes that they can use against him. So... 
And on the NHS Brexit dividend it’s been:1. Let’s spend the dividend on the NHS;2. We said we could spent it on the NHS not that we would;3. We never said there’d be more for the NHS;4. If we did no-one was dumb enough  to believe it;5. Let’s spend the dividend on the NHS. 
NEW! Tees Valley Mayor, @BenHouchen, writes for the #FREER blog about how powerful post-Brexit Free Ports offer the North the chance to take back control and play its part in the UK’s economic success  
#BREXITCounting down the days.  
IT'S HAPPENINGThe nationalist Swedish Democrat party wants to have a referendum in Sweden to LEAVE the EU.In some of the latest polls they have been the BIGGEST political party in Sweden. 
Scale of irrational beliefs, in descending order of credibility:Flat Earth.Santa Claus.Tooth Fairy.England World Cup Victory.Brexit Dividend. 
Brexit dividends:  
Mobilisation gathering apace.‘The National Campaign Against Fees and Cuts (NCAFC) said it would join anti-Brexit demonstrations the National Union of Students (NUS) is organising this summer and autumn’  
Disappointed by the @BBC’s coverage of the so-called “Brexit Dividend”?Worried @BBCNews is turning into a Brexit mouthpiece for the PM and Brexiters - a #BrexitBroadcastingCorporation?Make sure your concerns are noted - make a formal complaint here: 
Begs the question, why was George Cottrell released by the FBI if they had him dead to rights hiding money for drug traffickers? Oh, that's right, George is about to screw the Brexit badboys & @RussianEmbassy . LOLZ Hello @Nigel_Farage@LouiseMensch@thespybrief@ericgarland 
Theresa May spent the day trying to insinuate that her desparate NHS injection will be a Brexit Dividend. Brexit will decimate government finances - there will be NO dividend. The PM is lying in a popularist move to gain some sadly lacking credibility... #BrexitShambles #r4today 
You out of a job is a Brexit dividend  
Two instructive things about this accidentally leaked briefing.1. On Brexit and the border, ministers’ briefings actually contain the same nonsense that they say publicly, including in the background sections. Alarmingly, they may actually believe it. 1/  
A Bulgarian friend just sent me this with the caption: "What a time to live in Brexit land".Really brimming with national pride...  
We should all be very worried that our Government feels it can lie with impunity about ‘Brexit’ money for the NHS, and that our national broadcaster (The BBC) feels compelled to repeat that lie. Brexit will cut spending by c.£15Bn pa. That’s the truth. 
A sad and poignant poem by my twelve-year old son about Brexit. His homework was to write about a cause he felt strongly about....  
Over the coming months, it is imperative that the PM, the government, as well as Brexiteers, come together to promote a positive vision for Brexit. We will be a strong, prosperous and independent country once more. My  piece in;  via  
Documents seen by the Observer suggest that Andy Wigmore, spokesman for the Leave EU campaign and the business partner of the biggest funder of Brexit, passed confidential FBI docs to officials at the Russian embassy and then denied it to parliament.  
Dominic Grieve says Tory rebels are prepared to “collapse the government” to block a “catastrophic” Brexit deal. @iancollinsuk asks: Would you respect such a move? 
Wonder how BREXIT happened?EXHIBIT A.:  
When brexit is dead I will : - Carry on hanging Eu flags- Post pics of what I ate for lunch- carry on look forward, not backwardWhat will you do when brexit is dead?#whenbrexitisdeadiwill ..... 
I was a supporter of Audit the Vote (by @DrJillStein and @putinRF) at @heatstreet before @20committee warned me off it, so I can be sympathetic to the desire to redo a vote that was unfairly targeted by Russia  #Brexit 
'Theresa May has ruined remains of credibility with NHS Brexit “dividend” lie' May was telling porkies or she's lost all grip on reality, says the Mirror. 
The intern has been asking if the “Brexit dividend” means pay rises all round. The boss was not amused. 
"This Wealthy Tycoon is Behind a New Shadowy Group Running Ads Attacking Electoral Reform in BC." Make sure you get out & vote for #ProportionalRepresentation in BC's November referendum. Precisely because big money doesn't want you to. #bcpoli #pr4bc 
A reasonable question for @theresa_may: where are you getting this "dividend" from because it sure as hell isn't from Brexit.  
Aren't facts supposed to be sacred in Guardian Towers? 'The Bad Boys of Brexit' is not an autobiography, it is a diary. I'd have thought as a journalist you'd know the difference. I'm surprised you've only just started reading it. Odd that. Bloody good, isn't it?  
Corbyn could bring down this Govt if he opposed Brexit, but that would then involve him having to do some work.  
Just had a thought about the Tory NHS "Brexit Bonus" plan.Let's say they increase income tax in England to pay for it.But if they spend it on NHS England, that means Barnett Consequentials for Scotland.But Scotland wouldn't have to increase income tax...<opens popcorn> 
Theresa May says extra #NHS funding will come from #Brexit *and* that 'Parliament cannot tie hands of Government'.1. We have no concrete deal. She made this claim up.2. That Parliament is sovereign is the most basic principle of constitutional law.This is embarrassing.  
The Basketcase Tories and their lying Prime Minister and Media Militia FFS!!! Choppers at the Telegraph still claiming a Brexit Dividend will be going to the NHS!!!  
What independence supporters have this weekend:A brilliantly focused campaign, successfully shifting the media’s narrative on Brexit and independence and attracting thousands of people to a movement ready to get to work.What unionists have this weekend:The pun “grievo max”. 
The Bad Boys of Brexit - aka @Arron_banks's 'autobiography' as ghosted by @IsabelOakeshott - is the gift that keeps on giving. Look! It was @Nigel_Farage who got the charge sheet....which is you, know, interesting. 
German MEP reveals 'Bavarian revolt' could STOP EU's Brexit bullying amid threat to Merkel  
#Leave won (they claim)#Remain lost#Remain are campaigning hard because #Brexit will damage jobs, the economy and people's lives.Why are #Leave still trying to sell #Brexit to the public. If it was going to be a huge success, just sit back and gloat.....unless............ 
the idea of an immediate “Brexit dividend” is bogus because a) the £350m payments figure was gross b) we are still making payments until 2023  c) damage to GDP/tax base could outweigh current payments Here’s today’s @FT explainer 
~£500m per year increase, which is about 3.8% growth annually but since that would alter over compound, more likely 2.8% annually. In other words, roughly the same level of increase ScotGov were planning WITHOUT your Brexit dividend. Will you commit to not being misleading? 
I just saw the execrable Suella Fernandes of the ERG shamelessly lying that there is a #Brexit dividend. The Brexit economic slowdown has already cost the government budget more than the cost of the UK's net contribution to the EU, and the damage has barely begun.#StopBrexit 
It’s a disgrace that @BBCNews gives any credibility whatsoever to the government lie that there is a #Brexit dividend, when the economy and public finances will be badly hit by Brexit. The @bbc is colluding in #FakeNews 
Whether it’s slagging Labour off prematurely for what was a successful public engagement venture, or lauding Theresa May for her ‘Brexit Dividend’ shtick, the media don’t even stop to draw breath before they vomit it all over the public sphere. Public Relations on speed! 
So @johnmcdonnellMP why can't you say it as it really is, that the PM has blatantly and shamefully lied by claiming that there is a #Brexit dividend? It's so sad to see Labour's ability to oppose so hamstrung by its collusion with Tories on #Brexit. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Maajid Nawaz pulls apart Theresa May's new NHS spending plan: "What Brexit dividend?" 
."The Tories are making a real mess of Brexit. Yet instead of showing real leadership by joining the Liberal Democrats in opposing the Government, and supporting a referendum on the final deal, Labour is idly standing by.". 
The pro-EU establishment in this country feels perfectly free to veto the instructions of the ­British ­people:  #Brexit 
The EU is facing an existential crisis – but it is migration, not Brexit, that will be its undoing, writes @CitySamuel 
So far, Neil, all the evidence suggests that the lies told about Brexit mostly came from Remainers & Project Fear.  People like you, in fact.  
Great to see so many people in media and politics tweeting up a storm that there is NO Brexit dividend.Quite correct.Maybe tomorrow you could do Jobs First Brexit and Customs Unions that let you negotiate all your own trade deals.It’s all lies.....also unicorns don’t exist. 
The government's own experts say that the UK would be economically worse off in EVERY possible Brexit scenario. That means LESS money.So... How can I say this politely?.... Out of exactly where are they pulling this #BrexitDividend? 
Now this one's a keeper.*Deleted* Soubry post from 2011, saying how bad the #EU is, but still anti a referendum on it. She'd probably hate this to be tweeted out when she's next up on her hind legs in the HoC trying to stop us leaving.So you won't, will you?  
What a load of old tosh. Brexit dividend?! Utter make believe nonsense. #BrexitShambles 
This ‘Brexit dividend’ - conjuring profit where there is none - resembles some of the more egregious accounting scams I cover in Bean Counters. Up there with Enron.  
More doubts about how the #Brexit #Referendum was won as Leave. EU faces new questions over contacts with #Russia 
In case you were wondering what was going on with Scotland and Brexit.  
Theresa May’s “BREXIT DIVIDEND FOR THE NHS” is a BLATANT ATTEMPT TO MILEAD THE PUBLIC! Don’t let her get away with it! PLEASE RT!  
We’ve entered a new age . Open propaganda from PM using the state to disseminate it re Brexit ‘dividend’ . Stating the executive branch of the govt is not governed by HoC- a direct assault on our constitution. If you’re not terrified you’re not paying attention . #Brexit  
Typically annoying facts from @sallygainsbury. In addition, of course, there is no "Brexit dividend". The OBR says Brexit will lose the UK money and tax receipts will go down. The UK govt has officially accepted that. Yet PM pretends there's a Brexit dividend money tree...  
If for the fact the damage from brexit will hit remainers too, I sometimes wish brexit would happen just to see desperate leavers beg to get back in the EU asap! Nah, just #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
It's not activism or a vendetta. MAJOR public interst1/ You're the biggest bankroller of Brexit. 2/ Many questions about data use, undeclared donations3/ Russian gold allegationsIt would be remiss of any public minded journalist to ignore this. Until you give proper answers 
The document included the British government’s position should questions be asked about Brexit, the DUP fines story, Billy Caldwell, abortion, legacy issues, economic issues, restoration of Stormont, MLA pay, Grenfell/Belfast tower blocks etc. 
'We could collapse the Government' Grieve sends stark threat to May over Brexit concession  
Would Brexit mean more money for the NHS?#BrexitDividend 
Meet ‘Posh George’: The Shady Money Man Tangled Up With Brexit, Russia, and Trump  
This is just nonsense.  If she believes it she is not capable of understanding simple arithmetic.  If she doesn’t she is deliberately lying about an impending disaster.  Perhaps it is a bit of both. #Brexit  
George Cottrell, a Farage aide and Brexit booster, was arrested by the FBI after attending the GOP convention in 2016 -- and  exec Andy Wigmore forwarded legal docs about it to Russian embassy officials  
Tory rebellions against May's Brexit plans 'could bring down government'  
Watching @bbcthisweek. Oh what a pity @acgrayling wasn't allowed to stay on for the whole show. The more he's on TV the better for the Brexit side of the argument. 
May announces #Brexit dividend And the experts say: rubbish-Tomorrow’s Guardian  
Even her own MPs don’t believe!the Prime Minister....May's claim of 'Brexit dividend' for NHS dismissed as 'tosh'  
Ever get the feeling that a large number of people voted for Brexit because they were sick of liars and charlatans leading the country (whether they realised or not).And since the vote the liars and charlatans have surpassed themselves. The future is bleak. 
And lying about Brexit without being properly called out by the broadcast media  
This is the only ‘Brexit dividend’  
Post-Brexit trade deal with India making excellent progress, according to London correspondent for @the_hindu ... 
Disgraceful BBC parroting of Mrs May’s fictional NHS ‘Brexit dividend’: proof of #BrexitBroadcastingCorporation 
Just had a look at @Arron_banks twitter feed....that famous 'Banksmore' sense of humour appears to have disappeared quicker than a Belizean diplomatic passport!#BadBeautsOfBrexit 
I stated that no Leave voter could still possibly believe in the Brexit dividend.Let us see if I am right or Unicornist are still among us.Brexit dividend: 
Good new insight here and follow up on @carolecadwalla piece on George Cottrell: why was Andy Wigmore alerting a Russian to Cottrell's arrest? Notes some of Cottrell's background #RussianLaundromat and his role as Brexit fundraiser  
May is now aping Trump so disgracefully with her straight lies on the Brexit dividend, former mandarins say the civil service is being compromised  
This picture sums up #Brexit.You cannot please everyone. If you set out to please all, you will please nobody, except for Soros, Miller, and the Grieve's, Morgan's and Soubry's of this world. Just please the majority   
Here is the route for the march from Stirling to Bannockburn  #MarchForScotland #indymarch #AUOB #AUOBBannockburn Please take the time to support Scotland against the Tories (Brexit. Power grab)&all that has&is coming with&through them. #StandUpForScotland together #WeAreScotland 
Here's a piece I wrote about the #PowerGrab @theSNP #Brexit and my "Journey to Yes" as an Englishman living in Ayrshire. 
As a #leavernow i appreciate the environmental benefits of #Brexit withdrawal from the open skies agreement will decimate the aviation industry and many others will be ruined by pulling out of the EU. Poverty is the best way to reduce our national carbon footprint 
I think we're going end up with a referendum rather than a general election, Gina Miller says  
Is the Brexit Dividend another lie?Spoiler: Yes  
Today @theresa_may knowingly lied to the country while in public office. She knows there is no "Brexit Dividend" and the announced additional NHS funding will come from tax rises and increased borrowing. She can't be trusted to tell the truth. That is why we must #StopBrexit 
They are so totally obsessed with making sure #Brexit doesn’t happen,  
Seriously is this Andrew Marr’s ‘defence’ for not calling out Theresa May’s Brexit Dividend (lying made up bullsh**) to pay for £20Bn NHS is that it was talked about on another BBC programme and Polly Toynbee mentioned it in the Paper Review?!? FFS!! Is this guy for real?  
There is NO BREXIT DIVIDEND!!!!!They must think all Leave voters are morons if they believe they will get away with this one.  
I think 'Brexit dividend' is my favourite oxymoron of the week. 
If #Brexit has taught us anything, is that our Supreme Court has to be the highest court of the land, not the ECJ. Our democratically elected officials accountable to the people of Britain, never again can these most of basic principles be compromised EVER again. 
There is no #Brexit dividend, only a massive Brexit cost!  
Director Of The Institute For Fiscal Studies: There Is No Brexit Dividend - LBC @LBC 
Good job Corbynistas are paranoid cranks whinging about media bias...GE2017:- Labour's COSTED manifesto = "magic money tree" "how will you pay?" X1000- Tories UNCOSTED manifesto: media reaction =  New unproven Tory "Brexit dividend" Media reaction =  
My MP Dominic Grieve thinks #brexit is risky, bad for the U.K. and would rather it did not happen, that’s why he voted #Remain.He says #stopbrexit could happen if there is a major change in public opinion. I will writing a more detailed letter about #Remainernow campaign later! 
Fantastic piece by @DPJHodges. The Tory rebels had a worthy cause but they overreached & now it’s time to stop before they cause irreparable damage. Time to back the PM or risk getting a deal they’ll like even less than the one they’re protesting. #Brexit  
I lived in Islington North until Feb & I was so fed up with how poor my MP was on Brexit and how he was letting down his constituents and his voters (& him not replying to me)I am now proud to have Dominic Grieve as my MP taking a principled stand & putting #CountryOverParty 
While we were on other things, Burundi's President Pierre Nkurunziza quickly organised a referendum to extend presidential term limits to allow him stay in the office through 2034.He won.Burundi is the world's 4th poorest nation. Nkurunziza has been in power for 13 years.  
Imagine if the £10s of billions being wasted on #Brexit were being spent to improve public services, or on investment in infrastructure & education, or even on cutting our taxes. They slashed and cut because of austerity, but they'll squander any amount on Brexit.#StopBrexit 
Remainers could muster a march of a million next Saturday and that would still be less than a seventeenth of the number of people who - unlike me - voted for Brexit. People need to get a grip, accept the result of a hard fought referendum and get on with making the most of things 
A really important thread on what losing Euratom really means. That those leading both govt & opposition should fail to ensure a frank national conversation about what Brexit actually entails is a stain on them that is wrecking our country, & our cohesion.  
There is no Brexit dividend 
"The irony is that Brexit is supposed to be about parliament “taking back control”. That fiction is being steadily exposed for what is in reality a power grab by the right wing of the Conservative party." 
So - what you want to know about tomorrow - Lords Brexit Amendment ping pong votes likely between 3 & 6.30pm tomorrow and only have to run slightly late to interfere with England World Cup match at 7. 
There must be at least one political journalist with enough with & gumption to ask the PM or one of her cabal to answer a very simple question: where in the imaginary treasure chest at the end of the rainbow will you find a Brexit bonanza? It is the absurdity of all absurdities. 
But it’s not a ‘Brexit dividend’ is it? Not arguing about the increase (3.4% a year is ‘welcome’ and not far off the historical average), but how will it be paid for? Borrowing, taxation, cuts elsewhere 
Letters: "There’s only one way out of this and that’s independence. But there’s one big obstacle facing us: we need Theresa May’s permission to hold a referendum and there’s no way she is going to allow that."  
And every analysis including all of their own show the economy will not grow post Brexit as much as it would if we were not leaving so the dividend is a lie.  
Ben Jennings on Theresa May’s extra £20 billion Brexit dividend for the NHS - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND. 
Back in February I reported on a Westminster source saying May would capitulate to the hard Brexit mob and it would be public. Well...  
The person running the country thinks increased taxes are a Brexit dividend.  
Brexit is a combination of 'Yes Minister' and 'Fawlty Towers'but it's not a comedy, there are no laughs, no funfor us the people having to watch it, it's a tragedy of epic proportions! 
So Corbyn is now also peddling the FLAT LIE of the “Brexit dividend”.Tell me again how he’s a completely different kind of politician.  
Do you know what, do it! Collapse the government, force an election and stand as an independent! Surely you wouldn’t stand as a Conservative, promising to respect the result and deliver Brexit, would you? Oh....   
There is no Brexit dividend. 
TWO YEARS on from Brexit vote and elected British politicians still don’t understand that can’t do deals with individual EU states. Doesn’t bode well  
Government lies continue to issue forth from our poisensous leaders. Make a stand against the hatred, against the lies and against the absolute idiocy of Brexit!March with us June 23rd in London.#PeoplesVote #FinalSayForAll #BrexitIsPersonal 
Dr. Sarah Wollaston: The idea of a brexit dividend was "tosh"Paul Johnson(IFS): The idea there's a #Brexit dividend is pure fiction.. even more importantly the Govt has already accepted the public finances will be weakened to the tune of £15bn per year as a result of #Brexit  
It’s been clear from day one that Barnier’s brief was to do a hatchet job by preventing a good Brexit deal at any cost & by any means, even plotting with Remoaners behind voters back, surely no one can be in doubt of their treachery. 
I only wish I had the power to do all this from the backbenches of the House of Lords! But I am trying to do my bit to stop Brexit, which is indispensable to Labour succeeding for working people in future  
Pro-EU Tory rebels warn Theresa May they are prepared to vote down her Brexit plans  
Awkwardly for Corbyn, Stephen Pound now backs a second EU referendum  
Would you like a badge, Theresa, my dear?  I'll hand deliver one, free of charge. Will look smashing pinned to your leopard print jacket, alongside those chains you've got round your neck, shackling you to your deluded #Brexit fantasy...   
Thanks to @HawickSNP @AbsoluteGinius & @CalumRKerr for hosting me with @PaulWheelhouse this afternoon for a great discussion on #Brexit & #IndyRef2 & last week’s events at #Westminster #SNPwalkout 
Magic Money Tree false but Enchanted Brexit Fountain real 
Dear @theresa_may - Any credibility you had left is gone- You have actively promoted a lie to the British people- Rather than captive to the Brexit lunatics, you are now one of them- We hope and trust you will be defeated and a meaningful vote puts paid to this madnessLAB  
So if the Conservative government is going to just flat out lie about Brexit, how is truth going to stop it?Anything factual we can offer is competing with outright lies and which do you think is more appealing to the public? 
UK PM May says need to ensure parliament does not overturn Brexit  
Because the "Brexit bonus" does not exist and we have a Brexit burden instead, the Treasury is making a good point 
Right now the vultures are circling over what used to be Great Britain. Post #brexit the country will be littered with the carcasses of businesses, gov departments, national assets, the NHS, and people.  And the vultures will feed voraciously... until there is nothing left #FBPE 
This is what Brexit has come to, even Bart Simpson a cartoon character knows that there is no Brexit dividend! 
Dominic Grieve says Tory rebels are prepared to 'collapse the government' to block a 'catastrophic' #Brexit deal  
"The economy has already shrunk a bit as a result of the Brexit vote." Not a quote from a Labour politicians, but from @PJTheEconomist on #SundayPolitics. A straight lie. The IFS is supposed to be above this. The economy has grown each month since the referendum. Fact. 
Tory rebellions against May's Brexit plans 'could bring down government'  
What has the world come to when even Nigel Farage can’t stomach Theresa May’s lie that the fantasy Brexit dividend will be spent on the NHS. There is no Brexit dividend. Any extra money for the NHS will come from extra tax or from robbing other services.  
Capitalism is declining in W. Europe, N. America, Japan (while rising in China, India, etc.). For victims of decline, fear, anger yield Brexit, Trump, “populisms,” etc. Such fake "solutions" only worsen capitalism's costs (social, ecological). System change is what we need. 
Finally a political leader with the bravery to say it.Brexit is illegitimate it needs to be stopped!#fbpe 
Apparently I’m getting a unicorn as part of my Brexit ‘dividend’. I’m going to call it ‘Tarriff’. 
Dominic Grieve is not a rebel, he’s a genuine, principled, fair, reasonable and sensible Parliamentarian, his party politics is an irrelevance in this context, his view about Brexit is paramount.  
Most people can’t relocate their lives or business interests out of Brexit harm’s way. They can only watch as its champions head for the hills. 
Nigel Farage - "Salvini's popularity ratings are going through the roof. One thing is for certain, for my money, Merkel is the past, Salvini is the future." #Brexit  
Because as you know AlexRepetition of a lie is the modus operandi of the Tory PartyOne you were quite happy to help with during the first Scottish Independence Referendum  
Thank you to @Feorlean for coming along to Kirkoswald today to give an update to Carrick, Cumnock and Doon Valley @theSNP members on the implications  of Brexit and the UK Gov #powergrab 
Germany reaps Brexit dividend. 
Tory lie today about “Brexit dividend” allowing £600m/week for NHS is staggering. Clue:there is no Brexit dividend.Labour happy to support Tory hard Brexit so no complaints from them.Of course,Wales must always wait for UKGovt to increase spending because of lack of fiscal powers 
As the Prime Minister pledges more funding for the NHS, @clivebull asks do you think a "Brexit dividend" will raise the projected extra £20bn? 
is this a legit use of official press offices @HeadUKCivServ - given the @OBR_UK view on the impact of #brexit on public finances...  
If we all do one thing, let us speak out, and continue to speak out amidst the lies & misinformation being peddled by this govt, clinging for dear life onto bribed power. #NHS #Brexit #BrexitDividend #marr 
What is the “ brexit dividend “ ? Will we all receive some form of financial gain ? I’d really love to know how words like this can be mentioned - and by those “ leading “ our country . It’s like a circus 
The EU quota share for English Channel cod allows the French to take 84% of the fish but Britain just 9%:  #Brexit 
Did Russia help influence Brexit-sure they did. Has Britain coerced votes in in other countries-yes. And more importantly Brexit happened b/c politicians over the last 30 years betrayed the people by hollowing out the welfare state and creating an anti migrant hysteria. 
Should the last-ditchers and their allies in the Lords prevent a good passage of the Bill implementing the referendum decision let's crack on with the abolition of the House of Lords, writes Labour MP Frank Field  
I support a strong, fearless BBC news service I am a critical friendVery critical of coverage ofBrexitCorbynScot IndyGazaSaudi Austerity And more I ask BBC to engage with its constructive critics - not, as now, contemptuously dismiss usWe’re trying to help you! 
Have your say: Should there be a second EU referendum?Jeremy Corbyn has said the "ship has sailed" on Britain's membership of the EU. Do you agree, or should voters get another say?#PeoplesVote#PeoplesVoteMarch 23/06/2018 London#FinalSayForAll 
Quite right, and what there is already clear evidence of is a Brexit penalty. As @TheIFS points out, Government has accepted forecast of a £15bn a year hit to public finances (or £300m a week) #brexitpenalty 
Why are Remainers so hysterical and so incredibly triggered by the NHS Brexit Bonus?> It confirms we LEAVE on March 29th.> Mrs May has DECIDED TO FUND THE NHS, not the EU.> It neutralises Remain's "Boris Bus" arguments and proves REMAIN lied through their teeth about this too  
We need a fundamental overhaul of our democratic institutions, to write down our constitution, to reject "winner takes all" democracy in favour of a system which maturely recognises a plurality of voices in power. Legitimate or not, Brexit is a symptom of our malaise, not a cause 
There is no Brexit dividend.Given there’s only Brexit cost, this money must all come from increased taxes or borrowing.Further, the Government’s own analysis show Brexit is a net loss.Therefore, this infographic from the PM is knowing disinformation.  
Sir Christopher is going to be FURIOUS when someone tells him about the government's approach to Brexit.  
MPs had their "meaningful  vote" on 09/06/15 when they voted by 544 to 53 to pass an Act, to allow the EU referendum.The rest is history. 
Hi @robburl just wondering if the march for a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal will be deemed as newsworthy as this  
She thinks a bloke with 4 followers shouldn’t tell her what to thinkHowever, she - 1 person - thinks she can tell 17.4million of us what we should think on BrexitShe’s condescending & loathed in equal measure 
Brexit fan #Marr didn't even question Theresa May's lie about a Brexit dividend and he implied himself there will be one by 2020... and no one at the BBC gives a flying shit about his on going shameful biased lying behaviour.  
Get this #Brexiters & #Lexiters.1. THERE IS NO EFFING #BREXIT DIVIDEND2. IT'S ALL #BREXIT BS3. THEY'RE LYING TO YOU4. YOU ARE DELUDING YOURSELVES5. WE'LL BE POORER6. WE'LL LOSE RIGHTS7. WE NEVER LOST BORDER CONTROL8. WE'RE STILL SOVEREIGN9. THE GOVT'S TO BLAME 
*Adam Curtis voice* the Conservatives were facing a crisis in the NHS, but they didn’t want to admit austerity wasn’t necessaryso one day, they made up a “Brexit dividend”and the astonishing thing is that it workedthe BBC and all of the newspapers just went along with it 
A reminder if May announces a mystery Brexit benefit for the NHS - not only is the money not as a result of Brexit, it merely resores spending to historic levels, after severe cuts since 2010.  
A good fisk of Minford's article on WTO-only Brexit. Reminder: Minford has no publication record on trade policy or WTO law (!); expects and welcomes the decimation of British manufacturing after Brexit; and wrongly forecast the effect of the minimum wage and (to date) Brexit.  
UK will be £10,000,000,000 a year BETTER off after #BrexitWith WTO tariffs UK will be £7,000,000,000 a year BETTER off.#HappyDays 
SENIOR EU OFFICIALS WARN OF IMMINENT EU COLLAPSE.When the President of the European parliament & the Vice-President of the European Commission both go on record warning of an EU collapse due to migration, you had better sit up, pay attention and get on with Brexit fast.  
Economy will be £15bn/year smaller after Brexit. So deeper cuts, higher taxes or more borrowing will fund NHS...  
If you've used the NHS recently or know anybody who needs social care you will know it isn't enough. And the claim that there is a Brexit dividend is absurd and dishonest 
Theresa May under fire over NHS #BrexitDividend claim.Assertion that there is any post-EU windfall to help fund £20bn injection ‘treats public as fools’, says Tory MP.Brexit is costing us money. There’s more money to fund our NHS if we #StopBrexit. 
Extra funding for the NHS comes from either:- Higher taxes - Cuts elsewhere - Increased borrowingThis Brexit dividend lie is not only an attempt to hide that fact but also to silence critics who keep pointing to that big red bus which promised £350m a week to the NHS.  
The headline is the Brexit dividend, but the reality that beckons the UK, is the absolute dividend of independence, freedom, sovereignty, secure borders, fishing waters back, ablity to negotiate our own trade deals & to rejoin the majority of free nations around the World. 
Repeat after me, @theresa_may "There is no Brexit dividend".Leaving the EU in this manner is national and international self-harm.#BrexitDividend #BrexitUnicorn 
It already is a coup. Brexit is a coup. It always was, on behalf of capitalist fundamentalists and the global corporate empire. It's a takeover, a stepping stone to a neo feudal state, totally privatised, authoritarian. 
Jonathan Lis is a journalist & a *Liberal Metropolitan Elite* thinker. It's unlike him to use intemperate language, calling May a liar & pathetic at that, But he's correct. It's time we called it out, not sweary or shouty but not reticent either. Brexit is like a coup by stealth  
This is the problem with (sorry Vince) Remainiacs. There may be interesting and important details to uncover about spending limits or attempts by outsiders to interfere, but shouting about treason and dismissing the referendum as illegitimate simply makes you sound like a loon  
Today’s Brexit metaphor: a decaying pier, on a dirty, frothing sea, lined with joyless fishermen and the last residents of a dying town stuck in a past which no longer exists, all under gathering clouds brought on cold winds from the East.  
Since when did you offer the WTO option when you argued for Brexit?  If the WTO option is better than any deal we get, then Parliament/the people will reject it and we will stay in the EU.  And you will have to accept that - whatever effect it has on you personally.#PeoplesVote 
Sorry, which thing are we meant to believe today?  I keep getting confused. How does this relate to your Brexit impact studies? Genuinely baffled tbh.#StopBrexit 
Powerful piece by @carolecadwalla in the @observer on how treason has been quietly accepted because implications are too big. #Brexit not just a mess but fundamentally illegitimate. 
Lets make sure the public get the FACTS on Theresa Mays “Brexit Dividend” @sally_lindsay @CHIMPSINSOCKS @DancingTheMind @Harryslaststand @liamcunningham1 @thelizcarr @bbcquestiontime @reece_dinsdale @Rachael_Swindon @RebeccaFMusic @LoreleiKing @DrBrianMay @eliistender10 
The ‘Brexit Dividend’ is a neo-Trumpian concept. It is the aggressive deployment of a non-existent thing. 
Cannot be overstated Democracy is under world wide attack - facism rising fast - Turkey, Brexit,Italy, Poland, Saudi Arabia, Hungary America is the tipping point in the world -if we lose in November we will not have another vote we must have a #BlueTsunami2018#SundayMorning 
After this  crap is over, America needs an independent and suitably empowered media watchdog that can penalize media outlets who consistently and knowingly spread fake news. Same with Britain. Trump and Brexit cannot exist in a FactCheck universe. 
Now I may have missed it, but have we yet heard the Leader of the Opposition ridicule the notion of a Brexit dividiend? #brexitshambles 
The director of the Institute for Fiscal Studies says suggesting Brexit makes us better off economically "is just wrong." 
So ‘Brexit dividend’=‘chance to get tax&spend past Tory right who’d normally hate it, cos it’s that or admit Brexit dividend dsnt exist’ 
Going through photos of the independence referendum and the funding for Better Together two salient points come up. How much Better Together relied on Tory donors for their cash and how much they relied on the Labour party to provide the foot-soldiers for the campaign. 
PLEASE READ THIS & SHARE...25th July 2018 could be a HUGE day for Scottish independenceIf the Supreme Court sides with Westminster, Scotland may become effectively INDEPENDENT!!!No referendum neededNo  UDI  declared& here is why......  
Shri @ArvindKejriwal has changed AAP flag without referendum? #AAP 
"We could collapse the government… of course I think Brexit is a bad idea!” blasts Tory Remainer Dominic Grieve  
The Lib Dems are the only party fighting Brexit. We want to give YOU the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option of staying in the EU. Join us today:  
Royal Mail’s commemorative stamps could be seen as a judgment on Brexit. Do you really think that’s wise?  
Superb. @johnmcdonnellMP points out why there is no ‘Brexit dividend’ for NHS.Govt must fund NHS by borrowing and/or taxes. Fine. But this could & should have been done years ago. Belated help now comes after years of NHS starvation & under a false banner of how it’s funded.  
The one thing, the only thing, Brexit has left to cling to is 'the will of the people'. And it is a simple lie. And we mustn't be afraid to say so.  
Let's recap. It looks like Brexit was won by 1) illegal money, 2) data crimes and 3) Russian influence. How can we continue w Brexit based on this grossly flawed referendum? Where is the inquiry? To continue without one would be constitutional malpractice.  
The state of the UK government:- Deported black citizens- Ignores crisis pregnancies in Northern Ireland- Lies about Brexit dividend for the NHS- Disrespects and ignores Scotland- Negotiates with each other rather than with the EU- Bribed the DUPA disgraceful govt. 
There is no Brexit dividend. This is yet another May gesture timed & designed to detract from the latest mess she's gotten herself into. #nhsfunding @Bremaininspain @_Britain4Europe @OFOC @Scientists4EU @euromove @InFactsOrg @IanDunt @acgrayling 
Sturgeon demands ‘equity and fairness’ for agriculture post-Brexit  
.@carolecadwalla has been exposing Russian interference in #Brexit since way before it was mainstream.Perhaps that's why Russia & LeaveEU coordinated attempts to discredit and threaten her.This is what opponents of democracy do. They're dangerous to a free & open society.  
Theresa May has claimed a Brexit Money Tree will save the NHS. After she was caught lying to two sides of her party last week, surely no one will believe her latest fib is anything but a desperate attempt to cling to power  
extraordinary thing about #marr this morning after proper questioning of @EmilyThornberry where she explained labour NHS is fully costed Marr interviews PM May fails to challenge on Brexit Dividend costing for NHS was ridiculous  
John McDonnell: "'The OBR' and 'The IFS' are both advising that on the basis of the negotiations that the Govt are taking at the moment; there won't be a Brexit dividend." Tories plans are completely uncosted.  
If the Government skillfully managed to get UK into EFTA/EEA *and* plug into all present EU and efta FTAs; then there could be a Brexit Dividend. As it stands; it looks like there will be a huge negative impact on economy due to govt mismanagement of brexit. #BrexitDividend 
Latest research from leading Brexit/Irish border expert @hayward_katy (& Mirjam de Jong). As in many other respects, Brexit is already having (mainly -ve) effects on lives & businesses near the Irish border (do read the whole thread for context & other issues & report link).  
Hi. This is the office of the Prime Minister of Great Britain, lying. There is no Brexit dividend. #PeoplesVote 
For years the EU has been financing NGOs and media outlets with the purpose of redirecting their loyalties and their lobbying to Brussels. Its MO is to buy off civil society and to capture civil society institutions. That's your "foreign meddling" right there. #Brexit 
Some twittereti journalists are going overboard criticising & questioning Congress for not supporting Kejriwal dharna. Wondering if these people are also questioning @ArvindKejriwal about AAP MLA & LOP in Punjab supporting Khalistan referendum! 
Happy Father's Day! Chris is a British dad with a problem - the Brexit deal is failing families. His wife didn't get a vote, his kids didn't get a vote & so he's asking you to demand a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal to make sure his family is protected -  
This is bloody terrifying. Economists say there’s no such thing as a “Brexit dividend” - on the contrary, Brexit is likely to ultimately reduce the amount spent on public services - and the Prime Minister is knowingly crowing this lie.  
Why aren’t two institutions that patently weren’t to blame for Brexit complaining more loudly about a foreign country that plainly didn’t cause Brexit. Truly it is a mystery why the public’s views on Brexit don’t seem to be shifting.  
"Rules of Origin" is going to be the main Brexit issue as we approach the final deadline. It will be responsible for job losses, business relocations, company insolvencies  and a border down the Irish Sea.Get a heads up on the issue here ☟ 
There's a fair presumption that in enacting a referendum parliament was asking voters to make a decision that had the political parties deadlocked. Otherwise what was the point? A referendum as sounding exercise would be a nullity, which is why nobody in 2016 treated it as such.  
Indeed, hence his conclusion: “There is no Brexit dividend”. And even if we assume there is, it won’t fund £20bn increase with “a bit more” tax and borrowing.  
No, @theresa_may. There is no “Brexit Dividend”.Brexit is costing us money, not saving us money. Even your own figures show this.Shame on you trying to mislead the public. We’re better off if we #StopBrexit and fund or NHS. 
Genuinely stunned that the palpably untrue “Brexit dividend” is now on the No10 website.  
I used to be sceptical of the argument that Brexit was about leaving a sinking ship. I am now reassessing my view:  
This is an OBSCENE LIE!You ought to be ashamed of yourselves.The 3.4% annual increase in #NHS funding will 100% be funded by tax and borrowing because — THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.Stop lying to us!We've had enough.#BrexitShambles #BrexitLies #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
You watch this video - unequivocal and clear as to what the referendum was all about. Then listen to the likes of Grieve, Soubry, AC Grayling, Chuka, Cable and other Remoaners trying to stop Brexit.  Their sheer dishonesty takes the breath away.  
Who remembers when people said Brexit would give Westminster politicians a wake-up call? Make them more honest and forthcoming with the public. A proper shake up. Today the prime minister has been on national TV telling a complete lie. There’s unequivocally no Brexit dividend. 
From the director of the respected Institute of Fiscal Studies @TheIFS: “There is no Brexit dividend”.Please RT so that everyone knows.  
“Funded by the Brexit dividend” is now the official Number 10 infographic  but the more important bit is “with us as a country contributing a bit more”  
What's annoying is... I almost never mention the 350 million a week lie, because, I know that Brexit voters like to pretend they never believed it. So I let it slide because it disappeared from the Brexit claims list. But to bring back this "Brexit Dividend" crap again...  
The very small number of people in the SNP who prayed in aid Jim Sillars' views on delaying a referendum may be feeling a little foolish today.  The man really has left the building.  He's anti-referendum, pro-power-grab.  Basically what's driving him now is his belief in Brexit. 
Translation: your taxes will go up, we'll tell you by how much when we get the Brexit divorce bill. Not to be confused with a fantasy dividend.  
I used to be sceptical of the argument that Brexit was about leaving a sinking ship. I am now reassessing my view, writes former Remain backer @nfergus 
A theory gaining ground is the referendum, which split the people mainly down the middle, is being used to divert attention away from immigration, which again is soaring and with more promised. Government is screwing both this country and her people. Somebody help us. . . please. 
.@theresa_may should be ashamed for repeating the lie about the #Brexit dividend. The IFS confirm there isn't going to be one. #FBPE 
What a dreadful week. Checks and balances on our rights and protections voted down. Amendments to minimise the damage of Brexit voted down. Parliamentary sovereignty at risk. May deceives her MP's on a meaningful vote and then lies to the country about a Brexit dividend. Awful.  
I’m a (former) Tory voter and I’d point out that ignoring the “Brexit dividend” blatant lie, this policy is exactly the same as the Labour Party.It stretches credibility to dismiss Labour plans as “magic money tree” and then propose exactly the same. 
If you’ve been following Russian machinations over Brexit this is just some really cool stuff here.  
I was excited today about the gov’t promising more money for the NHS. Then I found out that most of it was coming from the “#Brexit Dividend”. So, they might as well be promising gold doubloons from Atlantis.Also, intrigued as to how £20bn extra a year divides to £600m a week.  
Ignore the pointless row about Brexit dividend. Today's announcement reveals three important things: 1) after 8 years austerity is over 2) today's Conservatives care more about the NHS than tax cuts 3) we believe we can win in 2022 
May double-crossed Grieve over Brexit – this is a constitutional crisis | Andrew Adonis  
Never realised the UK had ceased to be a parliamentary democracy. Perhaps this should have been asked in a Referendum first before EU membership  
I don't trust #tories & Theresa May. I don't believe this NHS funding of £20 billion a year, smoke and mirrors as usual, vague on funding, there's no 'brexit bonus' is bull. Always some point in future "by 2024" never now. She's just trying to sweeten public up for a GE!#Marr 
Shameless liar."There is no Brexit dividend. Payments to the EU will fall after Brexit, but tax revenues will fall more as a result of Brexit. That is the official position of the Government" - IFS/OBR  
My comprehensive 50 page report on Brexit, the Irish border and the Union will be published this week.. please go to  to register for a copy... 
Do Brexit extremists really think threats of NO Deal are taken seriously by EU? Everyone knows we can't have no deal without destroying our economy and way of life - and hanging northern Ireland out to dry. Such hollow threats are not credible negotiating tactics! 
Every MP in Ealing is a #Labour MP.  Every MP in Ealing is calling for a #PeoplesVote. #Brexit is not inevitable, with leadership from the across the Labour movement, we can change the direction of our country.  
"One of the many good side-effects of Brexit should be the abolition of the upper House and its replacement by a much smaller senate" - Labour MP Frank Field,preparing to introduce a bill on Tuesday to #AbolishTheLords. One MP that deserves our respect?#Brexit  
The implication here that the non-existent "Brexit dividend" will contribute the *bulk* of extra NHS spending compounds the false statements of the PM and other ministers today.  
We need more than retweeting of facts to counter May’s genius manoeuvre. In one move she has *distracted from this weeks mess, *moved money to private sector mates NHS contracts, *made Boris look honest, and *linked something good that we all love with Brexit. 
What brexit dividend? Exactly where is this money coming from? Come on, give us details!! 
There is no fucking #Brexit dividend There never fucking wasThere never fucking will beUnless you are one of the few Brexerfuckingatti who will grab their bags of pieces of silver as they scuttle off on their Unifuckgcorns into their fucking sunset  
And there was me labouring under the illusion that Parliament was sovereign and the government was accountable to it. I should have realised that on Brexit the government unilaterally decides what is the will of the British people and Parliament has no right to challenge that!  
Things I don't believe in;1) Flat earth2) Healing crystals 3) Tea leaves4) Homeopathy 5) Brexit dividend6) BBC neutrality 
I’m done folks. I won’t be replying to or engaging with whataboutery, insults or other such nonsense from anti-abortion accounts. The referendum is over. The people have made their decision. 
Tory MP Sarah Wollaston describes Mrs. May's claim that the increased funding of the NHS comes in part from the Brexit dividend as 'tosh' that 'takes the public for fools'. Dr. Wollaston is emerging as that rare thing: a truly principled Tory  willing to speak the truth. 
Director Of The Institute For Fiscal Studies: There Is No Brexit Dividend - LBC  @dontbrexitfixit @thesilverfox971 @MutliRaceMan @ThatTimWalker @HowarthJudd @BrexitBin @TheStephenRalph @Steve_Remainer @David_T_Evans @City_Livery_SM @PatrickBHenry @MVLibDems 
Mainstream Remain Tory MPs are highly critical of Grieve and Soubry, accusing them of being dishonest about their motives. “This is not about democracy, it’s about stopping Brexit,” writes @WikiGuido 
There is no Brexit dividend. And you know that perfectly well.  
Is there a ‘Brexit Dividend’ that can be spent on the NHS?RT for bigger numbers. #BrexitBenefit #BrexitDividend 
So @theresa_may is resorting to repeating lies on the side of a bus put out by political scammers.1) Loss of EU clinicians is REAL, immediate and damaging, whereas2) A Brexit dividend is pie in the sky3) The NHS needs more that what is promised and it needs it now 
Because lying about Brexit has been @theresa_may’s modus operandi since becoming PM. 
The reality is that Tories have no governing agenda post ‘austerity’. It’s why Brexit seemed a blessing for them (which they wasted). The emperor has no clothes - it’s going to be incredibly difficult for establishment media to say.  
£350 million for the NHS: How the Brexit bus pledge is coming true  
There obviously is a Brexit dividend after the transition period finishes. This IFS / Remainer line is based on yet more Project Fear forecasts.  
Seems the SHN raven killing affliction is catching - once again I would really like to see the scientific evidence that justifies killing native wildlife - I dread to think what may be in store in our post Brexit world   
Contrary to what he told Parliament, Andy Wigmore passed legal documents to the Russian embassy related to George Cottrell, an aide to Nigel Farage who was arrested by the FBI & charged with 21 counts of money laundering, bribery & wire fraud#Brexit #FBPE 
Of course there's no Brexit dividend, as Sarah Wollaston, chair of the health & social care select committee, and former GP, is reported as saying: "it treats the public as fools".For at least 48% of the people, probably many more, Brexit provides the opposite of a 'dividend'.  
Brexit Divorce Bill paid in full  
First, there was #TrumpRussia.It sucked.But Trump always bragged that if #Brexit happened, then he'd win.Then Trump's cover up started.Then ⁦@carolecadwalla⁩ ripped the lid off Cambridge Analytica.Now, the #BrexitRussia coverup has landed.  
Quite distressing how close we are to Brexit and the only benefits the Brexiters can think of are still lies that were debunked a fucking year ago.  
The PM also takes the British people for fools with her claim of an NHS Brexit ‘dividend.’ Govt accepts Brexit weakens the public finances and the divorce bill along with pledges to replace EU funding already uses up our EU contributions for several years. This ain’t no dividend. 
Theresa May is a liar. She lies repeatedly. She lies in Parliament. She lies to voters’ faces. And most pathetic of all, she lies to herself.Everything she says about Brexit, its dividend, its potential for success, its taking back control, is false. She is unfit for office.  
Theresa May under fire over NHS 'Brexit dividend' claim  
With Banks trashing Wigmore’s claims on New Law being the source of Brexit campaign funding, if I still had a warrant card I’d be in the middle of looking at one of these for the same reasons I got a detailed first interview: to explore the evidence...  
Until Brexit, I confess I didn't fully appreciate the extent to which the British public is deliberately and systematically deceived, manipulated and kept in the dark by the media. They are master puppeteers.  
I've just read the whole of one of Carole Cadwalladr's big stories on Brexit/Trump conspiracies - a very strange experience. The most substance in it is about her and her personal reactions to the unremarkable stuff she's turfing up.  
So, in brief: 1. It's June 2018 and Govt still can't agree what Brexit means. 2. And whatever it means has to be agreed with the EU. 3. But whatever it turns out to mean, it's what 'the people' agreed to in June 2016 because, somehow, they 'knew what they were voting for'. Hmm.  
I think we all owe @ChukaUmunna our thanks for ensuring that the government is not able to get away with its continual blatant remorseless lying.  He has consistently called out the realities of #brexit since the very beginning. Cheers dude.   
You're right. It's all a conspiracy. Parliament knows that the government is pursuing a Brexit that its own experts say would harm the people of this country.So it wants the People to be the ones who decide whether the Brexit deal matches the promises made in 2016.#PeoplesVote 
Claims of 'Brexit dividend' for NHS dismissed as 'tosh'  
And they'd know, if they know anything, that Brexit is a disaster for the NHS: for nurse and doctor numbers, for funding, for drug authorisation, for access to radioactive isotopes in cancer screening and treatment. 
The only reason for opposing the Government’s compromise on a “meaningful vote” is an attempt to stop Brexit.  
Every single study of the government’s own commission has shown we’ll have less money after Brexit. Are you willingly lying, dangerously ignorant of the facts or merely distressingly thick?  
Now we have to watch senior politicians talk about   Brexit dividend for the NHS they know doesn't exist. They know govt figures show we'll be poorer. 
The feeling when you're so full of shit with regards a supposed "Brexit dividend", that even Nigel Farage calls you out on it.  
Caroline Flint, whose Doncaster constituency is a former mining area, is said to have lambasted 'patronising' anti-Brexit Labour MPs, saying: 'You are talking total nonsense. I care about jobs as much as you so don't lecture me.'  
Why isn’t there greater outrage in UK about Russia’s involvement in Brexit? “The government & opposition are compromised & want the scandal closed down. As does an embarrassed rightwing press & a shamefully negligent BBC.” - @NickCohen4’s must-read piece  
With every week that passes, we slip further from a country built on truth and respect to one built on lies and deception. These are dangerous times.There is no £350m a week dividend. May knows it, she's seen the figures showing ANY Brexit means less money for public spending.  
Who’s George Cottrell? Well he’s the person who was responsible for raising £££ to support Brexit. Oh? And an expert in money laundering, the dark net & crypto according to his indictment. Released from prison after 8 months. His side of the story here 
Went on Sky News this morning to talk about why we are asking @JeremyCorbyn to stand up to the government on Brexit. We need to challenge the Tories not appease them.   
Nope. In the opinion of every government department - including DExEU - Brexit will cost more than it saves. A dividend requires the exact opposite. 
12,000 trucks a day in and out of Dover / Folkestone every day x 17 customs agents = 705 transit docs per day for each agent  ... that’s 30 transit documents each hour every hour of the day .. that’s one every two minutes . I’m sure the brexit MPs will say it’s not an issue .. 
May's claim of 'Brexit dividend' for NHS dismissed as 'tosh'  
The Government’s shambolic Brexit negotiations are putting our economy, our jobs and our rights at risk. Share the facts   
“We could collapse the government" - Dominic Grieve says he and his group will vote against Theresa May if he believes she has broken her promise on a meaningful Brexit vote  
There is no Brexit dividend. Here’s why.  
Grieve is in danger of becoming a national treasure. Straight talking, common sense, no Brexit BS.  
Why isn’t there greater outrage about Russia’s involvement in Brexit? | Nick Cohen  
Mundell on @Sun_Pol_Scot saying Scottish Labour & Lib Dem peers support his position and completely ignoring the fact that democratically elected Labour and Lib Dem MSPs do not. #democracy #brexit 
The IFS confirms Theresa May has lied to the British public about #NHS funding. There is no #Brexit dividend. In fact, #Brexit will make us worse off.Where is the money coming from, Mrs May?  
And here’s the IFS chief @PJTheEconomist “There is no Brexit dividend” - who was awarded a CBE for services to economics by, essentially, the Govt last week: 
What a liar. There’s no Brexit surplus, as Govt’s own figures show. EU membership cost c £9bn pa; Brexit will reduce govt revenue by £15bn pa. This money is coming from higher borrowing. Even then, av NHS increase from 1948 is 3.7%, this will be 3.4%. H/t @ChrisGiles_ @ifs 
Cynical of Govt to wrap positive NHS story in nonsensical Brexit propaganda. New money is actually recognition that visible damage to NHS from inadequate funding in 2010s is likely to have electoral consequences. 
You can't maintain full participation in our foreign policy after Brexit, EU tells Britain  
I have clearly been suffering under a delusion. I always thought the the Government was answerable to Parliament, not the other way round.The tory Brexit Act bears a lot of similarities to the Enabling Act passed in Germany in 1933. And that is not hyperbole.  
I swear to god, if the English fall for the ‘leaving the EU means millions extra for the NHS’ a SECOND time, there is no hope for them. None. They need to wake up. Post-Brexit the ENHS is dead, sold to Trump for crappy trade deal. 
Arron Banks, Brexit & Russia. An 18-month investigation leads to a trail of new evidence showing the bad boys of Brexit had closer links to Russia & its ambassador than they have disclosed faces questions over contacts with Russia.  
Eg the Tory MP head of the Health Select Committee, while welcoming the funding says the Brexit argument is “tosh” and “treats the public as fools” 
Today is one of those days when I just want to say "F**K THEM" & leave them to their beloved #Brexit... It was never about us. It was born out of Party Politics & is being dragged on like a dead horse because of Party Politics. We've had 2 years of this shit. #FckBrexit 
Has anyone seen this 'Woman'...She was last seen posing as a Prime Minister but is now believed to be radicalised. She is known to be  dangerous and the public are advised to not approach (Especially if your name is Tommy)#brexit  
We will lose thousands of doctors & nurses and £15bn per year to our economy as a result of Brexit. The pie in the sky Brexit dividend is a myth, conjured up by a PM in desperate need of a genie in a bottle. 
Dominic Grieve admits on BBC @daily_politics this morning, “We could collapse the government.”  I thing we @conservatives should concentrate on delivering Brexit and keeping Corbyn out of Downing Street. 
Conservative ministers sayThat Brexit will bring the UKA shedload of wealthTo pay for our health,Delivered by unicorn sleigh.#BrexitDividend #NHSFunding #brexit 
Over the last few days, @theresa_may has shown herself to be stunningly dishonest:Firstly, with promises to her own MPs over the ‘meaningful vote’.Secondly, with a very deliberate lie to the public about a ‘Brexit dividend’.What has Britain become? 
Theresa May has gone full Boris. She promised to be “straight” with the people. Instead, she dishonestly promises a Brexit dividend for NHS. 
Director Institute Of Fiscal Studies, Paul Johnson explains why Mrs May’s claim of a NHS "Brexit Dividend", just isn't true. #Brexit #NHS 
Separately, PM has decided to try to help Team Brexit make case that the Vote Leave Bus pledge is being delivered on, even though the numbers don’t exist, and some members of her Cabinet, and OBR, and IFS don’t actually believe it will ever exist, certainly not in this timeframe 
Walkies not porkies!On 23rd bring your dog to the #PeoplesVoteMarch.Dogs will be marching together for a #Wooferendum to #StopBrexit.You've heard of the Suffragettes: these are the Suffrapets (feel free to accessorise your pooch).Other pets welcome.#Brexit #people 
This honesty from qualified doctor @sarahwollaston confirms what I suspected. @theresa_may betrayal of the principled MPs in her party over the #MeaningfulVote in the #euwithdrawalbill will only embolden them to speak out and start putting #CountryOverParty more and more.#Brexit  
“It’s really important when it comes to the negotiation of treaties, as it was with Maastricht, Nice, Lisbon and Amsterdam, that the Govt has as much flexibility as possible,” exactly @SuellaBraverman. Only one reason these rebels want power over the executive - to thwart Brexit.  
Theresa May trades on the idea that she is honest and does her best, but claiming a “Brexit dividend” for anything, let alone the NHS, is a lie as brazen as the one on Boris Johnson’s bus.  
It’s Father’s Day. My message is, Brexit is a result of criminality, widespread corruption, lies and greed. Stop it. 
“There isn’t a Brexit dividend,” says @PJTheEconomist #bbcsp 
Paul Johnson Institute for Fiscal Studies - There is NOT a #Brexit dividend.#StopBrexit #FBPE #marr #bbcsp #ridge 
"No deal is definitely better than a bad deal", confirms #Brexit Minister @SuellaBraverman whilst discussing the so-called "meaningful vote" amendment by Tory rebels 
No more politics for me today. If you've had a row with your dad - even one about Brexit - do yourself a massive favour and bury the hatchet today.He won't be around forever. X 
Welcome defiance of Jeremy Corbyn's continued backing of Brexit at yesterday's #JezFest 
Are you ready to hear the Government beginning to say that this increase won’t be able to be delivered unless they get their way on all Brexit votes... call me mystic meg... 
NARRATOR : There was no Brexit Dividend.  
The extra NHS money is welcome, but your article refers to a "Brexit dividend" that does not exist. Health spending can (and always could) be increased without such false statements.  
The 'Brexit Dividend' bullshit is a trick. It's so that any future attempts to rethink or tone down Brexit (or to apply for re-entry in five years) can be presented as "look at these people: they want to take money off the NHS and give it to Brussels". 
Well done indeed. I'm sure the many @BBCNews outlets have also been clamouring to talk to you about this. Surely they can spare a bit of time in between all the Brexit Dividend propaganda ??  
'Lords WILL pay’ Labour MP DEMANDS abolishment of Lords if peers BETRAY voters on Brexit  
A ‘brexit dividend’ for the NHS paid for by additional taxes is one of the most intellectually dishonest lines plugged by any government. Glad there’s people like you out there highlighting it. 
One of Tony Blair's former Ministers Caroline Flint has accused fellow #Labour MPs of calling her Yorkshire constituents 'thick' because they voted for Brexit.  
So Labour, before 2017 Gen Election, considered doing exactly what Number 10 have just done - and artificially link a tax/borrowing funded NHS spending hike with the £350m a week Brexit pledge, decided that it would not be credible, and the number was inherently deceitful anyway 
There is no Brexit dividend. Don’t be conned. Extra money will be from taxation and public borrowing. The #NHS needs more money, but let’s be honest where it comes from.  @Open_Britain #Brexit  
The Brexit dividend for the NHS is a bare-faced lie. Growth is slower so the welcome increase in NHS spending will be funded by higher taxes and/or borrowing- see the IFS. Pravda( the Mail), Izvestia( the Telegraph), Peoples  Daily( the Sun) will claim otherwise. How low we fall. 
There’s no such thing as a Brexit dividend, and the media are an absolute joke for pretending otherwise. Increasing NHS funding can only be costed by increasing taxes on the well-off - which we should - or on the majority - which we shouldn’t.Which is it, @theresa_may? 
The Brexit dividend tosh was expected but treats the public as fools. Sad to see Govt slide to populist arguments rather than evidence on such an important issue. This will make it harder to have a rational debate about the ‘who & how’ of funding & sharing this fairly. 
Completely fictitious ‘Brexit dividend’  regurgitated on front pages. IFS, BoE, every economist of note is clear - Brexit will cost UK. There is no dividend. But lots of Leave backing papers for whom number 10 press office spin is manna  
My daughter keeps asking me what will happen to me after #Brexit. Aftter nearly 2 years I still not have a proper answer, just vague promises. Brexit might split a lot of families. Will my daughter grow up without her father? The uncertainty is unbearable. #FathersDay 
WATCH: Shadow Housing Minister John Healy is absolutely right to label the so-called Brexit dividend as 'bogus' & 'not credible' - it's time for this Government to be honest with people about the cost of this botched Brexit. Please RT:  
So Theresa May is holding her nose, crossing her fingers behind her back and saying “Brexit dividend, brexit dividend, brexit dividend” today And hoping it gets her through the next month of:My story: 
Today Theresa May is claiming the NHS “£20 bn” boost will come from the Brexit dividend. She does not believe this. She know it to be untrue.It will be funded by borrowing and tax rises in the AutumnWhy is she doing this? 
Remoaners now crowing over the lack of a Brexit Dividend because THEY have prevented it from happening over their treachery in preventing us from simply walking away. Quislings. 
If she had the numbers,  she would have said "Parliament is sovereign".She hasn't, so she has to bypass Parliament.She lost her brexit mandate. 
Marr: “what birthday present do you have planned for the NHS?”May: “£20Bn paid by a ‘Brexit Dividend’, more than the Bus”Marr: “fantastic, and you love the NHS because you used it once”Marr: “yes, yes, I did Andrew”Entire country screaming “there is no Brexit Dividend”  
I’m assuming the country’s journalists and broadcasters are going to crawl all over the Tories’ sums today re NHS, Brexit dividend, UK growth and UK borrowing, and they will trumpet the truth for us out through the main news outlets not just here on Twitter. 
UK PM May says need to ensure parliament does not overturn Brexit  
We have so far produced almost 1,500 graphics supporting the case to remain in the EU and do a democratic U-turn on Brexit. To see all our graphics, articles and numerous videos, please go to our gallery at  
Shockingly bad journalism. No question, never mind sustained questioning, in challenge the blatant lies re extra money for NHS coming from a Brexit dividend. Sadly not quite as shocking that 'the Government' are trying to fool people once again.  
Labour MP, Frank Field calls for the abolition of the House of Lords: "Brexit will galvanise the country to reform as it has not done before.  One move in this renaissance may be forced on our tired political elite."   
When Jon Pienaar puts it to Tory Brexit Minister Suella Braverman (née Fernandes) that we now have one of the slowest growing economies (FACT) her reply is "I don't agree with that."That's the level our politics has sunk to. #5live #Brexit 
While the focus is on Kejriwal versus LG, his party’s radical flirtation in Punjab is taking a dangerous turn. His senior MLA Khaira backs “Khalistan” referendum. Where does AAP stand?@ChitleenKSethi reports: 
What is the point of a Labour party that lets the Tories have their way on a hard Brexit? - @HywelPlaidCymru 
‘Brexit dividend’ is sub-Trump soundbitery at its most patronising & cynical. All reputable economic forecasts, not least OBR ones which inform Govt policy, posit net losses of billions. It’s solely to appease Brexiters who will swallow anything ‘positive’ now.Happy Father’s Day 
When Theresa May talks about a #Brexit dividend that can help fund the #NHS  she is lying, her lies adding to the torrent of lies that have wholly perverted #Brexit as a democratic process. We have choice now, the lies & the liars or our democracy. We can't have both.#StopBrexit 
More Brexit delay. May reveals white paper won’t be published until week beginning 9 July now. So two weeks of proper EU negotiating, before everyone goes on holiday for August, and whole deal done in September? No chance #Marr 
Arron Banks, Brexit & the Russia connection.Those that can investigate this are those that should - it shouldn't fall on the shoulders of brave journalists like @carolecadwalla. Britain deserves to know what what really happened. Paging @10DowningStreet.  
"There will be about £600 million a week more, in cash, going into the NHS," says Theresa May on the post-Brexit dividend for the NHS  
I have been critical of the PM in recent months and frustrated at times by reports of the Brexit negotiations. But if ANYONE thinks that Jeremy Corbyn would do a better job just watch this. He wouldn't know the first thing about standing up for British interests. #Marr #Brexit  
The face of @AamAadmiParty in the Punjab opposes the concept of One India. Mr Khaira supports & justifies Referendum 2020 that calls for “Punjab nu Hindustan di ghulami toh azad karvauna “ but @ArvindKejriwal is shockingly silent. Your SILENCE SCREAMS of compilicty Mr. Kejriwal. 
Can we just be clear: any talk of a “Brexit dividend” for the NHS is a BIG FAT LIE.Anyone who claims there is, is a lying liar peddling lies and who thinks YOU are STUPID enough to believe them.Rant over. 
Delighted to learn that the Queen acknowledged and supports President Trump decision to deport dangerous muslim refugees#Brexit#MBGA#MAGA 
To date Royal Mail has refused to countenance a Brexit stamp issue, but has changed its mind and achieved appropriate balance with these stamps due out on June 26 pic.twitter.com/aRJRQWSDlH 
2. Might seem popular politics to say it will be cash back from Brexit but govt own number crunchers suggest there might not be any, even if there is it won’t be for many years and moreover economy uncertain because we’re leaving 
No Nick, she is promising to spend a brexit dividend that does not exist. 
I wonder if the "NHS Brexit Dividend" comes from the Magic Money Tree that was used to bribe the DUP?.It's a dead cat story to distract from the fact that May lied to the so called "Tory Rebels" and is going to lose on the meaningfull vote in Parliament next week. #Marr 
I'm not one for general BBC-bashing, but this is a terrible interview of Theresa May on #MarrPretty astonishing she's not even be challenged on the idea of a "Brexit dividend" for the NHS, when even official forecasts accepts this does not exist. 
Dr Sarah Wollaston, the Conservative MP and chair of the Commons Health select committee, says: "Don’t even begin to swallow any rubbish that this will be some Brexit bonanza. In reality the tax rises and borrowing will need to be higher as a result." #NHS 
Theresa May has just told #Marr that she doesn’t believe in the sovereignty of parliament and that parliament can not overturn the results of an advisory referendum.  It can, and in the best interests of Britain, it should.  #marr 
This NHS announcement is by far the biggest call @theresa_may has made as Prime Minister (other than promising that “Brexit will mean Brexit”). A Tory leader is promising more public spending paid for by more tax and more borrowing. 
Betrayed again. For years I’ve campaigned for a Brits only channel at ports of entry. Post Brexit we’ll still have to queue with EU citizens to get back into our own country. Javid drops UK-only travel queues as too costly and slow  
I welcome NHS boost but there is no #BrexitDividendTheresa May knows it's a lie. She knows that we know it's a lie...but she says it any way because she has no sense of shame & doesn't care we catch her out lying...anything to pretend Brexit is good. No respect for her. #Marr 
The Director of the Institute for Fiscal Studies says that to suggest Brexit will make the UK better off economically "is just wrong."  
Brexit: born with a lie, delivered with a lie. And the BBC will parrot the lie as if it was true. So the only people who will know its a lie are those that read a few newspapers. What a state we are in.  
Brexit should begin a British renaissance that starts with the abolition of the House of Lords - I will present a Bill on Tuesday that seeks to replace the Lords with a new senate  via @Telegraph 
‘So this is a real Brexit dividend which can be spent on the NHS?’ asks @AndrewMarr9 - any chance she might be asked about her own govt impact assessment papers which show the economy will shrink? 
Of all the shameful lies this woman has delivered, this has to be her biggest yet... THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND!!! #Brexit #Marr #NHS 
Theresa May announces an extra £20bn for the NHS. After discounting the amount raised by the ‘Brexit dividend’, that leaves £20bn to find. #Marr 
Pleased to hear @theresa_may tell @MarrShow the Brexit dividend will be spent on patient care not the black hole of bureaucracy. how do they ensure that 
Utterly dishonest performance from the vicar’s daughter to ascribe NHS increase to Brexit dividend, not higher taxes and borrowing. All govt forecasts indicate massive Brexit deficit, not dividend, and May knows this as she lies openly on #marr . The woman is a disgrace. 
Just to clarifyTHERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND. THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND. THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND.THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND. #Marr 
Theresa May banging on about a ‘Brexit dividend’. #Marr 
Finally. @NickCohen4 calls out BBC craven ignorance of the Russia-Brexit story. "Lies, fears and cover-up: Russia’s role in the Brexit vote is too big to ignore". Only thanks to @J_amesp, @PeterKGeoghegan, @carolecadwalla & now @mrjamesob is it being told. 
Theresa May just said higher spending on the NHS would be funded by "the Brexit dividend" - it does not exist. The OBR has forecast Brexit will *cost* the UK £300m a week. #Marr 
Am amazed that the media who propagated the £350 million NHS lie on the bus are now falling for the Brexit ‘dividend’ now - what has happened to UK media informing the public of the truth? 
Sorry @EmilyThornberry, it simply isn't true that no @UKLabour MPs want the chance to stop #Brexit. Dozens have already called for a #PeoplesVote with the option to #Remain. The majority of members want it and we are determined to deliver it. #Marr 
3) To remind you, our net contribution to EU budget, after money we get back from EU in various forms, is nearer £150m a week than £350m that was on bus. So even if you believe in the Brexit dividend, PM’s NHS promise still means our taxes and  gov borrowing rising £450m a week 
EU Commission."Proposes new laws"Is the sole EU institution tabling laws for adoption by the EU Parliament & the EU Council.I don't want an unelected foreign body proposing laws that affect my everyday life. I elect UK MPs to do that on my behalf. That's why I want Brexit. 
Thornberry on #marr envisages ‘Brexit could do us some good’ financially. But govt’s own forecasts show all scenarios leave Britain worse off, & Paul Johnson of IFS says ‘there is no Brexit dividend. Payments to EU will fall but tax revenues will fall more as a result of Brexit’ 
Worried your favorite player might get traded? When NBA players switch teams, you can switch jerseys. Learn more about American Express Jersey Assurance at . Terms apply. #AmexNBA 
Brexit fan Nick Ferrari admitting on tv he's a lying journalist. #Marr 
2) idea of Brexit dividend, as articulated by PM today, is dubious. UK growth has slowed significantly since Brexit vote, but global growth has accelerated. If this isn’t Brexit drag on growth, what is it? Lower growth cuts tax revenues more than we pay net to EU budget 
Abolish the House of Lords if Peers betray voters on Brexit, MPs demand 
The NHS “Brexit dividend” is such a terrible lie for the government to pump into our already damagingly polarised politics (the cash is mostly coming from tax rises) 
May announces extra money for the cash strapped NHS, funded by higher taxes and larger government borrowing, as there is no #Brexit dividend whatsoever.That's a headline you won't see in the Sun, Express, Mail or Times, ever 
#Marr #bbcsp Rubbish to claim that there is a #BrexitDividend ! The #BrexitReality is that #Brexit will be a costly, damaging exercise harming our public finances. If you want a dividend you have to #StopBrexit ! 
#Marr Bloody guardian bore on again Polly Toynbee. Always on TV & Radio. I hate Brexit & I hate Donald Trump. Every guardian journalist says same thing morning noon & night. No one gives a monkey’s what any guardian journalist says about anything OK.        
A ‘Brexit dividend’ is as realistic a prospect as a non fatal death, a partly lost virginity or a happy night out with Iain Duncan Smith. 
Institute for Fiscal Studies director Paul Johnson says new NHS funding can't be funded by Brexit dividend... because there is no Brexit dividend.  
Europe is fast losing interest in the Brexit soap – it has bigger worries | Andrew Rawnsley  
UK already losing £400m a week from Brexit (not gaining £350m for NHS) so May to wack up tax. This is madness. We need a #PeoplesVote on the Deal & to stay in the EU 
Absolutely necessary to give the NHS more money.But talk of ‘Brexit Dividend’ is red bus lie stuff.We are still in the EU now. We make a net loss if/as we come out.So any NHS £ boost is paid by new taxes - and from a position of financial loss. 
"The Conservatives, Labour, the right wing press and the BBC don't want to look at the Brexit scandal for fear of what they may find" Me in the Observer  
Thread on Theresa May’s NHS announcement - in short, don’t buy shoddy rhetoric about a “Brexit dividend”. The reality is the Tories still aren’t giving the NHS the funding it so desperately needs  
Election goes badly: buy time in office with £1bn to DUPBrexit going badly, very very badly: buy distraction with £20bn to NHSAnd if you are going to have a lie, may as well make it a really big one: tell people it’s a Brexit benefit. 
How to try to buy back a lie (& save Boris Johnson’s bacon): promise more than the £££s he promised to sway the referendum vote - then, in time, because if the new lie is swallowed & Brexit happens: ‘oh dear there won’t be the money after all.’ (& there won’t be.)  
"The debate over Brexit can be divisive, but that famous campaign promise can now unite us all: the British public voted for £350m a week for the NHS, and that – and more – is exactly what this Government will deliver." 
Extra spending can't be funded by Brexit dividend.1) Govt has accepted Brexit will *weaken* public finances by £15bn pa2) Financial settlement with EU plus commitments to replace EU funding already uses up all of our EU contributions in 2022There is no Brexit dividend 
Impressive spin operation from No10 to get all broadcasters to lead on Brexit dividend line, when the policy is as yet uncosted and most of the money is coming from mystery tax rises they have yet to outline 
"Brexit should begin a British renaissance that starts with the abolition of the House of Lords"  
It will emerge that most of the funding for the NHS promised by the Conservatives isn’t coming from a Brexit dividend, but either borrowing or tax increases. If it’s the latter, Labour’s policy of only increasing taxes for the top 5% and corporations will look much more appealing 
My bit in Observer on why left and right  don't want you to look at the Brexit scandal 
There is No "#Brexit dividend" for the NHS. I hate to break it to everyone but this £20bn NHS settlement is actually going to come from increased borrowing or taxation from all of us... the PM has spun this... #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Hilarious that Number 10 spinning that extra NHS cash is partly a Brexit dividend ..not even Brexit voters will believe it. If this line had been spun in New Labour era BBC wd have commissioned a Panorama on ‘spin’ and papers wd have fumed.. but media bar much lower for this govn 
Top 5 things that don't exist:1. #BrexitDividend 2. Unicorns3. Tory conscience4. Theresa Mays honesty5. BBC impartialityYet The Sun/Daily Mail readers believe in all 5 of them. Depressing.#Marr #Brexit #NHS  
The PM announces extra cash for the NHS.Of COURSE it's welcome !I question the TIMING of it & the DESCRIPTION of it as #Brexit dividend.TOUGH week ahead for the PM re Tory REBELSGo figure ! 
READ: Stephen Pound, labour's shadow NI Minister, released a video yesterday of his coming out to support a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
"Lies, fears and cover-up: #Russia’s role in the #Brexit vote is too big to ignore" - brilliant, blistering column by @nickcohen4  
Spain will be required to explain to the United Nations why it ordered violent attacks against the people of Catalonia on 1 October 2017 in an attempt to stop people exercising their democratic rights in the referendum on independence.  
Non-British EU citizens have been in Limbo for almost 24 months. We were not given a voice in the Referendum and that left us sad and betrayed.Will our voice be ignored again? We demand a vote in the final deal. @InLimboBrexit @acgrayling @mikegalsworthy @FinalSayForAll 
THEREISNO‘BREXIT DIVIDEND’ 
Brexit is going to happen, Anna, so YOU suck it up and let democracy speak  
 Dyson on the BBC news, again.  Why do we incessantly hear from him & Tim Martin but rarely hear from the literally thousands of successful businesspeople who can see Brexit is a disaster?  There are not two sides to every argument. 
Why isn’t there greater outrage about Russia’s involvement in Brexit? | Nick Cohen  
There's no Brexit dividendWe're giving EU £39bn divorce paymentWe'll pay billions more each year to access EU programmesBrexit will hurt economy - so less tax for governmentExtra money for NHS coming from higher tax rates/debt NOT BrexitBrexit is BAD for NHS not good 
I've seen these emails. When I found out that LeaveEU may be passing on FBI and campaign intel to the Russian embassy, I reported it to MI5 and NCA. US intelligence knows too. Brexit looks like it was part of a coordinated Russian operation.  
As it is absolutely clear now that the cost of leaving the #EU is greater than staying, the Prime Minister’s claims about funding the #NHS through a #Brexit  “dividend” are simply false.   A new low ,even for her.... 
It is sickening that Theresa May is doing a Boris Johnson & using the prospect of increased NHS funding as an advertisement for Brexit. The NHS is also haemorrhaging staff, which Brexit is partly responsible for. #marr #pmqs  
Every single #Brexit impact study says we will be worse off. Yet there is suddenly a #BrexitDividend. I can't  believe people actually fall for this rubbish. But they do. Repeatedly. #Marr  #NHS 
As media and MPs parrot nonsense about so called Brexit NHS dividend — mental health patients still sent hundreds of miles for treatment  
next federal election is a referendum on saving the ABC.  
Worth remembering it's not just Theresa May peddling lies about non-existent Brexit dividends. Jeremy Corbyn is just the same.  
At least Canada knows Brexit was a stitch-up!With Zack Massingham pulling a sickie it's left to Jeff Silvester to explain why Zack offered to return some of the money given to AIQ by Vote Leave back to Darren Grimes. You almost feel sorry for Jeff......almost.  
Thread. There isn’t a Brexit dividend.The NHS isn’t getting a massive increase.Journalists can’t do maths.  
When Theresa May announces her magic Brexit tree NHS money on #marr - please, remember this: 
Pushing ahead with #Brexit is NOT respecting the 'will of the people' - it is betraying them. They voted in good faith to have a better NHS, access to housing, education & social care - this will be impossible unless we #StopBrexit. Are you listening @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour? 
#Brexit dividend for the NHS? Not in this current settlement it would seem. As @GuardianHeather points out, all the money we currently send to the EU is already earmarked until 2022/23. So #NHS funding will come from borrowing or tax rises 
PARLIAMENTJust about every Member of Parliament stood on a manifesto promise to respect the EU Referendum result. Too many of them are inveterate, shameless, hypocritical liars. Those sitting in the House of Commons are not our masters. They are, quite simply, public servants.  
NHS "Brexit dividend" - until May confirms on official notepaper, with Treasury costings, it does not exist. 1/ 
Summary for those who can't watch:Brexit means BrexitStrong and stableTaking back controlBoris is just BorisNo appetite for a referendumThanks Andrew, here's your knighthood.  
Even Henry VIII didn’t subscribe to the doctrine of ‘government sovereignty’ which Mrs May is now asserting over Brexit. ‘We be informed by our judges that we at no time stand so high in our estate royal as in the time of parliament,’ is his celebrated declaration to the Commons 
Deeply worrying to see PM collude in Big Lie over non-existent ‘Brexit dividend’@TheIFS chief says govt could pay for more NHS spending by “taxing more or borrowing more . . . but not with imaginary dividend”Such blatant propaganda is anti-democratic 
Writing Guardian article - alongside  speech for the Lords tomorrow - in defence of parliamentary sovereignty and in opposition to the indefensible new doctrine of ‘government sovereignty’ which Mrs May has declared over Brexit 
#Marr @MarrShow“That is the official position of the government, which has accepted the Office for Budget Responsibility’s forecast that the public finances are likely to be weakened to the tune of £15 billion a year as a result of Brexit” #stopbrexit #OurNHS70 
So taxes and borrowing are going to rise just so Theresa May (who voted Remain) can say she's keeping the promise Boris Johnson put on the side of a bus during the EU referendum? Jolly good. 
Facts:The Earth is round.Vaccines are safe.Man-made climate change exists.There is no Brexit dividend.#FBPE 
#FinalSayForAll #BrexitDividend So the governments own report tells us that ALL Brexit options leave us worse off financially. Yet the PM is going to give the NHS 20 billion per year from the Brexit Dividend. She must think we are stupid enough to believe anything. 
Sunday Express goes full on with “Brexit dividend” and cash increase. Oh LordyDividend Nominal 5 years  
JezzFest LabourLive was unbelievable what an amazing event, as the media goes into Meltdown and the Tories, Theresa May £20Bn for the NHS paid for by a Brexit dividend?? You absolute liar, there is no Brexit dividend, OBR Brexit will cost public finances  £300M per week!!!!  
This is a shameless lie. The money for the NHS will come from tax rises and more borrowing. There is no ‘Brexit Bonus’. The Bank of England confirms that British families are already £900 worse off because of Brexit. Please challenge this lie today.  
This would be a criminal offence , or am I wrong @lauferlaw ? There is a definite connection between the Brexit badboys & Trump's motley crew. At all levels@LouiseMensch@thespybrief@FelisDave@ericgarland 
Is there a Brexit dividend when an effect of Brexit is to cut the amount of money available to spend on public services? /2  
Sunday Telegraph uses a £20bn figure divide by 52. Which is the real increase after 5 yearsReal5 year cumulaton Locking into Brexit   
All you need to know (concisely) about a supposed  ‘Brexit dividend’ for National Health Service  via @financialtimes 
‘NHS to get extra £384m per week’. Small print: Details of how the public will be required to pay through tax rises, won’t be spelt out until the budget in the autumn, because of ongoing arguments involving Hammond, Hunt and No10. This is the same bunch with no Brexit position  
Flashback: Latest revelations about the Bad Boys of Brexit having nasty Kremlin ties and that Isabel Oakeshott knew all along was staring us in the face at the end of 2017.  
MP demands abolishment of Lords if peers betray voters on #Brexit."To defy the elected House once is a misfortune. To defy it twice, particularly when this is about implementing the result of a referendum, is an act of Insurrection. The Commons must act." 
Will meet the media today 12.30 noon at Jalandhar,to expose the anti national deeds of @capt_amarinder and senior Badal  akin to the 2020 referendum! They’re very clever and know “how to run with the hare and hunt with hound” depending what brings them votes-khaira @ZeePunjab 
I dare @sunilkjakhar to register a case against me even while i deny support to 2020 referendum,does he have the audacity to act against Bj,Rss,Vhp etc demanding a Hindu Rashtra never denied by them?isn’t it as seditious as Khalistan?What’s @officeofssbadal’s take on this?-khaira 
Could Brexit-Russian contacts lead to a re-vote in Britain?  
Brexit fears forcing companies to shift investments offshore  
Providing a boost to post-Brexit farming with Evident Proof's immutable proof of evidence platform.  #ICO #Blockchain #Immutable #Unhackable #AntiCounterfeiting 
Brexit should begin a British renaissance that starts with the abolition of the House of Lords 
Latest poll shows separatists at Holyrood short of seats required to call referendum, but not by a lot. Unionist voters should not be complacent. @cultfree54 @2351onthelist @JohnLeoNo1087 @mik61scot @Ian_Burnett_ @athomsonkinross @AgentP22 @lass_ayrshire @Del_ivered @BRRSC 
An on line poll of 20k people suggests that only 7% of people who voted for Rouhani really voted for him. In a free election 42% of them would vote to end regime NOW, and 50% want a referendum now. In a different question 70% said they would say no to IRI in such a referendum.  
What seems like my daily message of support for @carolecadwalla who is in the eye of the Trump-Russia-Brexit storm. @Arron_banks tweeting about her ‘not being so lippy’ in Russia is particularly chilling 
To argue that public opinion about Brexit is exactly the same after two years, is an insult to the British people.I studied EU Law over 2 years, and worked in EU affairs for 3 and even I've learned a lot during this debate. 
Leading Brexit Campaigner Apparently Passed Documents on U.S. Probe into George Cottrell to the Russians  
Canada and USA are the other two. It's time Canada caught up with the others.Vote for changing to #pr4bc in the upcoming referendum. More info here:   
Keep hearing people saying that our 'stunt' detracted from the important things Jeremy wants us to focus on.No... Brexit* detracts from the things Jeremy wants to focus on.The biggest irony in all this is that we seem to value Corbyn's principles more than Corbynites or Corbyn! 
British Prime Minister Theresa May is intentionally lying to her country about there being a Brexit dividend. Diminished tax revenues due to the failing UK economy bc of Brexit means extra spending is only possible by extra government borrowing or higher taxes.. 
Remember hearing “There’s no magic money tree”?There seems to be one now. Because there’s certainly not a Brexit dividend.Every £ wasted on Brexit is more money that could have gone to our NHS.Let’s #StopBrexit and fund our NHS instead. 
The tarot revival thanks to Brexit, Trump and Dior  
Hi @BBCNews - There is no “Brexit dividend”.Your lead story is little more than a PR piece for @theresa_may.Even the government’s own analysis says Brexit will cost us money, not save us money.Shame on you @BBC, @BBCNewsPR. Report on the real facts. 
When all is said and done Brexit and Trump/Russia will be seen in history as part of the same massive conspiracy — the largest conspiracy in world history.  Mark my words!   
Banks —the primary financier of Brexit— handed off Trump transition team contacts to Russian officials.  
This is James Bond villain like stuff.Putin behind Brexit, trying to destroy the EU.Meddles in the US election, gets Trump elected who's alienating long time allies & threatening to leave NATO.Now the US leaving the human rights commission in the UN 
Tens of thousands of people will march through central London next Saturday to demand a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal. @MatthewStadlen asks: If you value democracy above your Remain vote, why would you be on the march? 
Finally figuring out that #Brexit as well as Trump-for-president were campaigns of Russia’s war against the West? I said they were, early in 2016 … and the anti-Ukraine referendum in the Netherlands, too. #PutinAtWar 
What a truly bizarre episode. User @GAtypical has deleted his/her account and vanished. Twitter sleuths had spotted a strong correlation with a certain notorious member of Lawyers for Brexit who has had accounts closed before this latest incident. 
I have been shouting about this for weeks....... Brexit will be an utter disaster just for this reason!  
Why Theresa May is wrong to claim there is a "Brexit dividend" to spend on the NHS.  
Frank Field MP - #Brexit should begin a British renaissance that starts with the abolition of the House of Lords.  
Those of you saying we're enemies of Jeremy Corbyn...We want all the same things Jeremy wants...We just know Brexit would stop him achieving them. #LabourLive 
A "£600m a week Brexit bonus" implies UK annual EU contribution is £30bn.In fact its more like £8bn.There is no grey area here - its flat out lies.Not spin, wishfull thinking or aspiration.Pure lies,This is how democracy dies.  
Unfortunately there will be no Brexit dividend - tax and borrowing to pay for NHS funding boost. #Skypapers 
Nigel Farage has called for Theresa May to be sacked as Prime Minister and claimed plans for Brexit have become so "ludicrous" that Britain is going to be worse off than before the referendum.You heard it from the horse's arse himself.  
It says something that I’ve not seen a single comment on twitter about what Jeremy Corbyn said. But I do know he saw a massive STOP BACKING BREXIT banner.I guess that’s because people care about one and not the other.Jeremy Corbyn’s time is passed, he’s totally blown it.  
The ‘Brexit dividend’ is as big a lie as the NHS false promise on the big red bus. By every calculation there will be less for the economy post Brexit and less for public services. And the £40bn they claimed we would not have to spend on leaving doesn’t help either 
Oh we’re back on this Brexit dividend bollocks again. Do they think we’re stupid? It will be funded by “increased borrowing and tax rises”. Say it as it is.  
Don't you just love it when an MP elected on s Leave ticket disregards her electorates and her constituents of Nottingham and does everything in her power to betray #Brexit because apparently she knows better than you.  
We're not asking you to abandon your principles @JeremyCorbyn.We're asking you to live up to them.You want a good NHS? Brexit screws itYou want to end austerity? Brexit would cut any government's budget.You want human rights? Brexit removes protections#LabourLive 
As a long time defender and fan of the BBC, i have to admit BBC News is no longer fit for purpose.  Shilling for the party in power, horribly partisan in its coverage of the Brexit debacle...  Really is a shame.  Whoever is setting the agenda there has broken something precious. 
Thank you, Chancellor Merkel, for your intervention in the 1-O referendum to protect innocent voters. Another call to @sanchezcastejon might win the release of #Catalonia political prisoners. 
Read these Eco quotes about how one defines fascism for yourselves and tell me that this doesn’t describe Brexit.  
The bad boys of Brexit , now aided & abetted by the Absolute Boys of @UKLabour . My rage is strong. 
Guys, Umberto Eco wrote this in 1995, which my sources tell me is definitely before this Brexit fiasco (though it’s beginning to feel like Brexit has been around for much, much longer).  
.@OwenJones84Brexit would tighten the purse strings of any future Tory government, so if you think Austerity's bad now... Just you wait...So... if the next government is Tory, the poorest in society are ****ed.If it's Labour, Labour gets blamed for Brexit and Labour's ****ed. 
The linked corruption and criminality in Brexit and Trump becoming more clear by the day.The work being done by Carole Cadwalla and her colleagues is important reading. 
The next time a corbyn supporter tells you they have the youth vote & that labour supporters have moved on from Brexit show them this. The GE17 ‘ youth surge ‘ was actually Remainers voting tactically . And does this look like moving on from brexit to you ? #brexit  
Trying to get to the bottom of the NHS funding “pledge”. Firstly let’s be clear there’s no such thing as a “Brexit dividend”. Secondly, a 3.4%/year real increase is below the long-run average NHS growth rate. And all the experts tell us we need 4%/year just to stand still.  
Top Brexit campaigner Andy Wigmore apparently passed documents detailing an American law enforcement investigation about money laundering on to a Russian official. 
Can everyone stop calling the money to the NHS a Brexit Dividend. It will come from tax rises, borrowing and the magic money tree 
Amazing that a media that fell for the £350m lie on the bus so willingly fall for the Brexit Dividend lie now. So few journalists so much media 
Brexit is going to make us poorer. All this promise means is that we always had the means to properly fund the NHS: the Tories just didn’t want to fucking do it. pic.twitter.com/Wml3401ewd 
This. This. This.The EU failing helps only Putin. The EU has been made into a scapegoat for all that is wrong in our own country. I know things are crap for many people. We need to own that for ourselves and change it. To be better than #Brexit.  
Unsurprising but still disappointing that so many Sunday newspapers, and subsequently broadcasters, appear to have swallowed the government’s “Brexit dividend” line uncritically 
The NHS is to receive a £20 billion boost by 2024 partly funded by a ‘Brexit dividend’, Theresa May will announce, as she sets out plans for the health service on its 70th anniversary  
a) there is no such thing as a Brexit dividend b) Brexit hasn't happened yet (thank heavens c) taxpayers will fund any boost to NHS d)media campaign suggesting otherwise is spin on stilts! 
‘Leading Brexit Campaigner Apparently Passed Documents on U.S. Probe into George Cottrell to the Russians’Andy Wigmore just had to email his Russian embassy friend and then lied about it to Members of Parliament.  (Leaked emails)  
Clear from the papers tomorrow, May has shaken the magic money tree to meet the Brexit pledge on NHS spending. If you don’t believe she’s willing to go through with it on seeing the news, whether it’s a gamble or not, you are in for a nasty surprise over the coming months. 
Pro-EU Tory rebels warn Theresa May they are prepared to vote down her Brexit plans Everything crossed that they all stick to their guns. 
On how there is no ‘Brexit Dividend’.Please don’t let anyone lie to you telling you otherwise. The reality is taxes and borrowing will higher as a result of Brexit. You can’t just lose GDP with no fiscal consequence.  
Four Sunday front pages. Four uses of "Brexit dividend" as though it is a fact ... when it is everything but.  
@OwenJones84 What happens if Corbyn takes power in a Brexit Britain, who'll get the blame for the country going to crap? Which party won't see the light of day for another 20 years? If it's your job to protect him... Do better.Help him help us help the country. #LabourLive 
It's not the "Brexit dividend" if it's being paid for by tax rises and more borrowing.  
There’s no such thing as a “Brexit dividend”, Theresa May is just saying that because otherwise they’d have to admit borrowing to invest in the NHS and public services is actually ok, meaning everyone would know they’ve been lying for 8 years about austerity being necessary 
Don’t even begin to swallow any rubbish that this will be some Brexit bonanza. In reality the tax rises & borrowing will need to be higher as a result 
A top Brexit campaigner appears to have passed documents detailing an American law enforcement investigation on to a Russian official.  
16 members of the former Parliament and Government of #Catalonia are in prison or in exile for organizing an independence referendum last October. Two of them have been imprisoned since 8 months today.#RogueSpain, Europe open your eyes.#FreeCatalanPoliticalPrisoners  
1. Not a single power grabbed yet it's a 'power grab'2. No plans to end devolution, the only party who oppose devolution are @theSNP who want independence at any cost3. Lots of new powers coming to Scotland with #Brexit4. but #SNP want to give powers straight back to Brussels 
RT if you’re backing Brexit like these fine folk!  
Don't often recommend an article from the 'New Statesman' but this is an interesting read....In Brexit Britain, Scots are starting to believe that independence is worth the risks  
What happens when you have 74% of 2017 Labour supporters and 85% of Labour members opposed to Brexit, but a leader who won't even support letting the British People review the Brexit deal?#LabourLive #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Brexit brings yet another nail in the coffin of the British economy.Plans for UK-Germany high speed rail services shelved due to ‘significantly changed economic environment’@nickreeves9876 @BrexitBin 
The British state wants to prevent another referendum or, prevent a Yes vote. One of the easiest ways to do the latter is to strip Holyrood of powers overs the franchise and hand them to Mundell. Postponers want to give them time to do this. Why? #DissolveTheUnion 
This is so bizarre- Open Britain have got the money and resources to run a ‘Brexit Live’ . What is stopping Adonis & co making this happen , instead of whining at Corbyn  
To be fair I think it’s you who’s trying to force a re run of the referendum, in the hope that eventually you’ll get the result you want  
So who will defend Brexit? Why does the government refuse to advertise its advantages? Why are Tory Brexiteers so silent? Why is there no propaganda war?Why are no Brexit billionaires or millionaires coughing up? We need to organise. At least sign up with  
DHOTYA has Amelia WomackDHOTYA has Keith’s 93 yo mumDHOTYA has “Even Wolves Die” kidDHOTYA has the Talent DoctorDHOTYA has 10 yo human right fansDHOTYA has Harry BarnesDHOTYA has Brexit Braces  
Festivalgoers appeared most concerned ab education, housing, wages & the NHS rather than Brexit. The mostly remain voters rued the “disaster of leaving the EU”, but said the ref. result must be accepted & was not among [their top priorities]#LabourLive 
Proud to see students and young people protesting peacefully at #LabourLive today - calling out Corbyn for backing a hard Brexit!Are you a student that is angry with how the Brexit discussions are going in Westminster? Join the @FFSake_ movement today #FFS #FBPE 
We are on the brink of losing Brexit. Soros and his billions, rebel Tories,  the Supreme Court, ALL the Opposition parties plus the House of Lords, the civil service, academia, the BBC and Sky not to mention a large part of the press are mobilising to overturn it. Beware. 
Read this: Farage & the truth about the illegitimacies of Brexit  
Members of Tony Blair's cabal who should have gone to prison for #Iraq and multiple other crimes not only got away with them but are now involved in blocking #Brexit You lot in Britain are either fools or scared to death of the neo-liberal mafia that protects these criminals. 
Such a fantastic day at the market today - 100 new sign ups & clearer than ever that public opinion is swinging behind a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Looking forward to seeing lots of you next Saturday! @BimAfolami @grantshapps @OliverHealdUK @DavidGauke 
Nobody's asking you to oppose brexit, just please stop silencing a party that does... #LabourLive 
Stop Backing Brexit @jeremycorbyn The views of Labour members have been systematically blocked in order to pursue a policy the vast majority of us disagree with. And now, peaceful protest is greeted with eviction.It's not good enough. 
Punjab CM Captain Amarinder Singh condemned AAP leader Sukhpal Singh Khaira for backing secessionism with his categorical support for Sikh Referendum 2020, propounded by Sikh radicals for the creation of Khalistan 
Paris beats London as Europe's most attractive city for investors for the first time in more than a decade  
There are 14 anti-Brexit protestors in this picture.Wembley Stadium holds 90,000 spectators.The world record for most people crammed into a Mini is 28.Ergo, the protestors in this picture would fill half a Mini.#Perspective #LabourLive 
NEW: Fresh Brexit headache for Jeremy Corbyn as shadow minister demands new EU referendu, 
WATCH Blow for Jeremy Corbyn as Labour shadow minister backs fresh EU referendum  via @PoliticsHome 
This month marks 25 years since decriminalisation of homosexuality. 3 years since the marriage equality referendum. The stigma against gay people is largely lifted. The same must happen for people who are #HIV positive. By raising awareness, we reduce stigma and fear #RedBall 
Labour Live: Corbyn fails to address Brexit divisions amid festival protest  
Just found the blueprints for Brexit.  
This is how low #Brexit Britain can go. Briefing against the Republic of Ireland because they stand for their national interest & the EU 27.  
What we’re asking for is clear, and @OFOCBrexit & @FFSake_ were peaceful in our protest and our message;Stop  Backing  Brexit!!#FFS#Brexit#LabourLive 
Simple message to the Leadership of the Labour Party. Stop backing Brexit. There is a way forward, support a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit  Deal. #FFS 
STOP BACKING BREXIT - the message from #LabourLive today is clear. 
The EU as a political construction is in a state of terminal decay:  #Brexit 
Jez, this is the first step of a young people’s campaign that WILL convince you to stop backing Brexit and to back a People’s Vote.  
Labour’s schism over Brexit unfurled at #labourlive 
Don’t be jealous remainers but here I am at Lake Como enjoying being in the European Union. In Italy for work. Let’s #StopBrexit shall we? Freedom of movement is an incredible gift. I don’t want my children to lose it. I want a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. #FBPE 
Full context: 1) Facebook was inside Cambridge Analytica office and told to leave by investigators who seized equipment, 2) FB hired co-founder #1 who took the data and sold to CA, 3) FB signed NDA w/ co-founder #2 in day of Brexit vote results, 4) FB has misled in hearings.  
“Information operations”.The Guardian’s resident Brexit bunny boiler thinks @andywigmore and @Arron_banks operate in a way that isn’t: “Yes, more gin and tonics... oh how about we troll the Guardian with more funny pics!? Call Pierre...” 
People wearing “bollocks to brexit” badges were in the minority, @lewis_goodall. Labour members & voters know our manifesto stated we respect the ref. result: to leave.Labour have to navigate a path for both remainers & leavers. Today, at #LabourLive, there were both sides. 
Seems they want to help BJP in its mission of ‘Congress mukt Bharat’. Also waiting to see if they pick up the issue of AAP MLA & LOP in Punjab supporting referendum for Khalistan. Hope in their zeal to save democracy, they don’t ignore a threat to unity & integrity of the nation.  
As @HuntedTeamNick has pointed out, UKGov has already planned a ‘resilience fund’ of £12bn a year (£250m/wk) for 5yrs to pay for Brexit.That’s nearly 10% extra a year for the NHS already budgeted for Brexit instead.The only dividend is a Remain Dividend.#NHSremaindividend 
Great to have Stephen Pound, shadow NI Minister, join our campaign for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal - at the same time as campaigners have called on Jeremy Corbyn to back us at #LabourLive 
So there are anarchists who support 'Punjab Referendum 2020'? And notice elements of the 'tukde tukde gang' who stand by anarchists. Issues may be different but the same ecosystem stands & rants together! Glad @capt_amarinder speaks up keeping #IndiaFirst 
If Corbyn stopped backing Brexit it would benefit the country, his voters and his party.Well said @OFOCBrexit@FFSake_ @BestForBritain #peoplesvote #LabourLive 
Hi Faisal,Is it about time government ministers were challenged on this?A lot of people have changed their minds now they know a bit more about Brexit.Could you and other journalists challenge them on this please? It’s 2018 now - not 2016. Thank you   
Labour voters and supporters escorted out of labour event for asking to act on the wishes of most labour supporters This is the craziness of #Brexit Britain political parties.#StopBackingBrexit  
The missed penalty kick was a statistical blip that says nothing about Messi as a player, and it was a total referendum on who Messi is as a person.  
Why were the anti-Brexit campaigners ‘escorted out’ of Labour Live? They should have been given the platform after Jeremy. They actually represented most of ‘Labour Live’! #LabourLive @OFOCBrexit  
Was with a fantastic group of young Labour supporters today at #LabourLive who all understand that Labour should back a #peoplesvote on the final #Brexit deal.Shame about violence/aggression when we held the banner up in the crowd during Corbyn’s speech- but we remained peaceful!  
Steve Pound is backing a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Are you with him? Join us at the march next Saturday (23rd June) near Pall Mall.  
So much for party democracy. These young anti-Brexit campaigners were kicked out of #LabourLive for peacefully protesting Corbyn’s stance on brexit.  
Anna Soubrey, who is she, other than the self styled destroyer of Brexit?What purpose does she serve, what has she ever done for the British people and British society as a whole?Anna WHO??Answers on the back of a postage stamp please:  
Today at #LabourLive, Jeremy Corbyn set out a list of principles and objectives that a Labour government would pursue. I agreed with every single one. However. Brexit. Goes. Against. EVERY. SINGLE. ONE.  
Jeremy should have held an Anti-Brexit Live, then he would have filled Wembley Stadium #LabourLive ⁦@OFOCBrexit⁩ 
To be clear. Lots of people in this photo are Labour Party Members and Supporters. Some voted for Jeremy Corbyn and are members of Momentum. We just believe that you can’t end austerity outside the EU. Brexit harms the poorest, hardest. #FFS#PeoplesVote 
.@jeremycorbyn stop backing Brexit. #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
After being in the EU with opt-outs, the govt now wants #Britain to be out with opt-ins.  So all that would change with #Brexit is that Britain leaves the institutions and loses its say in decisions that will affect it anyway!   
At #LabourLive, @OFOCBrexit & @FFSake_ campaigners call for Jeremy Corbyn to listen to his members and resist backing a botched Brexit. Please RT:  
Youth campaigners @FFSake_ & @OFOCBrexit call for the Labour leadership to change their hard Brexit-backing position. Please RT:  
Treasonous remarks made by  @AamAadmiParty Punjab LOP @SukhpalKhaira supporting  Referendum 2020.Question for Drama-loving 4 CMs;@mamtaoffical @ncbn @cmokerala and @cmofkarnataka ,partner of @RahulGandhi ; Do you also support this Anti National stance of @ArvindKejriwal ? 
Proud to have peacefully protested at #LabourLive with @OFOCBrexit - young people want and deserve a #PeoplesVote and @jeremycorbyn should champion young voices on #Brexit!!  
A group of young anti-Brexit campaigners have interrupted Jeremy Corbyn's #LabourLive speech to unveil a banner which says "stop backing Brexit"  
Not a bad turn out for the Corbyn speech. But it should worry Labour that so many of them are wearing “bollocks to Brexit” badges. Anti-Brexit banner unfurled as Corbyn starts speaking. The next 6 months are going to be the slimmest tightrope for him to walk. #LabourLive 
Labour members protesting during Corbyn’s speech. They say they support a “people’s vote” and want Corbyn to “stop backing Brexit” #LabourLive 
If Jeremy Corbyn had held an 'Anti-Brexit Live' he'd have had to hire Wembley Stadium. #LabourLive 
What a week it's been.Scotland beat England at cricket#SNPwalkout Labour has 600% more senior Brexit resignations than the ToriesDaniel Johnson reveals he couldn't answer a multiple choice question for 5yr oldsDuncan Hothersall loses an argument with a bridge 
There is no Brexit dividend. Every £ wasted on Brexit is money that could have gone to our NHS.Let’s #StopBrexit and fund our NHS instead. 
Greeting Jeremy Corbyn as he takes to the stage. Banner held aloft by a dozen or so people: “STOP BACKING BREXIT.” #LabourLive 
Politicians don't need to create more opportunities to block Brexit. They need to get on with delivering Brexit. RETWEET if you agree!  
The idea that the UK can leave the EU is nonsense. We can give up our membership and our major influence in the EU, but the economic superpower will still be next door, having a huge impact on our economy & domestic policies.So take back control #StopBrexit!#Brexit #FBPE 
Brexit...  
The best way of getting rid of the Tories is to get rid of Brexit as fast as possible, it would utterly shatter the Tory party, it has no other major policy, it would be defeated, broken and ripped apart by bitter internal conflicts. #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Constant  steam of tweets today from Corbyn, because it's all about him. Pity he's not so concerned about Brexit, because it's all about us.  
Another new anti-brexit / pro-Eu group forming, this time in South Wales. Why not give them a follow?@bridgendforeurope great to see. If you meet any regretful leavers who are #Remainernow whilst conducting your activities, please put them in touch.#peoplesvote #StopBrexit 
Two years ago today Jo Cox was murdered for opposing #BrexitThe aim was to terrorise and silence us...But we have not been silenced.You would be proud of us Jo.Rest in Peace.#StopBrexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
The Referendum in 1975 had a two thirds majority to Stay in EU. Far more legitimate than a fraudulent majority of less than 4% with millions barred from voting.#FBPE 
The Telegraph has decided it loves lies more than the truth. The Government's own figures show the *annual* cost of Brexit is well over 10% of what we spend on the NHS.  
I hadn't realised the power of my tweets.Unbeknownst to me, my tweets are apparently directly influencing the EU negotiations and causing them to fail.Fellow remainers. It's all our fault. #FBPE #brexit 
In Fleet today the message was clear: Brexit is not thought to be going well and there is strong support for a People's Vote on the final deal. Visitors also wrote Postcards to their MPs challenging Brexit.  
Before supporting Arvind Kejriwal, CM Mamata Banerjee, Shri N Chandrababu Naidu, Shri H D Kumaraswamy and Shri Pinarayi Vijayan must clarify if they endorse AAP leader Sukhpal Khaira’s statement supporting Referendum 2020 that asks for Punjab’s secession from the Indian Union. 
It's nearly time! This coming Saturday (23 Jun) we're joining what's set to be a HUGE march for a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. We're meeting at the station 11am. See you there! @peoplesvote_uk @euromove @CoHubNetwork @_Britain4Europe @Scientists4EU 
The results are in! The first ever full-scale Brexitometer in #Leeds has delivered its verdict. And we are blown away by the results, which show that the overwhelming view of the people of West Yorkshire is that #Brexit will be bad for the economy, for the #NHS & for Britain. 
The #brexitometer in Winchester today tells a story that MPs need to understand. We don't want Brexit. #PeoplesVote 
Me and @Jasmin_Beckett at #LabourLive saying BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT#FBPE 
How many times will #Brexit be mentioned on this stage today Jeremy? The single most damaging issue facing everyone in this country that you seemingly support.  
Statement of the obvious: "There is no Brexit dividend." If #Brexit happens, the costs will be enormous.  
If today's papers and the EU can be believed it really would seem May has gone for a very soft brexit, which in effect means we won´t be leaving the EU regardless of what she says or claims. All this time, all this waiting just for all those lies. It's not good enough is it. 
That Brexit will bring humiliation has been obvious for a long time now, see my blog of last October:  
ONE WEEK TO GO until the #peoplesvotemarch!We have a great range of speakers talking about why we need a #peoplesvote on the final #Brexit deal. This includes the following cross-party politicians. Brexit is bigger than party politics. Come and join us! 
The Referendum to which @SukhpalKhaira has extended support seeks to divide India & plunge Punjab back into dark days of terror. His statement is blatant violation of Constitutional ethics of an MLA.I demand @ArvindKejriwal to clear his stand on Khaira’s statement. 
It is no coincidence that the number of European fruit pickers working in the UK has plummeted in the last couple of years. Brexit has soured the UK’s ability to attract much needed workers from across the EU. Make no mistake, Brexit will leave us in a serious jam. 
**POLL**What do you think? #BrexitRT Poll after you vote for a larger sample. 
There are no benefits of Brexit  
You promised #LewishamEast you’d fight Brexit. So now you’ve got the job, when are you going to confront Corbyn?  
If we allow this to continue we will become a vassal state of the EU, with Brexit in name only and unable to escape the gravitational pull of the EU without a major explosion. We must act now, writes John Longworth  
Day of Action across Renfew & Erskine today! Engaging conversations with people in our local communities. Only @theSNP can deliver a positive impact towards the UK Government and the #PowerGrab they are enforcing on us all! #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit#StrongerforScotland 
So I want to know what Labour is going to do to make sure that Brexit doesn't steal jobs, prosperity, our ability to fix this country, or the control we have over our laws now.#LabourLive 
Brexit would tighten the purse strings of ANY future UK government.So even if Labour could weather that storm better by spreading the cost of Brexit fairly...They can't guarantee the Tories will never get in again. If you thought Austerity was bad before...#LabourLive 
I have solved the mystery of where this talk of ‘equal partnership’ came from. Alex Salmond used it in the Scottish Parliament when he was announcing his choice of question for the referendum. Saw it on YouTube. As I thought, an SNP confection. 
Tory MP, 33, eloquently sums up Brexit argument in 440-word Commons speech 
You see, Brexit, sometimes the people you forget about - because they live in the outlying places - draw on their togetherness and their pride and their history, and they band together and shout “Húh!” and refuse to bow down   
Never trust what a rich Brexiter says, pay close attention to what he *does*Ignore Rees-Mogg as he talks of Brexit Bonus but watch his investment firm HQ is moved ‘cos of BrexitIgnore John Redwood as he lies about Brexit benefits & listen as he advises others to invest abroad 
Macron's Brexit SNUB: French president wants to SCRAP English as EU's main language  
The “meaningful” vote was in fact the referendum in 2016, the result of which the government of the day pledged to enact. Remainers, however, want the authority to debate and reject any deal, and then force a second referendum, says the @Telegraph 
Brexit deal MUST be reached by October or UK could be left in legal limbo, ministers warn  
Fomenting dissent #PeoplesVote style in Kings Cross today. Lots of takers for the big march on 23rd against Brexit disaster  
Labour MEPs’ stall being manned by a guy in a “Stop Brexit” t-shirt topped off with a “Bollocks to Brexit” sticker. Have they told Jeremy? #LabourLive 
Let us make clear that if the government drives through #Brexit as it intends we will regard it as a criminal abuse of democracy, and we will do everything in our power to ensure that in due course the worst of  the perpetrators are prosecuted & jailed. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
If May goes for a soft brexit and keeps us locked into the EU we have not left. At that stage it becomes the people -v- May 
Dear Twitter I am very sweary today. Im sorry. I’ve had an essay crisis. I’m completely exhausted. And I hate Brexit. #stopbrexitsavewinnie 
#Brexit means giving up a seat at the top table in an organization which can negotiate on equal terms with the USA and China in order to go around begging for scraps from middle eastern dictatorships.This is called taking back control. 
Corbyn assumed the youth of Britain would support him after Glastonbury.After Glastonbury the youth of Britain thought Corbyn was anti Brexit.Now they know he’s anti EU.And Labour wonder why the youth of Britain are abandoning Corbyn...  
Had a long chat this morning with a woman who had bought in Spain for her retirement, and is now caught in a ghastly #Brexit #Waspi pincer movement.  She asked about another #ScotRef - she’ll be changing her vote to Yes 
Leftwing group pushes for the UK to stay in EU.Student organisation says it will join #StopBrexit and #PeoplesVote demonstrations this summer.More and more young people are mobilising against Brexit.   
.@scullyp & @thomasbrake check out the results of final @Open_Britain #sutton #BREXIT street stall straw poll today. Majority think #Brexit not going well and will not be good for jobs or #NHS. Most think there should be a @peoplesvote_uk on final deal 
Punjab has no place for any divisive ideologies,esp when it has found its footing on the path of progress. @AAPPunjab leader @SukhpalKhaira's support to Sikh Referendum 2020 is absolutely outrageous& @AamAadmiParty leadership should immediately clarify its stand for once and all. 
After an amazing stay in #Vienna (capital 13) with Louise, Alex & , a random lunch stop at Europapark in Lassee, we arrived in Bratislava, our 14th capital. We are now HALF WAY around the ! Defo faster then #Brexit negotiations!#StopBrexitSaveBritain #Iameuropean 
If anyone doubts Westminster’s intentions please remember:Polaris/Trident based on Clyde - too dangerous to be down near London,Hiding the McCrone Report,Scotland as testbed for Poll Tax,The ‘Vow’,Stifling of debate re Brexit & Devolution,Power Grab.I don’t trust them! 
If the Tory government can't keep a promise to their own party's MP's on Brexit & you believe they'll hand back powers after 7 years....more fool you! 
One of the worst lies told during the Referendum campaign was this of Gove's. It helped stifle debate and along with "Project Fear" allowed any rational argument against Brexit to be rubbished.  
We’re learning more and more just how toxic is the legacy of @theresa_may in the @ukhomeoffice: rigidity coupled with   a lack of real political courage plus a degree of mendacity, all on display in her conduct as PM over #Brexit 
A large swathe of UK political and media figures see Brexit as a tactical opportunity rather than a strategic crisis  
. @M_AndersonSF hosting a packed Brexit fringe event at #SFAF18 with Dr Colin Harvey QUB, @ChrisHazzardSF and the incredible John Sheridan from BCAB. #SFAF18 
"Pragmatic Leaver"  really, Anna? So disappointed...  I can't support someone who is campaigning for a #SoftBrexit  No #Brexit is acceptable!  
Punjab govt should register case against Sukhpal Khaira for his remarks. Arvind Kejriwal should clear his stance. Sukhpal should also be dismissed from post of leader of opposition: Anil Sarin, BJP Punjab Vice president on Sukhpal Khaira’s support to Referendum 2020 (Khalistan)  
Very clear views from Wimbledon residents about the government’s handling of Brexit and the need for a #PeoplesVote today. @S_Hammond will you stand up for your constituents? 
Barefaced liars from the referendum campaign - Penny Mordaunt (no UK veto on Turkish EU accession) and Boris Johnson (literally everything) - were rewarded with Cabinet posts. Hardly a wonder that the rest of our national culture should follow suit  
As stupid as Brexit supporters then?  
So why did you join the union? Workers’ rights? Collective bargaining? Brexit? Bringing down the Tory government? Perennial resentment of others?Nah... the ice cream van.  
RT this if you want a #FinalSayForAll on #Brexit.  
These two quotes about Corbyn from the Daily Mail tell you everything you need to know about his pivotal role in assuring Brexit.#FBPE 
Leaver to me yesterday "you're undemocratic trying to overturn a referendum"Me "you've just overturned the 1973 referendum"Leaver *silence* 
Many of us feel forsaken on Brexit"One firm commitment I make to people.... is that you have a real say, the final say in deciding on the policies of our party... No-one – not me as Leader, not the Shadow Cabinet, not the PLP – is going to impose policy" 
One day in the future, pundits will discuss a VAR decision without making it into yet another tiresome referendum on whether we should have that technology in place. Today is not that day. 
Just another unforeseen result of the insanity of Brexit. Thread:  
Just a reminder. This Brexit government is propped up by the DUP. A party which campaigned against the Good Friday agreement which brought peace to NI. A party which refuses to give equal rights to gay people and denies a woman’s right to choose.  
Well this about says it all, doesn't it. Mind you, HE COULD HAVE SAID IT BEFORE THE REFERENDUM??  
The EU Brexit deal will be “really quite humiliating”, senior Tory tells the excellent @JGForsyth today. I’ve heard few in Govt, Leavers or Remainers, who now disagree with this. 
Brexit is a current CRISIS.A general election could be years away.@uklabour should be focusing on stopping Brexit and ensuring the well-being of its core supporters (as a vast majority of them want).Current tightrope walking is alienating people in droves. See polling!  
This would be fine IF:- Brexit were just a UK process, with EU27 out of the picture- Brexit didn’t *exacerbate* the problems that led people to vote for it- Brexit as sold were deliverable- A bespoke option were availableNone of these things exist. We need realism now.  
Thank God that the AAP did not win in Punjab. I am not shocked seeing an elected MLA of AAP backing secessionism & coming out in support for the Sikh referendum 2020- Khalistan. Let’s not forget that Arvind Kejriwal had stayed at Khalistan sympathizers home during campaigning.  
If we #Brexit, we have no say on EU rules & miss out on the “Brussels effect”: Multinationals complying with EUregulations to gain access to the #SingleMarket find it’s then easier to implement them globally.The EU sets international standards,rest follow 
You could've put your house on Theresa May & the Remain Establishment backsliding on Brexit, hence why we stuck around! We're calling on all patriots to stand up for what is right, decent and true - British democracy! Join our movement today >>>  
This smear is an attempt to destroy my credibility. My anti-Brexit activism is a much greater threat to my career than Brexit is. I’ll be OK. My country, though, will not. I make no apology for bringing my knowledge and experience to bear in fighting this affront to democracy.  
PPCC Chief @sunilkjakhar lashes out at AAP leader Sukhpal Singh Khaira for backing secessionism with his categorical support for the Sikh Referendum 2020 propounded by Sikh radicals for the creation of Khalistan. 
A A P Punjab & National leadership stands for unity & territorial integrity of IndiaThe Party doesn't support any referendum & action will be taken againstMr S S Khaira@SukhpalKhaira@msisodia@ArvindKejriwal@BhagwantMann 
People ask why I always refer to Brexit as English (it should be simply ‘Exit’!) Because only England is Exiting: (1) Scotland & N Ireland voted against (2) Tory English nationalism (aka extreme Thatcherism) is driving Brexit, incl in Wales. Explained in  
There is some strange thinking here. If no ‘deal’ is reached, we don’t have to crash out: we can stay by withdrawing Article 50 sect 2. “Ministers fear UK will crash out of EU without a deal because there isn't time to pass new Brexit laws - The Telegraph  
I cannot believe I am now planning for a no deal Brexit at home.Plan a - fight Brexit. AlwaysPlan b - stock up on foodPlan c - ask my employer if it will let me move my job to its office in Amsterdam if need be. 
The #PeoplesVote March takes place in exactly one week! Join us to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal!  
Two-thirds of voters believe Theresa May making bad job of Brexit 
Aam Aadmi party's leader of opposition in punjab is supporting referendum for separate khalistan. One reason u should not support these snakes. 
Today’s @FinancialTimes “There is no Brexit dividend” - we will be £15B a year poorer. Stop this madness #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Brexit has happened because so few of our politicians are much good at persuading people or communicating big ideas or a sense of vision. 
#ChippingNorton doesn’t want Brexit and wants. #peoplesvote #PeoplesVoteMarch 23 June 
How long are we going to ignore the job losses caused by Brexit @RLong_Bailey The fall in the pound, near zero growth and households £900 worse off because of Brexit is having a significant impact.For the sake of the country we can't go on ignoring it. 
“After Brexit we’ve got to take greater responsibility for the future. Politicians can no longer blame Brussels -- and I think that’s a good thing”@GiselaStuart discusses life after leaving the EU in Brexit and the Battle for Democracy, a spiked film 
Corbyn's Labour is revealing itself as an anti immigrant pro #Brexit party (Owen Jones praising Caroline "Turn the tap off" Flint)If they really think they positioning themselves for Electoral success with young voters they are frankly kidding themselves  
Five months on, I don’t recant a word of this. Brexit looks ever more dangerous and unwise. I have turned it into a book with Will Hutton, just out:  
They’ve literally left it to the last possible moment ti come out against Corbyn’s Brexit strategy.Far too little, far too late. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
It's scary how closely the Tory Brexiters' approach to Brexit politics follows the script laid out by Goebbels after a Nazi referendum victory in 1933  
Christopher Chope MP: blocks a Lib Dem bill to outlaw a deeply invasive form of sexual harassment as it was "not debated properly".Also Christopher Chope MP: votes for the government to be able to pass hundreds of laws after Brexit by statutory instrument, without debate.Hmm. 
"There is a growing school of thought that ScotGov are not too concerned about holding a referendum, as the recent developments have opend the door to dissolve the Union in a courtroom. The first opportunity comes on July 24/25." #DissolveTheUnion 
After half hour most people at @Open_Britain #Sutton street stall are saying #brexit is not going well and big interest in @peoplesvote_uk March next Saturday 
It is rich of Soubry to talk about betrayal. Who was it whose constituency voted for #Brexit? Who was elected on a manifesto to leave the single market & customs union? Who promised to respect the referendum result? That's just three of her own betrayals 
Now that i have clarified will you clarify @capt_amarinder ji weren’t you part of Amritsar Declaration akin to 2020 referendum? Did you sign d memorandum to Boutras Ghali UNO chief in 1992 demanding”right to self determination” again akin to 2020? Plz don’t play double standards!  
What’s shocking is he accused me of colluding with the Russians on Brexit with no evidence. He’s been drinking the same Kool Aid as you! @guyverhofstadt @thesundaytimes 
No mate. You are not "winning". Your version of what used to be my party is leaving me and my children in poverty. You are a self obsessed, unelectable bunch of fools congratuating yourselves on your imaginary utopia whilst the Tories continue to destroy lives and Brexit rolls on  
Subsequently Farage has said that if he doesn't get the Brexit he wants, he'll take up his rifle. Ukip today tweeted about preparing for war. Why aren't these callous blood-thirsty maniacs in prison for treason? 
Right now in Bedford Street, Exeter, @Devon4Europe mega stall. Lots of interest. Lots of disgust at the government's handling of Brexit, also from those who voted leave. @BenPBradshaw please come and say hello.  
The @guardian have printed 4 corrections to the last 4 stories they printed . Using stolen material is a serious matter and not one we will let rest. Get back to proper journalism rather than spreading fake news because Trump/ Brexit hurts your feelings...  
Depends on Brexit. With Brexit, Paris probably becomes Europe’s capital over time, as it was before French revolutions and occupations led London to supersede it in the 19th century  
I do not care if Brexit is delayed, discarded or derailed. Never again should the Scots be left dangling over the precipice while our next door neighbours argue amongst themselves how best to destroy the fabric of their society 
You know when Corbyn supporters ask 'what can he do to stop brexit, he's not in government ?'Well, the Daily Mail seems to think he could have done quite a lot, and they are happy he doesn't. #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
The Brexit ref was advisory in law. Those who deem it binding, such as @afneil and @iaindale are allowing a dangerous precedent. Any constitutional change can now be effected by a minority of the electorate—as long as they edge it to win an 'advisory' referendum. Utter madness.  
How the last laugh is on this country for buying into the bantz of the Bad Boys Of Brexit – a column  
Hey @jeremycorbyn, you must be really pleased with yourself today. Myself? Really really disappointed. You can be sure I'll never vote for your Brexit party again until you are gone and replaced by a Remainer moderate.  
Punjab CM Capt Amarinder Singh condemns the statement by leader of opposition Sukhpal Khaira supporting Referendum 2020 (Khalistan) that aims for Punjab to secede from Indian Union, asks Arvind Kejriwal to clarify stand on his partyman’s support for pro Khalistan referendum 2020.  
Constitutional head CM of Punjab strongly condemn the statement of AAP LOP @SukhpalKhaira supporting Referendum 2020 that aims for Punjab to secede from the Indian Union, Mr @ArvindKejriwal Govt of India must remove the mask on AAP @HMOIndia @PMOIndia @rajnathsingh @narendramodi 
What is more likely to have caused Brexit?a) Putin and "the Russians?"b) the fact United Kingdom GDP, measured as a percentage of the EU average, collapsed from 2004-2014, outside of the London region.  
This week's Brexit debate begs the question: How on earth were so many politically correct, europhile Blairites allowed to become Conservative MPs?  
I strongly condemn the statement by leader of opposition Sukhpal Khaira supporting Referendum 2020(Khalistan) that aims for Punjab to secede from Indian Union. Please clarify your stand&ask your partymen to act responsibly. Do see what this Referendum stands for, tweets Punjab CM  
On second anniversary of Jo Cox’s assassination, we have got to rededicate ourselves to eradicating this hard right nationalism which is danger of undermining England through Brexit 
From my next @Britishgq interview @caitlinmoran wearing her anti-Brexit pro People’s Vote heart on sleeve, knee and forehead - join the march for the People’s Vote on Saturday  
Do you approve of this statement by your top Punjab Leader @ArvindKejriwal ji? Justifying Khalistan, Referendum 2020...!!! Clearly anti-national  
AAP leader Sukhpal Khaira supporting Referendum 2020 for Khalistan & break India. Ye Rajneeti Badalne Aye HaiRemember last warning of KPS Gill, Cop who ended Terrorism in Punjab? He said AAP providing platform to Khalistan radicals in PunjabThanks Punjab, You didn't elect AAP 
Hopefully the collapse of Brexit will see the Tory government, maybe even the Tory party following Brexit down a deep, dark hole, never to reappear in it's current shameful form.  
Dear Labour supporters.Today the Daily Mail lavishes praise on Jeremy Corbyn for his actions (read, inaction) over Brexit.Is there ANYTHING else you need to know?@UKLabour @Labour4EU @labourpress @labourwhips #labour #BrexitShambles #JeremyCorbyn 
We need a total clear-out of remain supporting MPs  and a Brexit supporting PM - before it’s too late.   
Enjoyed catching up with ⁦@DeccaJourno⁩ covering everything from moths & birds to #Brexit.  Oh, and I’m standing firm over my Heathrow bet :)  
John Redwood MP:'I'm against any tax rises to fund NHS.We currently pay EU £12 Billion a year.That's plenty of money: we don't need tax rises as well.We should Get On with Getting Out of #EU & spend the money at home, particularly on health.'#Brexit 
If A50 isn’t extended (or is but not by long enough) then Brexit fails. If A50 is extended by too much then Brexit will have died before we get there. I think the two states overlap. Sorry Brexit, I think you’re doomed. 
It is Government policy to leave the EU. Instead of getting bogged down in factionalism the entire Government irrespective of the stance of individual Ministers on Brexit must show national leadership & get out there, extol the benefits of Brexit & deliver for Britain.  
But what it all comes down to is this, indy may be a risk, but it’s a risk that Scotland can manage and control. Gordie would prefer we’re stuck with a Tory Brexit, a disaster in which we’re helpless to influence the course of events. Which do you prefer?  
How a clean-break Brexit could boost the economy and Treasury coffers:  
And here I am in today's @FT making the point again. You can fund additional spending on the NHS from higher taxes or higher borrowing, but not from a Brexit dividend that does not exist  
What a shameful way for an elected MLA to justify anti-national acts like ‘Referendum 2020’ for Khalistan. People supporting breaking of India should be booked for sedition, both in India and abroad.  
Basically it comes down to choosing 2 risks!  The cliff edge that is Brexit and a Tory Government for years. Or the smaller risk of Independence, a chance to get back into the EU and have a voice in the world  
Traditionally, the UK oscillates between Labour & Tory; they represent opposing ideologies. The next election will be different. On the single biggest issue of our time, Labour & Tory are united. Those who oppose Brexit will not vote for either party. #LibDems #Greens #Plaid #SNP 
READ | The Mail's take on the Bad Boys of Brexit.@Arron_Banks: "A lot of very clever people couldn’t see the elephant in the room. Mass immigration, the pressure on the NHS, schools, everything. In many ways it’s a cultural war, not a political war." 
Anonymous liar lies. (It's the Brexit way).  
What did we learn from this shameful and shambolic week? My latest Brexit Blog post:  
Mr @ArvindKejriwal I strongly condemn the statement of your LOP @SukhpalKhaira supporting Referendum 2020 that aims for Punjab to secede from the Indian Union. Please clarify your stand on this & ask your partymen to act responsibly. Do see what this Referendum stands for  
JUST IN: At last, total unity behind Theresa May's latest Brexit proposal #Dateline2018Also, don't forget to follow us on Instagram:  
Merkel told Rajoy ‘Europe cannot accept’ police brutality during independence referendum 
This will become an acid test for the BBC. Both the OBR and IFS think there is no Brexit dividend - it is a politically motivated fiction. If the BBC starts routinely talking about the Brexit dividend as if it really exists then they really will have become the Brexit BC.  
LibDem Wera Hobhouse, promoter of the Bill to criminalise 'upskirting', says it’s an outrage that 1 MP can block a law for which there’s consensus among 649 MPs Meanwhile, she is trying to block Brexit, for which there is a consensus among 17.4m voters.  
‘Ever since she took office, the Prime Minister has been trying to evade and avoid parliamentary sovereignty over Brexit ...’ Start of my speech for Monday’s Lords debate 
IFS director @PJTheEconomist: “There is no Brexit dividend”   
When the RW press are hailing @jeremycorbyn as the saviour of Brexit, it’s time for a rethink. 
Excellent article from a brave colleague @Sandbach please RT & send her your support. 'We're not Brexit rebels, we're pragmatic leavers,' says Tory MP  
Ireland turns on EU as Brexit alliance crumbles - 'Stop RAILROADING us'  
Supporting 2020 Referendum may b any individual's views,but it's not @AamAadmiParty ideology & will never be. AAP is against any kind of violence & bloodshed & stands only for UNITED,STRONG,SECULAR,EDUCATED,HEALTHY & CORRUPTION FREE India & will always strive for that @msisodia 
When you hear ministers describing the imminent boost to NHS spending as a Brexit “dividend”, think . Britons will pay for it through increased taxes and the burden of higher debt  
England should have been given this 11am slot today, we'd have paid for fuckin brexit 
Threads like this are the saddest. Professionals with valuable expertise, who routinely had their informed concerns dismissed by ignorant blowhards like Hannan & Carswell, dealing with the utterly unnecessary, potentially dangerous fallout of the Brexit idiocracy’s blind faith.  
Says it all that the Mail is praising @jeremycorbyn for pretty much being the saviour of Brexit, rescuing the PM from her own ‘rebel’ MPs.  Just says it all. No opposition at all, despite the empty words of fighting a Tory Brexit.  What an absolute let down. 
Brexit is starting to feel like one of those family holidays that goes badly wrong  
In overwhelming numbers, Labour voters rejected Brexit. Now, Corbyn is betraying them for his own ideological ends. People voted for Corbyn to stand up ‘for the many, not the few’. It is now the many that look to him, hoping he takes a stand against a few right-wing Tories. 
After some replies last night, it’s really clear there are some people who need to connect with others to form a support network. If you feel alone, trapped, or don’t know where to turn because of Brexit, please like this tweet and use those likes to connect with each other  
Why we will win a people’s vote & stop Brexit  
"There was so much ghastly sneering about those women"... You tell ‘em Laura! @bbclaurak defends #LoveIsland contestants’ #Brexit discussion on this week's #Brexitcast. Download the podcast here:  
So true. Even the BBC lamely came up with it as an afterthought. Lets face it our forces are being run down on purpose so the top brass can turn around and say we need to join a EURO-FORCE for defence. All part of the Brexit in name only by PM May and Mr Corbyn.  
Even without this praise from The Daily Heil, Corbyn will go down in the history books, alongside his Brexit pal Theresa May, as a stubborn, dogmatic, ineffective politician who helped cause untold damage to this country. 
This is not some snarky comment. The unvarnished truth. Brexit will be the far left's only significant achievement 
The Daily Mail thanks Corbyn for all he has done to deliver Brexit 
"The will of the people" was a phrase invented by Goebbels - the Nazi propaganda minister.It was a device used to stifle dissent.  The methodology was to run a referendum, grab a "win" of some sort, then put out the idea that all the patriotic people thought this was best. 1/n 
In case talk of Brexit dividend comes up in discussion of NHS funding thought I’d retweet excellent @PJTheEconomist piece explaining in his wonderfully clear way why there is NO Brexit dividend. NHS needs extra funds but it’s taxes not Brexit that will have to pay for it  
Seems Chope doesn’t even know what ‘upskirting’ is. Mind you, Caroline Nokes never read the GFA, Dorries had to ask colleagues what to say about Brexit, and the less said about ‘sectoral analysis’ Davis the better. We vote for Tory MPs to dick about it seems #chopeofthechurch 
Something smells very strange indeed about the process for brexit as it was finally exposed in our hearing last Tuesday. Very strange. 
The thread from @GAtypical was a tissue of lies from beginning to end, serving his/her objective of misleading readers who may not know the details of our complex national and European government structures into supporting his/her exploded idea of a “liberal leave” soft Brexit. 
Why would someone suggest that we trade real accountability, real democracy and true political power in the EU for what a democratically flawed system of lost sovereignty in pursuing a #flexcit Norway-plus Brexit? The answer is ideological zealotry.  
Read this thread - it gives a vitally important example of why #Brexit , no matter the good people who were initially persuaded by it, is a seriously bad and damaging retrograde step.  And then reflect this is only one example of many thousands...  
When the PM decided to take the U.K. out if the EU, the considerations were:- a narrow and tainted referendum result;- her policy statement that brexit meant brexit - prior misrepresentation of the law by Cameron. These are not the constitutional requirements of the U.K. 
In 2011, @Anna_Soubry said:The #EU was overly costly, bureaucratic, lacking in both democracy & accountability to the many millions of people who pay through their taxes.I don’t know about you, but it seems a bit hypocritical to me #EUWithdrawalBill #Brexit  
To be praised by the Mail on Brexit truly is a badge of shame @jeremycorbyn 
Yesterday an elderly neighbour, brexiter, told me he thought the govt were making a terrible mess of the negotiation, and that he was no longer committed to Brexit and thought it wouldn’t matter if it didn’t happen. From him that was extraordinary. Gobsmacked. We’re winning! 
Although I’m not a votary of 2020 referendum seeking a separate homeland for Sikhs but i don’t hesitate to say that it’s a result of a consistent policy of bias,discrimination n persecution of Sikhs ever since partition,be it attack on Darbar Sahib,genocide of Sikhs in 1984 etc! 
"Accept it's certain we are leaving the EU". Really? No. No. No. I will never accept that. Brexit is not a done deal. Yes, prepare for all eventualities, but never ever accept that this is a done deal. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
So one single MP in 650 can derail a private member's bill.But 48% of the population get ignored in shaping a referendum result.Not saying either is against any rules or anything, but still.Not feeling very happy about the great British democracy. 
Trying to think of all the conversations I had with people during the referendum where they demanded we leave Europol, Euratom, European Medicines Agency etc etc - In fact I struggle to remember talking to anyone who knew about the customs union, nope, not one street stall convo  
Join us on Sat June 23rd in London to protest and #StopBrexit - I’m travelling from The Netherlands to help make the #PeoplesVoteMarch the ‘biggest demonstration on Brexit yet’ ? 
Today's Daily Mail sincerely praises Jeremy Corbyn for his efforts to help the Tories deliver Brexit  
.@Nigel_Farage says remaining in the EU would have been better than the type of Brexit the UK is heading for, and that Theresa May should be sacked over the government's Brexit plan.Watch the full interview with @Peston in our new series,  #ITVNowWhat  
'We're not Brexit rebels, we're pragmatic leavers,' says Tory MP  
Conclusive: No one can now defend continuing with #Brexit; it is beyond doubt that both Govt & Opposition are now acting against the Will of the Ppl & the interest of the UK!The Ppl must be given a #FinalSaywith a #StopBrexit option. Denial = AUTOCRACY. 
The "Brexit dividend" is made from the droppings of unicorns. Brexit will hurt public services.  
Hi you can read it here: Thread by @hywelowen: "Interesting trip to France today: 1. Took taxi to airport. Lovely taxi driver who voted for . I explained about t […]" #Brexit Share this if you think it's interesting.  
Brexiteers now fighting tooth and nail so that MPs (the elected representatives of "the people") have no say on the Brexit dealThe mask falls This is not about "the will of the people", "taking back control" or "sovereignty"Just blind Brexit ideology 
How a gruelling ten days makes a deal on the Irish backstop more difficult - my latest #Brexit analysis via @RTENewsNow  
The powerful anti-EU group ERG is manipulating the media, in particular @BBC and @BBCNews, to spread their hard-Brexit propaganda. They are waging an "air war" to ensure that they achieve their post-Brexit vision  
"Why Corbyn could be the man who saves Brexit?Jezza has been consistent on EU.Voted against EEC in 1975 referendumHe voted against the 1993 Maastricht Treaty, which paved the way for ever-closer EU integration.10 yrs later he was hostile to the Euro" 
Parliament’s problem isn’t anti-Brexit protests outside. It lies within | Ian Jack  
Good to see this tweet still here then; Banks & Wigmore confirming they are what they look. 
A useful catch-up with this week’s dismal #Brexit performance at WestminsterAs @chrisgreybrexit says, we can no longer claim that our arcane and shambolic parliament, with its 18th-century style and process, is anything to be proud of 
Petition: Give the electorate a referendum on the abolition of the House of Lords  168,800 keep it moving. RETWEET  
For anyone who read my piece on Brexit and its impact on the creative industries, this is a kind of companion thread from someone in medicine. (Only shorter, you'll be relieved to hear). What unfurls, in this case, is a matter of life & death.  
why would any sane person want to become British in the brexit britain of today... I am british & ashamed of my homelands government. seems to me people NEED, (not want), to become british simply to secure their future in their chosen home country.  
When people talk about a "people's vote" or a "meaningful vote" and they claim they DON'T want to stop Brexit remember this @acgrayling reveals the real plan:Postpone, delay and frustrate it until the referendum becomes ancient history. They cannot succeed#PeoplesVote #brexit  
Brexit cost Jo Cox her life,  never forget what Cameron did,allowing Farage to bring his hate, Racism, fascism to the people and RW groups turned on their own people... what a sick nation we have become because of Brexit.. it has destroyed the UK our childrens future IS at risk  
Boggled. This is a Reader in sociology at Leeds Uni. He is advocating a dictatprship to overthrow Brexit. Yes seriously #FullGrayling pic.twitter.com/JTpAQamjgi 
Oh NO we will not . We are united in determination & @Conservatives will be wiped out if they don’t give the country what it voted for! #brexitNo 10’s calculation is Brexiteers will back down & accept softest of Brexits.    
Brexit and Trump's election taught me that every measure on the ballot should, regardless of how stupid it sounds, be taken seriously, so vote no plz.  
THE PEOPLE'S BREXIT.Take back control of our laws, our money, our fishing waters, our borders.ONE law for all. No "other courts".No polygamy.No slaughter of animals without stunning.No enforced shrouding of women.A common language.Protection of ALL children.TRUE EQUALITY.  
26. I keep making this case but then ignorant Brexit grunters just grunt "bollocks". So they are in fact saying that the EU *hasn't* taken control of aerospace, fishing, agriculture, energy and all points between. If that's what you think then why the fuck did you vote to leave? 
The Brexit comic using satire to 'laugh at our leaders'  
Brexit: no room for doctrine - we cannot walk away from the EU without putting in place the structures and agreements which will enable vital functions to continue. We have to negotiate deals because the alternatives are unthinkable...  #Brexinfo. 
German government is on the verge of collapse. Italy is overwhelmed. The MAJORITY of Brits want to BREXIT. Why?  Immigrants are NOT enriching cultural!  They will NOT assimilate. They are invaders. The globalists will not win this battle! 
I'm tired of waiting. First map of the #MainePrimary: the results of the #RCV referendum. Many more maps to come - by next weekend if not sooner. #ElectionTwitter 
The Tory party, bringing you:BrexitUpskirtingUniversal CreditGrenfellHostile Environment NHSA litany of shameful, despicable fuck ups. 
All the States currently applying to join the EU e.g. Albania Montenegro Serbia (and others) are so massively impressed and influenced by the UK’s referendum result to leave that they are continuing with their applications to join the most prosperous trading area in history 
Bloody EU. This last year has been awful. I haven’t been hit with any massive phone bills from using my phone across Europe. I’m sick to death of the EU making things better for us. Brexit now!  
EU making preparations for possibility of Brexit being postponed.Even better, call a #PeoplesVote and #StopBrexit. 
Oligarch who met Arron Banks to discuss lucrative gold deal has "top-level Kremlin contacts".Also involved was Sberbank, a sanctioned Russian state entity in which Jacob Rees-Mogg's firm has about £60m invested.#Brexit #BrexitRussia 
Boris doesn't mind independence....as long as it's not Scottish independenceWestminster hasn't finished stealing our resources yet!Westminster doesn't work for ScotlandWestminster only works for WestminsterTime for a change!#YouYesYet#indyref2#Referendum#Independence 
Nicola Sturgeon has oddly declared that the international tendering process was "a blatant betrayal of Scottish shipyards" and a reneging of promises made to the Clyde shipyards at the time of the Scottish independence referendum in 2014.  
#PRICELESS... THERESA MAY SHUTDOWN ROYALLY IN PARLIAMENT WHEN ASKED IF TRUMP SHOULD NEGOTIATE #BREXIT...  
I'll just leave this here for you to think about....In indyref2 Scotland votes no, our country will cease to exist, it will be a county of England named north Britain, and we WILL become 2nd class citizens in our own country!!!#YouYesYet#indyref2#Referendum#Independence 
Straight back from holiday, first think I did was to get online and join #SNP. The first time in my 52 years I've joined a political party, but can only see Scotland getting dragged into an abyss by WM over brexit.  Proud to stand up and be counted against the tyrannical Tories. 
Here is an important analysis of the effects of rules of origin on the UK's manufacturing industry after Brexit. Why is this not being more widely discussed?  
Britons seeking Australian & US citizenships ahead of Theresa May's Brexit talks . What BS. I suspect terrorism, child rape rising violent crime and being treated like third class citizens is more likely the reason  
‘They’re TERRIFIED!' Brexiteer (and pervert enabler) Christopher Chope says THIS is the EU's BIGGEST Brexit fear.’Your attempt to change the subject won’t work, Chope.  
Ministers fear UK will crash out of EU without a deal because there isn't time to pass new Brexit laws 
Remember, there was never any reason for a government 'to obey the will of the people' in the Referendum.The #Mail bullied a weak PM into using the slogan to try & intimidate REMAINER's. It failed, but #May continues to be intimidated by #Brexit extremist to lie to MP's  
The British Medical Association @TheBMA has been screaming for help for the better part of two years, but NOBODY'S LISTENING!!! I thought Brexit voters cared about the NHS....  
Thanks to @SnpDalriada for hosting the public meeting on #Brexit in #Lochgilphead tonight - good questions and great turnout including  one person who only joined @theSNP on  Wednesday..... 
Wait. There's more:Soft or hard, the EU has given Spain a veto over Brexit. If Madrid isn’t happy with the deal, there is no deal. <glances to camera> I’M LOOKING AT YOU, HERE, @DExEUgov 
As part of the EU though, Gibraltarians took part in the EU referendum. Of those who did, over 19,300 – that’s 95.9% – voted to remain. Only 800 voted leave. Don't talk to me about will of the people. WILL OF THE PEOPLE, MY ARSE. 
I am still a little paralised. I mean, after Brexit, Trump and 5 weeks of cancellation it feels so unreal that reason and good taste in the end has come back to this world. Still cant believe it: #LuciferSaved #LuciferonNetflix 
We are beginning to live in a Brexit one  party state with an ideological media that never deviates from the party line. A Brexit dividend for the NHS? What unadulterated nonsense! There is no dividend. None. Inside EU we could have spent billions more.. 
wow - had no idea the Tories were "tiptoeing around" the SNP with this direct power grab of areas devolved to Holyrood and imposition of a hard Brexit Scotland didn't vote for  
Looking forward to visiting the beautiful borders on Sunday to talk #indy #Brexit & #SNPWalkOut & to catch up with @CalumRKerr & @AbsoluteGinius 
What Chope did is typical of today's dumbed-down, truculently fogeyish, Brexit-obsessed stop-the-world Tory party. It lives and breathes for stupidity and chauvinism dressed up as "principle". 
Or Labour could do the right thing and1) Uphold democracy. >> Brexit undermines it.2) Fight for what is clearly the best for the country. >> Brexit demonstrably is not.3) Adhere to the party's foundational values, e.g. intl. solidarity. >> Brexit does not include any of them.  
As a nation we massively cocked up on Brexit, but we just absolutely nailed that public vote on @LoveIsland #LoveIsand 
Great to see championing of the importance of UK-EU science...and an acknowledgement that Brexit is damaging UK science already. This must be fixed.  
Here's an idea. We need an organisation to campaign against leading Brexiter MPs in constituencies where there are strong Remain majorities. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
A Shameless Lie! Diminished tax revenues due to Brexit are far greater than our EU contribution. The £5 billion will be met by unnecessary extra borrowing due to this ridiculous act of national self harm.  
Both Universal Credit and Brexit are Conservative inflicted disasters that we plough on regardless with - simply because of the stubbon stupidity of this cruel, incompetent and corrupt minority Govt and because of the money they bribed the DUP with.  
Indeed. #christopherchope should have laid down a Bill to outlaw skirts & dresses & avoided all this hoo-haa, or brought back chastity belts, corsets & knickerbockers. Anyway at least we’re not talking about #brexit  
The last two big London protests got around 50k participants. We need far more for the #PeoplesVote march. So please publicise it at least once each day for the next 7 days.   Please RT.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
It's apparently now or never to secure a hard Brexit or we may find ourselves writing in German in future. So says that total buffoon Longworth. And the @telegraph prints it. 
Written about Trump, applicable to Brexit.  
Imagine telling the country you WILL deliver the best Brexit for Britain then failing to get a simple upskirting bill through the Commons. 
How Scotland’s biggest selling paper is reporting on #Brexit today. Not sure what’s happening but feels like a perceptible shift in Scotland  
The strident and concerted attempt by the Remainer establishment to overthrow the democratic will of the people has been shocking and has revealed a rottenness at the heart of the way this country is run:  #Brexit 
WHY 'HE' UNELECTED 'LORD' want's to stay in EU . Brexit blocker Lord Heseltine pocketing £90,000 a year in EU land subsidies  
Check out how our author, Janice Atkinson, was silenced two times in the European Parliament while talking about Tommy Robinson and Brexit.  
Wait. Government advisor lori Love Island? Ninu Brexit Period. Loooooool unemployment ti de 
We're shit at voting for a government or on brexit my god we nailed that public vote on Love Island #loveisland 
No referendum act will get through Parliament. I appreciate everyone’s passion, but it has to be realistic.  
@theresa_may will next week announce a £5 billion annual windfall for NHS from Brexit. People will see the benefits of Brexit 
And meanwhile, over at Brexit...  
Debate on MONDAY 18th JUNE It's time to shut this UNELECTED Club of Cronies down. Petition: Give the electorate a referendum on the abolition of the House of Lords  
Nigel Farage says Theresa May's version of Brexit will be worse than staying in the EU  
So #Brexit was to a large degree brought about by a party which supports a fascist criminal. The former leader of this party has appeared dozens of times on the @BBC. Fascism is at the heart of our politics. The fight against #Brexit is a fight against fascism.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
That is really interesting.So I can say to a leave voter....All of the EU27 countries get a #FinalSay on our #Brexit deal...Why should we not get one?It is our deal. We want to be in control.Fab.Nobody is going to say "No" to that.  
So  - how did you manage to fail to do so?  You have so little discipline over something as obvious as this, yet the rest of us are watching you inflict #brexit on us in a similarly chaotic manner! Disgrace  -the lot of you! 
It may be hard to remember the last time a British politician spoke about anything other than Brexit. What other policies might be slipping through the cracks?  
Brexit news latest: Theresa May told by top Tory rebels 'you are losing our trust' - Evening Standard  
Three reasons today given to me by local French people, why the UK is "doing" Brexit...1/ they are crazy2/ the government is greedy ( don't understand this one)3/ they don't like foreigners 
Brexit latest:The ERG are now in emergency session deciding how to avoid the inconvenience of Parliamentary democracy. #FBPE 
The EU is preparing for the possibility Brexit will be postponed  
Parliament failed every woman (and probably kilt wearing man) in the land today. This Government couldn't organise a small alcohol tasting party in a brewery & the PM is the leader of the herd of dinosaurs. It is time they went & their stupid #Brexit folly with them. #PeoplesVote 
& the head of BBC news Fran Unsworth is reported today as wondering why younger people don't use the BBC as their main source of news.  One thing she hadn't thought of is that most people u.40 are Remainers and will hate the BBC's brexit bias. 
Its worth remembering that when people vilify the SNP for their complaints about only having 15 minutes to debate Brexit devolution that Davis and Chope were allowed to waste 6 hours of parliamentary time today purely for their own vanity. #upskirting #Chopeing 
Maybe I’m paranoid & Brexit-obsessed, but part of me thinks this is what ardent Leavers Christopher Chope & Phillip Davies were up to when they outrageously blocked legislation that would have banned upskirting: throw a dead cat on table (& discredit parliament for good measure).  
Scene: A Brexit voter takes stock of his allies.Christopher Chope, blocked a law on 'upskirting'.Arron Banks, palling about with the Russians.Rees-Mogg, moving his business to Dublin.Vote Leave, caught cheatingFarage, who used to strut around singing Hitler Youth songs  
You just know he wants to blame Brexit!  
The odious, grandstanding Christopher Chope MP is, inevitably, a full-on hard Brexit headbanger. How do normal, thinking Leave voters feel to have this character on their side of the fence? 
.Brexit Britain"A deluded & bitterly divided ex-imperial power about to shoot itself in both feet by leaving the EU, and preparing to sell off the last of its family silver - including the NHS - in a desperate quest for new trade deals.". by @joycemcm 
Imagine for a moment...... that Sturgeon had accepted the results of the EU referendum and on the day the result was announced she had come to her little podium and said “we are going to work with the UK gov to get the best deal for Scotland/UK....just imagine the possibilities! 
What did we learn from this shameful and shambolic week? My latest Brexit Blog post, up today:  
Brexit at Tiffany's 
Have you considered for one moment Gordon B that given current directionless British government, massive growing Nat debt, poorest economic growth, senseless policy & Brexit - that doomsday may come first?  
Here’s a thing; like it or not, Brexit is happening. If you keep trying to damage Labour who have the superior strategy (by light years), you’ll get a no-deal Brexit and the likes of Christopher Chope and Nadine Dorries making decisions on your behalf #spanners 
The release of these stamps follow calls for Royal Mail to issue a series of stamps to commemorate Brexit.  
The US should pay attention to foreign Cambridge Analytica probes, Americans haven’t yet fully grasped how malfeasance in the Brexit referendum and campaigns in the US might be intertwined in scandal.  
Quite simply: the UK is holding us back.More than that: now Hard Brexit looks more & more likely, the UK is endangering Wales.We only need to look at post-USSR countries like Estonia to see how much better, how fast growing our country could & will be. 
The #Brexit "dividend" is an accountant's approach. The net UK contribution to EU budget is dwarfed by economic benefits of membership @FraserNelson 
Except it isn't just brexit now is it? Our political system has been found unfit for purpose. You either sit back and watch us turn into Trumpland, or get out there and make the difference!(With family, friends, neigbours, great placards and sunshine of course!)  
Get your banners ready, prepare your marching shoes, and get down to London next Saturday for the biggest Brexit protest yet.  
MPs have already had THREE meaningful votes: The Article 50 vote The vote to hold the EU referendum The EU referendum itselfThey don't need more opportunities to block Brexit. They need to get on with delivering Brexit. 
Doubts cast on ‘Brexit dividend’ for National Health Service  
A message to all remainers. There are too many giving up. They think Brexit is inevitable. It is not. The case for Remain is stronger than any deal. All outcomes apart from remain make us poorer and will follow with our FOM being restricted. Come to the #PeoplesVoteMarch 23 June. 
David Davis 'blocked' plans to give parliament more power over Brexit  
Just over a week until the #PeoplesVote March - make sure you're there if you want a vote on the final Brexit deal!  
Congratulations to anti-Brexit Lib Dems increasing support in Lewisham - Labour cannot fake it forever as they support Tories in their damaging Brexit  
The Leader of Iran’s Islamic Revolution Ayatollah Seyyed Ali Khamenei says there is a need for a referendum among Palestinians from all faiths to form a Palestinian government  
One might almost think .@Nigel_Farage was trying to avoid any dialogue with the brilliant .@carolecadwalla Something to hide? #Brexit #CambridgeAnalytica#PeoplesVote #marr 
Clegg issued these words of warning in December. It is playing out exactly as he predicted. We will be muscled over that line by a Parliament too chaotic and cowardly to stop and think and say no to the Brexit zealots.And then it’s too late.#PeoplesVoteMarch 
EU companies would need to stop using British parts after Brexit to conform to rules of origin for "Made in EU".UK companies would need to stop using EU parts to conform to "Made in UK" rules of origin.The EU can source parts throughout the EU27.Where will UK source its parts? 
This @TheSun cover is two years old. Possibly my favourite from the referendum. The editorial argued that Brussels has proved increasingly greedy, wasteful and a bully – hard to argue with that two years on.  
MPs have already had THREE meaningful votes: The Article 50 vote The vote to hold the EU referendum The EU referendum itselfThey don't need more opportunities to block Brexit. They need to get on with delivering Brexit. 
“Imagine, if you will for a moment how much better things would be if instead of Mrs May’s big bowl of fudge we had a government fighting for a clean Brexit.” (via ⁦@kippercentral⁩) #ForTheNation 
Janice Atkinson: I will continue to fight against the EU, to deliver Brexit and make a lot of noise in the chamber  
Davies and Chope who derailed the 'Upskirting' Bill are ardent Brexiters, needless to say, and it's not a coincidence, given polling evidence on the strong linkage between social attitudes and support for Brexit:  
We now go live to Brexit 
What a revolting character. So obviously given a knighthood for political services by the Conservative Party..... Sir Christopher Chope: how he voted on gay marriage, women’s rights and Brexit.   
It’s time we called People like Soubry, Grieve, Sandbach, Soros,Grayling,Major, Blair etc, exactly what they are.They are Hard Remainiac Traitors who care not for Democracy and the right of the people to decide on theirFuture.We must guard against these imbeciles.#brexit. 
Pls RT.If Vote Leave are confirmed to have broken electoral law it undermines the integrity of the referendum@OwenPaterson would go so far as to say it would be illegitimate 
BREXIT WARNING: EU threatens May ANY attempt to trade with USA will be 'UNACCEPTABLE'  
Two years ago today: my voyage down the Thames aboard HMS Brexit with Nigel Farage, pursued by Bob Geldof in a pleasure cruiser  
Here is Nigel, he voted leave (& campaigned for #brexit most of his life). He’s now realised #Brexit is not working out how he envisaged & says it may be better to #StopBrexit.@Nigel_Farage have you heard of the #remainernow movement?  
Good news & well done @sajidjavid for taking doctors and nurses out of our 2-tier visa system. Post--#Brexit it is important that we tailor our system & have an immigration system that is based on the skills need of our country.   
'Great uncertainty' over EU citizens Brexit settlement scheme  
Now the walkout may have been over BREXIT, but it may have been for a much baser reason7526 additional members at an average of, say, £3.50 a month (from £2 for kids to £5 for adults) equates to £316,000 a yearfor a skint organisation"a fool and their money..."  
Have you notice the strong correlation between the upskirters and support for a hard Brexit? 
For the next week or so I'm going to be regularly banging on about the People's vote march on June 23rd in London. I'd encourage all other Remainers to do the same. We have to make these events huge because opposition to Brexit isn't coming from Labour as it should be. Please RT. 
As you're all aware @NicolaSturgeon has said repeatedly "when the terms of brexit are known" but the unionist politicians and press keep asking about the date. In order to know that date, we need to know when the Tories are going to be finished with Brexit negotiations.... 
Oligarch who pitched a deal at Brexit's biggest funder, @arron_banks, may have visa revoked. Fascinating new details on Brexit-Russia from @lukeharding1968 & Dina Nagapetyants 
Incredible. Of the numerous notifications I get these days, almost half of them are tantrums, mostly from the #FBPE crew who are actively campaigning against #Brexit. Should have worked harder to actively campaign and make a positive case for remain then - BEFORE the referendum. 
Brexit is not easy because a spiteful EU makes it that way in an effort to keep us and our cash in their doomed Empire. I wish we could sue the politicians who were so incompetent that they made EU deal after EU deal with no thought to building in an escape route.   
READ | In a letter to supporters, our chairman slams Brussels' blindness to soaring anti-EU sentiment across the continent and encourages Leavers to #donate to our campaign to restore Brexit's good name in the face of scandalous Remainer attacks. 
May: ‘Brexit Dividend’ WILL Deliver Multi-Billion Pound Boost to Health Spending   
When Lord Lawson & I debate Brexit on @adamboultonSKY on Monday, I will ask him how his French fluency is coming on. He is applying for a carte de sejour & applicants from non-EU countries have to demonstrate fluency. He will also have to demonstrate ‘substantial means’ 
You are the #GRExit supporter. Aren't you?You were also against #BRExit. Aren't you? Give us a break, clown....  
Mishcon de Reya  “We confirm receipt of your letters - Please note however that we are not instructed in relation to either complaint” Banks & Wigmore - proof that money can buy you lots of things but it can't buy you class or apparently Mishcon de Reya  
Poll: A recent poll shows that two thirds of voters think Theresa May is making a mess of Brexit. What does she needs to do regain your trust? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
There isn't even a  referendum called yet and already they've wheeled out this dinosaur?  They waited until the last moment last time.  Do they think we will listen this time?  #TheyArePanicking #DissolveTheUnion 
I have the answer. No need for another referendum. Every MP has to take a lie detector test. The question being, is Brexit in the best interests of the U.K. If the majority of MPs pass the test and say yes, then we Brexit (whatever that means). If they’re all lying we #remain x 
Quick scan of the early arrivals at today's #handsoffourparliament protest in Glasgow. #Brexit #SNPwalkout #PowerGrab 
Paul Manafort - a greedy frontman for dictators & crooked oligarchs - is the first of Trump's team to be jailed but won't be the last.Meanwhile, the UK has only just scratched the surface of Russian involvement in #Brexit, which was a dry-run for the Trump campaign.  
Foster + Partners designed the Gherkin, Wembley Stadium and the ceiling of the British Museum but now they could be on the move due to Brexit. This would be a national tragedy. Please share. 
A recent poll shows that two thirds of voters think Theresa May is making a mess of Brexit. @IainDale asks what does she need to do to regain the trust of the public? #IainOnLBC 
SEX CRIME: Mail readers react to Christopher Chope MP blocking the upskirting bill as only Mail readers can; by suggesting other places to see women, by calling for provocatively dressed women to be arrested, by complaining about the punishment and by mentioning Brexit and ISIS. pic.twitter.com/KWStAYRwk3 
Please ask why #leavers pretend #brexit is needed to control immigration, when we could just cancel brexit and actually apply directive 2004/38/EC (removal after 3 months if no job).  
Did the US, India, Kenya & Nigeria have a "soft" independence from UK? No.There's no such thing as  soft independence. You're either independent or not. This soft Brexit nonsense is just that. Nonsense. It's not a Brexit at all. It's just a term used to subvert our independence 
Nick Ferrari:Just get the damned thing done!Out there decent people who are watching this & pay their taxes just want the bloody thing done.And they don’t want us talking about it!We should have just walked out.Just walk out.Boom!Gone!#Brexit #EU 
This story is going to get way more online readers than anything about this week's Brexit negotiations. Already most read on BBC, just behind World Cup coverage on the Guardian, flying on Facebook. Happy Friday evening, Downing Street comms team.  
This is becoming a real problem.  I know, because steam has been coming out of our editor's ears all week, and I'm worried he's gearing up for one of his weekend editorials.Original #Brexit research, facts & news daily:  
Sir Christopher Chope doesn't believe there should be a law banning upskirting. He also doesn't believe in the minimum wage, climate change or gays getting rights. But he loves Brexit.  
Theresa May left speechless as she is asked if @realDonaldTrumpshould negotiate Brexit for her.  You don't want to miss this clip  
Theresa May was laughed at today when Jeremy Corbyn asked her if Trump should negotiate Brexit. Boris enjoyed it immensely. 
Absolutely.Labour's the only party that recognises & respects the fact that the country was, & remains fairly evenly split on 'Brexit' & that it must do all it can, in a crappy situation not of its making, to find the best compromise solution for all. Grown up democratic politics  
Just give me one reason to object to a bill preventing people from taking photographs up another person’s skirt. No? Thought not.How did we get in the Brexit mess? Because we elect utter shitbags and expect them not to act like shitbags. 
BREXIT: Giving ppl a vote on Brexit is only way to fix the mess the Tories have landed us in /#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Brexit was the beginning. 
Near, far, wherever you areBelieve that we can stop BrexitThe resistance goes onOnce more to London23rd JuneIt's going to be hugeThe resistance goes on#Brexit #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit #OFOC 
So a journalist was outed last weekend for sitting on evidence linking key Brexit backers to Russian espionage.The BBC saw fit to give her a platform on a panel show and she's trolling the people who outed her alongside the accused.There really are no consequences anymore. 
The EU is preparing for the possibility Brexit will be postponed  
Which major EU economy has now the lowest-growth and highest-inflation rates?It’s Britain heading somehow to Brexit  
"Americans haven’t yet fully grasped how malfeasance in the Brexit referendum and campaigns in the US might be intertwined in scandal."  
Whenever anyone says anything moronic in the Commons, it’s a no-brainer when you Google their name to find out if they also back Brexit. 
BREAKING: We have announced the lineup of political speakers for the #PeoplesVoteMarch.June 23 is set to be the biggest demonstration on #Brexit yet. It's OUR turn to make history, so pledge to march with us at .More speakers will be announced soon. 
David Davis has been accused of threatening to resign more times this year than he has met with the EU's chief Brexit negotiator  
We're offering a FREE post-brexit EU map showing an independent Scotland and Catalonia. 
.@dupleader Hi there. Just a few questions.1) Who wrote this one?2) Is it a £100, £200, £500, or £1000 fine?3) What was it about Albania and Turkey that made you single them out in your pricey Brexit advert out over, say, Iceland or Montenegro?  
The OIG report is NOT an important referendum on Mueller in any way. No reading of it could suggest it is. Yet, wise to news people's tired practices, Trump and Republicans know that they can fuel yet another day of baseless debate about Mueller. 3/ 
Nigel Farage - "Looking at all these people – Campbell and Clegg’s spin doctors and Dominic Grieve – I wonder what is the collective noun for a group of Remainers trying to overturn #Brexit?"Well, I’m going to suggest ‘a disgrace.’"  
Brexit is misogyny writ large. Funnily enough Christopher Chope here is a supporter of @LeaveMnsLeave Think he’ll help protect women’s rights post-Brexit?! Good luck with that.  
Nick Ferrari - "We should have just walked out. Just walk out. Boom. Gone. Employ Trump-like tactics."‘You walk in and you say ‘that’s it - take the deal or not’ and you walk off out of the room.” #Brexit  
The UK is set to register its worst economic performance since 2009 this year as a result of the government's poor progress in the Brexit negotiations. Brexit is making Britain stall. Tell your friends. 
“EU making preparations for possibility of Brexit being postponed. Documents and reports show fear that UK will run out of time in talks” The Independent, @joncstone Alternatively: EU prepares to save UK, despite UK’s best efforts to destroy itself. 
Michael Portillo - "If people defy what the establishment wants to do, they have to be bullied, they have to be punished, they have to be threatened.“It’s part of the bullying culture of the European Union." #Brexit  
Good week to recap - Tories have lost 21 elections on the trot in Scotland.  Yet have power to impose messy Brexit, Bedroom Tax Poll Tax and 2 child policy etc on Scotland. Just think on it - That sort of thing never happens in Euro Union but does in UK union. Time4 #indyref2 
[Brexit, austerity and all kinds of dogshit pushed through parliament]Tory MP:Yep, love it, go right ahead[Perverts are to be banned from taking photos up peoples skirts without their consent]Tory MP:YOU HAVE GONE TOO FAR, SIRS, I FUCKING OBJECT 
Hey @murdo_fraser, where's your plan for Brexit? The SNP have now produced 1,000 pages on what an independent Scotland might look like, where's your detailed report on what the UK is going to give us post-Brexit? 
We were all giggling when @LoveIsland's Hayley said Brexit meant we'd have no more trees, but it turns out she might have been on to something...   
To sum up: Prime Minister: "I cannot countenance Parliament overturning will of the people" Lord Gross: "The brexit decision was made not by referendum or by Parliament but by the Prime Minister" = "Parliament may not overturn the will of the Prime Minister" 
ANDREW PIERCE: Meet the man orchestrating the plot to thwart Brexit??  via @MailOnline 
Fantastic result from Lewisham East this week. The Lib Dems are the only party fighting to give YOU the final say on Brexit - join us today to stand up to the Tories:  
The row over amendments is really a battle for the soul of Brexit. If the hardliners win, it really will set us on a path to hard Brexit, if not, it will firmly establish that Parliament rejects that destructive vision. 
Corbyn & May are in a bizarre contest as to which can be more misleading to the public about the consequences of Brexit. We must remain in the EEA -- it is the only way to have access to the single market. If Corbyn was serious about protecting jobs and benefits, he would agree. 
A three-hour SNP-led debate on the validity of the #Sewel Convention will commence Commons business on Monday... #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill #SNPwalkout 
BREXIT IN A NUTSHELL: From his home in Florida, a columnist for a paper that pays tax in Bermuda and is owned by a non-dom, makes the case that following the proper parliamentary process is an act of treachery whilst cheering on millionaires who openly admit lying to get votes.  
The poll tax lasted two years. It brought about Thatcher’s downfall. Brexit's two-year anniversary is coming up. It will bring down May.  
Forget the Commons posturing, the reality is that the government is preparing a Brexit future that will be quasi-single market membership (with full ECJ powers) and a customs union, says @BrunoBrussels 
.@JLongworthLML: It's now or never to secure a hard Brexit. Conservative ministers take note  
Mundell and the Tory government has turned this on its head claiming the explicitly non-binding Brexit referendum gives them the power to override the consent clause of Sewell. This is clearly nonsense to anyone outside WM. 
Let me guess, he is also in favour of Brexit? 
#OTD in 1780 the Massachusetts Constitution, drafted by John Adams, was ratified by popular referendum. It is the oldest existing constitution in the world and was a model for the U.S. Constitution. Pictured is a broadside issued on 6/16 declaring the newly-adopted form of govt.  
Correct me if I'm wrong, but whereas traditional politics has tended to divide people by class & ideology, Brexit tends to divide people by personality type and fundamental beliefs about social morality, and those divisions tend to be much more personal and bitter. 
BREXIT: People’s March organisers expect ‘biggest demonstration on Brexit yet’  / #EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Brextremist & hypocrite Jacob Rees-Mogg: The City firm he co-founded, Somerset Capital Management, has set up an investment fund in Ireland & warned clients about the risks from Brexit. How often do you think he'll be asked about this in BBC interviews?  
So: Theresa has gone back on her word to Tory rebels.  Cue another week of Brexit chaos.    Anyone who believes that, after7 years, the UK Government will hand back the powers they are removing from the Scottish Parliament - is very gullible. 
Organisers of the People's March next weekend are expecting the biggest demonstration on Brexit yet.  
This Corrupt Inhuman Tory Govt’s lies & dishonesty are impossible to miss even with the   bias of BBC, Sky & RW MSM. This weeks Brexit lies to their own MPs shows their total lack of honesty. May/Tory’s continue to destroy and kill our Country & People without care or compassion.  
BREAKING: We have announced the lineup of political speakers for the #PeoplesVoteMarch.June 23 is set to be the biggest demonstration on #Brexit yet. It's OUR turn to make history, so pledge to march with us at .More speakers will be announced soon. 
Translation - “I know Brexit is a disaster but yesterday I felt it was 100% right to vote with the @UKLabour leadership in the hope that it would help my career. Screw you!” 
On services and trade. Still think increasing inter-linkages between services and goods is underappreciated in British Brexit debate.  
Mainstream Economists were right all along wrt #brexit .  #FBPE Perhaps it will be good to listen to them in the future 
EU fights to avoid damaging internal split over post-Brexit security arrangements as German Interior Minister takes on Merkel and the European Commission  
Owen’s argument: staying in EU shouldn’t be a key Labour objective, only winning next election. Problem 1: full EU engagement indispensable to Labour values & policy. Problem 2: Brexit now impossible without Labour being complicit. Problem 3: power without purpose is dust & ashes  
"It is my belief that decision should not rest with a few hundred people in Westminster but with the tens of millions of British voters whose lives will be changed forever by it" - read why @MidwivesRCM want a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal here:  
Merkel told Rajoy ‘Europe cannot accept’ police brutality during independence referendum  'Ribo has prepared a report on the violation of fundamental rights and freedoms arising from the “criminal justice reaction” to October 1' 
Norway, Liechtenstein and Iceland are partners in #EFTA and #EEA, and the foreign ministers discussed common interests, challenges & football today. Together, we endorse the EEA Agreement and preserve a close relationship with UK after #brexit @MFA_Li @GudlaugurThor @MFAIceland 
From the beginning, it's been a choice between a No Deal Brexit and Remain. Why won't Labour support a #PeoplesVote ? 
And every time the thought creeps into my head: "Well, the people asked for it." I remember:NO THEY DIDN'T. The vast majority of Brexit voters weren't fanatics. They were promised Brexit would make their lives BETTER not worseAnd statistically it's Remainers who'd pay the price 
We discussed many serious topics - the NHS, Brexit, migrant visas etc - on my @talkRADIO show today but I must confess that the response to this tweet made my day. Excellent work, everyone. #kumquat 
If being "right" was all I cared about I'd just sit back and let Brexit happen. I wouldn't need to keep doing this. I mean, I've stamped my flag enough for a posthumous "I told you so"...But unlike those saying "Well if it doesn't work out, that's life" I actually give a **** 
If I hear one more Brexiter say “will of the people”…You’re getting Brexit. You won.  And because of your honking wailing, Art 50 was activated before we were ready, guaranteeing the shittest Brexit possible. So thanks for that and stop moaning. 
The Brexit Dividend: like spending a tenner on scratchcards and celebrating getting to keep them when you fail to win anything. 
“List maintenance” is a bland term for voter roll purges. #SCOTUS built the crane from which the wrecking ball swings. #VoteBlue and do it every single time, even if it’s just a local referendum and there’s no big race on the ballot. Don’t let them #Purge you. 
Next time you hear an English chap describing the Irish border issue in Brexit using terms like 'weaponising', 'bluff-calling', 'reasserting sovereignty', 'Project Fear' etc... pause to consider the words of this woman from the Irish border region.  
I have had enough of all this PC. I don't care if it's through Brexit, Immigration, Deportation, i just want Our Country Back. We are like the rest of Europe overrun and afraid too complain about it. Well time has come to speak out and say close them borders and look after us.  
Ireland to hold referendum to decide whether it’s 2018 or 1328.  
'We're going to be in a worse position after Brexit than we were before we voted to leave'@Nigel_Farage attacks Theresa May's Brexit plans and says she should be sacked. Watch the full interview with @Peston in our new series #ITVNowWhat 
Ryanair with big vote of confidence in Brexit Britain as it launches huge new base at Southend Airport  
Just a quick one.@Arron_banks Are your lawyers contesting the Electoral Commission's decision to refer your Brexit campaign to the cops? 
Important to have a sustainable and long term plan with clear understanding of how it will be paid for, in other words without vacuous links to either Boris or his non existent Brexit bonanza 
Theresa May, 4th June 1940...We shall isolate our island whatever the cost may be.We shall fight on the benches.We shall fight in the cabinet.We shall fight in the Lords.And if this island is decimated and starving then we shall blame remainers for talking #Brexit down. 
#IsabelOakeshott corners #Remoaner #DominicGrieve on his anti-#Brexit meddling. "You stood  on a manifesto which said we would leave the #EU, the #singlemarket, and the #customsunion!"  #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #Tory @Conservatives @theresa_may 
Spot-on by @jowilliams293 at @spikedonline.No Aaron Banks, brash and blunt though he may be, *didn't* "buy Brexit". He's a convenient fall-guy for the elite who still can't process the fact that the people didn't listen to them. 
Mischon de Reya, the lawyers who threatened Daphne Caruana Galizia with crippling libel action in London in the weeks before her murder now threatening critics of the Brexit campaign 
Good point by @ottocrat here. If you hold a binary referendum in a political culture of FPTP you can ignore 48% of the voters and call it “democracy”. Compromise, and finding a common ground is not on the table.  
Another BBC show where Brextremist Julia Hartley-Brewer isn't challenged over her claims that 17.4m intended her vision of Hard Brexit. #BBCDP 
Theresa May is not a besieged moderate. Her record at the home office & as PM, her gratuitous insults to Remainers and her invocations of the "Will of the People" demonising opponents as "enemies of the people" all point to her being an authoritarian nationalist.#Brexit #FBPE 
With all of the confusion surrounding Brexit I still prefer our chaos to America’s lunacy in electing Trump : Interesting article : Spare me the calls for civility – President Trump deserves our rage   
Brexit dividend? Rees-Mogg's firm hedges its bets... in Dublin!  
PM plans to pour billions of cash freed up by Brexit to the NHS 
Took this at wrap on my first day on Vera at 2.30am this morning. Seems the northeast has abandoned the popular concept of ‘night’ in favour of Scandinavian perpetu-gloaming. It’s probably something to do with Brexit.  
You know what to do to any of these MP's caught trying to betray the referendum result - vote them out at the next election #BREXIT  
This is why a binary referendum in a country that has a first past the post system was such a terrible, terrible idea.  
Rumour is that the #EU27 may suggest that the UK put the exit date back because the country is running out of time to present a plan that can essentially protect its trading relationship with the bloc and also address the issue of the #IrishBorder.#WhosMindingTheStore ?#Brexit  
the only argument they've got left is: "well, independence is a risk"yes, but Brexit is a disaster.risk, or disaster?  I know which I'd prefer. 
EXCLUSIVE: Mariano Rajoy’s government broke a raft of European human rights laws with its violent and “disproportionate” response to the Catalan independence referendum in October. 
Your points:1) No membership fee: EU has 40 agencies which do government tasks, the cost is now split among 28 countries. Brexit puts it all on UK tax-payer.2) Fish: Fishing limits are to avoid over-fishing. Foreign fishing in UK waters was minimal.3) Immigration Control:  
The new funding settlement for the NHS will be funded in part by the Brexit dividend generated by the UK no longer having to pay EU membership fees.  
Why should anyone take seriously what IDS now says on #Brexit?  
Devoting each goal he scored for #Almería FC to the @guardiacivil policemen that beat up #Catalan voters (Yes or No voters alike) during the #1Oct referendum wasn't enough to make him, the team captain, immune to arrest for fixing matches.  
So basically the thing the British state requires the most with Brexit is Scotland. Which begs the question, would Scottish independence kill Brexit?  
The Irish border is so critical in #Brexit because movement across it is a material, lived benefit of EU integration & the peace process. @BorderIrish @BelfastAgmt A 16 yr old in a Monaghan focus gp put it well: "Live here for a week & see how many times you cross the border." 
Love  island is certainly more entertaining than EU #brexit preparedness notices, like the one on FLEGT. But both raise awareness! Fight against illegal logging is another dimension beyond @matt_dathan take on tree disease. 
People's March for a #PeoplesVote set to be the biggest demonstration on Brexit yet - see the line up of political speakers here:  
MPs should not have the power to overturn the votes of 17.4 million. Reversing Brexit would only deepen mistrust between public and politicians  
Apparently brexit doesn't remove rights. You can't deal with this level of denial  
Michael Portillo reminded A.C.Grayling that it was made perfectly clear to the public that their vote in the EU referendum would be decisive, and Parliament would implement their decision  
Brexit at the Border - a major new research report authored by @hayward_katy presents findings from a large scale study of views on Brexit from local communities in the Central Border Region. Available to download at:  
Blocked by Douglas Carswell after he complained about the incompetent way Brexit is being implemented - actually Douglas, good manners is to pick up your own dog poo. Pity you have made the mess and don’t take responsibility. 
Daddy what did you do when they took away our democracy?I voted #BRexit and when the refused to respect the result … I decided to get off my sofa and join the Freedom March on 23rd June 2018 :)  
I tell you what is “pathetic” is how @Douglas4Moray & @IanMurrayMP are now so desperate to apparently represent their constituents but on the biggest issue of the moment #Brexit they actively work against their constituents  
"You don't buy a house if it has had a poor survey" Tahir Maher at the #AdonisReading as to why the people should be allowed to reconsider #Brexit in light of the shambolic Govt response to the Referendum #PeoplesVote 
Lewisham East byelection winner to oppose 'extreme Brexit'.And huge surge in support for pro-EU parties, with big gains in votes for Lib Dems and Greens.All MPs should commit to a #PeoplesVote with an #OptionToRemain. 
Farage, you complete bell-end. They're relaxing the rules on immigration because your #Brexit has starved the NHS of Nurses and doctors from the EU. Get your head from up your arse and see the damage you've inflicted. Either that, or shut your flatulent mouth up   
Merkel told Rajoy ‘Europe cannot accept’ police brutality during independence referendum  
A welcome rebuttal of misconceptions about what was on offer in #TTIP negotiations re regulatory cooperation - and why UK is different from US #Brexit  via @wordpressdotcom 
EU warns that, without a #Brexit deal, UK airlines risk losing worldwide EU negotiated flying rights.#ProjectReality 
It seems piling onto a woman journo is acceptable behaviour, anything can be hurled, if she supports #Brexit. This is the level of hypocritical degeneracy we've let creep into our nation.  
It never occurred to you that the task of a political party is as much to lead opinion as to follow it? Imagine what would happen if @jeremycorbyn said clearly and unambiguously the truth - that Brexit is damaging to the very poorest in society. 
UK is now the low-growth high-inflation champion of the major #EU economies. Thanks, #Brexit!  
From @YouGov 66% think Brexit going badly but only 46% think wrong to leave (43% say right). Appears driven by Leave voters: 58% of Leave voters think Brexit going badly but only 7% think wrong to Leave.Conclusion: the process of leaving going badly does not lead to regret.  
3) And please be in London on 23rd for People's Vote March to Stop Brexit.If you can't get there can you support someone else to be there? It's not a done deal.Please share this with your network #StopBrexit #WATON 
Reminder of the stated terms of the referendum:  
With one piece of bad news after another, the sheer stupidity of Brexit is evident to anyone who is open to rational debate. It's come down to: *We're going to sink with the Titanic because we bought tickets to sail.* with a small chorus of *Nah, it's going to be great*. 
Thread request for support 1) Last night MPs voted by a majority of 20 to remove your human rights enshrined in EU law. This is what Brexit is. A right wing power grab. It's not too late to stop this and rebellious Parliamentarians havé requested our support 
Merkel told Rajoy ‘Europe cannot accept’ police brutality during independence referendum  
The Corbyn ‘left’ including Owen Jones have spent months calling Remainers ‘Tories’ ‘Neoliberals’ ‘Warmongers’ and worse.Suddenly they need our votes. I’ve got one response to Owen - no.A hard Brexit Labour Party does not deserve my vote. #StopBrexit 
I would investigate all MPs who are trying to obstruct #Brexit for links to the EU and possible secret payments by Brussels. It's pretty obvious that anyone who is prepared to block the decision of a referendum is a traitor  and has some financial interest in doing so. 
Two-thirds of voters believe Theresa May making bad job of Brexit - this is why we need a #PeoplesVote on Brexit  
If you don't support Corbyn you don't care about the poor = If you don't support Brexit you're unpatriotic = If you're on benefits it's your own fault. 
But Fraser, you’re numerate by the standard of our trade and know the “ Brexit bonus” for the NHS is pure spin - there can’t be a bonus yet (we’ve not left) & there wont be one for years ( if ever). But good to see you supporting more NHS funding 
Brexit: Only 22 Percent of Northern Irish Back Leaving Britain to Join EU Ireland   
Dominic Grieve and Anna Soubry have done everything in their power to slow down if not stop Brexit. And then they complain when we call them anti-democrats. If you don't want to be called a saboteur, stop behaving like one.@Tom_Slater_ on Sky Papers last night 
Any parliamentary vote on Brexit is MEANINGLESS compared to mandate from 17.4 Million majority in/out vote to Leave the EU.Only betrayal is from MPs such as Dominic Grieve, Anna Soubry, Ken Clarke who were elected on a Leave manifesto.#Brexit #Leave #EU 
Please share far & wide. .@OwenJones84, once again, hits the nail firmly on its head. @UKLabour respects the referendum result- to leave- and respects our leave voters.We also respect our remain voters, which is why Labour is pushing for a ‘soft Brexit’ & the v. best deal.  
Brexiters seem have stopped talking about the cost of Britain's EU membership. Not surprising really as the #Brexit economic slowdown has already hit government finances considerably more than the cost of EU membership, and the cost of leaving will only grow.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Labour can only win a general election by building a coalition of Remain and Leave voters - and that means carefully walking a tightrope on Brexit.  
Just been down the bookies to ask for odds on @BBCNews coverage of Stephen Hawking memorial mentioning his passionate views against Brexit and govt policy on NHS. NHS 100/1 Brexit 5000/1. Put a fiver on the double. 
Had a very good meeting with Prince Charles in Cork. We discussed the importance of maintaining strong relationships after #Brexit.  He really appreciated the warmth of the Cork welcome. Hopefully he’ll spread the word...  
Even if I had a 48,000 majority - I'd have still voted against a model that goes against the interests of my constituents. Those who want to sabotage Brexit are just unhappy that I won't help them to do it. 
A couple of sources now reconfirming the only plan inside government is the “hardest Brexit possible”They’ve been consistent and supported by events for over a year now.All notions of Brexit being stopped are dead. All that’s left is whatever damage limitation you need to do. 
IDS: “The EU has deliberately set out to confound the whole Brexit process"  
Labour got over half the votes on only 30% turnout. In 2017 the turnout was 70%. Lib Dems helped the tories plunge working class folk into austerity which eventually led to the brexit result. You'll never learn that the working class never forgets. 
"About a year ago Dominic you said... ‘no one in this House as far as I am aware, wishes to fetter Govt’s hands in negotiations. Or indeed Govt’s right to walk away from negotiations’.What you are doing now is doing exactly that!"Hypocrite!#Brexit #EU 
Would you buy a Brexit from this man?  
UK to use 'Brexit dividend' to boost health spending by 4 billion pounds: Daily Telegraph  
FoM is not a burden, it’s an important, valuable and positive right that UK Citizens will lose after Brexit.Petition: Protect UK Citizens' existing Freedom of Movement rights in Brexit negotiations  
If @CONservatives & @LibDems think they’re going to get away with blaming austerity on #Brexit, which hasn’t actually happened yet, they’re in for a big shock! Too much evidence proves their lies & misinformation wrong.Austerity is a political choice.Corbyn will end it. 
What a vile sub-text, @DanielJHannan - now you know #Brexit is failing you try to insinuate #Remainers are the bad people in the scenario, saying they are dropping their friends and family. Making out the leavers are the victims, yet again, in your grubby little scheme. /2 
"Call Irelands bluff"? What by opening a fucking office for your investment firm there to avoid Brexit consequences?  
Love Island (yes!) exclusive: Hayley was right to fear Brexit could mean fewer trees - and now eco experts are calling for her to be made national tree champion:  
Hey Brexit fan @PiersMorgan could you please RT this? ...and please don't keep saying nobody has changed their mind about Brexit. @susannareid100 @CharlotteHawkns @benshephard @kategarraway 
I rarely like pro-brexit tweets, but if this is the analogy for a successful Brexit...  
Our Govt is a fucking shambles: they're wrecking our #NHS & public services, manufacturing dramatic rises in #poverty, #homelessness & violent #crime, picking on the most vulnerable, & squabbling with each over #Brexit like the spoilt bastards they truly are.FFS #STOPVOTINGTORY pic.twitter.com/0dPxvZPpvk 
This explains it allAnna soubry received £6,000 from pro EU More United Ltd 8th May 2017 according to the MPs Register Financial Interests. She is receiving money to defy #Brexit, the government and the will of the nation.##EUWithdrawalBill 
Dami campaigned with Vote Leave and was expecting an orderly soft Brexit, not the current mess. He now wants a #PeoplesVote and will be on the June 23rd march.Follow him: @damidude 
UKIP MEP Bill Etheridge on Brexit: "I think we are in for one of the biggest betrayals in the history of our country." 
Courtesy of Brian, here’s the chat on RTE this morning, a good round the houses on the implications for Ireland and Scotland of a deeply  “shonky” (which is apparently not a well known word in Ireland ) British brexit.  
Get used to it Owen. And the rest of you. Brexiter politicians and influencers should never have peace of mind. Their precious Brexit is a fraud. Everything about it from the referendum to now has been an exercise in bad faith.#PeoplesVoteMarch 
Brexit has strengthened the union so much that there is now a 48 day wait for an Irish passport. Just a thought for any passing DUPer. 
The popular contemporary British artist, TV presenter & Turner prize winner Grayson Perry (@Alan_Measles) brings his inimitable style, wit & insight to NCH for discussions on ‘cultural divisions’ in the topsy turvy world of Brexit, Trump & more. Tickets on sale Mon 18 June, 10am  
Theresa May plans to pour billions of cash freed up by Brexit into the NHS, overruling Philip Hammond in victory for Boris Johnson and Michael Gove  
Government tables compromise amendment but pro-EU rebels still unhappy | Theresa May to pour billions of cash freed up by Brexit into NHS | Ryanair endorses Brexit Britain with huge new base | EU battles to maintain unity over post-Brexit security  
2034: UK holds referendum on nuclear physics..."Nuclear-Isotope-A-ers": We're heading towards nuclear holocaust . None of us are scientists! We should trust experts!"Nuclear-Isotope-B-ers" You calling me thick, mate? 
The majority of Britain voted twice – in the 2016 EU Referendum and the 2017 General Election – to Get Britain Out of the Single Market and Customs Union. The job of our parliamentary representatives is to fulfil the public’s wishes.  
EU Officials Are Growing Increasingly Concerned About Progress Of Talks And Think Brexit May Need To Be Postponed /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
The UK cannot negotiate with the EU without being able to walk away with no deal. That’s a fundamental rule whether buying a car or exiting a 45-year-old trading arrangement. #Brexit  
Would be good if @Nigel_Farage could front a Brexit party alliance including @Arron_banks etc. I am sure it would get the support from everyone that needs to see change from this 2 party debacle. Would have a Very good chance of success! 
Gave plenary lecture at University of Bath Chemistry Symposium - 'Chemistry has no Nationality'. In spite of Brexit, RSC will be throwing open still further the doors to international collaboration. 
WHAT THE FUCK IS A JOBS FIRST BREXIT??????? STOP PATRONISING US, THE PEOPLE. BREXIT IS ALREADY COSTING JOBS. THERE IS NO GOOD BREXIT OR LEXIT. Thanks for listening. Have a good day. #stopbrexit #PeoplesVote 
17.4m Leave voters aren't Russian, racist trolls, or 'scum of the earth'.  You lost a referendum.  Some people really need to grow up & stop acting like spoilt children.  
If you're around Leeds and looking for transport to the UK Freedom March on Sat June 23rd please message us, we're going!#Brexit #FreeTommy 
How to write a Mark Steel article:1. Select a target you hate, in this case Brexit.2. Then pick a current topic, in this case the World Cup.3. Produce some laboured conflations of the two.4. Throw in some Leftist buzzwords (also known as 'jokes').5. Call the result 'satire'.  
 Scotland silenced by Westminster. Brexit power grab sparks surge in @theSNP members. Stand with us, there’s strength in numbers. Join here:  
The Universal Credit shambles joins the long list of Tory failures including Brexit shambles, the NHS Crisis, the social care crisis, privatised trains chaos, council funding crisis and so on.So many crises but just one cause, the most useless government we’ve ever had.  
As reality catches up on the disaster that is Universal Credit remember it came from the mind of Iain Duncan Smith, who with Rees-Mogg will be last man standing for ‘we will work it out somehow’ Brexit. 
The most successful people I've met:1. Live in Leitrim2. Live in Cavan3. Live in Derry4. Live in Fermanagh5. Live in Monaghan6. Live in Louth7. Live in Armagh8. Live in Donegal9. Live in Tyrone 10. Live in Down11. Hate Brexit  
I’ll be going to the #BRexit Freedom March (my first ever demonstration).  Time to get off our sofas and do something before they take away our freedom, sovereignty & democracy.  
Better idea, Scots keep all the money, tax, and wealth they generate – in Edinburgh. Then London and rUK finances its own infrastructure, wars and brexit. #DissolveTheUnion 
Take note Westminster political class your #Brexit #PowerGrab & disrespect hasn't gone down well this week in Scotland. This from the paper of the Vow: "Scotland 'Shafted' by Westminster: The Gathering Storm" 
Let’s be honest, whenever you hear a Remain supporting MP say: “Of course we respect the result of the referendum, but…” it’s crystal-sodding-clear that their agenda is not to make a success of Brexit at all, but to frustrate and dilute it as much as possible. 
I am shut down in the EU Parliament again, twice in one week, during my speech about #Brexit. Arch enemy, an Irish MEP, chairs the session.  I told them they had DDD, Democracy Deficiency Disorder  
Another dark day for the @bbc but remember if it is bad for Brexit it ain’t on the Beeb.  
Always brilliant on #bbcqt!Watch as Isabel Oakeshott slams Remoaner weasel Dominic Grieve for his attempts to wreck Brexit.  
Like taxes, Brexit is for the little people 
Blow for Hammond as PM pours Billions saved from EU fees into NHSCash is part of the ‘#Brexit dividend’ as UK will soon not be forced into paying huge £13 Billion #EU membership fees.It delivers #Leave Campaign's most high-profile pledge. via @MailOnline 
Utterly grim. North-East England businesses are polarised between having done almost no preparation for Brexit, or are preparing by planning to move to the EU27.  
Promises made about #Brexit are being broken within hours even in Westminster, according to @Peston This reinforces the need for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal, so join us on the #PeoplesVoteMarch on June 23 to make YOUR voice heard.Info here: 
I was at bordering school with The Gibraltar Border and, well, ... But maybe now that it has followed my example & has its own Twitter account @bordergibraltar it will teach its monkeys to type ‘Hamlet’ and tweets about how crappy Brexit is 
Question. Has anyone else been put on the payroll at JCB since the Brexit referendum?  
Yes, now you ask, we are utterly sick to the back teeth of Brexit.But that is not a reason to "just get on with it" or "get behind it."We will fight for as long as it takes to #StopBrexit.@Suewilson91 (Brian Adcock) pic.twitter.com/UHbjmhIiS9 
It’s time we leavers contacted those that are actively trying to thwart #brexit and bombard them with our Invective.We have had to listen to their objections for far to long.We should set out a campaign to re educate them on why we the voters decided to leave the EU.. 
Petition: Give the electorate a referendum on the abolition of the House of Lords  One more great push to the 18th June when our debate is to take place. RETWEET ITOVER THE WEEKEND  
#brexit  Dominic Grieve, Anna Soubry, Nicky Morgan, Ken Clarke, Chuka Umunna, Alastair Campbell, Tony Blair, Richard Branson. And worst 2 journalist in  Owen Jones & Kevin Maguire. Shut up  we voted we’re leaving EU.  
It is incredible how the loudest advocates of Brexit are seeking to do business outside the UK. from @InFactsOrg  
It's reassuring that the man who told us  "Universal Credit" will be a success is one of those telling us Brexit will be a success. Everything Iain Duncan Smith touches turns to shit. 
Stephen Dorrell - Lewisham East by-election result shows Brexit effect “starting to bite” for Conservatives and Labour  pic.twitter.com/dK8I8ZV1wd 
I'm sending a local rep to the Brexit negotiations. He'll fit right in.  
Was... was it a secret that Dominic Grieve doesn't want Brexit  
Brexit makes sense against the background of Buchanan’s philosophy of Property Supremacy and Oligarchy.Foundation of both Trumpism and Brexitism. Governments will lie and cheat to achieve this kind of supremacy.⁦@TheNewEuropean⁩#FBPE 
Former Prime Minister of Australia, @TonyAbbottMHR, has advocated for #Australia and the #UK to negotiate freer movement of citizens between the two countries as part of upcoming #Brexit negotiations.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #UKpolitics 
NHS to recieve £4bn-a-year boost from Brexit dividendThis is headline management & vote buying.A competent government would stop £1.75bln waste on agency staff, question the need for 35k managers on >£60k pa, sort out £2bln+ pa legal bill etc etc etc.  
Dominic Grieve - The Daily Mail's level of debate around #brexit makes rational discussion impossible & it's deliberately designed to do it. When Dacre & the Daily Mail decide to raise the temperature he does it with the deliberate intention to stifle rational debate. #FBPE 
How the Remainer Rebels led by Grieve were stitched up on Brexit meaningful vote - what really happened, and what happens next  
This can not be re-tweeted enough. The Cameron govts promise to deliver the "will of the people" was never lawful.  It would need an act of Parliament to have made it so. The referendum was not and is not legally binding.  
FARAGE: Remoaners colluding with foreign powers in Brussels.“What is the collective noun for a group of Remainers trying to overturn Brexit? Well I’m going to suggest a disgrace.” 
#Brexit dividend:= I save £500 by choosing not to pay for buildings insurance. House burns down.Great, now I can use my insurance premium dividend to buy a tent 
This isn’t a thing, Daniel. Don’t strawman. I’m an ardent remainer, but friends of mine voted for Brexit. They were a bit misinformed, that’s all. Remainers are generally pissed off with people like you for misinforming them, not our friends for being misinformed. 
Two-thirds of voters believe Theresa May making bad job of Brexit - no comment from me needed, except #StopBrexit with a #PeoplesVote! 
Dominic Grieve making heated attacks on the tabloids. Understandably. He doesn’t want voters to know about his secret meetings with anti-Brexit campaigners. I’m glad we do. Confirms my instinct he and his colleagues want to overturn the referendum result. 
There is no "power-grab".The SNP cannot name 1 single power currently exercised by Holyrood that is being removed.In fact, Holyrood is going to accrue far more powers after Brexit.  
One thing you can be damn sure of now: The British government is going to do everything in its power to refuse us another referendum. #DissolveTheUnion 
Theresa May is a liar? PM goes back on her word over Brexit!! I am stunned!! Absolutely shocked, who, just who could have predicted that?  
The National: "Merkel told Rajoy ‘Europe cannot accept’ police brutality during independence referendum" #EU #Democracia 
Treasury thinks it takes two years for the bookmakers to run a software update. Somehow ministers have contrived to give the bookies a longer transition period than it will take to negotiate Brexit.... they’ll rake in another £4bn from FOBTs in the interim  
What I’m hearing from this conversation about Galileo is that Brexit means Brexit except when it doesn’t.  May and her destructive band of Brexiters haven’t a f*cking clue.  #r4today 
Another day another scene of mounting Brextremist desperation - they are wheeling out the ‘NHS Brexit dividend’ again across the Mail-Sun-Telegraph-Express-BBC axis. Next they’ll be sticking it on a bus 
For an intelligent Tory MP to speak out with such integrity against the gov & Brexit is something we should all be grateful for. That a man of Grieve's character is still in this government despite the appalling behaviour of his own party, is nothing short of miraculous.  
A. C. Grayling - In the 2 years that have elapsed since the 1st referendum we have had some actual facts... the govt's best cause scenario after #Brexit shows our economy would take a huge hit. He is confident that a #PeoplesVote is now more likely to happen.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Vote Leave cheated to achieve the referendum result. How is it therefore the will of the people.They lied and cheated. May knows it, Parliament knows it and the majority of the public knows it.Yet still the UK is still crashing out of the EU. Why?  
“Vote Leave chief who created £350m NHS claim on bus admits leaving EU could be 'an error”#Brexit #CambridgeAnalytica 
So we face another week of #brexit drama in Parliament, with the Lords given (by the Govt!) a key role. All the Govt’s negotiating energy is going on negotiating a deal with its own backbenchers. Meanwhile the EU sits and waits, bemused, and increasingly exasperated. 
Thank you to the volunteers, supporters, and voters who helped deliver the LARGEST SWING from Labour to the Lib Dems in over a decade. Labour dodge the issue of Brexit - but YOU deserve the final say with the option of staying in the EU. Add your name:  
Why people don’t trust politicians and the media, part 94:Brexit has already reduced the UK’s tax take by about £298 per household. This “dividend” isn’t a matter of opinion, this is just straight up false.  
The largest swing from Labour to the Liberal Democrats in over a decade - a clear result of Labour's refusal to stand up to this Tory Brexit. 
Vote Leave is going down for cheating in the Referendum. Make sure your MP knows this before she or he votes on the Withdrawal Bill.  
Had to re-tweet this again! It's an excellent analogy of why we should have a #peoplesvote on the final #Brexit deal once we know what Brexit will actually mean for the country.  
‘Brexit dividend’- why doesn’t Telegrpah just get Number 10’s press office to write all splashes? Cheaper, and not sure many would notice difference  
"EU’S €10bn SECRET REVEALED" Hot & exclusive from the #Brexit Facts4EU team. A must-read:  Is this really the EU that Remainer MPs want to be part of? 
Brexit asserts British sovereignty by destroying Britain  (cont) 
Two thirds of voters think May is making a mess of Brexit. She needs to be much stronger with Barnier & Rebels! 
Fantastic to see @JanetDaby elected as the new MP for Lewisham East. Look forward to working together on community safety, ensuring the genuinely affordable homes local residents need continue to get built and opposing this Government’s extreme Hard Brexit.  
The voters of Lewisham East have just sent emphatically rejected #Brexit. ⁦@UKLabour⁩ & ⁦@Conservatives⁩ humiliated by a collapse in support in the week that they both let us down in parliament yet again. Time to listen to us! #StopBrexit  
Events of recent days have proven that even @theresa_may's own party can't trust her to keep her word. Do you trust her with #Brexit? Do you trust her to save the Union? Do you trust her to protect the #GFA?Or do you think the UK deserves better? #MayOut #ToriesOut #StopBrexit 
EU officials are growing increasingly concerned about progress of talks and think Brexit may need to be postponed  
Today’s lead story: universal credit is a universal disaster, & the guy responsible - Iain Duncan Smith - now wants to do the same to our entire trade and economy with Brexit 
Given the mess Iain Duncan Smith made of universal credit - ‘unlikely ever to deliver value for money’ (National Audit Office) - why should one give him the time of day on Brexit? 
Voters in #LewishamByElection have fired a #Brexit warning at Corbyn as Labour cling onto the seat in the face of a massive 19% swing to @LibDems from Labour.It's another strong indication voters are getting behind calls for a #PeoplesVote leading to an #ExitfromBrexit 
May keeps bleeting The government is delivering the will of the British People as if this somehow absolves her from responsibility for the greatest peacetime disaster. Combat the myth - repeat daily. Brexit is not the will of the British People Remain Is 
I have never voted Tory in my life. I have always voted Labour or Green.BUTIn a GE, if Dominic Grieve were the Tory leader and Jeremy Corbyn the Labour leader I would probably vote Tory to get the Remainer Grieve as PM.Brexit is that important.#StopBrexit#CorbynOut 
I feel like the vote to save Alex and Samira is the biggest vote since brexit... #LoveIsland 
I encouraged my daughter to vote for the first time in the referendum vote after discussing the sacrifices made by women to get the vote, turned to me recently and said what was the point if the vote if the result outcome gets overuled/diluted anyway #democracy? 
Brexit effect: Paris unseats London as top city for foreign investors  
Vote Leave broke the lawBeLeave broke the lawVeterans for Britain broke the lawUKIP broke the law [repeatedly]Leave EU broke the law.We cannot justifiably make a major constitutional change based on the result of such a referendum. To do so is criminally irresponsible  
Wake up Labour! A 19% swing to the only anti-Brexit candidate in Lewisham East must tell you something. 
Three different covers for @TheEconomist this week: Americas and Asia get Kim and Trump; Europe and the Middle East get strongmen; the UK gets Brexit toilet paper.  
It beggars belief. MPs deliberately causing decline & fall of London: 35% fall in foreign investment projects since the Brexit vote. No longer a pretence of a benefit for any of UK, just evidence of harm. MPs plough on & media collude to suppress the truth  
Would President Donald Trump support a referendum on disbanding the FBI? When will enough be enough? 
David Lidington told the House that the referendum was advisory in debate on the Bill & on this ground rejected Alex Salmond's Amendment for a double-lock to prevent Scotland forced out against its will. Briefing paper 07212 confirmed advisory status. See  
No it doesn’t. A leaflet does not carry that force and nor did Cameron. The referendum bill was the controlling document here and it stated quite clearly it was advisory. 
You, your government, this entire establishment are corrupt. You should save your energy making these videos, your just adding fuel to the fire.Deliver Brexit, investigate the claims of ex cop John Wedger, free Tommy Robinson, then resign.Only then you’ll have an ounce of credit. 
Mogg moves business to IrelandLawson moves to France Redwood sells all U.K. InvestmentBanks is based in BelizeFarage moving to GermanyIf Brexit is so great why are they all leaving?? 
PM May Faces Another Rebellion by Pro-EU Tories: Brexit Update.  
"The referendum is merely advisory", Lord Butler, The House, June 2016. Edited by Chairman of Vote Leave Gisela Stuart at the time, I believe? He also said there may be a second referendum, all before June 23rd.("Nobody" covers a lot of people not doing something)  
#FBPE is cross party...anti-#Brexit & as the #BrexitShambles worsens we're growing in number & in anger at those denying a #PeoplesVote a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option. Both main parties are seen as complicit & are losing ground... 
Labour has made no secret of the fact that they supported Leave because they feared losing marginal seats to the UKIP vote. They now have to worry about losing marginal seats if Remain voters opt for @LibDems. How do they back Brexit and attract remain voters? 
This is so silly, when will #Remain acknowledge that #Brexit prevailed because people voted for the #MagnaCarta narrative identity #UK shares with #Canzuk, NOT #EU’s Charlemagnian option. It was a choice between two possible futures & #Leave won. Time to #respecttheresult #ukpoli 
So Labour hold #LewishamEast but are down nearly 18 points. Lib Dems jump into second, up over 20 points. MASSIVE message to the two Brexit parties. #PeoplesVote 
Powerful NHS union backs a new Brexit referendum.The Royal College of Midwives ⁦@MidwivesRCM⁩, representing thousands of midwives, is throwing its weight behind the #PeoplesVote campaign.Let’s make sure there’s an #OptionToRemain. #FBPE. 
Lewisham East result:LAB: 50.2% (-17.7)LDEM: 24.6% (+20.2)CON: 14.4% (-8.6)GRN: 3.6% (+1.9)WEP: 2.3% (+2.3)UKIP: 1.7% (+0.0)Time to wake up @UKLabour & @Conservatives. People do not want this disastrous #Brexit.  
Brexit: a shockwave of tsunami proportions - the effect on the aviation industry, the potential consequences of which are not appreciated. Because our international aviation agreements are wrapped up with the EU, it will have global impact...  #Brexinfo. 
Portillo simply lying on @bbcthisweek. In the Gina Miller Supreme Ct ruling it explicitly states:"clear briefing paper to parliamentarians explaining that the referendum would have advisory effect only."Contents of leaflet irrelevant.@acgrayling 
Michael Portillo is from that old school where we vote for a referendum, the politicians say they can't have another one, and then the people say "OK then, sir....we're just the humble people for you to dictate to now".They work for us and we tell them when we want a referendum 
“If you got a second referendum on the deal and you lost, would that be it?” @afneil  “I would accept it” @acgrayling#Brexit#bbctw 
In my view, A.C. Grayling should be permanently on TV representing case for #Remain & virtues if EU.  It really would ensure that if there was 2nd referendum, his side would lose #bbctw 
First Brexit, now Englixit? France wants to to restore the diplomatic language of kings and czars as the EU's official tongue.  
This frontal attack on the PR Referendum has made me believe it's the right thing to do... The fact @bcliberals hate it makes me believe it's for a good reason... It will ensure they never get in power as a majority again. 
“The British people were told that they would vote once only, they were told their vote would be decisive... all of that was absolutely unambiguous” Michael Portillo tells @acgrayling on #Brexit promises #bobcat 
WATCH | @IsabelOakeshott corners Remoaner Dominic Grieve on his anti-Brexit meddling. "You stood on a manifesto which said we would leave the EU, the single market, and the customs union!"Support us at  
Some superb comments by Plaid Cymru leader @LeanneWood on the #Brexit #PowerGrab & how Scotland & Wales are being treated. And lets not forget the Northern Ireland mess. #bbcqt 
.@afneil asking @acgrayling what evidence he has of Russian interference in #BrexitAnswer: He waffles for a few minutes because he doesn’t have any. And now he’s getting aggressive with Andrew. Classy. #bbctw 
AC Grayling says people voted for Brexit because of emotions, not facts. He then says Russian influence is why the UK voted for Brexit. When asked for evidence, he cannot provide it.What was that about facts, Mr Grayling? @bbcthisweek#bbctw 
Oh, suddenly Andrew Neil wants EVIDENCE that Russia has interfered?  Ah yeah, that'll be because it threatens the credibility of the Brexit vote. A lack of evidence didn't seem to trouble him a few months ago when he was trying to smear those who have been involved with RT. 
According to Corbyn the Tories are divided, here’s a timely reminder of how many people have RESIGNED from working for HIM#BBCQT #BBCTW #Brexit 
AC Grayling pumps out unhinged anti-Brexit waffle on Twitter on a frequent basis. Some highlights include labelling Brexiteers “vermin“, seeking a general strike to oppose Brexit, claiming “90% of informed opinion” is against Brexit. Why is the BBC giving him a platform? #bbctw 
Not one question was put to #IsabelleOakeshott about her Brexit email cover up, and there we have it folks ! #BBCQT 
Tony Blair says chance of stopping Brexit has risen to 40%.He also said the “growing appeal of the authoritarian leadership-style” is a problem.You're trying to reverse a democratic vote and you're calling others "authoritarian".Fuck all the way off, you utter bellend. 
On top of that she managed a nasty jibe at Grieve about his meeting this morning and he was too much of a gentleman to jibe back about her failure to disclose possible illegality, ie Russian interference in the Brexit vote.  
Well Mrs May, we've completed your MRI. It shows you have:- a complete lack of accountability - no idea what to do about #brexit- an inability to stand up to Boris Johnson- a desire to stay in power no matter the costOnly one cure I'm afraid...see ya!#bbcqt #TheresaMay 
I can't believe 2 years in, and there's virtually no serious discussion about the economic devastation Brexit is going to have on the UK. Good lord it's ALL the media talked about during our Scottish indyref. #bbcqt 
Couldn't of put it better myself . The lady is right, Brexit will leave us all worse off.... What a bloody mess!! #Brexit #bbcqt 
There’s zero evidence that Britain will get better trade deals outside the EU, says the president of the CBI.Brexit is bad for jobs, bad for business, and bad for communities all over the UK. #StopBrexit. 
How can someone who is also a Mother, speak about another human in such an abhorrent way. Comparing someone who is proud of their country and believes in #Brexit to the likes of ISIS etc. Is truly appalling. But you clearly have no moral compass to feel ashamed of your remarks.  
Really enjoyed my evening with 450 heads and governors at conference in B’ham. Show of hands on optimism/pessimism re  Brexit. One hand up for optimism. 
Scandalously #bbcqt invite @IsabelOakeshott & don't ask her abt her key role in the #Brexit scandal involved @Arron_banks & @andywigmore. Makes a farce of @bbcquestiontime & this is a huge story abt democracy & its corruption which the #BBC have consistently played down. 
Having worked with #DominicGrieve I can honestly say not only is he one of the brightest men I have met, but also one of the most generous/considerate. Using his intelligence as an insult sadly captures the Brexit debate perfectly. To say there is no trust in him is moronic 
Why is the Daily Telegraph front page tomorrow saying that May has promised extra NHS funding paid for by the "Brexit dividend"?  THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND. THERE WILL BE NO BREXIT DIVIDEND. 
Can people stop quoting Churchill in their Brexit rhetoric!!!He was the biggest European Unionist in British History!!!!!!#BBCqt 
#bbcqt reality of #Brexit laid bare.Mann & Oakeshott (and Dimblely) - Brexiters - Brexit is simple, Brexit is easy, why are we even talking about it?Grieve & Wood - no, it isn't, and the country is at great risk, and Red cakeism is the same as Blue cakesim 
This bloke just utterly owned Isabel Oakeshott on national telly. Drinks are on me mate! #Brexit #BBCQT 
As always #bbcqt on Brexit leaves me firmly of the view that the British people deserve the self inflicted catastrophe they're about to endure. 
Does #IsabelOakeshott not care about what happens to the #GoodFridayAgreement if we proceed with the basic Brexit as originally presented? Or perhaps she’s just not that bright? #bbcqt 
The gammon is in full effect again on Brexit - 'just get on with it' the cry of the clueless 
We still seem to believe that there's a good Brexit deal out there.It's my right to vote for a chocolate cake that makes me lose weight.That's my democratic right. Buuuuuut....#BBCqt 
#bbcqtI am sick of ppl telling remainers that if they just shut up and fall behind, the UK would strike a great deal with the EU.Brexit is a square peg in a round hole. No matter how I try and believe that either the peg is round or the hole is square, it will not make it so. 
*Brexit at the Border: Voices from local communities in the Central Border Region of Ireland/Northern Ireland*An initiative by @QUBelfast & @europe_icban to gather data on the immediate & anticipated effects of #Brexit for those living on the #Border1/10 
Well, well, well.@Anna_Soubry received £6,000 from pro EU More United Ltd 8th May 2017 according to the MPs Register Financial Interests. She is receiving money to defy #Brexit, the government and the will of the nation.#BBCQT #EUWithdrawalBill 
Isabel Oakeshott has known for months that Arron Banks of Leave EU was in cahoots with Putin's Russia, which brokered multibillion pound "business" opportunities for him. And she sat on this information.The #Brexit she helped promote is a fraud & people can see this now. #bbcqt 
''We must be the laughing stock of Europe''This audience member says the government is imploding due to their 'shambolic' handling of Brexit from start to finish #bbqt 
What will Dominic Grieve do if Parliament do get to decide on a 'no deal' scenario? (Rhetorical question)He'd Remain.That's why it can't happen. Undermines negotiations & will be used as a means to overturn the referendum.#bbcqt 
Got to say, Dominic Grieve is absolutely knocking out of the park tonight on both Brexit and how the likes of Paul Dacre perpetually poison the well of discussion.#bbcqt 
#bbcqt Dominic Grieve does talk a load of bollocks. Doing everything he can to stop Brexit. With that stupid smug face. Loves the sound of his own voice. 17 million voted leave you idiot we’re leaving. One horrendous MP FFS. 
Tory rebellion back on after MPs reject May's Brexit amendment.Fresh showdown looms after redrafted wording on ‘meaningful vote’ deemed ‘unacceptable’ to rebels.Keep up the pressure. Secure a meaningful vote - and a #PeoplesVote with an #OptionToRemain 
After sleeping on floors for years, a friend finally moved into a rented property today. Excitement became anxiety at the state of his new home and, as he put his front door back on its hinges & cleaned dog poo off the floor, Brexit did not enter his thoughts once #FBPE #BBCQT 
Well you've got that wrong for a start @IsabelOakeshott - people actually DO trust Dominic Grieve, even non-Tories can see he's solely interested in saving us from an economic catastrophe under #Brexit #bbcqt 
Latest Brexit results:Dominic Grieve 6 Isabel Oakeshott 0#BBCQT #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
These are some of the Daily Mail reports Dominic Grieve is referencing. He has previously said he has received death threats about his involvement in the Brexit process and questioned the role the media has played. #bbcqt 
"They are like a bunch of drunks on a pub crawl"@IsabelOakeshott says politicians are staggering along with no idea of where they're going or what the cost will be of Brexit #bbcqt 
There's no mandate for Brexit, says @LeanneWood. A reminder, because she often seems to forget: 854,572 (52.5%) voters in Wales chose to leave the EU. #bbcqt 
Dear Martha,I am writing from twitter to let you know I am still alive. Brexit goes on with no end in sight although my brothers and I have long forgotten why we fight. We pray the lord will find sense anon. All my love to Lucy and the boys. Tell momma I'm doing OK.Your Joe. 
‘The problem Dominic is people don’t trust you’ — did @IsabelOakeshott seriously just talk about trust?? After the last week? And then makes a pro Brexit applause point. Why is this person on my telly? And why is she badged as a journalist? #BBCQT 
And also elected on a mandate at the 2017 General Election to deliver Brexit...  
The DUP's Westminster-based ultras, hyped up with Brexit and Trump, they forget NI is different. Having alienated the liberal small n nationalist bourgeoisie, on whom the Union will soon depend, they're now moving on to their small u unionist counterparts on whom it already does. 
There’s a murmur in the air. And I can hear it. There’s a magic atmosphere and I can feel it. There is a referendum on Scottish independence coming. Come and join us.  
#bbcqt The majority think leaving is wrong. Any brexit ranges from very damaging to catastrophic. It’s not the will of the people but the demagogues in the Tory party #stopbrexit 
Brave move of Wetherspoons in phasing out EU beers. Post #Brexit we need to invest in our own industries & become a global economic powerhouse once more. Time to #BackBritishBrands 
I’d like a government of national unity led by Grieve Benn Umunna to Stop Brexit, stop austerity, reform our voting & Parliamentary system, and reboot the collapsed UK on sensible, pragmatic, tolerant, grown-up lines, taking a lead in Europe & thereby the world.  
Dominic Grieve says Parliament is "entitled" to force the Government to do as it says on #Brexit... but that's not what he said during the Article 50 debate last year. #bbcqt 
Putting Oakeshott on #bbcqt isn’t another case of #bbcbias this is unashamedly rubbing our noses in it. She has no credibility left (not that she had much to begin with). The BBC should be questioning her on what she did sitting on controversial Brexit emails. Don’t watch #bbcqt  
Paul Sinclair showing why he is no longer a political ‘guru’. Just compared Ireland’s attitude to Brexit with Scotland’s. Do you want to tell him what the difference is or will I? #ScotlandTonight 
Where are the Tory Brexiteers such as Johnson & Gove? They are conspicuous by their absence & silence in defending Brexit.  Brexiteers really need all the leave MPs to speak for them at this crucial time..Don't they know they would have most of the Country behind them? 
#Brexit was supposed to cut immigration, but now as fewer workers come from the EU the government is allowing more medical staff to come in from outside the EU. Can't say we didn't warn that #Brexit  would mean more non-EU immigration. #StopBrexit #LeaveLies 
Dominic Grieve: "The Daily Mail is a vile newspaper." #Brexit 
"The implied hit to the public finances [from Brexit] is about £15 billion per year bythe early 2020s—about 10% of NHS budget (& almost double any possible saving from ending budget payments to the EU)"IFS analysis for @UKandEU paper "Brexit & the NHS"  
BBC News at 10 does 3 minute segment on Rolls Royce job losses in Derby. The word #Brexit is never mentioned. Restructuring apparently. Nothing to do with that shower in Westminster... #BrexitShambles 
I know you guys couldn’t be trusted with Brexit or the British government but pls save Alex & Samira at least 
I feel like samira and alex must be a slam dunk for staying? But then, I thought that about Brexit too. Britain, try not and fuck it up for once!!! #loveisland 
Swear if Alex leaves Love Island it’ll divide this nation more than Brexit #TeamAlex #LoveIsland 
12 June: Arron Banks tells Commons he led "journalists up the country path" 14 June: Banks tells this journalist it's "reckless" to say that his meetings with Kremlin lackeys suggest his Brexit campaign was colluding with a hostile foreign power  
You see the sort of people that Anna Soubry is mixing with and she has the temerity to say she’s not trying to stop Brexit.She is in collusion with the Liberals and Labour in a concerted attack to stop Brexit.She needs to be sacked.  
bet they all voted brexit 
Partly funded by the Brexit dividend, so that’s:Brexit dividend: -£40 billionBorrowing: £40 billionIncome tax: £4 billion 
I don't know if I agree I don't know enough about internal Labour Party dynamics but if the Labour Party can sort out a leader who would stop prevaricating about Brexit & oppose it unequivocally I would be most grateful.  
#Brexit means Brexit.  
The 2016 Brexit result was a result of the lack of democracy in Britain - a pressure cooker building up steam. Only democracy, the people being in control, can release it. #fairvotes #electoralreform @MakeVotesMatter @electoralreform 
The Grieve amendment w’d let the Commons (not the Govt) decide what happens if there’s no majority for the Brexit outcome. That’s surely what representative democracy means. Ironic that it will be for the Lords on Monday to give the Commons another chance to affirm this principle  
'Juncker and Barnier THREATENING Britons!' Wetherspoons boss promises Brexit BACKLASH  
"Brexit dividend"    
May scrambles to defuse Tory Remainer mutiny over Brexit BillTime for the Remoaners to shut up or put up. Respect the will of 17.4m! Or Resign!  
'There’s a plot to stop Brexit!' Hartley-Brewer in HEATED row with Treacherous Remainer  Falconer   
Brilliant scoop by @Steven_Swinford. Our @Telegraph splash tomorrow: "Theresa May poised to give NHS £4bn-a-year boost funded by Brexit dividend, borrowing and income tax"  via @Telegraph 
The FBI bragged about preventing a presidency. I wonder which British agencies have bragged about stopping Brexit? 
Joined at pub table by 3 elderly German Anglophile tourists, all in love with Britain and London and still hoping Brexit won’t happen for both Britain’s and Europe’s sake. It’s still slightly sobering hearing it from other people. 
Theresa May's attempt to avoid a Brexit rebellion within her party looks doomed   
“Dear World,We are Global Britain.Our Prime Minister lies to our government and they all backstab each other.Please come and do business with us.Love and kisses, @DExEUgov @tradegovuk @foreignoffice xxx”. #BrexitShambles#Brexit  
Looks like even Tories can’t trust the Tories >> Leading Tory rebel Dominic Grieve rejects May's Brexit compromise  
The BC Liberals just promoted an opinion-editorial in The province that calls for the return of #BigMoney into politics, specifically the #referendum. Andrew Wilkinson & the BC Liberals have shown their true colours once again! They want big money to influence how we vote #bcpoli 
What have Rolls Royce job losses got to do with #BrExit? They just invested a ton of money in engineering trying to save their business because they are falling behind the market and they are making losses - while we are in the EU. They are laying off middle managers to fund it.  
Ex-Daily Mail hack and Hard Brexit  campaigner Isabel Oakeshott plays only to the galleries of right wing zealots - frequently contradicting or shooting herself in the foot within almost the same breath... #bbcqt 
Oh, dear. Well...let's look at what they said during the making of the referendum act to see if there are any clues as to what should happen if this is true.  
Thanks to @37paday we now have another name in the list of great parliamentarians extoling the democratic virtues of the referendum process.  
My prediction. A week before the Brexit deadline, the EU will present the UK with a deal that will suit them. The UK will sign it because they won’t have a choice, to leave without a deal will destroy this country and the EU knows it. 
"Respect the will of the people" ="you lost, get over it" ="err...I really don't have any other pro #Brexit arguments"A functioning society needs more to go on when making huge gambles than a one off voteThe referendum was important.Facts emerging since are more important 
Theresa May's Brexit compromise plan falls apart as pro-EU Tory rebels brand it 'unacceptable'—she promised them plans that would give parliament more power to block a no-deal Brexit but her proposals fall far short of what was pledged. 
The reason why remainers & the EU are desperately colluding against Brexit is because as soon as Brexit succeeds it is game over for the EU & they know it. If a country shows they can thrive outside the EU (as we have done for centuries), the entire project disintegrates  
Tory remainers won’t stop trying to overthrow the people’s Brexit vote or defeat UK democracy. They have to go, they need to be sacked or a real Brexit simply won’t happen. They are enemies of the people & democracy. They are fanatics who will always side with the EU against us  
If you win an election in breach of the rules, if you win it by cheating, then you cannot be said to have been democratically elected & if you win a referendum in breach of the rules, if you win it by cheating, the same again must be true.I would say #StopBrexit but #WhatBrexit 
Did you vote leave thinking no deal was a conceivable outcome? If not, know it’s ok to change your mind, know #brexit is not inevitable, know others feel like you, know you can become a #remainernow 
Today, in just 25 minutes I overheard 4 different conversations on independence & Brexit: - in a Sainsbury's petrol station, - walking down Gibson Street,- in a newsagents, and then - in Glasgow Uni gymWhatever we're doing keep it going @IanBlackfordMP @NicolaSturgeon 
Unbelievable:EU official claims:- Farage, Wilders, Le Pen, Salvini on Putin's payroll  - Russians responsible for #Brexit Funny he did not mention his great friend George Soros who has publicly pumped billions into political campaigning 
I couldn’t disagree more with Lloyd Evans over Brexit but I couldn’t have had a nicer afternoon doing this interview with him. Just as it should be. What a delightful chap.  
Remoaners claim they don't want to stop #Brexit we just want a vote that COULD stop it which we will like totally never usIt's like my son asking me for chocolate at dinner time and swearing he won't eat it until later.Get behind the Government or go!  
The only aspect of Brexit likely to cause a gin shortage is Anna Soubry. 
Brexit #PowerGrab is not just about EU powers, Mundell says Westminster can over rule Holyrood where there is disagreement. There's disagreement on privatising SNHS, free schools, Uni fees, fracking, GM crops, prescription charges & many more. #DissolveTheUnion #ScotRef #JoinSNP 
Brexit is being thwarted rather than implemented. Our politicians and civil servants have run up the white flag of surrender:  
Not soon enough “Theresa May's government will fall if MPs reject her final Brexit deal, senior Tory warns - Sky News  
Brexit: Theresa May's compromise plan falls apart as pro-EU rebels brand it 'unacceptable' - The Independent  
The simple reality is this: no matter how much the Brextremist minority wishes it were different, there is no majority in Parliament for a destructive ‘no deal’ Brexit. With two thirds of voters now saying the PM is handling Brexit badly, this shows why we need a #PeoplesVote /3 
Why are Remainer rebels still denying that they’re trying to block Brexit? If they’re so sure that the country is with them, why not just be honest? 
Ryanair Endorses Brexit Britain With Huge New Base  
THREAD: The PM made a solemn commitment that Govt wld accept the substance of Dominic Grieve’s amendment giving Parliament a meaningful vote at the end of the Brexit process+preventing the catastrophe of a ‘no deal’ Brexit. Now they are trying to row back on that commitment. /1  
That would the @ElectoralCommUK who’s chairman said Brexit was a collection of Eurosceptic nonsense & another board member called for  a second referendum  
Leave campaigners rambled on incessantly about Norway and Switzerland. They also promised "all the same benefits" which can only be achieved by membership of the CU/SM. The idea that voters all knew they were voting for hard Brexit is ridiculous.  
Dearest MPs,By the time you come back from your summer recess we will be about 6 months from Brexit day; it will be clear that you have failed. If you aren’t fighting it by then you will need to pick a plea. Options are:IncompetenceNegligenceMisconduct 
Lord Malloch-Brown: “We must win the meaningful vote... That is likely to trigger a new referendum”Lord Bilimoria: “Meaningful vote” could “stop Brexit”Viscount Hailsham: Without it to remain is “not an option”Wollaston: "There is no attempt here to overturn the referendum."  
When it comes to Brexit, @NickFerrariLBC wants to just "get the damned thing done!" - do you agree? #ThePledge 
Committed and courageous parliamentarians, who are Pro-EU MPs, stand by their principles and values, after the PM apparently offers them a meaningless vote on Brexit.  
When we won the Brexit Vote and we were Leaving i was really excited about it. The only way i can describe the feeling about. Brexit now, is like when you were a kid and you found out there was no Father Christmas. These bastards have sucked the life oit of it what a shame. 
So Universal Credit is now going to be at least 6 years late, it is being hammered in the courts, and its running costs are £15bn rather than the planned £3bn. Remember IDS saying 'It will be on time and on budget'. Yeah but he said Brexit is a great idea.... The fuckwit lies 
Two pics sum up unprecedented days in Commons for me:  Tues full @theSNP  benches for points of order protesting #Brexit votes #PowerGrab; Weds empty benches after #PMQs #SNPwalkout - we will use all options  available to stand up for Scotland... 
MUNDELL has been called on to RESIGN by RIGHT-WING TORY THINK TANK over his mishandling of #Brexit billAnd part-time Tory RUTH Davidson doesn't escape their criticism eitherRUTH stands ACCUSED along with Mundell of DELIBERATELY CAUSING a CONSTITUTIONAL ROW to thwart BREXIT  
This isn't about Brexit. It's about an idea of public life. If a politician feels "it is not the place of politicians to tell the public they were wrong" that person should not be seeking, or be deserving of, public office. 
Brexiters I’m already bored with your ‘this is not my beautiful Brexit’ routine.You broke it. You pay for it. 
The millions victimized and ignored by capitalist globalization turn, angry and frustrated, to nationalist capitalism (Trump, Brexit, etc.). But that will abuse the people too. Nationalist capitalism always has. The problem is capitalism. 
If Remain minded MPs gathered together now they could say "Brexiters before and since the referendum, including in parliament, have shown themselves to be untruthful and untrustworthy. We must oppose Brexit as willed by these people". And no-one could blame them one bit. 
Delivered by the Scottish people in a referendum called by Labour realising the vision Smith and Dewar. You don't speak for them. The SNP opposed the Scottish Parliament until they accepted the inevitable in the 1990s.SNP MPs voted to make devolution safeguards worse this week.  
Who funds you? Are you a US based and funded lobby group, seeking to pick on the carcass of Brexit Britain? Who funds you?Who?Hello? Yes you... Who funds you?  
The look on Remainers faces when Britain stays in the EU after a decisive victory in a second referendum.  
Who's the conspirator? Dominic Grieve, who defied death threats to oppose Brextremism & is open about his views?OrJacob Rees Mogg, who pretends Brexit will make us better off then quietly transfers some of his business to Dublin, warning clients of Brexit risks? #PeoplesVote 
Now that Mrs May has reneged on her commitment to Dominic Grieve & MPs on parliamentary sovereignty in respect of the Brexit treaty, the House of Lords is mobilising for one of the biggest votes in its history 
Steve Bell on Brexit and job cuts – cartoon  
“Tory rebellion back on after MPs reject May's Brexit amendment - Dominic Grieve says government’s new wording over MPs’ ‘meaningful’ vote is unacceptable”  
 #Catalonia mayor of Argentona who helped organise self determination referendum refuses to appear in #spanish Court to answer related charges "it is a farce and their courts do not have legitimacy"  
The Speaker of the House of Commons, John Bercow, is determined to stay on for a year longer than he promised in order to ensure Brexit can be reversed. Very neutral and so patriotic. He must go ASAP. 
The union is a dying beast being strangled by a Brexit chain being pulled by Hyena like Tories ready to get fat on the rotting corpse. Scotland must leave soon or all that we hold dear will be stripped and sold for profit.  #DisolveTheUnion 
Ukraine's friend of the week, Rebecca Harms, pushed for a boycott of Putin's World Cup. Ukraine's foe of the week, Arron Banks, donated millions of pounds to Brexit's Leave campaign--perhaps at the request of the Kremlin.  
Meanwhile worth noting that people familiar with actual Brexit negotiations say there is no visible bridge between what is available in Brussels and what May's domestic constraints allow her to ask for ... 
Since the sanctimonious hag sent that tweet, things seem to have changed. Looks like May's had a moment of sense, and isn't going to give MPs a free shot at scuppering Brexit. 
Expecting Mrs May to implement Brexit is like asking an arsonist to put out a fire. She should go now and a genuine Leaver appointed as PM. It’s not too late to make it happen if the Tories have the guts to depose her.   
Who does Dominic Grieve think he is? The Knight in shining Armour riding forth to save the British working class from the evils of Brexit? He is nothing but a low life uncollegiate rebel that wants his own way. In short he is an outlaw. 
Tory Remainers’ attempt to deny Brexit is betraying Britain’s democratic vote — and would see our Government collapse if successful, says @TheSun 
It's been said many times over the last year, but Theresa May's Brexit vision may well finally bring her down. She's deceived half her own party, broken a promise to them in order to get a vote through. How stupid must alleged Tory rebels be to ever trust their leader again?  
Theresa May is Melting!!!!The whole country is laughing at May’s angry face, Britain is Broken, Brexit Austerity Grenfell Windrush NHS crisis homelessness Foodbanks, laughing at the utter despair of a Basketcase Tory Government  
Do you think there’s a “conspiracy” against Brexit? @Nigel_Farage is taking your calls #FarageOnLBC 
Steve Bell on Theresa May, Brexit and job losses - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Statement from @DExEUgov: "Our new amendment respects the tests set out by the Prime Minister and the Brexit Secretary... in all circumstances Parliament can can hold Government to account, while also allowing Government to deliver on the will of the British people"  
Here is how the #Brexit referendum result would have looked had we voted by constituency.Remain would have been obliterated.#EUWithdrawalBIll 
"Between Brexit and Grenfell we have had an alarming insight into the mind of the modern left: it prefers the poor when they are screaming for their lives rather than when they’re calmly demanding political change", writes Brendan O'Neill.  
Just imagine we had had a spine four years ago....we could be sitting every night watching the Brexit debacle and laughing our asses of at JRM, DD and Boris making total wankers of themselves.....we could even feel sorry for all the decent English folk who have to live with it 
Surprise, surprise,May has not honoured her promise to table an amendment that would give the Commons a meaningful vote over Brexit deal.The move to defeat her unacceptable move is back on:  #BrexitShambles 
Brexit LIVE: Tory rebels REIGNITE feud as they REJECT May's meaningful vote amendment  
Dear Labour Remainers. If Corbyn opposes Brexit it might be stopped, but if he supports it, there will be nothing anyone can do to stop it. If you want to stop #Brexit you must ensure Corbyn does the right thing. The future of our country now rests on your shoulders.#StopBrexit 
This is pure spin. The new amendment is already an uncomfortably large concession from the Government. It gives the rebels everything they have asked for EXCEPT the ability to block Brexit altogether. There are no honest grounds for opposing it unless that is your true motivation  
It’s amazing that a UK government making an utter mess of the Brexit amendment negotiations at their own country’s parliament, with their own party MPs, is credited to be in charge of the real Brexit negotiations with the EU, whose outcome needs to be approved by 27 countries.  
Tory Brexit war explodes as rebels brand ⁦@theresa_may⁩ 'sneaky' and proclaim they'll defeat her.Brexit chaos as PM’s plan backfires when she reneges on deal.If she can’t negotiate fairly with her own MPs, how will she ever negotiate with the EU?  
Just as expected!!! Theresa May's Brexit compromise plan has fallen apart and pro-EU rebels brand it 'unacceptable' - inevitable! You can't promise everyone everything in the hope you can push something through the Commons!  
Just another example of why you would have to be off your head to trust anything May and her UK government appear to agree to. #Brexit #Brexitshambles  
The whole Brexit process has been unforgivable. The brand is irretrievable - it’s a shoddy power grab, masquerading as a democratic exercise but shored up by dishonesty, apathy and managed ignorance.Sorry @Anna_Soubry we know you’ve tried. 
If there is a single job lost, a single company going bankrupt or a single negative consequence caused by brexit, look no further than Theresa May first, then her cronies after...... #mayhemmustgo@LibDems @vincecable @LibDemEurope @TheNewEuropean @guardian #fbpe#stopbrexit 
Since the Referendum, any MP who is still a “Remainer” is an MP who wishes to subvert democracy. Be nice to see TV reporters reflect on this  
.@thomasbrake asks whether there's any scenario where the PM would consider giving the PEOPLE the final say on Brexit. If you want the final say on Brexit, with the option of staying IN the EU, join our campaign:  
Because they know it won’t. What was clear from the debates this week is that barely anyone is left who argues Brexit good for Britain.  
Delighted to welcome Prince Charles into my Brexit War Cabinet Room today for talks on my future  
Leading up to the referendum, Brexiters lied that a 'no deal' scenario was simply inconceivable. Yet with less than a year left until our withdrawal from the EU, the Conservatives are now planning for a 'no deal' Armageddon Brexit. People need to be given a final #VoteontheDeal 
First Nigel Lawson applies to live in France. Now Jacob Rees Mogg's investment firm sets up in Ireland, and warns clients about dangers of the hard Brexit he advocates.  The stench from the rotten cake-and-eat-it posse just gets worse.  
We often hear the phrase “no-one likes abortion”. Well, I’ve seen a whole lot of commentary during and since the referendum that suggests that phrase isn’t true. Society seems to have gone from thinking abortion was generally a bad thing to celebrating it as a cherished freedom. 
I firmly believe that if Brexit is not achieved, Parliament will have lost Authority. Chaos will ensue.  
May would be toppled if Parliament votes down final Brexit deal, says senior Tory May proves she cannot be trusted, not even by her own party. Used to think she was just putting party before country, but clearly it's self before party before country. 
The new Italian government has announced that it will not approve the Canada-EU trade treaty (CETA). Unanimous approval is required. Poor Trudeau. International trade agreements seem hard to obtain. Let’s hope the UK can give him one after Brexit. 
I cannot see how with an assault on free speech, an assault on freedom itself, a corrupt legal system, the treachery of brexit, the disgusting treatment of Robinson, the disgusting attitude and conduct of the EU towards us, how in Gods name we are not involved in an uprising !!! 
NEW: Theresa May thrown into fresh crisis as Tory rebels reject Brexit peace deal 
The Brexity press must stop its monstering of Grieve and Soubry.  If Brexit were a good idea, the Government wouldn’t need to destroy the sovereignty of Parliament in order to ram it through. Hurray for these brave and principled MPs who are standing up for democracy. 
which means Brexit in total disarray1/ No Withdrawal agreement yet2/ UK govt may lose vote on  'no deal' amendment next week3/ UK govt, after 2 years, still can't say what future EU-UK they want4/ Constitutional settlement in disarray 
Tory Brexit war is back on after 'sneaky' Theresa May goes back on agreement  
Brexit update 2 weeks pre-crucial EU summit:- UK govt no proposal on regulatory alignment vital for NI backstop- UK govt reneges on deal with Tory rebels on handling a 'no deal' outcome- UK govt no agreed position on future EU relationship- Scotland: Sewel convention torn up 
Tory Brexit chaos explodes as rebels declare war on 'sneaky' Theresa May 
Theresa May's Brexit compromise plan falls apart as pro-EU rebels brand it 'unacceptable'!Dominic Grieve agreed a wording to a new amendment this morning, but claimed what was tabled later in the afternoon had been altered.What happens next? 
BREAKING: Theresa May's Brexit compromise plan falls apart as pro-EU rebels brand it 'unacceptable'  
Met @SimonHarrisTD today Looks likely that three tiny legal challenges to ENORMOUS referendum result to hold back abortion legislation about a month Averaging another 280 exiled women-Cruel/ uncalled for/ sour grapes #together4yes 
If this is how she treats her own backbenches, how do you think Theresa may will treat the trust of the public over Brexit…. #brexithaos 
There is no attempt here to overturn the referendum or to micromanage the negotiations simply that the majority of MPs will not support a cliff-edge no-deal Brexit & will insist on a meaningful vote 
So, to be clear, the PM lied to her back bench MPs.Normally, that would not even be thinkable.Within a near dictatorship it is not surprising.#Brexit#Dictatorship#PeoplesVote 
Actually ...1. Labour supported the referendum bill in parliament.2. Many Labour MPs campaigned to Leave.3. Labour stood on a hard Brexit manifesto at the GE.4. Labour are the opposition, it's their constitutional obligation to offer alternatives.#FBPE 
90 - Al-Faraj had a poor 90 minutes for Saudi Arabia tonight has he’s worried the government may not deliver the Brexit he campaigned for. Nige. 
Would be funny if only it wasn’t such a serious issue, Preventing the most destructive  Brexit matters to the majority in Parliament 
Is there any TV journalist at all who covers Brexit through the prism of the nation having voted to Leave in a great democratic event? 
The realities of Brexit are becoming clearer every day. No extra money for the NHS EU nurses applying to work in the UK down 89% Already costing our economy £300m a week Reckless gamble with peace in NIJoin us to demand a #PeoplesVote  
Theresa May's Brexit compromise plan falls apart as pro-EU rebels brand it 'unacceptable'  
When the British politician Jo Cox was murdered in the run-up to Brexit, Alex Massie wrote this excellent piece on how a culture of spewing vitriol inevitably leads to violence. Read it again. Every word.  
Brexiters saying any genuine person who doesn't want to stop Brexit would back amendment, it gives Grieve what he says he wants, but doesn't allow Remainers to overturn Brexit 
5pm: ExcThe public think that Theresa May is handling Brexit more badly than at any point since she became prime minister, according to a new poll for The Times. 
This is of course only an issue if anyone was wanting to amend it to stop or delay Brexit. But the rebels keep telling us they don't. So it shouldn't be an issue. Hmmm.....  
The SNP could hold an independence referendum every year from now until I’m carried out in a box, and two things would remain true:1. I’d vote against their flawed proposition.2. They’d lose every time. 
5/ ...nor set a time limit by which a vote to leave the EU should be implemented. Instead, this is a type of referendum known as pre-legislative or consultative, which enables the electorate to voice an opinion which then influences the Government in its policy decisions." 
4/ And this from the bill's briefing paper:"It does not contain any requirement for the UK Government to implement the results of the referendum... 
Martina Anderson MEP will be hosting a fringe event on BREXIT at #SFAF18 on Saturday 16th June at 1pm in Meeting Room 3, Waterfront Hall .@M_AndersonSF 
Brexiteer source: Dominic Grieve has got what he wanted. He wanted a meaningful vote, and this will be one, and he said he didn't want to stop Brexit, and now he can't. 
Together we forced the Government to listen to us, to keep open a vital route for child refugees after Brexit. Thanks to campaigning all over the country the Government accepted all of @AlfDubs & @YvetteCooperMP's amendments to the EU Withdrawal Bill. Well done everyone! 
 - MEP Guy Verhofstadt apologies for claiming the Brexiteer had colluded with Russia to “deliver Brexit” in a letter from lawyers. MEP Guy Verhofstadt picked on the wrong man 
I feel sorry for British youngsters who want to be part of the EU & find it hard to feel sympathy for those who took this right away and ignored all warnings of the economic consequences of Brexit. I hope in the very unlikely event of a final say Referendum they'll change opinion  
At the very least the #EUWithdrawalBill is a power grab. In the context of Brexit and the growing demand for independence it is likely this is actually a move towards direct rule and the de facto annexation of Scotland. #DissolveTheUnion 
Whatever the outcome of Brexit, there are three simple truths which only liars deny:1. Brexit will harm the UK.2. The younger generations are pro-EU.3. At some point we will ask to rejoin the EU.#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
Brexit could be postponed if talks don't progress this summer  
Valerie is coming to the People's Vote March because she wants to stand up for her EU friends and family.Join her and others and march to demand a People's Vote on the Brexit deal on June 23rd:  
The Mogg is undone! A charlatan, a scoundrel, his main aim has always been to achieve a hard Brexit so that he can gorge on the carcass of Britain's devalued assets after it tanks after Brexit. I think this could be treason?  
Ireland’s National Museum is collecting protest art made during the historic abortion referendum | @artnet  
This is the world @Nigel_Farage has brought to Britain, if we let this happen we end up with the country we deserve. 
The clamour for parliament to have a ‘meaningful vote’ is simply a ruse. We cannot let Remainers use it to thwart Brexit, says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
catching up on this forensic @instituteforgov report which compares the Brexit challenge to “delivering an Olympics without knowing the year, the location, or whether it is the summer or winter games...” 
IN CASE YOU MISSED IT: Earlier today the Royal College of Midwives joined the Royal College of Nursing by calling for a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal. Our NHS is at breaking point. Don't let Brexit make things worse. Please share 
Rees-Mogg: Goal of Anti-Brexit MPs Is Continued EU ‘Vassalage’, Not Parliamentary Sovereignty     
This is why y’all asses need to go out and register to vote we can’t have another brexit suprise on our hands  
Just because I know you can't get enough Brexit process trivia, rumour is next Chequers awayday is 5th and 6th July, which fits with earlier whisper that trade bill will be back on 9th - not confirmed 
This is a key point. No 10 has been trying for months to devise an unamendable Brexit motion - SO IT CAN’T BE AMENDED TO PROVIDE FOR A PEOPLE’S VOTE. But this is precisely why the House of Commons would wish to amend it. So NO WAY should Dominic & colleagues agree to this  
So, pro Remain Theresa May replaces Minister who is a Remainer in a Leave constituency who quit for #Brexit conflicts with an pro Remain MP in a Leave constituency.  What could possibly go wrong? 
BREXIT: A VISUAL METAPHOR  
You do not obtain the will of the people if you cheat. Could this render the result of the Brexit referendum null and void?  I wonder...  
Once again we must point out to Remainer MPs that this man is the EU Parlt's #Brexit Co-ordinator.  Is this misguided thinking truly what you want to stay part of?Original #Brexit research & news daily:  
This is exactly why John Bercow is telling friends he wants to stay on as Speaker - to make sure Brexit motions can be amended  
Dominic Grieve's push for a 'meaningful vote' really would mean stopping Brexit, as numerous anti-Brexit campaigners have admitted, warns Nick Timothy  
You have until 10pm to vote Green in the #LewishamEastByElection today.A vote for @Ros4LewishamMP in #LewishamEast is a vote for: Clean air A final say on Brexit Schools to be proud of  
I share people’s concerns about the implications of a ‘no deal’ / hard Brexit under the Tories, but yesterday I felt it was 100% right to vote with the @UKLabour leadership for a jobs first Brexit, which respects the referendum vote, while putting employment rights at its heart. pic.twitter.com/qYNeaLaOn8 
Jacob Rees-Mogg’s fund is opening up in Ireland, Nigel Lawson wants to be a French resident and Andy Wigmore is planning to move to Belize. Why don't they stick around and enjoy the "sunlit uplands" they promised after #Brexit? Hypocrites!#PeoplesVote 
This @neechamber report on Brexit readiness does not make pleasant reading. It is candid because the situation is so serious for all NE businesses & the jobs our communities depend on. The findings are shocking & depressing  pic.twitter.com/Qr48vRAFnJ 
Scotland's Brexit Minister, @Feorlean, on David Mundell's statement: "Today the UK Government has attempted to turn our established constitutional arrangements on their head." 
On my way to Manchester for the post- @bbcquestiontime commentary over on @bbc5live at 11pm. It's the one year anniversary of Grenfell, Brexit continues to be a shambles, and QT has Isabel Oakeshotte on - anything else I should know? 
If Theresa May does not secure a good Brexit deal by the EU summit — she should just walk away, says Iain Duncan Smith  
.@patrickharvie: "The current constitutional crisis greatly increases the urgency of giving the people of Scotland control of their own future, instead of dragging them into the chaos of Brexit Britain."  
Making the referendum unjust.  
Tugendhat: Rebels will bring down government if they vote against Brexit deal. 
The waters are being deliberately muddied. And funded. We need to stay focussed now. Brexit hasn’t changed the concept of right and wrong. So be very clear which side you are on. And let’s support people like Carole fighting every day in our corner. #FBPE#stopbrexit x 
In Brexit Britain, Scots are starting to believe that independence is worth the risks by ⁦@chrisdeerin⁩ 
#bbcqt Bloody Dominic Grieve getting on my nerves. On every TV channel trying to derail BREXIT. With that smug face thinks he’s a smart-arse knows everything. John Mann, Isabel Oakeshott & Audience give him a mauling.  
The SNP’s Brexit walkout shows Westminster’s contempt for Scotland can’t go on | Dani Garavelli  
Summary:1. Brexit is a feminist issue.2. Why isn't Theresa May fighting Our Corner?3. Because, of course, Brexit is *not* a feminist issue.4. Unless, of course, you're a deranged, obsessive woman who has to provide a 1000-word piece for the i in a hurry.5. That's all, folks!  
The fact that this video went so viral shows that something as vital to the Brexit debate as "Ordinary Legislative Procedure" wasn't known by people on EITHER side. You can't blame Brexit-voters for that. That's on the UK media.  
The following things have drained the joy out of the #worldcup for me:1. Having to watch Putin strut about;2. The foaming pint of toxicity that Brexit and the rise of the Alt-right has tried to pour into Englishness; and3. Endless photos of Harry Kane trying to look hard. 
Today’s business questions. The new tactic of the Tories is to try and shout us down at every opportunity. Won’t work with me. Went through the referendum when there were 640 unionist practically snarling at me when I was on my feet.  
He is a traitor just like you Anna. He was caught sneaking into a meeting with the EU yesterday. History will not remember you and your cohorts kindly. You’re a disgrace. Sooner you’re deselected the better.#Brexit  
On Brexit (for)On Scot Indy (against)On Corbyn (against)On keeping May in power (for)@BBCr4today @bbcquestiontime and all the main BBC “news programs” are betraying the BBC’s own duty, responsibility and ethos This is terrible forUK democracy The future of @BBCNews 
In our latest article, we write about the continual attempts by Remoaner Rebels from both parties to reverse Brexit, betraying their constituents and the Great British Public. It's time for some serious party discipline.  
For the next month people will be looking for Brexit analogies out of the #WorldCupRussia2018.Twitter will go into meltdown if England scores an own-goal. 
Zut alors! France is using Brexit as a pretext to restore French as the official EU language.  
4. The walls that have hidden the Brexit campaign are wide and tall. They were built to last. They are crumbling nevertheless 
Soooo wrong on so many levels from both sides.#Brexit  
I despair at what's going on. You are a Servant of the Public, paid, not just by your constituents, but by the whole Electorate, 52% of whom voted out, but you don't like the outcome, so you & other Servants of Public, use your position to change the outcome. Shameful. #brexit 
2. She was called an obsessive -- and in a way she isShe was told there's no story -- not only by the Brexit right, which has to cover up, but by other journalists, most notably at the BBC, who have to find excuses for their failure to cover Russian interference in our democracy 
May capitulates again - Soubry claiming victory. We must either accept Commission offer or Remainer MPs will cancel Brexit. Thanks Theresa  
Email your MP and tell him in common with the rest of the population you are pig sick of the pathetic in-fighting over brexit. We voted to leave and we want to leave. We don´t want this country damaging squabbling just so a few elitists can hang on to their perks. 
to be clear nothing is over until the fat lady sings! We who voted 17.4 million were told unabashedly brexit means brexit. There is no such thing as the words you make up there is brexit or no brexit hard or soft is made up by impotents! 
One thing is clear, the lack of a nationalist voice in Westminster arguing against Brexit makes a hard border more likely. Sinn Fein should take their Westminster seats and use their mandate to defend the interests of all the people of Ireland on #Brexit. 
Dominic Grieve should be hailed a hero for what he has achieved for democracy. Deal or no deal Parliament will have a meaningful vote and to be clear there will be no hard #Brexit when the EUWithdrawal Bill is passed. 
Equal partners, eh? The vow, eh? Promises of ships, eh? Promises of listening, eh? Promises of hearing the Scottish government on Brexit, eh? All we see from these Tories are betrayals and lies and #Mayhem #SackTheTories #MundellMustGo #MundellResign and take Moothie with you. 
It's very simple.Labour's Brexit masterplan is to ensure that we Leave the EU and blame the Tories for it.#FBPE 
Excellent analysis. The SNP’s Brexit walkout shows Westminster’s contempt for Scotland can’t go on | Dani Garavelli  
Brexit also panders to populism, paints the patsies. pisses on progress, pays the privileged, praises privatisation, disempowers Parliament, pushes down people, polarises politicians and the population, prevents problem-solving policies and puts party politics before prosperity. 
Just thought I’d let everyone know that today @Arron_banks reported the theft  of his 11,000 emails from @IsabelOakeshott to @ASPolice that have conveniently and illegally been passed onto various people in the anti Brexit media.  
"Brexit is a big deal, but it's not a done deal, and it's too important for politicians alone to decide" says Steve Coogan, in support of a #PeoplesVoteDo YOU want a say on the final Brexit deal? If so, join us on the #PeoplesVoteMarch on June 23.RSVP:  
The problem with Tories is that no matter how much their party betrays Britain they will always put party over principle. May has sold us down the river.  She will try and leave in name only. But the struggle is far from over yet. Brexit means Exit!  
May's government could fall if MPs reject her final #Brexit deal warns senior Tory. She could have been toppled on Tuesday, but the majority of rebels fell for her lies. 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg said the calls by his pro-EU colleagues to have a say on the deal the PM gets back from Brussels have ‘nothing to do with parliamentary scrutiny - they are about stopping Brexit’  
Ryanair Endorses Brexit Britain With Huge New Base  
As things stand, the country they eventually ‘get back’ is going to be shorn of Scotland & Northern Ireland & financially dependent on a capital city that didn’t want Brexit. But, you know, down with Dominic Grieve. 
As I said yesterday in Foreign Relations hearing still time for a peaceful path forward in #Nicaragua  1. Allow NGO’s to help groups build political & electoral capacity2. Intl supervised referendum on Ortega in 20183. Intl supervised presidential elections in early 19 
in other words the brexit that Scotland overwhelming rejected is taking precedence over the devolution settlement that Scotland overwhelmingly voted for. This is a democratic outrage and it shows that Scotland, its parliament and it's people are treated like 2nd class citizens 
Corbyn continues to give Theresa May a free pass on Brexit.Lib Dems are fighting back though. We want to give YOU the final say on Brexit, with the option of staying in the E.U.  Add your name to our campaign today: 
Just had a thought. If 10% of constituents can force a by-election, could 10% of National voters force a referendum on the facts? I wonder if anyone is pursuing this option . There would be no problem getting 10%! #Exitfrombrexit #PeoplesVoteMarch @libdems 
D Grieve trying to convince people he's not out to stop Brexit. Meeting @campbellclaret  in the EU's offices is a weird way to go about it 
David Cameron will always be remembered as the PM who lost a referendum.Theresa May will always be remembered as the PM who ended the Union... but not the European Union. 
Big exclusive here from @waitey - largest firm of architects in the UK, the world-renowned @FosterPartners considering moving HQ out of the country in face of #Brexit  
Come on surely the public gets it now.This dickhead isnt going to feel the hard brexit effects like us.The Elite never do, thats the whole point.  
Think about where the world would be if Russia and co had not influenced Brexit and Trump?  
If #Brexit happens Leavers will not be satisfied. The right-wing press will direct them to new targets for hate - Muslims are clearly at the top of the list at the moment, but any group which doesn't fit the label of 'decent white middle-England' could be targeted.#S 
When Brexit completely destroys the UK, who will be held accountable?  Will the Government still say "it was the will of the people"?  When the Government knows it is wrong, then surely they ahould stop this madness now! #stopthisbrexitmadness#stopbrexit@Ferretgrove 
Brexit has turned most of our media into a place that persecutes the principled and promotes the pitiful.  
Was Silvester just a useful idiot in the Nix/Mercer/Bannon scheme to allegedly launder data, software and money across borders to evade jurisdictions for triggering brexit and boosting Cruz, Bolton and Trump? Many questions remain unanswered.  
#SuckItUp? It’s about time @BroxtoweCons did something about the disgraceful #MP @Anna_Soubry & her behaviour. #AnnaSoubry is ignoring her constituency, & the entire country’s decision to #Leave the #EU & defying her @Conservatives party manifesto! pic.twitter.com/yqFa1VIMTR #BREXIT 
 WATCH: The UK Government is working entirely within the Sewel Convention as part of the devolution settlement.The SNP should put their toys back in the pram and get back round the negotiating table. #SewelConvention #Devolution #Brexit  
Rees Mogg nail on head:MPs calling for a “meaningful vote” on Brexit just want to stop the UK leaving the EU  
The EU is making far more concrete plans for Brexit than the UK. The UK isn't even prepared for customs checks at the border - not so much as a booth has been built. Meanwhile the EU quietly builds bypasses around the British Isles.  
Message to those arrogant MPs who've still not got the message of the #Brexit voteIf you don't vote to deliver #Brexit 'toute suite' we will vote you OUT at the next election.You might then realise what OUT meansOUT means left, gone away,departedWe voted to be free of the EU 
Politicians keep saying "the will of the people" because they want to be excused responsibility for the dire consequences of Brexit.Don't let them get away with it. Make it clear to every MP that THEY will be held responsible for the consequences of any Brexit they implement. 
Just to confirm, to the #FBPE screaming "Labour keep supporting Tory Brexit!"2018: 37 EU Parliamentary Votes:34 times Labour Voted Against Tories3 times Labour Abstained*0 times Labour Voted With Tories* Even if Labour hadn't abstained, Tories still would have won majority 
Great to see pro-independence supporters outside @ScotParl this afternoon. More & more people are growing tired of the contempt the Tories have for our Parliament, and are rejecting the shambles of the Brexit-backing Labour  Join @theSNP at  
Yesterday’s theatrics looks awfully like clever politics from SNP. Was very hard to get Scotland engaged on Brexit bill and its devolution implications. Feels like that’s changed today  
If Brexit is sold out then the BBC will have been profoundly complicit in the establishment stitch up. Millions will stop paying.  
“We have sought consent” said @DavidMundellDCT . Yes, but you didn’t get it. That’s the point. #Brexit #PowerGrab 
#WorldCupRussia2018 is going to be terrible. First it's in Russia, who we all know cause most of the world's problems. Second, there will be individual nations with fans waving their national flags. This is Alt-Right nationalist poison brought by Bannon and Brexit. 
28 Labour MPs voted to keep UK tied to EU10 have constituencies that voted for Brexit by over 60%@patmcfaddenmp@annaturley@EmmaReynoldsMP@bphillipsonMP@MaryCreaghMP@angelasmithmp@RhonddaBryant@jessphillips@margarethodge@SKinnockThere’s no such thing as soft #Brexit  
David Mundell confirms the view we long thought he held: "Scotland is not a partner in the UK, it's a part of the UK". Know your place, eat your cereal... #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill #PowerGrab 
He was re-elected AFTER the Brexit referendum, & against someone offering a 2nd referendum, with a bigger majority.We had a manifesto that respected the referendum result: to leave.GE came AFTER the referendum.Labour increased vote share & number of MPs. Have a good day. 
#UK : TENS OF THOUSANDS To Take To The Steets In #Brexit Anniversary Rally Next Week!  Will May listen?       #fo2eu 
Oh fuck off with that slogan.There is NO Brexit deal "for the many", whoever they are.  
Brexit warning from investment firm co-founded by Rees-Mogg  
Now we have both British and Canadian House or Commons discussing contempt of Parliament charges against characters in Cambridge Analytica/SCL/AIQ Trump/Brexit scandal defying formal summonses to appear. This is not normal.  
Sajid Javid to relax immigration controls on non-EU skilled workers including doctors and nurses in signal of Britain's more global outlook after Brexit  
Somerset Capital Management (co-founded by Jacob Rees Mogg) is warning prospective investors about the financial dangers of Brexit, as they set up a new fund in Ireland. Protecting the rich, whilst stuffing the poor. Spread the word. 
Tories going on and on today about how Westminster is "supreme" and can do what it likes when it comes to Brexit. I think they'll soon find out, that attitude will not wash with the people of Scotland. 
Combining my love for football nerdiness and Brexit geekery here...  
Mundell confirms that they will impose the Brexit bill on the Scottish Parliament. 
Honoured to be the first EU leader to meet Spain’s new PM Pedro Sanchez  at the Moncloa in Madrid. We’ll be talking about how much Spain and Ireland have in common re #Brexit and #FutureofEurope and looking ahead to the next @EUCouncil meeting. 
is brexit a stunt 
Brussels STEPS UP plans to create new Irish shipping routes to BYPASS UK after Brexit  
Labour threw away a chance to defeat the government over the EEA/single market amendment. It has left the country heading towards the economic precipice and people asking what exactly our opposition is for.Me for @LeftFootFwd #Brexit #EUWithdrawlBill 
For once there is no rant about a second divisive independence referendum by the opposition at #FMQs - funny that..... 
"Calls for MPs to have a “meaningful vote” on Brexit are nothing to do with parliamentary scrutiny; they are about stopping Brexit."  
BREAKING: Irish MEP @liadhniriadaMEP gets sight of EU commission proposal to develop maritime links between Ireland and continental Europe as part of contingency plans for a possible “no deal” #Brexit outcome. @rtenews 
If chuka  was PM he could no way stop Brexit than Jeremy could. When are people to going to learn it’s only the TORIES that can STOP  Brexit. 
The disrespect shown to Scotland in the Brexit process has driven over 5,000 people to join the SNP in the last 24 hours. Stand up with us for Scotland - join today! -  
The only Scots MPs that stood up against the Tory #POWERGRAB were SNP MPs. They were joined by 4 Welsh Plaid Cymru MPs, 1 Bath MP, Caroline Lucas & Labour's Dennis Skinner. The Better Together BREXIT Forever pact did nada. #FMQs 
Theresa May's government will fall if MPs reject her final Brexit deal, senior Tory warns  
If the Brexiters were rogue traders who had sold defective products costing thousands of pounds to millions of people through lies and false promises, the public and media would be shouting for them to be prosecuted and jailed.#StopBrexit #brexit #FBPE 
2. Visiting Coventry Cathedral reminded me what Palliser and other British diplomats built in Europe after the war - key components of the structures, rules of EU institutions and the rights of European citizens. I hope the EU will remember them - regardless of  Brexit.  
Brexit is a big deal but it's not a done deal! If you agree, join us at the #PeoplesVote March on 23rd June! Find out more here: 
Lord Malloch-Brown: “We must win the meaningful vote... That is likely to trigger a new referendum”Lord Bilimoria: “Meaningful vote” could “stop Brexit”Viscount Hailsham: Without it “to remain within the EU was not an option”The “meaningful vote” is Remains last ditch attempt 
Brexit obsessive diary dates - 5pm, today's deadline for compromise amendment, Withdrawal bill in Lords on Monday, then back in Commons on Wednesday, then Trade Bill, big potential bust up, rumoured to be week starting July 9th, which is also NATO summit and Trump visit..... 
Patrick: Constitutional crisis caused by UK Gov abolishing principle of devolved consent. Greatly increases urgency of giving the people of Scotland control of their own future, instead of chaos of Brexit Britain. #FMQs 
Christian Adams on Theresa May’s Brexit troubles - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Exlucisve: @theSNP membership has risen by over 5,000 in 24-hours following MPs' mass walkout from Westminster. Normal daily figure is 50-100. Party source attributes surge to anger at Tory Brexit "power grab".  
I was covering the Scottish independence referendum when this front page came out, a crucial moment in the campaign.Now the guy who orchestrated 'The Vow' has backed independence.Four years. What a wild ride UK politics has been.  
Foie gras imports may be banned after Brexit, UK minister suggests  
Fishermen warn of a repeat of the "travesty" of 1973 if UK waters are carved up as part of a Brexit deal  
#Brexit is a disaster for the NHS. Govt forced to remove immigration caps for medics coming from outside the EU to fill the 40,000 vacancies caused by EU staff leaving and few new recruits arriving. Taking back control, my arse. 
Conference ends. Shaking hands, exchanging business cards, tentatively agreeing to speak at another meeting. Then, from one European colleague after another (awkwardly): “Sorry for your Brexit”. 
Why would an anti-Brexit MP ‘criticise’ the EU?Because the #Galileo ‘row’ is concocted.Next, the EU will ‘allow’ us to participate, which means keeping their military rules, policies and structures.This might even have been the Grieve promise. They know we’re losing defence. 
Asked the Brexit minister in HofC if, according to CBI the car industry is to become extinct after Brexit if we are not in the Customs Union with the EU what’s the Govrnment’s contingency plan to save 30,000 car related jobs in the North East. There was no answer  @Open_Britain 
Brexit warning from investment firm co-founded by Rees-Mogg. He must be so cross that @guardian have shortened the firm's name to SCM - the name of my company  but ours stands for Smart, Commonsense, Modern 
If you're one of the millions who voted #brexit in the referendum, and had been promised it would be beneficial, do you now understand that they wilfully lie to you?#StopBrexit2018 #PeoplesVote #Remain #FinalSayForAll 
Brexit warning from Rees-Mogg's investment firm to investors about Brexit “considerable uncertainty" What a hypocrite! Warning his ultra rich clients, whilst telling British people to follow him over the cliff edge.  from Rees-Mogg's investment company 
"David Davis sought to reassure Right-wing Tory MPs that ministers will not let Parliament dictate Brexit terms."Wasn't this all about taking back control in UK parliament, not government? Don't remember that being on the ballot paper. 
I don't like the use of the word "traitor" in discourse but if it is to be used it applies to @isabeloakeshott who sat on evidence of Russian meddling in the Referendum (by her own admission) for two years while bullying @carolecadwalla for uncovering it 
The Royal Mail - which has banned its employees from flying the England flag - is now low key trashing Brexit. Connection?   
'More concessions, more delays!' Farage WARNS Remainers 'dramatic Brexit moment' is COMING  
It’s about time @BroxtoweCons ended their silence on their MP @Anna_Soubry’s behaviour. By ignoring her constituency’s, & the entire country’s decision to #Leave the #EU, she’s also defying the @Conservatives party manifesto promise which she was elected on last year. #Brexit  
People voted for Brexit after being promised a better deal/relationship with the EU.If the government can't get one, they have neither the right, nor the democratic permission to do anything but let the people decide what to do next.#PeoplesVoteMarch 23 June 
Silly @theSNP  stunt of walking out of lCommons cost the party a 3 hour debate  the same day. Yet the SNP  walked out in protest a lack of debating time on Brexit 
This week has made one thing clear: the Lib Dems are the only party fighting Brexit.If you want to #ExitFromBrexit join today:  
There are probably 500 people here at lunchtime on a very windy Thursday. How many more feel the same passion but just couldn't make it today? There's another demo tomorrow in Glasgow at 5pm... #handsoffourparliament #brexit #snpwalkout #FMQs #powergrab 
The whole Sarri or Conte saga is starting to feel like Brexit.In that no matter what way you voted it's so drawn out and badly handled that you get the feeling nobody will be happy in the end! 
#  Ok I'm calling it, wouldn’t have been a referendum on Europe would be no austerity, NHS wouldn’t be decimated, if the Liberal party hadn’t gone into coalition with this stinking Conservative government 
UK needs a 'people's vote' on all Brexit options, says Gina Miller  via @flacqua @bsurveillance  
This absurd grandstanding seems symbolic of the whole Brexit project as an MP walks through a crowd of protestors, haranguing them but totally ignoring them and not listening to anything they have to say#TheyAreThePeople #StopBrexit 
"There's going to be a new government" - top Tory MP @TomTugendhat warns rebels if they vote down Theresa May's Brexit deal  
What conspiracy, you tinfoil loons? There is an open nationwide grass roots movement to stop the calamity of Brexit. The movement is gaining momentum against the backdrop of dwindling public appetite for leaving the EU. #IsupportDominicGrieve 
Hello, @BBCScotlandNews, can you tell us why you’ve failed to report that Murray Foot, architect of #TheVow, is now backing Scottish independence? Is it because you think it’s unimportant or because you know it’s huge?#indyref2 #ScotRef #Brexit 
British people voted for FREEDOM!Iain Duncan Smith tells May: Get a deal by EU summit or WALK“The British people voted for freedom & Parliament must remember that nothing should stop the Government delivering on that vote.”#Brexit #Leave #EU Go #WTO 
#PollingDay in #Lewisham and Labour out in force trying to elect more Corbyn lobby fodder.It really is simple, if you approve of Jeremy Corbyn and his tactical abstentions that support Tories vote Labour.If you want a strong consistent vote against Tory Brexit vote for Lucy 
Question for brexit voters.If these guys have no faith in brexit, why do you?  
An EU building being politically used to host a meeting of extremist ultra remainers #EUFs organising to deny the democratic #Brexit referendum vote - sounds like EU business as usual  
Off with the team knocking up in #LewishamByElection. Have already come across Tory canvassers looking glum and a Labour voter voting for us because of #Brexit. Come join us!  
See? They ADMIT they want to stop Brexit.Yes. It is a terrible idea and literally everything since the vote corresponds to that conclusion. 
Two British political operatives who were prominent figures in the Brexit campaign were in regular contact with the Russian ambassador in London while they campaigned for, and met with, Donald Trump in 2016  
One of the weirdest aspects of Brexit debate is the GOTCHA attitude of many of its advocates when you want say you want to stop Brexit. 
Dominic Grieve caught holding talks 'with arch enemies of Brexit at EU’s London HQ'  
Lunchtime. On a Thursday. With less than 24 hours notice. Does Sarah Smith still think "no-one really cares?" #handsoffourparliament #brexit  
Rule of thumb: If anyone ever suggests a Brexit issue will be solved by the WTO SPS and/or TBT agreement, there is a 99% chance they are wrong. 
BREXIT: The language being used on Mail Online to describe those opposed to fantasy versions of Brexit is getting insanely hostile.“Public enemy number one.”“Democracy hating traitor.”“Should be dealt with.”“Treacherous snake.”“Guilty of treason.”“Internment.”“Hang ‘em.”  
Tom doesn’t pull punches : “ the idea of the Union being based on “partnership and mutual respect” was “fraud and myth”.   Tom Devine: ‘Brexit Bill blunder will increase impetus for independence’ | The National  
In reality, post-Brexit hygiene checks at the border are a big issue for the British fishing industry and shouldn't be played down, as I wrote in the Times a while back: 
This is a point in history when the left & right want the same thing (hard #Brexit) for their own reasons.  The left cannot see (or do not care) that they are cannon fodder.  But #Brexit is fascist, we see it in every "enemy of the people/overturn the referendum" pronouncement  
If the Daily Mail attacks Dominic Grieve then he has my full support. The right-wing Media wishes the UK to be poorer post-Brexit. I do not. Staying within the EU is right and must be our campaigning line. 
Why we're against a hard brexit:• Those just about struggling through will see their wages decline• Rights at work will disappear• Public services will be slashed even furtherRead more here:  
This is well #Brexit  
In Ireland, blasphemy can cost you $30,000. A referendum could change that.  
CONFIRMED: The Tories will use #Brexit to erode workers' rights.I gave @UKGOV ample opportunity this morning to distance themselves from the remarks of one of its Ministers who seeks to scrap labour protections after our EU departure. All I got back was spin. 
"The real aim of the Hailsham amendment is not greater scrutiny, it is a threat to Brexit," warns @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
I briefed him once. He was interested, engaging, insightful and actually quite inspiring. He was not what I had expected at all. I’ve been a fan ever since. On #Brexit, he is absolutely spot on. A true statesman and patriot. #ISupportDominicGrieve 
Great blog from @JamesMcGrory: No one voted for a bad deal on Brexit - #PeoplesVote gives us a chance to do something about it. Please RT: 
This is what we can all agree on - Brexit is in a mess.It does make sense to prep an escape route out of the mess. Maybe the PM will come back with a deal that will do. But if not... let's think practically about our ability to ditch it. A #PeoplesVote provides that backstop. 
My mum recently met up with some old friends visiting from Spain. They've lived there 15 years, about to lose right to vote in UK GE. She asked them if taking Spanish citizenship because of #Brexit. It was news to them that Brexit means they lose their right to live in Spain  
I am out to destroy Brexit because Brexit is out to destroy Britain.In the Daily Mail's eyes, that makes me a villain, a traitor even. Given the reality, which I refuse to fudge about, what does that make the Daily Mail? #IsupportDominicGrieve 
They already have.  Redwood and Mogg have moved their money out of the U.K., I presume Theresa May’s husband is doing same.  Farage has applied for German citizenship, Lawson applied for French residency.  They are all protecting their money, ready to pillage post Brexit Britain 
Judging by Brexit questions in the Commons today, nearly two years on from the referendum the Government is still completely unable to explain how leaving the customs union will help UK manufacturing. 
Tory delight in Lab divisions over Brexit looks like displacement activity to me. You are the Govt, chaps. And you are failing to deliver anything resembling a proper Brexit. People are noticing now. 
Just to be clear on the April referendum, I was working on the theory that just before we crash out in March the EU will offer a one month extension so we can hold a referendum on the deal. 
Big welcome to all those who voted No at the last Indy referendum to the Yes side. It wasn’t an easy decision and I’m sure many deliberated long and hard before casting their vote.Welcome onboard #Yes #Indyref2  
Still cant believe its IHOb. Burgers?! Its the brexit of breakfast. 
Why should a Corbynista give a damn about the harm #Brexit will do to the British people when he can yell "Iraq"! Along with rabid nationalism, leader-worship was one of the genocidal political plagues of the 20th century. #StopBrexit #brexit #FBPE  
#Brexit Qs underway in @HouseofCommons - already 7 @theSNP MPs have been called - we'll make our presence felt, and Scotland's voice heard, at #Westminster using every means possible #ScotlandCan @joannaccherry @PeterGrantMP @DavidLinden @PGibsonSNP @alisonthewliss @AlanBrownSNP 
The official advice MPs received in June 2015 about the non-binding nature of the referendum. If you think it should be better known please RT (H/T @JamesTurner37) 
Do you trust these people on Brexit?Does Theresa May tell the truth?Is Boris Johnson reliable?Can David Davis master the detail?Does Michael Gove care about people like you?If not, shouldn't we get Parliament to oversee their Brexit plans?It's YOUR LIFE in THEIR HANDS.  
Why do Remain MPs now pretend we did not know we were voting to leave the single market and customs union, when both official campaigns in the referendum told us just that and actually agreed on this point! 
"Labour wants a Brexit for all our people. One that offers security to workers in the car industry worried about their future, hope to families struggling to pay the bills each month and opportunity to young people wanting a decent job and a home of their own."    Jeremy Corbyn.  
Last reply. I think Brexit is most important issue of our generation. It will damage economy, people will lose their jobs. People with money will be OK. It will damage investment in education, health etc. I'm annoyed with Labour because they are not yet coherent on the issue. 
The 1987 poll tax brought about Thatcher’s downfall. Now Brexit will do the same for Theresa May, says @Andrew_Adonis  
Calls for MPs to have a “meaningful vote” on Brexit are nothing to do with parliamentary scrutiny; they are about stopping Brexit:  
Tory rebel Dominic Grieve was accused of ‘supping with the devil’ last night after he held secret talks with avowed enemies of Brexit  
The Daily Mail wants to silence anyone who dares criticise #Brexit, but WE won’t be bullied. Join the #PeoplesVoteMarch on June 23 to make your voice heard!For all the details, and to pledge to march alongside us, visit:Please retweet! 
Good to see the Royal College of Midwives join the @theRCN & growing number of others calling for #PeoplesVote on a #Brexit deal (if this shambles of a Govt is capable of reaching one)  
The UK will plunder essential doctors and nurses from the developing world - at the huge detriment to the countries that trained them - because EU clinicians have been driven out by the Brexit vote. Nobody is winning here, not least patients 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: "The European Commission is using our public money to fund the fight against Brexit." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg |  
The Brexit headwinds are turning into a gale.  
If Brexit was a frisbee, Britain was a dog and reality was the man holding the camera.  
Back in the chamber for @theSNP to ask @DExEUgov what they will do to address @EHRC advice that losing #CharterofFundamentalRights after #Brexit will weaken #HumanRights in UK. Answer = nothing because UK Govt disagree with @EHRC. Shocking 
"The decision to launch the fund was nothing whatsoever to do with Brexit” says Jacob Rees-Mogg   
Nigel Farage, on his LBC show on Wednesday, gave the biggest indication yet, that he may return to full time domestic politics to fight for Brexit. I for one would welcome him back. 
And we have every right to reverse a bad decision. Brexit is damaging the UK. We will resist it and the British people will eventually reverse it. 
1. Take a part-time job as an MP to supplement your main job in finance2. Use your part-time job to push for a hard Brexit3. Sell your clients advice on how to mitigate risks of hard Brexit4. Profit ££££££££Isn't it time to oblige MPs to treat it as a full-time job?  
Dominic Grieve's carefully curated image of being a noble sage simply trying to defend the constitution lying in tatters this morningMPs should not be fooled by his 'wise old uncle' manner - his amendment is a wrecking amendment designed to block Brexit  
The reason Tories are struggling with Brexit is it conflicts with their principle of making as much money as possible for the least amount of work. 
1. Seen quite a bit of anti #FBPE nonsense...mainly from the further left..we've been called a cult by Corbynistas...I'd remind them, cultists worship deities PEOPLE or objects; opposing a #Brexit which is leaving us all Poorer, Weaker with Less Control & Fewer Rights is neither.  
I was. 100%. If I'd known there was ANY chance of Brexit I would have been a clear yes.  I wasn't told that.  The Yes campaign never managed to get the message across and I listened to the media - they wouldn't lie surely?Fool me once - shame on you.  They won't fool me twice. 
The EU has blocked UK businesses from the #Galileo satellite system and #EUdefence projects. This decision hurts Britain's economy and weakens Europe's security.EU leaders need to decide. Do they want a security partnership with us post-Brexit or not?  
Jacob Rees-Mogg. A hypocrite by any reasonable definition. A do as I say, not as I do spiv,  example of so much,  wrong with politics today.  City firm co-founded by Jacob, set up investment fund in Ireland..warning about dangers of hard Brexit. #Brexit  
It’s quite astonishing to see the @LibDems saying, “we’re the party you can trust”.Do they really believe people are that stupid?The coalition. Austerity. Tuition Fees. The Bedroom Tax. Brexit.They are Tory enablers!Vote Labour. Vote @JanetDaby.#LewishamEastByElection 
Jacob Rees-Mogg's European Research Group - Hard Brexit for the Few, not the Many... and funded by the poor... #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles #r4today 
NEW: powerful NHS union, the Royal College of Midwives, has thrown its support behind a #PeoplesVoteMore and more people everyday are demanding a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT this:  
Labour: Abstained on the power grab and have six front bench resignations. Want a hard Brexit.SNP: Voted against the power grab, walked out of parliament (as Donald Dewar did in the late 80s), gained over 1,000 new members and the architect of "The Vow" backs independence. 
If we keep focusing solely on Brexit, there will be nothing left to save. The Tories are destroying the countries. There  is nothing more important than kicking the Tories out. Now!  
PLOT: Tory MP meets with Remoaner groups as establishment bid to stop Brexit continues. Mogg: “Dominic should be careful about the company he keeps if he wishes to maintain his position that this is not about stopping Brexit.” 
How could any serious political observer fail to see the growing frustration of Scots MPs, the repeated, broken promises by the UK Government and the growing lack of parity between Scotland and Northern Ireland over the same “one size fits all” Brexit?  
No more Monsieur Nice Guy: Time to play Barnier at his own Dirty Game!No payments without a Good Deal.Immediate stop to all #EU fees.Trade Deals with Commonwealth.Duties on German & French cars.All step by step until we get an acceptable deal.#Brexit 
If Malloch-Brown, front-man for Soros-funded Best for Britain campaign to overturn the Referendum result, was one of the peers Grieve met with Campbell, then there's now a direct link between Grieve and Soros. Wow.And these people have the nerve to blame "Russian influence". . .  
The Daily Mail wants to silence anyone who dares criticise Brexit. Show them we won’t be bullied.Donate to the #PeoplesVote campaign today:  
Spot on James, madness. #Brexit must, and can still be, stopped  
Just saw a bunch of Lib Dem peeps saying the SNP is embarrassing. The LDs agreed to the bedroom tax in return for the AV referendum. 
Foote’s article is the death of The Vow and the era of establishment Scotland propping up a decaying regime:  @murrayf00te @DaniGaravelli1 @Ben_Wray1989 @GerryHassan @alexmassie @KennyFarq @thoughtland @LesleyRiddoch #Brexit #BrexitMeltdown #SNPwalkout 
Asking me to ‘get behind’ May’s or Corbyn’s Brexit is asking me to push my beliefs of tolerance, reason, logic and improving the opportunities for young people and future generations over a cliff-edge.Anyone prepared to get behind that is either an idiot, an arsehole or both.  
**I need the collective HELP of Twitter**With new evidence emerging daily (Rolls-Royce today) that #Brexit has absolutely no upside, but will prove disastrous for the UK, I need help to understand WHY are our politicians still pursuing it?What's your theory?@mrjamesob #FBPE 
Theresa May is the wrong person to be negotiating on behalf of our country. She never understood the reasons for Brexit and is a broken figure. He's not perfect but I think Boris Johnson could rally patriotic popular support and get us a far, far better deal. She needs to be gone 
A self made Brexit tragedy in 4 partsSpring 2016: Rolls-Royce warn leaving EU will lead to job losses in DerbyJune 2016: Derby votes 57% for #brexit2018: Tories & Labour confirm UK will leave Single MktJune 2018: 4 000 Job losses in DerbyYou fools, you absolute fools.  
Today is the Lewisham East by-election.Vote @UKIP to reject Tory/Labour FAKE Brexit and to end politically correct policing to make our streets safe again.#LewishamEastByElection 
Utterly tedious of @bbcnickrobinson to keep challenging Labour with “has the EU said publicly that they support your Brexit strategy?” knowing full well, if the EU did that, headlines would shriek BRUSSELS INTERFERENCE.Equally tedious of Labour to never have this simple answer. 
Mundell: SNP sought to “use Brexit as cover to change constitutional settlement to give Scottish Parliament a veto over UKwide responsibilities; something we cannot accept”. *WE*. YOU'RE THE SCOTTISH SECRETARY. YOUR JOB IS TO PROTECT SCOTTISH INTERESTS. RESIGN @DavidMundellDCT. 
Last time the choice was between the unknown and the safe status quo.  To me there was no reason to risk what we had - even a small risk.  I have a family to think about.We don't have that now.  There is no status quo.  We have Brexit doom, or Independence hope. 
I don't understand why letting parliament have a meaningful vote on Brexit will "reveal our negotiating hand" surely the EU already know our hand?1. Blue passports2. Unicorns3. Infinite Cake 
The idea that a "no deal" Brexit is now off the table is dangerously complacent. Theresa May is locked into a strategy that virtually guarantees a major confrontation with Brussels - and it would likely require a new PM backed by a… 
Young people and students (including midwifery students) know any Brexit that harms NHS isn’t a Brexit worth having. Glad to see Royal College of Midwives coming out in support of a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit Deal. #FFS 
Laura Smith MP @BBCr4today: It's not my job to tell ppl they were wrong (re #Brexit)ME: Offering the Ppl a #FinalSay where everyone has a chance to decide if they still want this #BrexitShambles or now to #StopBrexit #Reject #Revoke #Remain #Reform isn't telling it's asking. 
@theSNP @NicolaSturgeon I'm English. Some Scots genes somewhere. I've just joined the SNP. Seems to me Scotland is the last stand for what I would have termed a few short years ago to be British culture and values. England is morally corrupted by Brexit. Time for #indyref2 
Rolls Royce and Landrover Discovery....thousands of skilled well paid jobs gone thanks to Brexit.For every job there will a bunch of other people who rely on that income...shops, hairdressers, dry cleaners, taxis, cafes, restaurants, cinemas, and they will shed jobs too. 
The Times: "The former newspaper editor [Daily Record] who masterminded a promise of extra powers for Holyrood in the days before the independence referendum has said Scotland should quit the UK." #YouYesYet 
I have to agree. No Deal/Car crash/cliff/edge/kamikaze Brexit is at least as likely as any other outcome at this point IMHO, whether intentionally or by accident/incompetence.  
So like LeaveEU officials repeatedly 'briefing' the Russian ambassador during the Brexit and Trump campaigns?   
Extraordinarily cowardly & dimwitted Laura Smith iview on Today. Unable to say how Brexit will make her constituents better off, unable to mention a negotiator who'd accept Labour's unicorn policy, desperate to attack "nasty" Tory Brexit w/out any ideas to improve it. 
Good & bad news for #brexit this week. On negative side Jaguar & Rollls-Royce slash 6 000 high quality jobs in UK.On plus side Weatherspoons to punish Europeans by not promoting Belgian beer & French wine at its pubs in the run up to “brexit day”.That will show them... 
European Parliament, changes to number of MEPs after #Brexit:- Cut from 751 to 705 MEPs- Redistribution of the 73 UK seats: 46 available for possible enlargement, 27 to under-represented countries (incl. +5 for France)-Formal adoption by Council on 28-29 June#EP2019 
Peter Brookes on Theresa May and Brexit talks – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
2. Govt has until close of play today to figure out its version - Letwin brokering the deal - feels like there is just going to have this kind of power struggle every single day til brexit’s done - whether that fills you with joy or dread 
Jacob Rees Mogg can avoid the financial consequences to him of a hard Brexit by setting up offshore structures in Dublin.  Those who lose their jobs in car plants as a result of hard Brexit can’t.  
The #UK is considering launching a ‘five-eyes’ alternative to the #EU’s Galileo satellite project, announcing its first space defence strategy with #Canada, #Australia & #NewZealand@Gadget_Ry @TTech_News#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpoli #Brexit 
NEW: Jacob Rees-Mogg defends own firm after it moved to Dublin amid hard Brexit fears 
If #TommyRobinson is KILLED IN YOUR #UK PRISON, @theresa_may @GOVUK @UKParliament @10DowningStreet YOU WILL BE GUILTY OF MURDERYOU’RE GULITY OF HUMAN RIGHTS VIOLATIONS#TheresaMay YOU’RE A DISGRACE TO THE FREE WORLD #FreeTommyRobinsonNow #FreeTommy #Brexit  
The rich can escape consequences of Brexit by setting up offshore structures. They aren’t who will suffer consequences of hard Brexit.  Those who work in engineering or car works which close because  of hard Brexit can’t save their job by setting up a company in Dublin. 
The Westminster Elite stands thoroughly exposed and discredited by Brexit. Once the dust settles on Brexit, the whole rotten system must be torn down, people removed and major reforms implemented.  
The EU isn’t hindering Brexit, the PM is — it’s time for anyone but Theresa May  
6/ It is funny how patriots like @johnredwood and @Jacob_Rees_Mogg say to the public Brexit will be great and then take measures to protect their clients post- Brexit.I say funny.In truth it is fraud  
5/ I am sure those losing jobs will be comforted to know that Ghost Of Victorian Past @Jacob_Rees_Mogg will be ok as his business is now setting up in Ireland because of Brexit.  
If you're going to use this reasoning, what about Brexit makes it the right way forward exactly?This isn't a "gotcha" question. It's just that if this is the hill you're choosing to die upon, you really ought to have a coherent answer for the sake of your own credibility.  
I think this is one of the most interesting #Brexit stories for many days EU to create new sea route between Ireland and mainland Northern Europe that will bypass Britain after Brexit under “preparedness” plans being drafted by @MartinSelmayr 
The British public is not dumb. All fair-minded 2016 Remain voters as well as Leavers know there was a promise to implement the result of the referendum. We are seeing disgraceful plotting against democracy by establishment EU zealots. It simply must not prevail.  
Blackford tells #BBCGMS @theSNP will look for more opportunities to frustrate Brexit processes in Parliament 
Hilarious. Meeting to campaign against Brexit is now a Daily Mail ‘conspiracy.’ This nonsense will soon change when Dacre is replaced by Grieg as editor  
It is a total disgrace that an MP is still peddling the lie that democracy requires that #Brexit be railroaded through. If your understanding of how democracy works is this poor, you really are not qualified to be an MP. 
“The same politicians who insist we listen to Grenfell survivors spend the rest of the time trying to silence Brexit voters. These people only like the poor when they’re weak and suffering, never when they’re revolting.” Brendan O’Neill on #Grenfell 
I’m afraid this week’s episode of CakeWatch is extremely sweary. Please do not listen to it if that sort of thing offends. If, on the other hand, you’re more offended by bits of the constitution being ripped up by the Government in the name of Brexit purity, you may enjoy it.  
My 96-year-old father Brigadier Stephen Goodall will be at the front of the #peoplesvote  march with @Vets4EU @Farmers4EU @_Britain4Europe. As my Dad put it yesterday "Brexit Wrecks It" let's make sure it doesn't.  
Well done our midwives. Now it's time for business to start speaking out publicly on a #PeoplesVote. I understand they don't want to unsettle employees, but those employees will be a lot more unsettled if they lose their jobs because of Brexit.   
Scottish independence backed by former Daily Record editor Murray Foote who masterminded "The Vow" front page which helped defeat independence in the 2014 referendum  
You think Brexit helps??!! Loss of skilled EU staff, worry about just-in-time manufacturing if outside Customs Union, currency uncertainties, threat to British aviation if outside EU arrangements: all this could have been last straw  
Today’s #DailyMail is silly & sinister. They won’t stop  #DominicGrieve (send him your support) from fighting their hard no deal #Brexit. Sad & dangerous times when MPs are vilified for meeting campaign groups they don’t even support!  
Well done you. But we’ve long ran out of the unicorns you promised the 17.4m. So now we’re calling for a democratic final say for all voters to judge if Brexit is good as you promised it would be.  
It must be lovely, for those who can afford it, to avoid the incoming blows of Brexit. But for one of the Hard Line Brexiters to do it…makes me absolutely furious.  
My @Daily_Express piece on the Lords amendments and why the Prime Minister must be given maximum freedom to negotiate the Brexit for which 17.4 million people voted.  
As new facts come to light, it's no surprise that more and more unions are backing a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Its great to see the Royal College of Midwives do that today. Please RT: 
 @OwenSmith_MP If you’re a #remainer or a #remainernow & like Owen (and me) you believe #Brexit will make the UK poorer, weaker and more isolated, it’s vital you do what you can to oppose it!Write to your MP, talk to friends, join local anti-Brexit group, back #peoplesvote! 
Last night’s #Brexit vote marked the 100th #Labour front bench resignation under Jeremy Corbyn. That is an achievement which sets him apart from any other political leader. 
MUST-READ: powerful NHS union, the Royal College of Midwives, has thrown its support behind a #PeoplesVoteMore and more people everyday are demanding a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT this: 
When Brexit is over, and our country is in ruins, Theresa May will turn and say "I've have delivered Brexit, this is what you wanted".And the country will say, "No, it isn't".No Brexiter will be satisfied with what is delivered, and every Remainer will mourn for what we lost. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: "Dominic Grieve should be careful about the company he keeps if he wishes to maintain his position that this is not about stopping Brexit... if you sup with the devil you should use a long spoon and he is using an egg spoon."  
.Brexit is making a United Ireland more and more likely...... 
Powerful NHS union just backed a second referendum on Brexit 
Six Labour MPs quit over #Brexit vote as 74 vote against their whip.Looks like there are far more Labour MPs with principles than Tories. Pity so many Tory MPs fell for May's con trick on Tuesday. 
So what. It’s business readjusting to Brexit , not all about cash.We voted for an independent Britain with strong borders. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Didn't your constituency vote Remain? Meanwhile you're ignoring them and helping the WM government push through hard Brexit, which will have a horrific impact on the economy of your constituency.   
Mogg’s written an article in @thetimes insisting on no meaningful vote for parliament, insisting the referendum delivered a ‘clear mandate’. Oh you wish.Much better to read this letter from Graham Davies instead.  
“Fidelity to the promises that are implicit between the governing & the governed is absolutely essential to the health of our democracy...The real danger of extremism in our politics is if we ignore what people voted for” @SimonClarkeMP#Brexit 
Journalist betrays her sourcesPublishes straight lies about a sitting prime ministerCovers up collusion between Brexit campaign and Russia“You’re welcome,” says the BBC 
The Tories’ chaotic Brexit has lost the trust of business, and jobs will go | Aditya Chakrabortty  
(Reuters) - Lawyers for #Brexit campaigner @Arron_banks ordered the European Parliament’s chief Brexit coordinator @guyverhofstadt on Wednesday to retract a claim that Banks colluded with Russia to deliver Britain's vote to leave the European Union. 
Whether the walkout was a stunt or not the lack of attention to Scotland Wales and given the seriousness N Ireland in the Brexit process is a real scandal. And totally at odds with the idea this is about ‘taking back control’ for people of UK  
‘Concessions make no-deal MORE LIKELY’ Rees-Mogg makes BRILLIANT Brexit point on Newsnight  
Owen Smith - I remain a remainer... l would love this country to block, thwart, resist, revert #Brexit as it will make my constituents poorer & my country weaker & more isolated. I can't believe this Govt is still pursuing a policy to make our country poorer..#StopBrexit #FBPE 
This metropolitan sneering at the good honest British shed is why Brexit happened.  
There are many groups responsible for esterday’s debacle - yesterday’s step nearer to a hard Brexit. Top of the list, the government. Next, the spineless Tory ‘rebels’. Third, Her Majesty’s oh-so-loyal opposition. All three combined to excellent effect. Oh yes. 
On @GMB at 7.10 to discuss the ongoing Brexit crisis. House of Lords has a key part to play in upholding parliamentary sovereignty & ensuring Mrs May honours her promise to Dominic Grieve that Parliament, not Farage & Rees-Mogg, decide what happens next 
If only the majority of UK people were aware of the countless warning signs of Brexit, as we are, they would be out on the streets daily, protesting. But the media does an effective job of keeping them asleep.By the time they wake up and smell the smoke, it'll be too late. 
Italy 1922-43.Portugal 1933-74.Germany 1933-45.Austria 1934-38.Spain 1937-75.Slovakia 1939-45.Romania 1940-41.Croatia 1941-45.Hungary 1944-45.Fascist regimes in Europe. ALL ended by 1975 - when the EEC and then EU took shape.#Brexit has reawoken the filthy beast#FBPE 
Theresa May is Melting!!!!The whole country is laughing at May’s angry face, Britain is Broken, Brexit Austerity Grenfell Windrush NHS crisis homelessness Foodbanks, laughing at the utter despair of a Basketcase Tory Government where Tories think Trump could do a better job omg!  
Lying Brexit supporting journalists welcome at the BBC  
Talking on @GMB about Brexit chaos in Labour. @jeremycorbyn spent his life campaigning to Leave now pretends he wants to stay in 
BREXITEERS. do any of you worry what happens if brexit bombs. No deal #Brexit could lead to food and fuel shortages a revolutionary situation and you lot will be the bourbons  @BorisJohnson @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @DavidDavisMP @SteveBakerHW @SuellaBraverman @LiamFox @jeremycorbyn 
Gammonism:As the contradictions within the Brexit case are exposed a new blind hate called Gammonism is gripping the Brexiters.Gammonism involves pretending that every issue arising is part of an undemocratic plot and that any barrier to Brexit is unreasonable.#FBPE 
IF we ‘leave’ - and it’s not a done deal! Brexit can be stopped! - I’m definitely in.  
I agree. I'm English, live in Wales. UK will be worse off without Scotland, Scotland better off without England. Brexit will be the end of UK. Independent Scotland, reunited Ireland. I hope Wales will eventually join a Celtic Union, and I hope that happens in my lifetime. 
Congratulations to Mrs May, who has successfully dragged us out of the Charter on Human Rights.I'm sure the #Brexit fanatics will explain that they KNEW they were voting to be tortured and killed by the government, and that it's worth it. 
We cannot let the Remainers thwart Brexit says ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩  ⁦@BrexitCentral⁩ 
Treacherous remainer Dominic Grieve insists he's not out to destroy Brexit. So what was he doing addressing a secretive meeting in the EU's London HQ of those plotting to reverse it?  via @MailOnline 
JUST IN: IGWUOCHA WARRIORS CONDUCTS A MOCK REFERENDUM TO TEST RUN THE OUTCOME IF A REFERENDUM DATE SHOULD BE GIVEN TODAY  
So true. Those of us who are outspoken critics of Brexit particularly its hard variety are hardly making a secret of it.  
I am shouting a loud and very warm 'Welcome' to Murray Foote and congratulate him on his announcement that he has changed his mind on Indy.In a democracy, people are allowed to change their minds!That's why we need an IndyRef2 and another ref on Brexit.It's called 'democracy'! 
Oh, and it's not like we haven't been here before....20,000 'patriots' were on the wrong side of history in 1939, their descendants are on the wrong side again..... 
Why is no one in Britain discussing whether to hold another referendum if the last one was subject to foreign tampering?  
MAGNIFICENT from @guyverhofstadt and long overdue, Farage & Banks called out for what they are. Behind all the noise, the lies and the bluster from the Brexiteers, it's OUR country, OUR rights and OUR freedoms that are being stolen by a fifth column. Put this on @bbcquestiontime 
I personally THINK this is a great idea!Though NO ONE seems to care what #WeThePeople WANT! Referendum To Split California Into 3 States Gets On Ballot -  
Who said that Royal Mail were NOT going to release any #Brexit stamps?This one, at least, celebrates the Great #BrexitShambles 
Jeremy Corbyn 'in bed with Theresa May' over Brexit, Vince Cable says  
The hits keep coming: "AG Laxalt files anti-abortion court briefs despite 1990 referendum"Now you know why his team likes to limit @adamlaxalt interviews. This is astonishing. Just look at how he dodges or doesn't know. Great, revelatory work by @KOLO8: 
Wendy and James uncovered the Alfa Bank link between Brexit and Mississippi GOPers entangled in all this mishegas <squints> LAST YEAR.  
UK faces more bruising Brexit debate in Commons, as the government seeks to reverse changes inserted by the House of Lords softening the terms and increasing Parliament's role in the process.  
Not just in the Brexit debate but all along. It seems that only when it's something close to home do some / most people notice. SNP reached out their hand to Labour a number of times to no avail. The union is over in all but the paperwork. 
This is some dumb evil shit that’s giving me a real Brexit vibe i.e. it will probably pass  
Two British political operatives were in regular contact with the Russian ambassador in London while they campaigned for, and met with, Donald Trump in the United States in 2016 #ArronBanks #brexit 
Expectations of a soft Brexit look dangerously complacent, with British Prime Minister Theresa May set for a high-stakes confrontation with the EU  
The Mail rightly asks why Dominic Grieve slipped into the EU’s London HQ yesterday for a meeting with Alistair Campbell and the peers who are trying to reverse Brexit. Tory rebels around Grieve say they acknowledge the result of the referendum. Who do they think they are kidding? 
I joined the greens after the 1st independence referendum, but then I realised that I had to join the SNP to help free Scotland from the tyranny of Westminster.  I’d encourage every scottish citizen to join. 
You do realise that New Labour was centrist and under Tony Blair it led Britain into a war in Iraq so disastrous that most of the world's present day problems can be laid at its feet. #brexit  
14th successive YouGov poll showing that the Will of the People 2018 is to Remain. It is madness and undemocratic to implement a catastrophic Brexit which the majority don’t want  
The Royal College of Midwives is backing the #PeoplesVote campaign. We’re calling for a public vote on the final #Brexit deal. Read this article from chief executive and midwife @GillWaltonRCM: 
Better for No voting Scots to come to the conclusion that Scotland is better off self determining our own future, better late than never and Brexit is the straw that is breaking many camels backs, Those of us for Indy must look forward along with new Yessers, not look back. 
Said all along, Sturgeon never wanted a deal with UK Govt on Brexit, never. This is what it's all about. Picking fights, stirring up hostility & grievance, & creating mayhem.Disgraceful. Scotland deserves better than this shower of spiteful troublemakers.  
52% of voters in 2016 felt voting Brexit would make Britain better. But as you can tell from the chaos we're seeing now, they wanted very different things. So if Brexit happens, it will be what a small minority wanted.48% of voters wanted ONE thing: Not to **** up the country. 
In the face of Brexit and a Westminster power grab Scotland needs independence, says ⁦@murrayf00te⁩ - the man behind ‘The Vow’ of 2014 
An investment house founded by Jacob Rees-Mogg, a Conservative MP and supporter of a hard Brexit, has set up a post-Brexit fund in Dublin  
I think what made the #SNPwalkout so effective today is an almost global frustration at the Tories stonewalling on Brexit and continual tired political soundbites. What @IanBlackfordMP did was raw, passionate, and with genuine frustration. That resonated with a lot of people. 
'Brexit modern peasant REVOLT against out of touch OVERLORDS!' UK MEP STUNS EU Parliament  
Just to remove any uncertainty, I am hard #Remain. I am marching with like minded friends on 23rd June in London who are also hard Remain. Hard Remain means no #Brexit. No May Brexit and no fucking Corbyn Brexit. Fuck Brexit and what it is doing to my country.#StopBrexit 
While he's here, could someone ask @Arron_banks how he can square these images to the 'evidence' he and his oppo gave to @CommonsCMS? 
Realistically, EEA membership is the only single market pathway for Brexit. It’s a starting point to navigate through this shitstorm. So for the Tories (and Corbyn) to either rule this out or ignore it, is both arrogant and unbelievably stupid.#EuWithdrawalBill 
But Westminster can be allowed to ‘overturn will of Scottish Parliament elected by Scottish people’ on Brexit and devolution... ...  
Bankers from the City of London are threatening to leave if #Brexit is implemented. That would be the best thing that could happen to Britain. These parasites have been sucking the blood out of the British #economy for ages. 
Not directly #Brexit related peeps but the environment is going to be put under pressure by development & it is vital the wild woods are given statutory protection...would be grateful if you could give it a big push...thank you. 
If you like Banks' contempt, Farage's jovial deception, Davis' bluster & May's conflict of interest then don't join me in London on 23.06.18. If you think Brexit and its overlords are dangerous and its servants weak then please RT and see you there. Do it. 
4/ Ivan Rogers makes some cogent points why the association model of the EU (eg Ukraine) might not suit the UK post Brexit. @IanaDreyer 
Now, #r4today, you do need to get Jacob Rees-Mogg in.You urgently need to ask him why it is acceptable to inflict a Hard #Brexit on the entire population of Britain excepting his wealthy clients. 
Bankers to ask Theresa May why they should stay after Brexit - Reuters  
The  threats against MPs have been cynically whipped up by Tory politicians & the right-wing press including the PM with rhetoric about the "Will of the People" which demonises opponents of #Brexit as enemies of the people.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Usual rubbish by Mail. There’s no ‘conspiracy’ to oppose Brexit - it is an open campaign to oppose Brexit, an exercise of our democratic right, & we invite various people to come & give us their views, sometimes including politicians from all sides.  
Dear @guyverhofstadt, I think I can help. I think if you say "colluded with the Russians AND delivered Brexit", it's legally safe. We know he LIED about the Russians because he admitted it in parliament. We don't (yet) know if this helped DELIVER Brexit. Hope this helps, Carole  
The 6 resignations from Labour frontbench over Brexit means more than 100 MPs have quit the frontbench under @jeremycorbyn.is that a record 
Are you angry about this week's #EUWithdrawalBill votes? You should be, and we are too! Join us on June 23 as we march on Parliament to demand that the people be given a say on the final Brexit deal.Pledge to march at: Please RT! #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Referendum to split Calif into three states will appear on the November ballot  
#EUWithdrawalBill:- the current situation:-- No EEA- No Single Market- No Customs Union- No proposed backstop for the Irish border - No freedom of movement - No details on CAP, devolution, Gibraltar, fishing, aviation, ECJ.= Brexit means total confusion. 
Loads of tweets today from English people about moving to Scotland cause they feel it might be the last refuge from this Brexit insanity & not one reply from a Scot saying you’re not welcome or we hate the English.It’s been come join us or we’d love to have you.Makes me proud 
Looking at the list of #Brexit “rebels” tonight, it reads like a Who’s Who of every treacherous scurvy plotter and wrecker who cost #Corbyn the last election and cost Britain the chance of a #Labour government. Because of them we have Theresa #May 
Quick one on #LewishamEastByElection I think the events of the last couple of days could see a huge anti-brexit tactical vote come out and could see a hell of a swing.I am also hearing things about canvas on the ground! Keep an eye on it tomorrow.#voteremain 
Surely some mistake @michaelgove? Is not maintaining EU environmental standards and principles the basic starting blocks for your Green #Brexit?#EUwithdrawalbill 
Ok I'm calling itLabour leadership challenge before the party conferenceGeneral Election in November when the EU talks break downChuka Umunna as PM by December (Maybe David Lammy)Second referendum called for April on the dealNormal service resumed by next May 
The hypocrisy of ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ knows no bounds as his company sets up Dublin fund to keep European investors if we Brexit via @FT 
Hey, #Newsnight - since you've got Jacob Rees-Mogg (yet again) will you ask him about how he's protecting his and his ultra-rich clients' wealth from the impact of #Brexit by launching an investment vehicle for Somerset Capital Management in Dublin? 
They say Corbyn can't stop #Brexit. It is true that on his own he can't stop #Brexit, but it is also true that if he opposes Brexit it might be stopped, whereas if he supports it, then there will be nothing anyone can do to stop it. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
The purpose of Brussels is to impose a federal superstate on the peoples of Europe. This is why Britain needs to stop kicking the can down the road – because when the road runs out, the Commission has a cage ready for us:  #Brexit 
House of Commons -  tonight after the rejection of The European Single Market by .@Conservatives  and .@UKLabour  has given a clear message to Companies -  prepare to exit the UK.Folly of the gravest order.#Brexit #FBPE #LewishamEastByElection 
Rees-Moggs fund sets up Dublin clone to avoid oncoming storm. “The decision to launch the fund was nothing whatsoever to do with #Brexit,” they say.Brexiters think Remainers disrespect “the will of the people”, while those who conned them laugh at them. 
#labour chaos today again highlighted how @UKLabour have voted to frustrate Brexit today, playing politics rather than delivering for people.  
Leavers do not own the right to define the detail of Brexit. They could’ve campaigned for a specific idea of what Brexit meant. They could’ve sought a mandate for ‘No deal better than bad deal’/Brexit-regardless-of-cost. They didn’t - because they knew that would lose. 
Rounding off two genius days of Brexit news.  
74 brave #Labour MPs rebelled tonight. You can be a rebel too. If you are a party member, sign up today to join members across the country proposing our @Remain_Labour & @Labour4EU motion in their CLP, calling for a #PeoplesVote to resolve #Brexit  
#IStandWithJeremyCorbyn also with @Keir_Starmer , @BarryGardiner & @EmilyThornberry & their teams' attempts to navigate Brexit whilst in opposition, & whilst the Labour malcontents use Brexit to attack the leadership.Rather have those leading Brexit than the governments 3 Stooges 
Urgh! I think I'm going to be sick!Just read the BBC is re-running ALL 12 hours of the Brexit night Referendum results on 23rd June.Get writing people. Could this be ANY more pointless, or ANY more bias, while the debate over Brexit continues? 
That Labour couldn’t present a united position on Brexit today is a terrible indictment of its position on Europe. We deserve better Government but we also deserve better Opposition. 
In #LewishamEast, @LibDems the only major party with a candidate - and a leader - prepared to engage with both friends and foes and to talk to them straight on Brexit.  
Moving #TommyRobinson to prison run by Islamist gangs is not 'just' the State trying to get him killed. It's also intended to scare the entire British population into silence as they continue with the #GreatReplacement and deny us a real #Brexit . Naked tyranny aimed at us all! 
I’m a member of @UKLabour. I voted #Remain.I voted for @JeremyCorbyn in the 2nd Leadership Election AFTER the #Brexit ref.I voted Labour in the GE AFTER the #Brexit ref.I would vote Labour again tomorrow. Brexit belongs entirely to the Tories.#IStandWithJeremyCorbyn 
The connections between Brexit, Trump, and Russia just keep popping up.Over and over and over. 
.@BrandonLewis explains how Labour just voted to frustrate Brexit. Tell them what you think at  
#Brexit is the defining issue of our generation. If we abstain, we will be  complicit. We stand by our principles, or we stand for nothing.  If you want the #Labour Party to stand against Brexit and support a #PeoplesVote now is the time to join us. 
I voted remain, but #IStandWithJeremyCorbyn because his policies are the best hope for Britain.Those who attack him for not stopping Brexit don't understand the parliamentary numbers or the fact that Labour has at least 5 Brexit fundamentalists 
This Pig predicted Germany winning the 2014 WC, Wimbledon Tennis Finals, England Voting for Brexit & Trump winning the US election through apples. The pig 100% Prediction accuracy  
Hey John - you voted against a meaningful vote - so you are happy to have a hard Brexit and screw the ordinary working people you claim to represent #FBPE 
Heat is on Arron Banks as a Brexit-Trump-Russia nexus of Nigel Farage’s campaign while the data crimes and illegal coordination scandal widens  
I’ve joined the SNP, I’ve been a supporter of Independence for a few years now, but not necessarily backed the SNP. With what’s going on regarding Brexit and more specifically what went on at Westminster today it’s become clear supporting the SNP is the only way. #SNP #Scotland 
Laura Smith showed integrity and courage by voting against the unelected House Of Lords trying  to overturn the elected Commons and the referendum.Well done Laura, Crewe and Nantwich should be proud of you.  
Laura Smith MP: 60% #Leave"Taking rules from Brussels but having no role in making them is simply not good enough for Britain.I promised Crewe & Nantwich I would respect the referendum result.Remaining in the EEA is not compatible with that"#Brexit #EU 
I’m not a lawyer, but Twitter is full of clever legal  brains. Can anyone point me to the passage in the 2015 Referendum Act that says the result of the poll should take precedence over a vote of parliament?  
.@NicolaSturgeon is the only political leader that has said directly after the referendum, I (and any other migrant) was (and made me feel) welcome here. She even invited us EU citizens to a special #FMQ soon after the EUref. Today I did the long overdue thing and joined @theSNP 
23 minutes and counting on banning foie gras (live in the Commons).They've spent more time discussing the welfare of ducks and geese (important as that is) than discussing the brexit bill Lords amendments pertaining to Scotland.Think about that for a moment #DissolveTheUnion 
Delighted to have supported my Prime Minister in every single vote this evening, voting against unhelpful Lords amendments. #Redditch voted to leave, I am here to deliver on the will of my constituents. Tonight’s votes will bring closer to the sensible #Brexit they voted for.  
Looking at the Brexit clusterfuck today, I am more glad than ever that the Repeal referendum was so decisive. 69%. Now *that’s* a mandate. 
 The Brexit spaceship was always destined to break up when it got into the orbit of the real world 
Jeremy Corbyn hit by backbench revolt by 75 MPs in Brexit vote  
When:Your MP's don't back you on #Brexit90+ rebel6 of your front bench team resign because they disagree with youThe total number of MP's that have resigned from your front bench smashes the 100 barrierI imagine that @jeremycorbyn has had better days!#EUWithdrawalBill 
After a lifetime of serving the Conservative party, the most senior member of Parliament, Ken Clarke, voted against the government six times tonight. Over Brexit. Seems important, somehow. #EUWithdrawalBIll 
The huge lie of the 'the will of the people' that the wretched May keeps mouthing: it was 37% of a restricted electorate - and that % has DROPPED since the referendum - which, to boot, got its paltry 37% on lies, deceit, false promises, illegality and outside interference. 
If post Brexit UK is going to be so great @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, why would you need to set up an investment company in the EU? #BrexitLiar 
I expect Mr Davis @DavidDavisMP, with his SAS training, will be training all his front bench chums the art of escape and evasion. You won't see them for dust come next March as they leggit for the ports and airports.Don't let them get away with it.It's their Brexit, not yours. 
EU withdrawal bill goes back to the Lords with their suggestions overturned. Let’s move on and make Brexit the best for Britain’s future- I have great faith in Brexit Britain and I respect the people’s vote in the referendum. Well done to those MPs who voted down the amendments. 
So you can order both of my books on Russia’s involvement in Brexit, Trump, and beyond direct from small but brave publisher @CynefinRoad and all good retailers.#TheArtOfHybridWar is out now, the UNABRIDGED #AlternativeWar on June 21. (Both come out as ebooks the same date) 
Competition for most amusing tweets today:1) SNP outrage about MPs abstaining yesterday on flawed clause, as SNP HoC leader absents himself from all of today's key Brexit votes in a silly stunt #ironybypass2) guy mansplaining pregnancy to me (it's "a joy" & sleep is for wimps) 
It will come as no surprise to my constituents in Bristol North West that I voted at every opportunity to move us as far away as possible from a Hard Brexit tonight. I’ll keep doing so! #BrexitShambles 
The Good Ship Britannia Sinks Below the Waves: Scotland, Brexit and the Thoughts of Tim Shipman  #SNPwalkout 
Love the shoe & top hat. But Brexit is sinking Brexit - the dishonest in pursuit of the impossible  
I live in Northern England, I am a EU27 citizen directly affected by the xenophobia that is driving Brexit. I have taught North East working class kids for 20 years and have helped many of them into higher education. Anything you want to say to me?  
Brexiters make the mistake of thinking we are trying to stop Brexit because we are loyal to the EU - when in fact, it is because we are loyal to the UK. It's they who are damaging their country because of their loyalty to a destructive ideology that can only fail. 
"vote Brexit, get more immigration" is absolutely the sort of development I am glad to welcome in this banter era of politics  
This evening I voted for amendments to the #EUWithdrawalBill to keep UK in the Customs Union & Single Market, & keep Charter of Fundamental Rights & Environmental standards - no easy way through Tory Brexit mess, but I’ll keep representing strongly pro-EU views of my constituents 
Tens of 1000s of Welsh jobs depend on frictionless trade with the EU. An #EEA-based #Brexit is now the only realistic, ready-made option for #Aberavon, #Wales and the entire UK, particularly given the shambolic incompetence of the UK Govt. The time for abstaining has long passed. 
Hey @bbcquestiontime, why are you not inviting @carolecadwalla to balance this? It's ridiculous that you invite someone on who withheld critical information on Russian involvement in Brexit and not the journalist who actually forced the issue to go public #bbcqt 
Vince in 2010: "Together, we can all impose vicious Austerity that will play a very large part in causing Brexit". 
EXCLUSIVE in tomorrow's National: Scotland's top historian Tom Devine on why Westminster's handling of Brexit Bill will turn Scots towards independence. Make sure you pick up the paper for more.   
They didn't. 318-301.Over enhanced scrutiny for the workers' rights our PM  said would be 'fully protected & maintained'. So why deny a Parliamentary enhanced scrutiny check?Why, indeed? The question of almost everything Brexit. 
Jeremy Corbyn won't stand up to the Tories on Brexit. The #EUWithdrawalBill tonight has made that clear. Join the Lib Dem campaign to #ExitfromBrexit today:  
Cons & Lab both split on Brexit is another good reason for trusting the British people with a vote on any deal. Might bring it up tonight @SkyNews papers with deluded Brextremist @toryboypierce 
If you think the defeating of that amendment signals the EEA's exit from the Brexit debate you are incredibly naive. There is a reason it is the Brexit that simply won't go away. Just wait until they try to figure out how to preserve the Irish border after leaving the SM. 
It’s jealousy. Soubry is a sad, bitter, twisted and vicious character.  She demeans herself every time she speaks. By contrast Flint has conducted herself impeccably in relation to Brexit and is growing in stature with every speech and media appearance.  
If you live in #Lewisham tomorrow you get your chance to elect a new MP. Choose a MP who supports Brexit. A Party that supports Brexit. Pick a Conservative MP. #LewishamByElection 
The Lib Dems will continue to fight to defend our environment, but this is best done from within the EU. That’s why we want to give the people the final say on the Brexit deal, and the chance to stay in the EU. Join our campaign today:  #EUWithdrawalBill 
House of Lords spent about 20 hours debating devolution implications of Brexit. House of Commons: 15 minutes  
Whatever you think of the SNP demo, the treatment of Scotland & Wales by the House of Commons has been shameful in this Brexit debate & will harm the union  
Anna Soubry received £6,000 from pro EU More United Ltd 8th May 2018 according to  MPs Register Financial Interests. Nice little earner to defy #Brexit & @theresa_may in this week's Lords Amendment votes. 
The men who told you Brexit was for the little guy will have:...first dibs on Visas, so ending free movement won't affect them...private healthcare so destroying the NHS won't affect them...large profit margines so cost increases won't affect themAnd.. 
I think it is about time people of this country re-took control of @BBC - we are expected to pay and fund it, it belongs to all of us, not just the Brexit loonies.They no longer represent those who oppose a suicidal Brexit, we must force change if we want to stop this lunacy. 
‘Fifth Column’:  #EU Brexit Boss Demands Farage, Orban, Salvini Populists Be Shut Out!  The RATS are protecting their cheese!                    #fo2eu 
Now voting against Gov't motion that seriously waters down Lords amendment 3 to create an independent environmental watchdog, to replace role of EU in protecting wildlife & nature across UK. So-called 'Green Brexit’ looks more ridiculous by the day. #GoveWatch #EUWithdrawalBill 
Shadow Minister for the Cabinet Office @LauraSmithMP right to resign to vote against the EEA amendment, right because the EEA would not be the Brexit her constituents or the country voted for   
Jeremy Corbyn brought the house down at today’s PMQs, leaving Theresa May ‘absolutely fuming’By @timothyjwoods7 #PMQs #Brexit 
Resignation of Laura Smith and four PPS’ shows Labour leadership’s policy of waving through the Conservatives’ hard Brexit is no longer tenable. Time for Labour front-bench to join @LibDems in opposing the government on the biggest issue of the day. Together we can win. 
Every employer & trade sector rep I meet say; if we're not going to stay in  EU, then only a soft Brexit will do - to protect jobs, economy & ok, yes, their businessIt feels like we're crashing headlong into oblivion & I'm being pushed away from the brake lever    
Jeremy Corbyn hit by backbench revolt by 75 MPs in Brexit vote  
Labour, again, opening the door to a Tory hard Brexit.  
‘A huge cache of leaked messages show how Eurosceptic Tories have repeatedly pressured the news outlets inc @bbcnews @bbcr4today to shape coverage of Brexit – and joked about cutting off a BuzzFeed News reporter’s testicles’ #StopBrexit 
She doesn't need to worry David Dimbleby and @BBCPolitics will look after her  no doubt about that. They will have maybe 3 minutes if at all asking about the emails, and the rest will be her bread and butter talking about Brexit, whipping the pro Brexit crowd into a frenzy. 
[Interview] 2019: Referendum Or Total Collapse Of Nigeria - IPOB Spokesman -  
There have been enough Labour resignations and rebellions this evening to put to bed this idea that they'd be doing a better job of Brexit than the Government – Barnier would love to be offered EEA for the UK – he knows it's the worst possible deal for the UK and the best for EU. 
And this is your Wednesday Brexit summary. MPs vote against EEA and an Irish Border, while Gov says border in Irish sea is not an option. There is also probably a majority against no deal. It is not clear how many MPs have noticed this may be a problem.  
The Commons has just voted to take away the EU Charter of Fundamental Rights after #Brexit, eroding our rights and equality protections. #EUWithdrawalBillThis is a needless step backwards for the UK. Rights lost aren't easily won back. 
It’s called managing the narrative. You wait for the hilarious bit where it’s claimed Russian tried and failed to use hybrid warfare techniques during Brexit. #ComedyGold 
"As the Tories are increasingly driven by right wing figures like Jacob Rees-Mogg, it is all the more important to defend the basic individual protections set out in the Charter of Fundamental Rights" @thomasbrake. Sign up for an Exit from Brexit:  
You are so wrong!  I voted NO in 2014, but now, thanks to #Brexit, am 100% YES for #indyref2. I am not the only one!This cannot continue. There is nothing left for Scotland, but independence! We can do it!#scotref #FreeScotland #DissolveTheUnion 
Steve Bell on Theresa May and Brexit talks – cartoon  
 EEA Single Market *The* Customs Union No Deal Brexit  proposed backstop for *A* Customs UnionNo  or  for Customs Partnership+ say  to border infra / Max FacSo the answer is…?   
A constituent of Phillip Lee is still furious that he resigned over Brexit, so she phoned @Nigel_Farage to vent - and what she said was absolutely brutal  
The Commons just voted in a razor thin majority to take away the Charter of Fundamental Rights after Brexit, eroding equality, privacy and fairness in the U.K. and caving to the Government’s exploitation of Brexit to advance an anti-human rights agenda. 
Indeed, this is the effect of the Corbyn Whip to abstain. It allows a Brexit on the Tory Governments terms.This is not anti-Corbyn it is pro-truth!#fbpe 
BTW my daughter had total body irradiation in October as part of her treatment for Lymphoma. She is in remission now but, if she relapses she may need more treatment covered by EURATOM. These life threatening effects of Brexit must be highlighted and addressed! #PeoplesVote 
MPs still voting, this is a mammoth session, but I think EEA vote was biggest Labour Brexit rebellion and biggest Tory rebellion so far... v happy to be wrong, anyone else doing the numbers? 
'They do know BEST!' Tory MP delivers in PASSIONATE speech in defence of Brexit voters  
Majority of Labour backbenchers voted for Lords’ Amendment on EEA tonight. View of Lab MPs is clear, we don’t want a hard Brexit. 
PM in PMQS: "I cannot countenance this House overturning the will of the people". Countenance: "admit as acceptable or possible."Pure demagogeury. How about telling the people straight what is actually going on and the risks Brexit poses. #timefortruth 
Next, I am voting against the Government’s motion to delete Lords amendment 5 to transfer the EU Charter of Fundamental Rights into UK law upon Brexit. There should be no dilution of important legal rights on equality, disability & environmental protection. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Biggest Tory rebellion in Brexit process so far - on #EEA #SingleMarket tonight...more Conservatives than it took to defeat the Prime Minister in December. What a lost opportunity! 
So, you can catch up with the chat I had earlier with ⁦@mrjamesob⁩ on @LBC from around 01:39:00 here (The app is good).Talking about hybrid warfare, Brexit, Trump, Russia, and my book #AlternativeWar  
Tories have done the numbers: “There have now been over 100 resignations from Jeremy Corbyn’s team. These resignations show that Jeremy Corbyn can't lead his own party let alone our country through complex Brexit negotiations.” 
So on the #brexit #WithdrawalBill amendment that could have protected jobs in London & rest of UK, Corbyn orders his MPs to abstain.Corbyn's stuck 2 fingers up to voters in #LewishamEast He's saying their jobs don't matter. Their vote can let him know what they think of that. 
To @MilesBriggsMSP & @ScotTories questioning @theSNP actions today- tonight we’re voting according to our constituents wishes on #Brexit unlike you. Oh & an afternoon at my desk allowed me to catch up on some of the casework your boss can’t be bothered doing 
Labour's Brexit heroes who voted against EEA: @KevinBarronMPRonnie Campbell@rosie4westlancs@frankfieldteam@FitzMP@CarolineFlintMP@MikeHillMP@KateHoeyMP@KevanJonesMP@JohnMannMPDennis Skinner @LauraSmithMP@gareth_snell@spellarGraham StringerYou are real democrats. 
Irony klaxon:“the fund management company where Jacob Rees-Mogg is a partner has set up a fund in Dublin, as asset managers worry about being cut off from European investors after Brexit....”  
Jeremy Corbyn's just whipped his MPs to abstain on an #EUWithdrawalBill amendment that would have kept the UK in the EEA after Brexit. He's just, effectively, voted with the Tories to make every single one of us poorer.  
Yet again, Westminster proves just how out of touch it is with the people of Scotland, who rejected a Brexit that would cause so much harm. #EUWithdrawalBill Read more here:  
Britain's customs system is already one of the most efficient in the world, per World Bank ratings. 98% of containers arriving into Britain from outside the EU are cleared within 5 seconds. And you say these can't be adapted to handle imports from the Continent?#Brexit  
Proud that majority of Labour backbenchers voting for #EEA #SingleMarket tonight - a clear message that Labour should stand up for jobs and our public services which a hard Brexit will devastate. 
Brexit: MPs reject bid to stay in EEA amid Labour revolt  
Jeremy Corbyn suffers biggest Brexit rebellion and frontbench resignations as Labour splits erupt 
So all five Manchester Labour MPs supported the Tory Government on its Hard Brexit mission, again. This time to remove reference to EEA membership from the EU Withdrawal Bill. I really don't ever want to see a "John Leech supported the Tories" leaflet ever again. 
The bosses of some of Europe's biggest banks will ask Britain's Prime Minister Theresa May on Thursday to give them a reason to stay in the City of London after Brexit now that hopes are fading for a generous EU trade deal.  
Brexit LIVE: Labour in crisis as 5 ministers QUIT and Corbyn plot for soft Brexit CRUSHED  
Another Lords wrecking amendment bites the dust. This one would have forced us to negotiate a customs union with the EU.  To think that these attempts to destroy Brexit have been cooked up by unelected cronies. When all this is over the Lords must be stripped of its powers. 
The House of Commons have voted against remaining in the European Economic Area, despite Theresa May making a mess out of negotiations with Brussels. If you want the final say on Brexit, and the option to stay in the EU, add your name: #EUWithdrawalBill 
Arron Banks may leave politics, says Brexit is tedious and exhausting  
Wasn’t brexit supposed to be a good thing for the UK, wasn’t that the basis of the leave campaign?...not damage limitation  
There you have it - Labour chose to abstain when it had the opportunity to defeat the government & stop this slide towards a hard Brexit. Don’t let anyone ever tell you Corbyn isn’t a hard Brexiter. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Is this the good news that Labour Whips claim? 90 Labour MPs defied the whip - and plenty of others like @YvetteCooperMP made clear they towed the line with heavy heart. Labour is as disunited on Brexit as the Tories  
Five Labour MPs quit their shadow posts in protest at the party’s shambolic handling of Brexit.Theresa May under intense pressure from both wings of the party over her shambolic handling of Brexit.Jeezy peeps, the SNP can’t leave them alone for less than a day..... 
You couldn't make this up. Jacob Rees Mogg, who  bullies Theresa May towards a reckless No Deal Brexit, has the gall to warn his rich clients of the risks that Brexit brings! Sorry Brexiters, but these Brextremists are laughing at you.   
This evening, I have resigned as Shadow Defence PPS to vote in favour of the Lords EEA amendment. I have always said as an MP I will put the interests of my constituents first and I believe that means voting to maintain the closest possible relationship with the EU after Brexit.  
We haven’t been forgotten: we’ve been betrayed. Despite their false reassurances the U.K. government isn’t interested in fighting the corner of 1.3mn Brits on the continent. Shame on them. #brexit @BritishInEurope 
I can truthfully say that after a lifetime in Labour politics and half a lifetime in Parliament I have never heard of any of the five MPs who have resigned the #Labour whip over #Brexit. People we’ve never heard of resigning from positions we never knew they had @talkRADIO 
Andrea Jenkyns MP walks past remoaners outside Parl countering their 'Stop Brexit' cries with 'Go Brexit. The best years lie ahead!" This is how we need our MPs to lead Britain and fulfil the democratic vote to leave?Kudos Andrea!  
BREAKING: Labour MPs Laura Smith, Ged Killen, Ellie Reeves, Tonia Antoniazzi and Anna McMorrin have resigned from their frontbench roles over the party's position on Brexit.  
BREAKING: MPs vote 327-126 against EEA membership after Brexit. 
No 10 accused of forcing through Brexit votes before Leave campaign investigation is published  
So why is Nigel boosting a huge US MAGA account? Farage is supposed to just be about Brexit. The links between individuals, organizations & hostile Foreign Intelligence Services is there for all to see. Mueller's team has it all@LouiseMensch@thespybrief@ericgarland 
BREAKING: MPs vote against amendment to Brexit bill which called on the Government to negotiate full access to the Single Market.The defeat sparked the resignation of Five Labour frontbench MPs. 
I will not vote for any amendment to Brexit legislation that does not deliver the exit from the European Union that my constituents voted for. 
Labour’s Laura Smith quits frontbench to vote against EEA amendment. MP in a Leave constituency backing Brexit. 
I promised Crewe & Nantwich that I would respect the referendum result. Remaining in the EEA is not compatible with that. 
WATCH | "The Lords amendments have only one aim: to thwart the democratic will of the British people!" - @ConorBurnsUK fights back against the plot to subvert Brexit  Support us at  
Today in PMQT May banged on and on about about the vote outcome and adhering to the people’s will! Not once referring to the lies & investigated referendum corruption, or how the same people’s votes may have since changed? She’s a fraudulent liar protecting their tax fiddles! 
Chair of the ERG, one of the fundamentalist groups driving Brexit, moves his company to Dublin  whilst investing heavily in Russia. Hedge funds financed Brexit and are now "shorting" UK companies to make huge profits. @DrJayDrNo @CrankyCentrist 
Sinn Féin today signed a declaration alongside the leaders of other progressive parties (SDLP, Alliance & Green Party) calling for the protection of human rights and equality after Brexit - @newbelfast 
This is just a bloody disgrace.  Why isn’t @BBCNews splashing this!  The #1 Hard Brexiter in Parliament is moving business out of U.K. to mitigate the disaster of #Brexit.  You could not make it up  
At the stroke of a pen we could end this pathetic #Brexit farce. Revoke A50.Much damage already wreaked, it would take a long time to repair, but the relief in the country would be therapeutic, the economy would boom.#StopBrexitSaveBritain And put the kettle on.Good night! 
Queen Brexiter @JuliaHB1 helps @Femi_Sorry decide that the People need a vote on the Brexit deal... Thanks Julia!  #PeoplesVoteMarch (June 23) 
My successful amendment in @ScotParl today “agrees that independence is best for Scotland’s future, and recognises that Brexit is a major threat to Scotland’s economy, society and environment." Quite timely! 
.@Anna_Soubry is out of order here. Anna is quite awful in response to the points made by @UKLabour MP @CarolineFlintMP on #Brexit because they do not meet with her own remain views.Well done the speaker for calling her out. #EUWithdrawalbill 
Watch: Furious over Brexit, Scottish lawmakers walk out of UK parliament  
“If there is one message that the referendum sent us, it is surely this: that the traditional working class communities across the United Kingdom will no longer be ignored,” says Tory MP Jack Brereton  
Labour doesn't want to stop Brexit they want to see the country fail so they can ride in on their mythical unicorns and supposedly save the country. They cannot legitimately claim to be the party of opposition to then aid the government in delivering Brexit. #StopBrexit 
What would it mean if the UK joined/stayed in EFTA and the EEA after Brexit?Explanation by Dr. Michael Sánchez Rydelski and Cath Howdle, of @eftasurv -  
Best speech I’ve heard on potential new centre-Left paradigm post Brexit. A country which tries harder to spread power, wealth, opportunity  
Brian Adcock on Brexit and the start of the World Cup - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  pic.twitter.com/ryayMVFlVe 
Whatever you think of Brexit, if ‘taking back control’ means denying our elected representatives time to fully debate possibly the most historically important legislation many of us will see in our lifetime, this threatens the end, not the strengthening, of meaningful democracy 
Lords amendment 51 (LA51) to the #EUWithdrawalBill aims to keep the UK in the EU Single Market after withdrawal from the EU, through membership of the European Economic Area. This would avoid the worst economic damage of #Brexit, so I will be voting to keep LA51 in the Bill. 1/3 
It’s clear we are the only party in Scotland getting stuck into the UK Government for the shambles that is Brexit and the way they’re taking the piss out of our parliament. Come and join us:  
The Brexit traitor trope: how hard-right fantasies put us all at risk | Owen Jones  
Have you been missold Brexit?Do you think you may be entitled to compensation?Tough fucking shit. The Government said you had your chance. Will of the people  
Jeremy Corbyn brought the house down at today’s PMQs, leaving Theresa May ‘absolutely fuming’By @timothyjwoods7 #PMQs #Brexit 
Typicla of Anna Soubry though. She got herself elected as MP by telling her voters she would respect the referendum outcome. When UK voted leave she stabbed her own voters who voted leave by a MAJORITY in the back. This brings dishonour to her and Parliament.  
EU to block UK's access to Galileo satellite programme after Brexit  
#EUWithdrawalBillIndependent: "Europe has been very good to the north-east as far as trade is concerned," said Labour MP Phil Wilson. "My region has seen industrial extinction in the past. I support the Lords' EEA amendment. A collapse of industry could follow Brexit." 
24 hours later and May's Brexit 'compromise' with pro-EU rebels is already falling apartRebels say she promised to discuss their proposals to give parliament control over Brexit if there is no deal but Downing Street says otherwise. SHAMBLES!  
As a Brexiteer, do you feel disillusioned by Theresa May’s approach to Brexit? @Nigel_Farage is live #FarageOnLBC 
The impact assessments say 2% drop in GDP for Norway style option. That’s a mini recession. It’s limited in damage compared to a hard Brexit. But let’s not kid ourselves - any version of leaving the EU is bad for jobs and livelihoods. Btw not a criticism of @SebDance he is great! 
Rees-Mogg fund goes to Dublin post Brexit, Farage kids ask German Passport, Nagel Lawson residency in France, Paul Dacre leaves Daily Mail. Brexit Farce keeps on getting more entertaining by the day  
Today I met reps frm councils in Armagh, Cavan, Donegal, Fermanagh, Leitrim, Mid-Ulster, Monaghan & Sligo to present findings from 'Brexit at the Border' study.*REPORT OUT FRIDAY!*Features: Actual people frm the actual #border region talking about the actual impact of #Brexit  
How much do you personally care about whether Britain does or does not leave the European Union? #brexitRETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
Am urging Govt not to reject my amendment (i) on Lords Amendment 24 from @AlfDubs . Without it child refugees would no longer be reunited with young brothers or sisters after Brexit. My amendment has cross party support. Hearing the Government might be rethinking...... 
MPs say they'll honour the #Brexit voteThen say we need to stay in EU Customs Union & Single Mkt.Which means we stay in EUThey must think we're stupidWe know what their game isThey want to overturn the biggest democratic vote in our history but don't have the guts to say so 
"I remain a Remainer, an ardent Remainer! I would love this country to block, thwart, resist, reverse Brexit!" blasts @OwenSmith_MP 
So grateful to @SimonClarkeMP for standing up and giving a voice to Leave voters and disassociating himself from Soubry's calls for Leave voters to just "suck it up".Simon is right to argue that if parliamentarians seek to frustrate Brexit, it would be dynamite for populism. 
For the next time Rees-Mogg says #brexit will work out fine and we don't have to worry about a hard Tory Brexit....#ToryBrexitShambles 
It's official ... #brexit is going to be so risky,    Moggy is moving his business OUT of the UK !Apparently,the REAL trading and business opportunities are in the EU. 
I can see it now... Opening goal WC 2010: Tshabalala screamer lifts the whole of Africa to its feet.Opening goal WC 2014:Hosts Brazil score an own goal, whole nation in shock...Opening goal WC 2018:Russia to score the most brexit CB headed corner goal in 88th min 1-0 win. 
Vote Leave's targeting supplier AIQ is facing contempt of Parliament charges in Canada for not showing up to a hearing on their role in potential electoral and data crimes during the referendum. What are they all trying to hide?  
Former Europe Minister @CarolineFlintMP says Michel Barnier “would bite the hand off the Prime Minister” for the EEA/Norway model as it is so clearly the “worst deal” for the UK.Anti-Brexit Tory MP @Anna_Soubry cries “shame!” from the benches opposite. pic.twitter.com/dBcq8FsQ7v 
And it's irrelevant because, even taking the claim at face value, it doesn't justify giving the leader of a minority Govt free reign to inflict "meltdown" on her country - which it can't sensibly be said the Referendum gave her mandate for - without consent of Parliament. /ENDS 
.@theSNP ’s stunt today was an embarrassment to Parliament and an embarrassment to Scotland. They clearly care more about headlines than delivering for Scotland. They play games with the constitution, play games with Brexit and now are playing games with Parliament. It is a joke  
Matt on Brexit and the World Cup - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
You missed a bit in the bio. The bit about deliberately sitting on evidence of Russian tampering in the EU referendum while also going on the BBC to lie in the face of the key journalist to attempt to bully her into silence, aided and abetted by the host.Where was that bit? 
We must be able to have a more sensible Brexit debate, says Antoinnette @Sandbach, who reported a constituent to the Police merely for non-abusively criticising her for resiling from the Manifesto on which she stood for election.Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha.#EUWithdrawalBill 
For the avoidance of doubt Anna you stood on the Conservative Manifesto to leave the EU including the Single Market and the Customs Union. p.s. Your constituency voted leave#EUwithdrawalbill #Brexit #BrexitBill 
BREXIT: Bankers to ask Theresa May why they should stay after Brexit /#EU #Brexit #Banking #Finance #Economy 
Mrs May a Prime Minister set on dividing the nation, making us poorer, reducing our standing in the world & knowing full well that what she is doing is wrong. Who gains, the Rees-Mogg’s of the world, quietly moving operations to Ireland & protecting their wealth Stop Brexit #FBPE 
Scottish lawmakers walk out of UK parliament in Brexit row  
Having ruined your experimental European project I somewhat doubt that the leaders of the Netherlands, Belgium , France and Luxembourg are capable of leading you to the promised land. Your "battle" with Eastern Europe is probably lost already. #EU #UK #Brexit  
Gina Miller SNAPS at 'dishonest and cowardly' MPs – demands second Brexit referendum. Remember just a little while ago when she protested that she was not calling for a second referendum . . . .   
My constituents are not against all migration - but they want to feel that we have better systems in place, that they feel it is fair and managed. And that is something they haven't felt for a long time. @CarolineFlintMP makes a passionate defence of her constituents. #Brexit  
First up on this week's #bbcqt is the man who got the government to promise MPs will have a bigger role in Brexit negotiations - Dominic Grieve  
You have to admire the neck, really........Arch-Brexiteer Jacob Rees-Mogg sets up Dublin arm to trade in EU after the UK quits #brexit  via @IrishTimesBiz 
Wetherspoons prepares for Brexit by replacing EU-sourced drinks with British brands - Sky News  
Michel Barnier would snap the hand off the PM to accept the deal if offered the Norway deal, because it is the worst deal for the UK, short of no deal at all @CarolineFlintMP tells Commons #Brexit debate  
Is Chuka Umunna plotting to form a new party - he even has a name for it, Back Together - says @georgeeaton in this week's cover story, "How the Brexiteers lost control of Brexit ..."  
Caroline Flint is honouring the referendum unlike Anna Soubry who was discourteous and also showed very bad manners to her colleague Nigel Evans on Daily Politics today she should be ashamed.....  
"Democracy is about putting power into the hands of the people. But these treacherous MPs see themselves as the last defence against the mob, rather than the means through which the masses can be given political force."Tom Slater on the #Brexit-blockers  
.@CarolineFlintMP demands UK creates the workforce we need -  asks why does UK train fewer doctors per head than Ireland or Holland? #Brexit  
Official documents filed by Rees-Mogg's business admit that hard Brexit "may increase costs" for the business "or make it more difficult to pursue its objectives".Remember that the next time Rees-Mogg claims that there's nothing to worry about.  
This country is going to become an UGLY place if we don’t get Brexit — proper Brexit. I really don’t think remainers get it. @LBC 
This was David Mundell in January promising the Brexit  devolution issues would be debated. Yesterday Tory MPs spoke until time ran out and today @IanBlackfordMP was thrown out of Prime Minister's Question for saying the promise should be kept 
Unbelievable. It's 2018 and this is a CONSERVATIVE MP absolutely schooling Labour in the positive need for immigration. Jeremy Corbyn's Labour are so obsessed with supporting Tory Brexit, they don't give a shit about the consequences. #PMQs pic.twitter.com/hi28BWfQD6 
Efforts to stop Brexit lie behind the Hailsham meaningful vote amendment.  
The Brexit deal will have a huge impact on the lives of millions of women across the UK.Thousands of them will be joining the #PeoplesVoteMarch on June 23rd to demand a say on the deal the government negotiates with the EU.Join us here:  
Nothing but the utmost admiration for @CarolineFlintMP this afternoon. Brave and searingly honest in calling for the referendum mandate to be respected. 
I voted no at the last referendum as I truly believed the Union could be fixed. Since then I am now convinced it is not salvageable. The time is now. The time has come. It’s time to free ourselves from the shackles of the Union. #IAmYesNow #SNPWalkout 
"We have decided to disembark from a liner in the middle of the ocean as a country."　Hilary Benn, Labour chair of the Commons Brexit Committee, says the UK is in "a perilous place" in its negotiations with the EU.  
Like Communism, Brexit would have been a success if only the right people had implemented it. The 'great betrayal' narrative beginning before we've even left.  
Caroline Flint is a rare MP who supported Remain but actually understands why her constituents disagreed with her and respects their decision. The odious treatment she received from Soubry and her "fellow" Labour MPs shows what a bubble they live in.#Brexit 
The problem is not the EU. It is the implacable unwillingness of the British political system to accept and implement the result of the EU referendum, despite overwhelmingly voting to hold that referendum, argues @andrew_lilico 
Appalling the abuse that @Anna_Soubry gets even in the House when she dares to challenge the lunacies of Brexit. 
A mental health charity has slammed the Tory MP who told a Scottish MP to commit "suicide" during yesterday's Brexit Bill debate. 
Our @Femi_Sorry has just been blocked by one of the heads of @VoteLeave_eu (Daniel Hannan) for pointing out that he promised us that Brexit would mean staying in the Single Market.Very disappointing...  
ONLY the Lib Dems are fighting to give the PEOPLE the FINAL SAY on the Brexit deal, with the option of staying IN the E.U. Join our campaign today: #EUWithdrawalBill 
Lord Digby Jones:“Just beware the tyranny of Parliament.You’ve got something like 1,500 people in Houses of Parliament who look to be overruling the wishes of 17.2 Million people.The tyranny of Parliament is like the tyranny of dictators..."#Brexit #EU 
Fund founded by Rees-Mogg sets up post-Brexit vehicle in Dublin  
Tonight SNP MPs will vote to protect the jobs and living standards of people in Scotland from the damage of #Brexit. Here are the facts.  
MP Tom Brake asks Theresa May whether there's a limit to the national damage she's willing to accept from Brexit.Theresa May says:We'll make Brexit happen with as little damage as possible.That means no.  
Hypocrite doesn't come close to describing Jacob Rees Mogg. His words talk up the fantasy brave new world of Brexit Britain, but his actions show him abandoning his country after the irreparable damage he causes and fleeing to Dublin. What a shyster!  
You have no leg to stand on. You convinced people to vote for a Brexit that does not exist. From an objective standpoint. You lied. So have some humility. 
Now @ChukaUmunna in Brexit debate talking about benefits of immigration - and steps that could be taken to control it without leaving the EEA. He'll vote for the EEA amendment. 
Lest Brexit lets anyone forget  ....  
‘No deal is better than a bad deal’ was never a credible #Brexit negotiating position. Lamenting that the Government isn’t preparing for no deal is a red herring. (Plus it doesn’t have the £, time, capacity or ‘tech’ to do it.)  
Wetherspoons to replace European beers with British ones in preparation for brexit  
The Russians made you vote Brexit. The loony left in all its glory.  
Chuka Umunna compares Brexit to his persistent hayfever, saying it is: “Consistently horrendous and there is little that can mitigate the appalling effects.” 
We have a country. It's called #Scotland. At the moment it's run by a right wing dictatorship based in the country next door to mine. It's called England. There's supposed to be a union of equals, but it's not. An independence referendum is on the way. #indyref2 Bye. 
Chuka Umunna now speaking: ‘Brexit is like my hayfever - consistently horrendous’. 
1. Every single constituency in Scotland voted Remain.2. All debate about how this affects us was meant to last 15 minutes last night, but was talked over time by a Tory MP. 3. Stephen Kerr MP: Stirling voted 67% Remain, he represented them by voting for Brexit every time.  
Brexit: car firms face extinction, warns CBI chief.There was "zero evidence" that trade deals outside the EU would provide any economic benefit to Britain, according to the president of ⁦@CBItweets⁩.MPs must call a #PeoplesVote and #StopBrexit. 
Im going to pay every person in Britain 1 million pounds each, to agree to having a new referendum on Brexit.  Now, I dont actually intend to actually  pay, but hey ho, democracy will have spoken, so tough titties everyone!  You voted for it! 
True insight into the mind of the new Brexit Unionist. Power devolved is power retained. (PS. You’re not meant to say this Tim)  
Next time someone says I never blame the Tories for Brexit, I will remind them I stood outside parliament doing so.And in turn got my message on national TV.  
New Catalan referendum ‘is the only way forward’ @foreign_cat #dkpol #svpol @sz @nzz @blickch @independent @libe @lesoir @repubblica @nytimes @telegraaf @sr_utrikes @dagensnyheter @ft @bild @derspiegel @dw_politics @dwnews @europarl @coe @eu_commission @fr 
 Today @SP_LocalGovt @KeithBrownSNP gave evidence on city deals. UK Govt no-show.  Earlier this year @SP_HealthSport conducted #Brexit enquiry. UK Govt no-show. Now @SP_Justice members have been informed, David Mundell won’t appear tomorrow. A partnership of equals? 
With this level of ignorance about this country’s constitution it’s no wonder that Brexit is heading for the rocks. 
Leaving London | Morgan Stanley expects to move 400 to 500 jobs out of the U.K because of Brexit, or about 10 percent of its workforce in the country.  Chief Executive Officer James Gorman said on Tuesday. “It’s net negative, there’s nothing particularly good about Brexit.” 
Kenneth Clarke in a speech today in the commons, talked about the referendum's in out vote missing the complexities of leaving. Independence or no independence, sovereignty or no sovereignty was a simple choice that was easily understood. Leavers made the right choice that day. 
Unless we leave the customs union, the UK will be unable to negotiate independent trade deals with fast-growing economies around the world. Fudging this aspect of Brexit will be unacceptable to the British people. Me and @cricketwyvern for @BrexitCentral. 
LISTEN | Ex-CBI head Digby Jones speaks sense on parliament's outrageous attempts to sabotage Brexit. The noisy Remoaner MPs want to subvert the will of the people!Read at Support us at  
And @SNP says 1000 new members today after the Brexit vote yesterday. 
Tonight at 6pm in Dundee's City Square there will be flash demo to protest the tory government's handling of the Brexit debate. Hope you can all attend!! #powergrab 
Scottish lawmakers storm out of UK parliament in #Brexit row. And suddenly, everyone knows what is going on regarding Brexit in Scotland and London so whether or not it was staged, it worked.  
Therefore labour are not capable of functioning as her majesty’s official opposition party. If they’re not up to the job I can mobilise quite a lot of people who are. And are working tirelessly and brilliantly on this. Brexit is not a done deal. Our country deserves better #FBPE 
Home Affairs Committee Chair Yvette Cooper says Cabinet antics means we are heading for a “Dad’s Army Brexit” that risks making the country a “national joke” 
Grieve still doesn’t get it. We voted to leave the EU and restore accountability & democracy. Yet preening self-important prigs like Grieve arrogantly believe they have a divine right to substitute their own views for those of 17.4m voters who won a referendum. He makes me sick.  
Corbyn's selfish remainers are determined to stop us leaving the EU at all costs - even though 70 per cent of Labour-held constituencies voted for Brexit, blasts Rod Liddle  
Even if what was promised won't be delivered?The "£350m/wk we could spend on the NHS"? - No.The "exactly the same benefits"? - No.The "40 trade deals by the time we leave"? - No.Is that honouring the result of the referendum?#ThisIsNotTheBrexitWeWerePromised 
Things that outrage Tory MPs:-SNP MPs walking out.Things that don't outrage Tory MPs:-the power grab-job-destroying Brexit-a Bedroom Tax-the Rape Clause-sanctions-disability benefit cuts... 
Change Britain's @andreajenkyns welcomes ONS figures showing 1000 new jobs created every day since Brexit vote:"Yet more good news for British businesses and workers, and a devastating blow to the claims of rising unemployment we heard from Project Fear" 
'Honour' the referendum? It's advisory! You don't blindly honour something that is advisory. You use it to advise whilst making a responsible, debated, considered decision. 
Repeat: there is no level of damage bad enough to prompt May to ask the people again if they want Brexit.No level.If we run out of fuel, she won't ask us.If we run out of medicines, she won't ask.If we run out of food.If the streets are burning.Nope. She won't ask.  
Sinn Féin, Alliance Party, SDLP and Green Party have released a joint statement on human rights and equality in the event of EU exit #Brexit #HumanRights 
'GO BREXIT!' Moment @andreajenkyns strolls through anti-Brexit protest outside Parliament  
The fudge on the Brexit meaningful vote by @theresa_may yesterday was done to simply to keep her rebels in line. Send the PM a message and join our campaign to give YOU the final say on Brexit, including the option of staying in the EU:  
This is the min standard of a stance of Democratic defense where a party has to uphold the rights & voice of its constituents. I dnt care if u like or dnt like the party. Or even Brexit. The Q is how much trust you place in yourself as a citizen & ur institutions in Scotland 
Absolutely brilliant speech by @DerekMackaySNP on the benefits of independence: “austerity (and Brexit and slow growth and inequality and alienation of migrants) is the price of the union”. 
Trouble ahead. No10 says Parliament cannot be allowed to stop a no-deal Brexit: “We have to be in a position to honour the result of the referendum in all circumstances”. This is a specific aim of Grieve et al, that they thought the PM had agreed. 
Joint statement from leaders of SF, SDLP, Alliance & Greens raising concerns about impact of Brexit on human rights & equality  
Theresa May is fudging the meaningful vote issue on the #EUWithdrawalBill and Labour have gone quiet.Lib Dems believe YOU deserve the final say on Brexit, with the option of staying in the EU. Join our campaign:  
Oh FFS, the FBPE gang are still at it-they're like those bloody Duracell bunnies,that go on and on and on...Shame their talent for basic arithmetic wasn't as good as their talent for whingeing...For the last time;Labour can't stop Brexit!!  
Truth about Govt and Brexit: prep for no deal -nothing, trade deals ready -nothing, new immigration policy -nothing. They’ve already folded. 
World Cup/EU latest: Officials are considering using the big screens in the Justus Lipsius building to show the big England-Belgium match on the first day of the massive Brexit/migration/Macron reforms summit on June 28 
Powers were always owned by London and devolved down. They were never, and could never be, owned by Edinburgh. They'll be devolved down again but legally they are in London's gift. If you have a country, that's how it works. You may not wish to be part of UK, but win a referendum 
A referendum may be held later this year on removing the offense of blasphemy from the Irish Constitution.  Blasphemy is a victimless crime.  
MUST-WATCH: @guyverhofstadt calls Nigel Farage a 'cheerleader of Putin' amidst allegations of collusion with Russian officials during the referendum. Please share.  
I’ve just joined the SNP.  Time for independence is now.  Get the referendum called!!! 
That moment when you realise that promise Theresa May made to you on Brexit means nothing  
Ken Clarke says that no member of the public, during the referendum, ever asked him about the single market or the customs union. That’s because Cameron et al said, on numerous occasions, that #Brexit would mean leaving them both. Has the “father” of the house been nodding off? 
BREAKING NEWSTODAY’S JOINT STATEMENT FROM THE 4 REMAIN PARTIES IN THE NORTH ON HUMAN RIGHTS AND EQUALITY POST BREXIT“There must be no diminution of rights, safeguards and equality, including as set out in the Good Friday Agreement 1998 and subsequent agreements”  
Ken Clarke in the Commons congratulating @DanielJHannan for being informed and a formidable debater - which he is - but Ken goes on to suggest Dan has never argued for leaving the EU Customs Union, not true. He's always said it would be madness to stay in it post-Brexit. 
I strongly believed in the Union, until #brexit showed me that this was not a Union of equals but an occupation by an utterly corrupt Westminster. I have changed my views on Scotland entirely and fully support Scottish independence. 
Quote of the Day is Paul Dacre on the Daily Mail's future support for Brexit...  
‘Did you do as @BorisJohnson suggested and ask @realDonaldTrump to take over #Brexit negotiations?’ You could almost feel @theresa_may’s pain after @jeremycorbyn asked her this awkward question at #PMQs today.MORE:  
Apparently the SNP desperately wanted to debate the impact of Brexit on Scotland so much that they walked out of WM to ensure there was no debate.  
"Brexit at any cost? I don't think so" @Wera_Hobhouse on the latest Tory tactics to avoid giving the public the final say on Brexit. If you want the final say on Brexit, including the option of staying in the EU, join our campaign:  
We're finally getting there? We've known for a year that Russia interfered with the Brexit vote.  
NEW podcast: A bombshell report suggests that Russia also worked to swing the Brexit vote in favor of leaving the EU  
We all benefit from the vital protection of EU equality and anti-discrimination law – we can’t let Tory #Brexit diminish it. @LibDems are calling for current rights to be enshrined in UK law #EUWithdrawalBill #FBPE 
After Google’s #8thRef ad ban the No side claimed a conspiracy and told journalists to FOI the Department of Health for any records of correspondence with Google and Facebook about the referendum campaign. So, I did. Today the Department told me no such records exist. 
I’ll be speaking for @theSNP at @PrideEdinburgh this weekend celebrating our gains 30 years on from the fight against #Section28 & warning of the threat to #LGBT Rights from #Brexit & the #HostileEnvironment on #immigration 
.@scottishlabour's position on #Brexit is summed up perfectly by @KirstySNP. 
BBC News - CBI chief: Car firms face Brexit extinction  
Theresa May suffers guffaws & humiliation as Jeremy Corbyn jokes about Boris’ remark about Trump taking over #Brexit talks. WATCH : Theresa May’s expression and Boris Johnson red with embarrassment.   
BREAKING: The Solicitor General, in response to my intervention, has confirmed that a no deal Brexit would necessitate a border on the island of Ireland and is therefore against Government policy. A No Deal Brexit binned for good? Here's the full exchange:  
"The SNP are completely justified in their protest [...] With critical Brexit votes later today to keep Wales in the Single Market, we cannot risk our right to vote."Our statement on why Plaid Cymru MPs did not walk out with @theSNP MPs in the House of Commons today. 
Poland to Vote on EU Membership, Christian Heritage in Proposed Constitution Referendum  
Jacob Rees Mogg, like Lord Lawson who's applied for French residency and Nigel Farage who's bought a house in France, is making plans to avoid the consequences of #Brexit to his business.#Leavers, can you now see the writing on the wall, you were conned.  
I see you're still working against #Brexit and the British government Anna. And the democratic will of its people. Putting the EUs needs above those of who you're supposed to be representing in writing isn't your finest hour.  
Furious Scots lawmakers walk out of UK parliament in Brexit row  
A mental health charity has slammed the Tory MP who told a Scottish MP to commit "suicide" during yesterday's Brexit Bill debate. 
May other citizens of #Europe note that, today, 59% of Scotland’s Members of the UK Parliament walked out of the debate on #Brexit that 62% of Scots had voted against. Many of us are finding it hard not to feel colonised by a political spirit that is alien to our dearest values.  
PERCY: “I’m getting a little bit tired of hearing people who lost the referendum try to write the terms of our exit.”"Being a rule taker has to be 100% out of the question on our exit.” 
70% of Labour constituencies voted to Leave, any short term satisfaction from defeating the Government on Brexit legislation would be at the expense of losing our marginal Leave-backing Labour seats, writes @labourleave's @John_Mills_JML and @cricketwyvern 
She is willing to sacrifice the entire UK economy for Brexit. 65million lives to be permanently damaged for absolutely no reason.I've shared this below a few times: Brexit is akin to a Cargo Cult.Maybe time @theresa_may read it too. It sums up where we are precisely. 
UK Parliament will never be a forum to elevate Wales' point of view. Always a matter of trying your damndest to get a word in.This week's Brexit voting was a scandal. Mere minutes to discuss Welsh (& #Scotland/NI) issues. Shameful. No voice. #Wales has to realise what's happening 
The Brexit logic is falling apart; the clock is not.   
So what? Brexit is not Scotland's choice. Westminster is not Scotland's parliament. You are not Scotland's voice. #DissolveTheUnion 
As #Brexit rips the country apart and casts both halves into the void let us not forget the wise and prophetic words of David Cameron during the 2015 general election...   
Damn - the Govt Solicitor General is being absolutely brutalised on #Brexit by Labour MPs and, well, everyone...Brexit is a mess that’s falling apart.  
24/1/18 - Mundell promises devolution amendments to Brexit Bill12/6/18 - Tory Government refuses to debate devolution in Brexit Bill (by talking until time ran out!)13/6/18 - @IanBlackfordMP is thrown out of PMQs for demanding it's discussed while Mundell sits quietly 
Brexit at any cost, no matter what. You just know this lot have their escape routes planned. They won't be around to suffer the consequences, a mass exodus & resignations of the Brexeratti on or soon after 29 March 2019. "You wanted your Brexit, here it is, enjoy."#StopBrexit 
Had some interesting conversations today on twitter. I think everyone agrees the country is in trouble and many people have difficult lives. The split is between people who think brexit will make it worse and people who think it might even make things better. My view is worse. 
Pennsylvania Republicans want to take a page from North Carolina's book, and gerrymander judicial elections.Even if their proposal gets through both chambers, it will need approval by referendum. Voters can stop this.  
Cutting state support for education did not reduce overall tax liability. It just shifted the cost to local communities via referendum.When referendums fail, it is our students who suffer. 
btw, Scot parliament - PR, minority gov - voted against Brexit deal. It's not *SNP* being ignored and disrespected, it's our very democratically elected parliament, in which every party except the Tories voted against. As you say, Scotland has zero power or impact in this union. 
Here's a cool idea - why not support your country, your party and the manifesto you were elected on?Many principled MPs, who campaigned for Remain during the referendum, can manage it - why can't you? #sortitplease 
Leavers say that we should ignore the opinions of those who abstained in the referendum. Well it is much more responsible to abstain if you feel unsure or insufficiently informed than to vote on the basis of ignorance & blind prejudice.  #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
LATEST: #AgricultureBill detailing government's post-Brexit policies for farming will be published before end of July, @DefraGovUK secretary @MichaelGove tells @CommonsEFRA 
But if Brexit is going wrong, it has to be the fault of Remainers, or the fault of our sovereign Parliament for trying to make sure the Brexit process isn't harmful?  
When @Jacob_Rees_Mogg tells you that a hard Brexit will be absolutely fine and cause no problems with the Irish border whatsoever, he's actually talking exclusively about himself.  
Judging by that sorry #PMQs, all Labour have to do is say 'We will overturn Brexit' and they'll likely be in power by the end of the week.The Tories are fucked.  Absolutely, totally fucked. 
Pub chain Wetherspoon is to sell more drinks from the UK and non-EU brewers in the run up to Brexit.  
It's actually beautiful that, in the middle of another divisive Brexit debate, Parliament and the country can come together and laugh at the SNP. 
Today @JuliaHB1 accused @Femi_Sorry of sabotaging the Brexit negotiations... His response ...  
Pub chain Wetherspoon says it will stop selling champagne ahead of brexit, due to the fact nobody who drinks there has ever ordered it. 
I can see where your coming from and I really did analyse the potential economic impact for #leave vote. In the end I decided that the long term benefits of going outweighed the short term benefits of staying. Economic gain did not trump democratic freedom #EU #brexit 
May escapes #Brexit bill defeat as #Tory rebels accept concessions  
Friends! So ANGRY!Cameron forced a referendum on us, which literally nobody wanted, apart from the people!And which awakened & empowered the Fascists, i.e. 17,410,742 people who disobeyed Our Experts' orders to vote Remain!No wonder we Remainers are - literally - revolting!  
My MP told me face to face that no-one will die because of Brexit. If that were true it might be worth suffering a recession to get rid of the party that inflicted this on us but any drop in tax revenue must result in more deaths because of impact on NHS, care and policing... 
Yesterday’s most important amendment from the Lord’s with some further amendment was on the #GFA which not only places it in law but also means we will have to be in a #CustomsUnion with the EU & in effect the #singlemarket. Let’s just suck it up and move on!!  #Brexit 
Scotland was promised federalism if we rejected independence, yet was robbed of powers in a Brexit crisis we didn’t vote for against the Scottish parliament will. When this injustice was raised, an MP was told to commit suicide. Solidarity to SNP MPs for walking out the Chamber. 
Brussels dismisses calls for unrestricted access to the Galileo satellite system, despite warnings of “irreparable” damage to UK security relations.I assume we'll now be reducing our 'Brexit bill' to repatriate the billions we've poured into the project?  
The Prime Minister confirms at #PMQs that there is NO level of damage Brexit can inflict on UK firms and jobs that will lead her to grant the people a final say on the deal and a chance to exit from #Brexit. This is the state we are in! #FBPEFor *U*Ks sake #StopBrexit 
Maybe it's a mistake for Remainers to speak of seeking ways to soften Brexit. I want no Brexit of any texture, colour or flavour.  The answer to the accusation "You're just trying to stop Brexit, aren't you?" is, in my case, "Absolutely yes. Why would I want anything less?" 
Yo, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. Is it true what Private Eye says? Could Brexit make life more difficult for your hedge fund? (I suppose even the biggest cloud has a small silver lining).  
2014: "Scotland should lead, not leave"2018: "Scotland should be seen, not heard"#PMQs #Brexit #SNPwalkout 
Yo, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg does your hedge fund need to be in Ireland because of, y'know, Brexit?  
Tory MP Robert Courts just asked Keir Starmer if Labour was willing to accept the free movement of people to be in a customs union with the EU.Over 2 years since the referendum, and some MPs don't know the difference between the single market and customs union. Jesus. 
"The relationship with the devolved administrations - with Cardiff and Holyrood - has gone bust" @bbclaurak on #SNPwalkout over #Brexit debate#bbcdp #pmqs 
Tory “rebels” are copying @jeremycorbyn. I seem to remember him headbanging for government policy & then proclaiming that “the real fight starts now.”  That real fight never did materialise in the end.It's a jobs first #Brexit - their jobs. None of them care about the citizens. 
The actions of the Conservative Government in overriding the will of the Scottish Parliament, and denying MPs of all parties and of all devolved nations a say in the 19 minute debate last night is completely unacceptable. #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill #PowerGrab #SNPWalkout #PMQs 
#ProLife #ChooseLifeWhat Happened When 3 Women Faced Deep Suffering Rather Than Abort Their ChildrenThe grace of each woman’s decision throws into relief the lurid jubilation in Ireland over the results of the May 25 referendum 
Only 15 minutes to discuss Brexit and relationship with Wales, Scotland & N. Ireland. That's your great British 'family of nations'. Wales can do so much better. We need #indyWales now! 
How the British establishment sees our limited democracy: Perfectly fine to squash Scottish devolution into a 15 min non-debate. But to protest abt this state of affairs is a "stunt". #Brexit #PowerGrab 
Labour spokesman- action will be taken against Labour frontbenchers voting for the EEA: Says everything you need to know about the current #Brexit supporting @UKLabour leadership 
No10 confirms that part C of the Grieve amendment (bear with me here), which would see parliament step in to prevent a no deal Brexit, has been rejected by the Government. That's not what the rebels believed after speaking to the PM. More trouble looming. 
The moment I and my SNP colleagues at Westminster walked out of #PMQs this afternoon.We were elected on the basis that we were being sent to London to stand up for Scotland. Today we made a statement against the way Scotland has been treated during the #Brexit debate.  
The only meaningful vote on #Brexit was held on June 23 2016.It is the duty of #Parliament to deliver the will of the people.Anything less is a betrayal of #Democracy#LBCLIVE #skynews #Conservatives #bbcqt #bbcdp #PMQs #Brexit 
Brexit is going well.  
Terrible handling of #parliament by the speaker today, straight into an SNP trap. The video of Scottish MPs leaving the chamber with MPs chanting ‘bye’ will be the most powerful bit of footage in the next Scottish independence referendum #Westminster  
BBC News - SNP MPs walk out of PMQs in 'Brexit power grab' protest  Good. Let’s hope they stay out. #NotWantedAtWestminster 
It's worth noting that - presumably because it was only an advisory referendum - Parliament in the 2015 Referendum Act dispensed with many of the statutory safeguards that protect election results from cheating. 
Downing Street is pushing through votes on Brexit at Parliament before the criminal investigation into Vote Leave is released to the public.  
Not only have we lost urgent debate on the devo issues we lost yesterday due to SNP MPs childish stunt, they lost 5 PMQs and if they got their way the TVs would be off & public cleared. They also can’t vote on Customs Union & Single Market now. Made Tory govts Brexit job easier 
More Scots voted for Brexit than voted SNP. More Scots voted for Brexit than voted SNP.More Scots voted for Brexit than voted SNP.More Scots voted for Brexit than voted SNP.More Scots voted for Brexit than voted SNP.More Scots voted for Brexit than voted SNP.#PMQs #BBCDP 
Remember Westminster watchers the SNP walkout on #Brexit #PowerGrab isn't just abt WM disrespect of the SNP but of the Scot Parl. Scot Parl voted 93-30 against Brexit bill with SNP, Labour, Lib Dems & Greens in majority. Only Tories against.  
What a pathetic generation these millennials are. I did my exams then joined the army, didn't cry or faint, just got on with it. World's gone mad. Granite Brexit needed!  
Brexit, the power grab, Scottish voices being shut out from even contributing to the debate. Never mind £200bn wasted on Trident renewal, the Rape clause and every other stinking policy imposed on Scotland. What the hell are we waiting for? #ScotRef #snpwalkout 
Tom Brake - The president of the CBI said that sections of the UK car industry face extinction unless the UK stays in the CU.. is there any level of damage inflicted by Brexit that will cause the prime minister to consider supporting a #PeoplesVote?#StopBrexit #FBPE #PMQs 
The Prime Minister confirms at #PMQs to me that there is NO level of damage Brexit can inflict on UK firms and jobs that will lead her to grant the people a final say on the deal and a chance to exit from #Brexit. This is the state we are in! #FBPE 
Scotland is now closer to independence than it has ever been. This Tory union is a shambles and completely unsustainable. Tory austerity and Brexit have destroyed it. Thus Scottish independence is now a question of when not if. #Indyref2 
“I will do everything in my power to delay and impede and interfere with and stifle and muddle and obfuscate and obstruct and confuse and derail and discombobulate in any way I can to see that #Brexit never occurs on my watch.“  
When will @Theresa_May realise it is more important to secure a good Brexit deal than to appease the competing egos of her warring Cabinet? #PMQs 
6. The Supreme Court in Miller held that referendum had no legal effect. 
BUSINESS: ‘Wetherspoons to serve only British gammon in run-up to Brexit.’  
Another clear #PMQs win for @jeremycorbyn exposing the absolute chaos at the heart of the Cabinet, which is undermining Brexit negotiations. 
At the risk of being called a mansplainer, it's mathematically impossible for Corbyn to stop Brexit without Tory "rebels" voting against their own party. However, if the final deal fails Labour's 6 tests, they will vote against it. What more can Corbyn do?  
MPs must vote against the Government’s reckless, hard #Brexit today.  
Is Downing Street trying to cover up what happened inside Vote Leave? Two of the PM's senior advisers are subjects in an investigation into electoral and data crimes during the Brexit referendum.  
The #EU is dying. Everything it has touched has been a disaster thanks to authoritarians like you. Its values and principles are not compatible with democracy and freedom, and that’s what people want. Your attempt to create a new Soviet Union in Europe is doomed. Happy #Brexit.  
Walkout - @IanBlackfordMP surrounded by SNP MPs in central lobby after leading a Commons walkout over UK Gov ignoring Scottish Parliament denial of consent for Brexit bill  
nobody but nobody will be the least interested in the rest of #pmqs Fully support @IanBlackfordMP and the SNP team for refusing to be silenced again.  Yesterday was the last straw. #EUWithdrawalBill #brexit 
Ashen-faced Theresa May left speechless at PMQs as even Boris laughs at Corbyn's Brexit jibe #PMQs 
The SNP’s MPs walk out of the Chamber in protest against the Tory Brexit power grab against Holyrood and the breach of promise that this would be allowed debate time at Westminster. Speaker looks aghast. #PMQs 
While we're on the topic, remember when @EdwardJDavey got himself thrown out of the Commons and the Lib Dems all stropped out after him, back in 2008? It was all because they said they wanted an in/out EU referendum. Whatever happened to that policy? #PMQs 
#PMQsJeremy Corbyn: "When the Prime Minister met Donald Trump last week, did she do what the Foreign Secretary suggested and ask him to take over the Brexit negotiations?'"#BojoTheClown 
It is “a democratic outrage” @IanBlackfordMP asking for the House of Commons to sit in private over #Brexit vote"I have had a mixed sequence of advice" says the Speaker #bbcdp #pmqs 
Just noticed Philip Hammond at PMQs. Forgotten he was even in the Government. When was the last time he said anything about anything that matters - eg Brexit and the economy? 
The search continues for a brexiter who can explain how brexit is going to benefit Britain .@mrjamesob @No10Vigil @BremainInSpain @acgrayling @mikegalsworthy @albawhitewolf @BrexitBin @EUflagmafia @GuitarMoog @catherinemep @nickreeves9876#StopBrexit #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Nearest precedent to @IanBlackfordMP + fellow @theSNP MPs walking out of @HouseofCommons chamber was Nick Clegg leading @LibDems walkout after then speaker refused vote on holding....EU referendum 
I missed this. It’s absolutely outrageous if true. Did no 10 force through Brexit vote before Leave investigation into MASSIVE overspending report came out?   
All SNP MPs walk out over Brexit amendments 
.@jeremycorbyn: did @theresa_may do as @BorisJohnson suggested when she met @realDonaldTrump and ask him to take over the #Brexit talks? Her response below is a must see. She is not amused. #PMQs 
.@theSNP's @IanBlackfordMP has used parliamentary procedure calling for the House to sit in private following the PM's failure to say she will bring forward emergency legislation on the #EUWithdrawalBill - Scotland has been silenced on Brexit  
Pound falls for a fourth day as inflation stagnates and Brexit tensions continue  
Labour said they would sign new trade deals…Now they want a customs union deal that prevents that.Labour said they would get control of our borders…Now they want a deal that would keep free movement.Labour aren't respecting the referendum result.#PMQs 
Labour’s position on Brexit could mean accepting free movement and continuing to follow a swathe of EU rules with absolutely no say in them.This breaks Labour’s promises and does not respect the referendum result. #PMQsTell them to #respecttheresult 
The case against 8 school teachers in La Seu (Catalonia), accused of inciting hatred for discussing events of 1 October referendum in class, has been dismissed. It should never have been brought.  
Arch Brexiteer Jacob Rees-Mogg’s Investment Firm launches Subsidiary Fund in Dublin to avoid negative effects of Brexit 
Corbyn opens #PMQs by asking May if she's invited Donald Trump to take over Brexit talks, as Boris Johnson was recorded as suggesting. Let the pictures tell you everything.  
Corbyn asks if the PM when she met Trump, did she do what the Foreign Secretary suggested and let him take over the Brexit negotiations... Boris Johnson struggles to contain a smirk on front bench. PM looks furious. 
This debate about single market and customs union is not for nothing.It's about the fabric of our economy, the geography of manufacturing, and the fact that if we are not careful, Brexit will finish what Thatcher started.  
Oh, Jeremy Corbyn! That was brilliant: "when she met President Trump last week did she do what Boris Johnson asked and ask him to take over the Brexit negotiations?" Huge laughter + May looks absolutely fuming #PMQs 
Gibraltarians have two principal Brexit nightmares. The first: the threat of chaos on the border. The second: the possible exclusion of Gibraltar from any transition period. @LibDems will be fighting for the people of Gibraltar who don’t deserve to be in this uncertain situation. 
Hahahaha!!!! Corbyn “did the Prime Minister invite Donald Trump to take over the Brexit negotiations like The Foreign Secretary suggested?” #pmqs 
A fine opener from Corbyn: “When the Prime Minister met Donald Trump last week did she do as the Foreign Secretary suggested and ask him to take over the Brexit negotiations?” #PMQs 
We're delivering on the decision made by the country in the referendum to leave the EU and we will not accept anything that prevents us from taking back control of our money, laws and borders. #PMQs 
Almost 1,000 people a day have been put in new jobs since Brexit vote says  Office of National Statistics. so much for Project Fear with unemployment at lowest for 44 years 
Corbyn going on Trump and Brexit - when PM met Trump did she do what Johnson asked and ask Trump to take over the Brexit negotiations? Huge laughs in House, May looks utterly furious 
Jacob Rees Mogg to public:"Hard brexit will be fine"Jacob Rees Mogg to accountants:"Protect me from the consequences of my actions you're fucking fired"  
MPs seriously underestimate how much frustration and distrust there will be in the political process if they do not deliver Brexit. #RespectTheResult #CleanBrexit 
The ultra-remainers sum up the worst aspects of centrist politics over last 20 years. They are so eager for 'compromise' that they are obsequious to Tories who don't even rebel while attacking a Labour leadership trying to get a soft Brexit. Embarrassing. 
Following Brexit vote in Commons yesterday, No 10 responds to questions about precisely what happens next:  
WATCH | Remoaner Anna Soubry boasts about the concessions that she won from Theresa the Appeaser yesterday - including a veto on a No Deal. May is bending over backwards for a small cabal of Brexit saboteurs! Support us at  
Any possible Brexit deal will be worse than remaining in the EU, argues @andrew_lilico 
Science is a fundamentally collaborative & global enterprise & the UK should seek arrangements that create the lowest possible barriers to practising scientists seeking to move across borders #TogetherScienceCan #Brexit  
Ryanair (famously miserable on Brexit) announce new $300m base at Southend airport, operating 13 routes to 8 EU countries. Ryanair exec says, somewhat bizarrely, "Don’t confuse this great news as some sort of vote of confidence in the future of UK aviation." 
Now Theresa May's gone into full Sergeant Wilson mode over Brexit, expect more tabloid ire - my inews column -  
Debate winding up on future of EU with Dutch PM Rutte. Brexit is increasingly not a priority here, the world is moving on without us unless we get our act together. Scotland voted to be part of the EU’s future   
Rotten to the core, just like his brainchild, Brexit 
Blame everyone besides your self. Maybe if you were listening to the concerns of the people of Britain Brexit wasn't happening. have you ever asked yourself, why so many people in Europe dislike the EU ? 
Don't forget to throw your toys out the pram because the British people have democratically decided to go a different direction. I voted #leave and it had nothing to do with so called #russian influence. It was because of you and your #corrupt #eu government #Brexit #freedom 
I don't want to come across all 'tin foil hat' here - but I have a working hypothesis that the Tories, not Labour, are the ones negotiating Brexit?  
On june 23rd there are lefties marching with brexit dodger gina miller, 100 right wing groups marching and a big eid party all near or in trafalgar square/whitehall. Kaiser chiefs said it best when they said “i predict a riot” #millwall #chelsea west ham 
We're in Temple Bar this morning where @PearseDoherty @mfearonsf & @conwaywalsh are launching our Ard Fheis clar.Topics include party development, Brexit and creating an all-island economy!  
Come on Farage off your arse. You should be leading millions of protesters to parliament square trying to save our country. When we lose brexit, we lose everything. Our culture, our laws, our country. Sadly the left and the young don´t understand how this works. 
Without a Customs Union, British-based car firms will face 'extinction' says the head of the CBI.Already businesses are spending 100s of £millions preparing for a possible 'no-deal' Brexit- with immense opporunity cost.Brexit is dragging the UK economically & morally! #StopBrexit 
North East businesses say remaining in the EEA & customs union will reduce barriers to trade after Brexit which will impact massively on the 62.3% of our exports which go to the EU & will affect regional jobs & prosperity.  
Given yesterday's shambles & remaining absence of *any* guarantee Parliament will get #MeaningfulVote on #Brexit deal, it's all the more important MPs vote today with their conscience & in their constituents' & the nation's interests on #CustomsUnion & #SingleMarket/#EEA 
Corbyn's selfish remainers are determined to stop us leaving the EU at all costs - even though 70% of Labour-held constituencies voted for Brexit... 
Here are the arrogant people who think they are charge ( tragically they presently are..) and who have created the appalling mess Scotland now finds itself in.....#Hubris #Brexit  : Arron Banks dines with DUP after MPs' grilling -  
For all those arguing for a 2nd referendum on the final deal - how did that work out for @David_Cameron? 
The fishing industry must not be sacrificed in a Brexit compromise  
Important to respect the referendum vote on #brexit but @UKLabour just trying to frustrate it & vote against. Tell them to #respecttheresult 
Thought for Wednesday: not a single living former prime minister is in favour of Brexit. What does that tell you about the likelihood of it being good for the UK? 
Well, this 2014 No voter joined the SNP the morning after the Brexit vote. 
Two of the best journalists in the UK talking together now on @LBC about Brexit, Putin and Mercer @carolecadwalla @mrjamesob 
Quite a bit of left  twitter seems to believe the establishment and FBPE blaming Corbyn for Brexit is illogical and a hopeless strategy.Given the centre and right successfully blamed Labour and the welfare state for the 2007 banking crash I wouldn't be so sure. 
#Wetherspoons will cut the number of EU drinks and replace them with British ones in the run up to #Brexit  
Daily Telegraph states that three Junior Cabinet MinistersHave met with Soros funded Best for Britain.If this is true they should be sacked immediately and an investigation launched into foreign interference on our Sovereign Parliament..#brexit 
@thatginamiller #Wetherspoon to stop selling champagne ahead of #Brexit  - probably very apt as there will be absolutely nothing left to celebrate once we have departed the #EU 
++BREAKING++Jacob Rees-Mogg setting up feeder investment fund in Dublin “to avoid post #brexit passporting & other associated costs with doing business in a UK outside the EU”. 
I'm sorry Ms Soubry @Anna_Soubry but you lost me at "I trust our PM" and I entered total belwilderment at "I am sure a sensible amendment will be forthcoming".#NoTrust #NoBrexit #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Inspirational people who have put a smile on my face this week I just want to say thank you. Strong in character & belief with a moral purpose. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Why don't we skip straight to a fifth referendum? Or do them weekly? Perhaps we can have a prize given? Make it a bit like the lottery? Twice a week? Hourly? 
Ruth Dudley Edwards: If there was to be another EU referendum, I'd vote Leave with even more gusto than 2016   
Those attacking @JeremyCorbyn don’t / can’t offer any solutions. They just want to attack vociferously and tweet condemnations like hysterical clowns. Not a single one of them can say HOW @JeremyCorbyn can STOP Brexit. 
Britain is short of skills as Brexit approaches, according to a CEO who represents manufacturers  
Dear @Jacob_Rees_Mogg Private Eye is reporting Jacob Rees Mogg’s investment fund has set up a new feeder fund in Dublin to avoid consequences — such as an end to passporting — of hard #Brexit.   So, not just a liar who makes stories up, but a hypocrite 
Labour is avoiding answering questions on Brexit, says Liberal Democrat candidate for Lewisham East @lucyvsalek. We need a final say on the Brexit deal  
"President Putin’s Russia seems to have determined that Britain is Western Europe’s weakest link"Brexit will diminish Britain's place in the world and place its security in jeopardy. Spread the word.  
Does Theresa May have a Brexit strategy after all? Me for @Independent yesterday  
Coup MPs like Chuka Umunna et al knew perfectly well that Tories had more votes than Labour on the Brexit issues, but he was more concerned to be seen 2 be against/undermineCorbyn, rather than there being any logic/validity to Chuka's stance. #WednesdayWisdom#EUWithdrawalBill 
Pro-EU Tories warn PM: keep your word or face fresh rebellionRebels say they could back fresh amendment if May does not stick by assurances on EU withdrawal billAnyone who trusts May is an idiot, she is a shameless liar.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Vote for Corbyn if you want, but for many of us brexit has a direct impact lives! EG. Loss of pensions. We'd be bonkers to support it in any shape or form. FYI he could have rallied his MPs & got some of the lords amendments through. It's ingenuous to pretend otherwise.  
Very interesting thread that raises a lot of questions I’ve been thinking about - so much of current UK chaos is product of injecting direct democracy - Brexit referendum - into an uncodifed parliamentary system  
3 days left to book your free tickets for a discussion on #CitizenRights and #Brexit in #cambridge this Saturday with @DanielZeichner @InLimboBrexit @Elenauk @JoRust45 @Liesbethflowers and Dr Peter Walsh.#cambridgeinlimbo#WednesdayWisdom 
Finally, someone has said it: "There will never be a time 'after Brexit." The UK's struggle to define its relationship with Europe will never end  
Wetherspoon boss Tim Martin is truly embracing Brexit by replacing EU goods with British products and transitioning to global trade. Supporting Britain and providing value for customers - bravo!Read at  Support us at  
As the decision to leave the EU was, it appears, made by the UK’s Prime Minister solely informed by the result of a deeply dodgy referendum, then the denial of the vote to Brits who’ve exercised their right to FoM could be v. significant.Let’s hope for better luck in Luxembourg  
Today, the Convener @RHBruceCrawford  has written to @ScotSecofState on the #EUWithdrawalbill #brexit. Read it here  pic.twitter.com/JmPBCkEo0G 
Today will expose those using Brexit merely as a political stick  
Looking forward to meeting with regional Mayors in Liverpool today. Together we’re crossing political divides to call on the Government to devolve greater powers and funding over skills - vitally important as we approach Brexit 
The real 'constitutional vandalism' is irreversibly altering Britain's EU status based on a systemically flawed Brexit vote won with well-documented cases of (1) illegal money, (2) data crimes and (3) Russian involvement. Apparently British democracy has no standards anymore.  
We voted to #Leave #EU & ever since we’ve had unedifying spectacle of metropolitan elite trying their hardest to stymie that decision matched only by incompetence of those who are trying to implement it.Brexit means #BrexitCan we FINALLY get ON with it? 
#LBC James O’ Brien still Brexit bashing every bloody day. The dweeb talks to himself non stop saying I hate Brexit every minute. CLOWN  get him off the radio he’s ruined LBC. Once great radio station Brexit bashing station now. James O’ Brien  wins award  bore of the year.  
The fishing industry must not be sacrificed in a Brexit compromise:  
In a General election voters reaffirmed their view on the EU by voting overwhelmingly for the two main parties who both promised Brexit and rejecting the main party that offered a second referendum or a stay in option. The Commons followed up by approving the EU Withdrawal Bill. 
When a Tory rebel said she was just doing her duty as an MP, Nick Ferrari told her: "Your duty is to deliver Brexit, which is what the people have told you to do."  
WHEEY: Wetherspoon to offer more UK & non-EU drinks in run up to Brexit. “Brexit will create big marketing opportunities for UK and non-EU producers, which Wetherspoon is keen to encourage.” 
THIS COULD BE ONE OF THE MOST IMPORTANT BREXIT LEGAL CHALLENGES TO DATE, TO BE HEARD ON JULY 5th IN THE EU COURT IN LUXEMBOURG Please donate & RT  
So Dutch not paying anymore after Brexit ?!  
Despite Theresa May's last minute deal with her own party, Brexit started with the people and should end with the people. The people must have the final say on the deal, and a chance to #ExitFromBrexit. Join our campaign today: #EUWithdrawalBill 
Corbyn voted yesterday to stop a Hard Brexit. Another one so totally ignorant to what went on and more interested in bashing Jeremy. Shameful.  
"The NHS has been subjected to the longest financial squeeze in its history. This is a government that’s failed our NHS, pre-Brexit and during Brexit. And it certainly can’t be trusted with the NHS post-Brexit either."               Jeremy Corbyn.#ToriesOut #JC4PM 
Europe has a fifth column in its ranks: Putin's cheerleaders who want to destroy Europe & liberal democracy from within: Le Pen, Wilders, Farage, Orbàn, Kaczynski, Salvini use Kremlin money & intel. Like Farage's friend Arron Banks, who colluded w/ Russians to deliver #Brexit 
Listen, and you can hear ‘suicide’ being shouted by Conservative MP Ian Liddell-Grainger, when @IanBlackfordMP asks what options are open to MPs from Scotland for a proper debate on devolution and Brexit #EUWithdrawalbill 
.@theresa_may made a huge mistake yesterday. It will cost her her job. She should have resigned after the election; she’ll be forced out because of Brexit. #EUWithdrawalbill 
The CBI is wrong. They are the voice of the large industrial vested interests that oppose the competition and productivity growth that free trade under Brexit will bring - EFT's Professor Patrick Minford  
No wonder Brussels wants everything written down and legaled. This govt's promises aren't worth the paper they're written on. The damage #Brexit has done to our international reputation as an honest, decent partner is immeasurable. #BrexitBill 
I welcome decision of the Irish government to hold a referendum on removal of offence of #Blasphemy from Irish Constitution. Offence of Blasphemy is incompatible with states' international commitments on freedom of expression. #Ireland 
Petrol price levels cannot be justified says RAC, and just to think if it wasn't for the Brexit vote you'd be paying 20p a litre less for the fuel youput in your car. Dwell on that for a bit! Brexit Britain, a little country which seems to get high on masochism & embrace 'stupid' 
You got a Tory Gov't, you got #Brexit & now on road to a Hard Brexit. Well, that's what happens when voters listen to what they read in Tory owned newspapers & fall for FBPE & Open Britain Trap. Should've listened to Corbyn & not 2 those who misrepresent him.#WednesdayWisdom 
Labour is a party pro Hard Brexit, anti-Independence and now abstains when Scottish Parliament is stripped of powers against its will.....If you want Independence you simply CANNOT vote Labour 
Please don’t be too disheartened! My first time demonstrating outside HoP yesterday against Brexit. The support from passing traffic was AMAZING. It’s not a done deal!  
UK BREXIT MESS ROLLS ON...  
Good for them. Brexit boom!  
Polish President Duda has unveiled 15 questions that are considered for a referendum on whether to change the constitution later this fall.One of the questions to be asked is whether if Christianity should be mentioned in the preamble as the bedrock of Polish culture & identity  
For over a year now, anyone pointing out that Corbyn clearly has no intention of opposing Brexit has been roundly criticised as either insufficiently faithful or an active conspirator.I hope his Carling Lads Army got whiplash, at least. 
I support a united UK at the heart of the EU. But if the Brexit calamity takes place it will be hard to argue against Scottish independence. Coupled with the growing support in Northern Ireland for a United Ireland within the EU we could see the end of the UK 
Hi mainstream media, Now that Theresa May has put off any major decisions on #Brexit, again with her fudge with Tory rebels, any chance yo could now report on #ToryIslamophobia and #ToryRacism? It's an actual thing and people are worried. Thanks! 
I really don't understand it. It's been obvious, to everyone, for ages, that Corbyn wants hard Brexit. If your point of view is "well, he's worth that", then ok, I don't agree, but it's a point of view I can understand. But this long, drawn-out duplicity is ridiculous. 
Jacob Rees Mogg -Tory #diastercapitalist.And he's not the only one.As this fiasco continues, watch out for many  of the #JaredAndIvanka s of #Brexit to surface. Without shame. Hey, it's #business! #AlwaysBeClosing  
My German wife, already terribly stressed at the 2yr Brexit anti-immigrant agenda, was in tears this morning shaking her head at the way Westminster is treating Scotland. And here’s a Labour activist trying to score points on back of Labour ABSTAINING on the issue.  
Femi Oluwole: "The government isn't acting in the interests of the people right now. All the experts they base their decisions on are telling them Brexit hurts the country." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @Femi_Sorry | @OFOCBrexit |  
Brexit has become season 6 of ‘Lost’.  
If yesterday proved nothing else, it showed the #FBPE brigade in the clearest possible terms that attacking Corbyn changes nothing because, as many have said for some time now, he cannot stop #Brexit. I'll now be auto-blocking any still thick enough to believe otherwise. 
So, just to recap:According to polls, a clear majority now *don’t want Brexit*.ALL leaders of industry and economic experts say Brexit is suicide.The Leave campaign lied, was illegally funded and ran on stolen data.But we’re doing it anyway, because “the will of the people”. 
Daily Briefing: - Brexit showdown averted, for now- Macedonia reaches deal with Greece over name- French parliament votes on Macron’s railway reform  
I think many of us feel that Brexit has left a hole in our hearts. For me and others it threatens to leave a hole in our family too, and a huge gaping hole in our bank balances where our salaries used to go if our freedom of movement is not maintained...  
This is the Land Rover Discovery, Thousands of JLR Jobs have just been lost due to #brexit as JLR Switch production from Solihul to Slovakia, hope that you are happy now #brexit #morons But still we have got our country back Innit 
Apart from a couple of Labour Rebels Corbyn & the whole Labour Party were defeated alongside FibDems, SNP etc by Tory+DUP > all other MPsNo Tory Rebels rebelled.So please enlighten us how Labour can stop #Brexit you bloody moron.  
Dutch PM Mark Rutte: 'Unity is the bedrock of our strength. Unity defines our ability to act. Sadly, Brexit will leave a big hole in our circle. The only positive effect is it has made the other 27 member states even more aware of the importance of unity and working together.' 
I didn’t vote for Brexit and yet the fact that it is undeliverable is somehow my fault.I’m not a member of the Labour Party and yet the fact that they are unelectable is also somehow my fault.Is there anything else anyone would like to blame me for?   
'Go Brexit!' Watch Tory MP shout down anti-Brexit demo in BRILLIANT clash outside Commons  
In Britain, up to now, it would be unthinkable that an election or referendum could be lost but the winner denied the spoils of electoral victory.I fear for faith in our democratic process if this is the case, destroying trust in British institutions would be populist dynamite. 
Despite attempts by the #EU to crush democracy, the voice of the people will be heard as Poland prepares for a referendum on EU membership this November  
Wetherspoon to stop selling champagne ahead of Brexit  
Brexit must be stopped. Good news: it can be stopped! #PeoplesVote 
The "Will" of 17.4 million "People" is ever so slightly more important than the "Will" of 16.8 million "People? This is insane. This is Corruption. There can be only one "reason" for #Brexit being forced through like this - some political opportunists are being paid to do it. 
 Founder Mocks ‘Fake News’ Inquiry, Claims Anti-Brexit Chair Took Money off Russians   
Yesterday a united Labour Party voted in favour of the #LordsAmendments during the #EUWithdrawalBill whilst the Tories and the bought and paid for DUP overwhelmingly voted against them. Do you finally get it now #FBPE? Corbyn can't stop Brexit!  
While aiming for a soft Brexit is the sensible option in this mess - It will never satisfy the ultras long-term (on both sides). I’m not sure public will like it much either. Ultimately, I’m afraid, we’ll have to decide whether we’re really in or whether we’re really out. 
“Rebel Conservatives have forced Theresa May into a climbdown, handing parliament greater control of Brexit if she fails to seal a deal.” After a climbdown, could Mrs May be forced out by Conservatives ?    
Re-upping this. The chair of the DCMS committee - backed a cross-party group of 10 MPs - has called the main funder of Brexit a liar. At what point does this become a thing?  
“We either support the 17.4 million people who voted to Leave…or we’re going to allow people who really want to stop Brexit by using legal challenges and legal words to put this in doubt.”You can always rely on @KateHoeyMP to tell it how it is! 
Nicola Sturgeon's NATS have created a stand off over BREXIT. Westminster has bent over backwards for them. They are still not happy. As a Scottish voter am I outraged? Yes. I am outraged the NATS have wasted so much time and energy on this when there were better things to do. 
Tories still not getting that simply saying you don't rule out a no deal Brexit does not confer the leverage that would come were the EU to think the UK is actually getting ready for a no deal Brexit. You have to invest and prepare. 
I remember the dark days before 1973 when the UK was gin free.  Not.  What utter tosh from Project Fear.  Viva #Brexit  
In case there is any doubt - there will be a meaningful vote whatever Jacob Rees-Mogg and the Tory ERG say. When will they accept the reality? - there is no majority for their extreme Brexit in the House of Commons. The PM knows this which is why she conceded on this yesterday.  
Brexit has emboldened so much racist ignorance. One caller to LBC said he voted leave cos there were too many ‘indians’ in his Tescos. Frightening mindset. 
Remember when you lose your job or your business folds and food prices are sky high because of Brexit or you lose your EU citizenship and Freedom of Movement you have three gentlemen to thank, Arron BanksNigel FarageAndy Wigmore. Make sure you show your appreciation  
Government sees off (for a few days at least) potential rebellion on Brexit Bill | Three ministers said to have met anti-Brexit group | PM to host Chequers Cabinet summit to settle Brexit border policy | Jobs rise and unemployment falls (despite Brexit)  
.@IanBlackfordMP tells #BBCGMS that the lack of time given to Scottish MPs to debate the #Brexit bill was a "democratic outrage"  
LISTEN: a rousing defence of Brexit & democracy from Lord Digby Jones @Digbylj on @talkRADIO 
Thanks #Brexit ... Goodbye #London Bonjour #Paris 
Love this.Wetherspoon to stop selling champagne ahead of Brexit  
Great piece from Phillip Lee on why he resigned from the Government over Brexit and why he backs a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal.  
I don’t agree with the Irish government’s position on this. A number of EU countries, such as the Baltic states, want and need more help on defence. Given their strong support for Ireland on Brexit, Dublin should reciprocate.  
About 40% of Lewisham voters voted Brexit. And about 30% of people didn’t vote in the last General Election. I want to give a voice to those people, and to the people left behind by Labour, the Tories, and UKIP. – Anne Marie WatersVote 'FOR BRITAIN' on 14th June, Lewisham East  
.@BBCgmu commentator says unchallenged that as Brexit farce unfolds “the Taoiseach is threatening”. I thought An Taoiseach simply asked the British government to honoring the backstop it agreed in December & March. Hardly a threat but honoring deals a whole new concept for BG 
One dead MP and plots to murder more...Certain Brexit MP'S have created this mood music of extremism and they are in the #Tory    party. We need to make June 23rd count. We need to shake this country back to its senses. We need a #PeoplesVote. 
I see we're at the part of Brexit where we drink turnip juice to own the EU  
What we have in Westminster is not a modern functioning democratic parliament. It's a bunch of ego-maniac power hungry Tories running amok in what can only be described as a clown circus.If this is what Brexit looks like, then Indy can be the only sensible choice for Scotland. 
@ Brexit Bulletin: “A pattern is emerging in the politics of Brexit Britain: a crisis, then a vague compromise that keeps all sides happy. The compromise is soon revealed to be an unsustainable fudge.” 
If only that bearded spawn of Satan called Jeremy Corbyn hadn't forced our brave and noble Tory rebels to vote with the govt yesterday, the meaningful vote amendment would have passed, making a no deal Brexit impossible. Still, can't be helped. Bloody Corbyn, eh? What a bastard. 
If #Brexit were cancelled I think this would be the response of the majority of Brits:"It's been cancelled? Oh I thought we'd already left, Ahh well, did you see Love Island last night?" 
We are a laughing stock to our 27 partners who will be voting on the final deal in the European Parliament, while we cannot even agree to let our own parliament have a proper debate about all this.  Absurdity.  An advisory referendum has broken our #democracy. @bbclaurak 
A No Deal Brexit has to be off the table. It would devastate the country and Brexiters who keep saying just walk away are either:a) incredibly wealthyb) incredibly stupidc) both 
OUTRAGEOUS: Government Ministers and MPs have reportedly met with the Soros-funded anti-Brexit Remoaner group. Working to undermine the will of the people - unacceptable!  
We are excited to invite you to join us on 1/29 from 12– 1 p.m. PST for a Virtual Information Session about our Psychology Degrees! You’ll hear details on the program from faculty leaders, learn more about our admissions process, and more! RSVP here today:  
I'm afraid what we are seeing happen to Brexit under the May regime is the normalisation of betrayal. What would have been unthinkable a year ago now being conceded, more being asked for. Hence we need a new PM. 
Ireland is modernising while the UK slips backwards towards the end of the Union & the dark ages under English nationalism: “BBC News - Ireland to hold referendum on blasphemy law  
Wetherspoons to replace Champagne with British sparkling wines in the run-up to Brexit  
BBC does it again. Serious story about brexit economic concerns has to be "balanced" by a comment from a brexit crank (Minford) giving the false impression that both arguments have equal merit. For the record Minford has already conceded brexit will eliminate manufacturing in UK  
Whilst the pantomime played out in the Commons, the real villains were in a Committee Room. Two of the Brexit Bad Boys admitting they did whatever it took - however unscrupulous - to secure a Leave win. And very few of the voters who were manipulated will ever know. 
Gina Miller's interview with @iancollinsuk was - Labels MPs cowards and liars.- Calls for a second referendum. 
Feeling on real down today, partly because of the way the Brexit vote went yesterday. However, more so because I am so in despair of the lack of backbone and moral fibre of our MPs and the apathetic electorate who don’t care or care to understand what is going on around them 
Wetherspoons ditches French champagne and German wheat beers for British brands ahead of Brexit  
Honda reaffirms commitment to its Swindon factory post-Brexit  #GBmfg 
This referendum is a shocking display of liberal lefty nonsense The floodgates will open and there will be blaspheming factories all over Ireland.#blasphemy 
Pub chain Wetherspoon is to sell more drinks from the UK and non-EU brewers in the run up to Brexit 
Brexit will harm the UK economically say 13 studies. Please spread. It’s never too late to stop Brexit   
Wetherspoons will stop selling Champagne as pub chain announces it will sell more UK-made drinks in run up to Brexit  
CBI chief: Car firms face Brexit extinction  
Precisely because #Brexit has turned out to be much more complex than was anticipated during the referendum, the result will be a #Brexit no one voted for.  
As England's soccerball team head to the #WorldCup in Russia we will see a great analogy for #Brexit A nation stirred up by jingoism begins to believe it can win on the world stage despite knowing the reality is that they'll lose and only Russia will gain from it all 
Exclusive: EU officials have privately rejected Labour's Brexit policy as unworkable 'cakeism' reports @adampayne26 
When @Arron_banks and @Andy_Wigmore smugly admit to lying during the referendum campaign, what they mean is: if we had told the truth, Leave never would have won.Reminder: a functioning democracy depends on a well-informed electorate. 
Here's a list of Scottish MPs  from Remain constituencies who voted against having a meaningful vote on #BrexitAndrew Bowie David Duguid Luke GrahamBill GrantKistene HairAlister JackStephen Kerr John Lamont Paul Masterton David Mundell Douglas Ross Ross Thomson 
I don't think it is the case any more that Brexit won't happen - it is more that it can't happen. Simply because nobody can be bothered to work out or explain what would have happened. Nothing will come of nothing. 
Britain doesn’t meet the definition of a democracy anymore. Sad times for decent people. Stop Brexit.#FBPE 
"WAKEY, WAKEY" - Our #Brexit call this morning to all MPs to wake up.   
Leaked letter shows how Brexiteers were denied moment of triumphMay & Many MPs could face defeat at the next General Election, if we don’t get a Full Brexit! 
The Best For Soros group, of which Chuka is a leading light, has an explicit agenda to block Brexit. And he expects to do that without flak?  
Facing Defeat on Brexit, May Gives Ground to U.K.’s Parliament  
Some days, Brexit can feel like death by a 1000 cuts, be we're still here, still kicking, still screaming & still gaining ground. Whatever May does, whatever nonsense Davis spouts, we will shake it off & come back for more, because nothing else matters until Brexit is buried. 
And topple the govt.? Fear of a Corbyn anti-austerity government runs deeper than the fear of a Tory Brexit, because a great many gravy trains would hit the buffers, & light would be shone into murky corners. Umunna (the Hon Member for PWC) & others in Lab also have a lot to lose 
Day 2 of the #EuWithdrawalBill: heading into Parliament for another day at work and defending Scotland from a damaging Tory hard #Brexit. Just a pity that only 35/59 Scottish MPs can be relied on to do that.  
Bankrolled by millonaires and promoted by media moguls - motivated by tax avoidance and self interest - delivered on a vehicle of nationalism and xenophobia. Brexit the gift that keeps on giving...to the rich!  #EUWithdrawalBill #r4today 
And this tactic of relentless hounding Corbyn supporters for the last 12 months instead of lobbying potential Tory rebels worked like a charm yesterday did it? Corbyn can't stop Brexit. How many times dies that have to be pointed out? FBPE is like talking to spoilt children! 
Morgan Stanley confirms it's moving hundreds of jobs because of Brexit  
Jeez Ed, take a step back. Consider the possibility that the dislike of Corbyn is precisely because he whipped his party to vote with the govt on Brexit and has not provided any leadership in trying to avert economic disaster. Also, look at reaction to tory rebels who backed down 
President of the CBI: "There's zero evidence that independent trade deals will provide any economic benefit to the UK that's material. It's a myth,". Extraordinary times when the leader of this pro-Conservative organisation speaks out like this.  #Brexit  
Note to Corbynistas:#FBPE is not partisan. We criticise Leavers of all parties. But you only hear it when we criticise Corbyn. The truth is, every party apart from the SNP owns Brexit. Because every party apart from them supported it in Westminster. 
BREXITThe political establishment can't abide the views of the people & it couldn't believe it when we voted to Leave the EU. But, in 2016, we voted by a healthy enough margin for Brexit. The Establishment didn’t like it, of course. But it was a fair vote with a clear result.  
It would seem that we the people have no representation in Parliament. Yes votes were won, but not before @theresa_may sold out Brexit by her pledge to Traitor Grieves and his cabal. Brexiteers have no courage, just meaningless talk. #MayMustGoNow 
I'm going to march for a #PeoplesVote on June 23 to demand that the people have a say on the final Brexit deal - will you join us?  @peoplesvote_uk 
The governor of the Bank of England said households are £900 worse off than projected before the Brexit vote.It’s not possible to get the exact figure using public data, and the Bank of England told us the calculation was based on unpublished data. 
Discussing Theresa May’s Brexit chaos in a mo on @GMB. The PM doesn’t know what she’s doing 
There is a full on attempt through fake news and dirty tricks, to subvert the referendum and keep us tied to the EU against our will.   This would be electoral suicide for the Tories.  They must see the job done.   
Reminds me of UK leavers complaining that brexit would be going swimmingly if only remainers would cheer it on (and stop pointing out what a disaster the whole thing will be)  
There are NO TORY REBELS!!!! If you want the softest Brexit ever!!! Get Corbyn, the astonishing attacks on him strengthens the Tories!!!  
Brexit has divided and broken Britain. It has shown what the majority of MP’s stand for, themselves and their own  self preservation and wealth. Shocking. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Rep. Mark Sanford (R-SC) appears to have lost his primary today, which became a referendum on his criticism of President Trump.  
Remember, Brexit means giving up our say in what those laws are.So we'd be copying laws we now won't have any influence on.#TakeBackControl...? 
I'll be there with other Remain MEPs and encourage all pro-Europeans to show up in visible solidarity with all those brave souls across the nation who wish to protest against the lies sold to the electorate over Brexit and want a #FinalSayForAll on the Withdrawal Agreement deal. 
Judging by the comments to Ian's retweet of a petition against the Power Grab, I get the distinct impression Nicola knew exactly what she was doing when she said she'd call the next referendum when people demanded it.The People are demanding it.Go Scotland!  
The games of Parliament laid out for all to see. Brexit debate - most called to speak remainers. Concessions made to Traitor Grieves and his gang to prevent No Deal. Barnier offers EEA membership. 17.4 million voters ignored. @theresa_may will accept Brino. Sold out 
“The money, or source of money, for the referendum effort has no bearing on regular people...”This is a stunning assertion for a journalist to make in Seattle, USA 2018  
Ireland Will Finally Hold a Referendum to Repeal Its Blasphemy Law This October 
Brexit: Sections of the UK car industry face extinction unless the UK stays in the customs union, the president of the CBI has said. Dreschler also said there was "zero evidence" that trade deals outside the EU will provide any economic benefit to Britain.  
Indian Fugitive billionaire "bollygarchs" are allowed in but students, entrepreneurs and doctors aren't. Britain's post-brexit policy towards India is clearly in a big mess.My op-ed in the @FinancialTimes this morning  
If it passes ballot referendum, it will literally be the California voters determining for themselves. 
Just remember, your "Let's get our country back" campaign is putting us at risk of losing parts of it... Congratulations Brexit...#DissolveTheUnion 
it would be so sad for the UK to split but, scotland voted to remain in the UK despite westminster constantly screwing them over, and instead of learning their lesson, westminster has repaid them by inflicting hard Brexit on them. they have every right to leave! #DissolveTheUnion 
Hang on!9EUs haven’t given up hope that Britain will change its mind on BrexitMaking America great means putting an end to political tribalism, which only serves TrumpPutin’s lust for the great divide.Anyone doubt 45 and his team’s methodologies are written in Moscow? pic.twitter.com/qsHFkEwtOA 
Northern Ireland-born Labour MP @KateHoeyMP ,who was one of around a dozen rebels in the party who helped ensure the government's Brexit plan remains on track, writes about the Commons votes last night:  
Welcome to the Unconstitutional Ranked Choice Voting which occurred today here in Maine. This should never have made it to referendum, let alone law. It is  Unconstitutional.Thankfully we have @Governor_LePage who will never sign this!!! #NoOnOne  
Some of them worked for both, some only for the Brexit campaign - all worked in the building of Go Skippy (At the time Liz Bilney was also working for Go Skippy) She says « yes they do both, but now they are full time really on the campaign, we also hired new people » 
Tory/Lib Dem austerity devastated the working class. Corbyn does not have the numbers to stop Brexit. Perhaps if those Blairites had gotten behind Corbyn instead of in-fighting Labour may now be in power and then he COULD have done something about Brexit. Wake up. 
And the day's headlines on the Daily Express simply encouraged this nasty, brutish, undemocratic thuggery. That this particularly ugly creature has been let out of the Brexit bottle since 2016 makes me despair at the damage we've already done to ourselves.  
And that’s the BEST Brexit available. 
If only we had someone like this great man negotiating Brexit! Trump gets things done unlike our spineless government! His unorthadox political style is exactly what the western world needs and it's driving the loony left nuts!  
Ultimately the significant moment in the UK’s Brexit negotiations was when, during the referendum, Theresa Villiers said that the Irish border would be as “free-flowing as ever”. Everything else is just noise. 
"The truth is that the Brexiteers don't give a flying frig for Ireland, North or South, and that includes Irish Unionism and the DUP." Such a pity that @duponline don't realise their English nationalist allies would betray them in a heartbeat to reach the promised land of #brexit  
Young people really ARE getting more stupid, study finds  So #Snowflakes really are stupid! That explains why they dont understand that older people with wisdom and sense voted for #Brexit 
UK Government accused of showing 'utter contempt for Scottish democracy' on Brexit Bill  
Brexit is the most significant political change during the life time of my kids and not one Scottish representative got a chance to speak. Im raging. So much for a union of equals.  
This is an apt quote to describe the mess PM May has created and probably deliberately, she is the worst PM in history IMO. This "I fear all we have done is to awaken a sleeping giant and fill him with a terrible resolve." She should be removed from office now. #brexit 
Brexit: How can a Govt do this to its people? How can MPs support it?The notional volume of interest rate swaps cleared at Frankfort's Eurex business has increased to more than €7 trillion compared to just over €1 trillion a year ago. That's 7 TRILLION  
PM May faces another day of Brexit compromise in parliament  
Brexit: who cares wins? - as the media hyperventilates and the commentariat so comprehensively misses the point, all we can do is watch and record, with growing dismay. The game they are playing at Westminster is not worth a light...  #Brexinfo. 
Three of Theresa May's ministers 'held talks with anti-Brexit group'  These people call themselves democrats!! #Traitors all of em!! 
Facing uncomfortable questions and in a fit of pique Banks resorts to whataboutery and accuses a member of the committee of drunkeness and sexual impropriety before having a childish temper tantrum 7/8 
Tonight's Brexit music choice. Some advice for Tory rebels on UK Govt. promises. From an Irishman. 
She's laughing because she lied to the Tory 'rebels', double-crossed them - and knows they will do nothing to retaliate.May wins 'meaningful vote' on Brexit - by making fools of Tory rebels  #bbcnews #itvnews #channel4news 
Pathetic Corbyn troll living in a paranoid fantasy world in which #FBPE is a plot against Corbyn. #FBPE is against #Brexit, and thus far Corbyn has been pro-Brexit, so we attack him. Is that so hard to understand! #StopBrexit 
Hi @elisouchka, hope you are well - you may want to get in touch with @DamianCollins MP, the chair of @CommonsCMS - your film may be of some serious interest to both him and the UK authorities! cc @paulhilder @carolecadwalla @peterjukes @profcarroll @IanCLucas @JoStevensLabour 
So far as I can tell, UK constitutional structures at the moment aren’t just mixed, they’re scrambled. Brexit is a universal solvent, and all the previous structures are crumbling and mingling in it.And that cannot be a sustainable state of affairs. 
Support is building for a #PeoplesVote.Let the people have a say on the Brexit deal and an option to #StopBrexit. 
The Tories are arranging a rich man’s brexit. The disgruntled working people who actually voted for it are going to get mugged  
You’re quite right, Nigel. If they were putting country before party, they’d scrap the insanity that is Brexit.  
In the last week or so, there’s been the UKSC deciding obiter dicta it knows better than legislators what the voters want; Parliament not supreme but bound by a referendum in a past parliament; Parliament deciding not to have a say over the executive but let it loose unfettered.. 
They win. Homophobic, anti-abortion, hard Brexit mp in *Vauxhall*. Preposterous. Self indulgent. Insulting to representative democracy. 
Would be irony of the century if the Unreconciled Continuity-Remainers succeeded in eventually stopping Brexit, but just too late because the #EU had finally disintegrated in mutual acrimony only the week before.Think I wouldn't stop laughing for a year. 
Hard to believe that barely 2 years ago the UK Government & @ScotTories were patting themselves on the back for putting Sewel, the principle of devolved consent, onto a "statutory basis". Today, finally, they effectively tore it up for the sake of their chaotic #Brexit obsession. 
Unionists have now lost all right to demand that anyone respect the result of a referendum, when they’ve run a coach and horses through the Scottish devolution referendum of 1997 
Today I think we see for the lie that which is Labours argument of solidarity , in abstaining and enabling a power grab on Scotland's devolved powers which they themselves created, then I think we see the kind of nationalism they supposedly want - brexit England's nationalism 1st 
My response to this Telegraph article is incredulity! I’ve never met this group, never heard of them, I disagree with their campaign and would never in a million years support their undemocratic objectives. Do I support a second referendum? Answer below.  
Here’s another great video prepared by @LLJourn this time with #Remainernow Gary from Norfolk. He talks about the lack of information about ramifications of leave vote at #euref and how he’s seen his prices go up & that #brexit is not wanted by the young! 
This is a rare ray of light, offering clarity amid Westminster confusion. If Westminster breaches the terms of the Act Of Union there is no need for a referendum. The Union fails, by virtue of non-compliance by one of the two supposedly equal partners. End of story. We're out.  
The consequences of Gove and Boris failing to get their act together in the immediate aftermath of the referendum becomes increasingly apparent. 
There is zero chance of the Lords supporting any amendment  which does not give Parliament a proper and meaningful vote on all the options available at the end of the Brexit negs - deal or no deal.  
#FBPE accounts have been hyper critical of LAB & Corbyn for months. Where have you been.....? As I have stated many times the parliamentary arithmetic has always been against LAB. This is a Tory Brexit 100%........#EUWithdrawalBill 
Major Breaking: Possibility of an In/Out Referendum in Poland on #EU Membership. 
PMS update. Almost cried talking about how brilliant it was that focus went immediately to Northern Ireland when the referendum passed. 
Atheist Ireland welcomes the announcement that our decade-long campaign for a referendum on the blasphemy law has been successful.We will finally be able to vote in October to remove this anachronistic,...  
Constituents of Tory MP who quit rather than back Brexit blast him  @MailOnline 
Atheist Ireland welcomes the announcement that our decade-long campaign for a referendum on the blasphemy law has been successful.We will finally be able to vote in October to remove this anachronistic, silly, and...  
How many man hours and millions have hardline remainers wasted to produce nothing and get nowhere all these months? Had they accepted the result and pitched in there would by now be a strong cross party backing for EEA Efta. #Brexit 
Tory rebel Phillip Lee could be DESELECTED after quitting May's Government over Brexit. Take Soubry as well!  
Just back from two days at the protests/vigil in LondonPlease,please,please anyone who can get ther tomorrow (Wednesday 13th) get yourself along and make some noise. Great bunch of people, now hoarse shouting "Stop Brexit!"  told by MPs could here us in parliament.#StopBrexit 
Over 17.4m people voted for #Brexit We did not vote for a #Brexit fudge.Please retweet if you agree.#bbcdp #EUWithdrawalBill #EU #conservatives #Parliament #TheresaMay #bbcqt 
#Brexit today -   -  
I’m sorry that I ever was pro-union. #Brexit has showed, quite blatantly, that Westminster treats Scotland with utter contempt. I never saw it before. I’m truly sorry and horrified by their actions. 
The UK, which Scotland voted to remain part of, voted to leave the UK, There was no separate vote for Scotland, and the fact that support for independence is no greater than before the Brexit vote confirms your point is nonsense! 
SO... While Westminster/Britain continues to seemingly endless debate #Brexit -  The Irish economy growing three times faster than any other European country:  
One thing to be said for Brexit: if it had not happened, I wouldn't necessarily have had it made so obvious to me who are the weak souls in Parliament - and who are the strong. I love the friends I've made through this experience. 
Wednesday's Guardian: "May escapes #Brexit bill defeat as Tory rebels accept concessions" (via @BBCHelenaLee)  #tomorrowspaperstoday 
#skypapers Help Yasmin Alibhai  - Brown on. Get ready for shouting & screamin. Yasmin hates Donald Trump & Brexit. Guaranteed Donald Trump bashing. Different class to that idiot I sit on the fence Barack Obama. 8 years done nothing about North Korea. Donald Trump sorting it.  
I love how centrists say no-one cares about brexit the SNP should calm down when it comes to indyref triggers but when they think we aren't looking curl up in a ball screaming oh my God what has become of this country 
Theresa May has agreed to something. Nobody quite understands what it is. Neither does she. A few auto factories are to move out of Britain. Everybody attacked Corbyn. Just another day of Tory Brexit shambles... 
Oh yes we do. Your true colours are shining even brighter now - you don’t care about brexit, you care about stopping Corbyn. That’s all that motivates you. 
Very much a side note to today’s #Brexit shenanigans but, jeeez, what a bad way to do parliamentary politics.No one seems to have a clue what’s going on, and MPs spend ages trooping out of chamber to vote. 
Says Nicola Sturgeon who has No Respect for the majority of Scotland that voted no, and is now pushing for another ‘once in a lifetime’ referendum  Hypocrite.  
All to hold a fractured Party together. Brexit would lead to Independent Scotland, united Ireland, and then which way would Wales jump? Little England all alone? End the Union to save a Party which few young people would be seen dead voting for. Doomed?  
What a country ! €15million on the Abortion Referendum; another €15 million on the next one; No lack of funds for setting up abortion network across the country, and not enough money for the homeless or Doctors,Nurses,Speech+ Occupational Therapists + many other Hospital queues 
Just a funny thought,but maybe, with all these 'brexit' Votes by Theresa May's Government, supported by @jeremycorbyn , - this may be the MOST loyal that he's been to ANY Government ... ? 
As a fervent No voter in the independence referendum, it would take a lot for me to change my position. Yet the sheer lack of care shown by the UK Govt and Official Opposition to Scotland’s interests in Brexit has pushed me over the edge. Scotland can no longer be overlooked.  
Any government minister found to be colluding with Soros-funded Remainiacs backing a *third* referendum should be sacked on the spot. This was not in the manifesto upon which you were elected!  Support us at  
‘Murdoch can get stuffed’: MPs vow to defy ‘bullying and threatening’ newspaper headlines on Brexit vote  
Look at @TheGreenParty’s MEP Molly Scott Cato getting the best #Brexit possible, in the national interest, while the Tories continue faffing about with their #BrexitShambles and Labour fail to hold them to account. Pls can we elect more Greens? #VoteGreen #StopBrexit 
The Guardian front page, Wednesday 13 June 2018: May escapes Brexit bill defeat as Tory rebels accept concessions  
Labour Twitter tonight -Moderate - Brexit will be a disaster for UK and Labour voters and members massively oppose it.Cornynista former remainer - But Iraq. 
Must be pretty sweet being a conservative right now. What with Trump and Brexit and everything going your way yet still thinking all the problems are the fault of liberals who aren’t in charge and it’s almost like they didn’t think any of this shit through. 
Brexit must be stopped. The good news: it can be stopped! #PeoplesVote Keep fighting. 
Once upon a time the Labour Party attacked the Government. Now its outriders - desperate to cover its leader's pro Brexit stance - attack the Government's rebels. 
The gap between what Tory rebel Remainers say @theresa_may promised them today and what @DavidDavisMP says they were promised. Government Brexit crisis may only have been delayed a few days  
Soros funded @BestForBritain has held talks with Remainer ministers & MPs to encourage them to oppose @theresa_mayThree ministers have indicated they’re threatening to follow @DrPhillipLeeMP in an attempt to scupper the PM & subvert democracy#Brexit 
Solicitor General @RobertBuckland tells @bbclauraK the government's agreement to 'further discussions' on the meaningful vote, may or may not result in changes to the #EUWithdrawalbill #Brexit  
15mins to discuss Northern Ireland, despite all of the risks to the GFA and of a hard border from Brexit and how the NI issue is so central to the UK agreeing a Withdrawal Agreement with EU. So much for DUP influence, or do they even care? 
Remain is getting that message out to the rest of the EU "don't make the same mistake as us". Brexit will only serve to make the EU stronger @SODEMAction 
I hope those in Scotland have finally seen thru those shower of shits you elected to represent you in Westminster for what they are; self serving Tory/Labour puppets. They don’t give a flying rats ass for our country or the Brexit catastrophe that’s about to hit us! 
With one reckless tweet, Alastair Campbell accidentally reminds everyone why the Labour right is finishedBy @bexsumner #Brexit #Iraq 
You never learn, do you? Party before country every damn time.You stand there and expect to be taken seriously calling for things like #PeoplesVote but you're easily swayed, safe in your bubble of privilege. Meanwhile the rest of us have fought Brexit consistently these 2 years 
Ireland to hold referendum on blasphemy law  
People must have been stupid to believe a remainer would and could deliver brexit. One thing is for sure. This will screw the tories because never again will my cross go beside the name of one of these liars. 
I feel empty right now. Watching Scotland being stripped of it's voice and powers and dragged to Brexit oblivion with the rest of the UK right before our eyes while the Tories laugh.It's a sorry state of affairs and anybody who accepts this should be ashamed. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Tony Blair, Gordon Brown, John Major, David Cameron, Michael Heseltine, Ken Clarke, et al.....They all believed that the UK should remain in the EU, apparently even Teresa May originally agreed, so what's changed and why? What makes the current 650 different #Brexit?  
For all those who pontificate to @sinnfeinireland MPs urging us to take our seats & 'influence' the #Brexit debate, this right here demonstrates why nationalists in the north have very clearly turned their backs on Westminster!  
The thing so bad about brexit is that all the smart people like Rees-Mogg and his cohorts really did think they had some form of control over May. She has made them look as stupid as the 17.4 million who voted for freedom and the country they love. I detest May. 
This is the contempt which Westminster feels for Scotland's Parliament and Scotland's MPs. Devolution all but ignored in debate and the leader of the 3rd party told to contemplate suicide as an option. @ScotNational #EUWithdrawalBill #BrexitBill #scotlandsplaceineurope #Brexit  
I reckon @Arron_banks must have watched my US Senate video. He absolutely bested the doltards on the parliamentary star chamber today. Ran rings around them #Brexit @talkRADIO @JamesWhaleShow 
Given today’s latest insult to democracy in House of Commons over Brexit, I say this: if all voters aren’t already outraged at the Tories’ appalling antics towards Scotland, then they clearly aren’t paying attention...Mundell, Lamont, et al = new ‘parcel of rogues in a nation’.  
If anything last sentence in the piece - calling for Britain to ‘break the Gordian knot’ (the Irish border) - is even worse. Irony of imposing a will on a people who voted for GFA and did not vote for Brexit in the name of ‘sovereignty’ would be hilarious if it wasn’t so serious  
So. What was the post-Brexit 'beyond' that was worth walking out of a Select Committee to discuss with our MPs for North & East Antrim?  
Jacob Rees-Mogg articulates splendidly why the Remainer 'concessions' actually make a no-deal Brexit more likely, and how they’ve always had these powers over the executive:  
I’m reading the usual attacks on #FBPE types from Labour.It is not our job to come up with an alternative to Brexit that unites the country by addressing the lies of the Leave campaign and the scapegoating of EU and migrants.The Leader of the opposition gets paid to do that. 
The Tories embraced austerityThe Tories operate a hostile environment policyThe Tories initiated BrexitThe Tories bunged DUP to cling to powerThe Tories hurtle towards hard brexitThe Tories place needs of party over countryIts all Corbyn's fault#fbpeLibdemLogic 
Still waiting to hear how Corbyn can stop Brexit. I have a pen and paper. 
Forget your referendum CHARLIE FLANAGAN,  deal with this family that is about to be torn apart due to incompetence in your office!  
Cambridge political scientist @cjbickerton & LSE Professor of Law,rather than acknowledging the genuine dangers to communal relations in N. irl as a consequence of Brexit, know better than PSNI chief constable as they sit at their comfortable desks in their comfortable offices.  
Apparently people still think Brexit means more control... not less... (and that somehow Femi has been discussing this for 30 years...)Chatting with @jackpowell82 on @BBC5LIVE#EUWithdrawalBill 
Used to tell parents that the best thing they could do give their high school kids a boost was to keep on giving them books.Looking at Brexit, I'd add start learning a second language & getting them used to travel. 
Ireland Will Finally Hold a Referendum to Repeal Its Blasphemy Law This October  
Arron Banks brags to MPs that  were prepared to “lead people up the garden path” to win the referendum. Brexit looks ever more illegitimate but the fact is one can commit fraud against voters with impunity. Not good enough.  
We have to undo the injustice of Michael McDowall’s racist referendum. Those kids are Irish, they were born here.  
So, in summary, some hard-right Tories put on centrist clothes to damage Labour over Brexit, the centrist dads in the PLP swooned, FBPE'rs went into deranged anti-Corbyn mode, only for the hard-right Tories to vote for their hard-right colleagues after all. What a sorry saga 
 “led people up the garden path” in #Brexit #Referendum  - Arron Banks admits :  
So far it looks like today is the day Labour committed us to hard Brexit 
Dear Canada: now that you've realised America is no longer a reliable partner, you're welcome to join the EU. We can even call it the Atlantic Union, just for you.Dear Britain: now you've also realised you can't rely on America, maybe give up on this Brexit nonsense? 
Hey, @ChukaUmunna - this was a really good day for democracy, wasn't it? You need to decide whether your determination to oust Corbyn is more important than stopping a cliff-edge Brexit. Get behind the party. Shape up or ship out.  
You know that trade were going to do outside the EU?Business will need access visas, but free visa to loads of countries only free under EU agreements. Ukrainians are charged €110 for a 6th month Visa, they and others are likely to charge us post Brexit 
I voted against Brexit because I thought it'd be bad for the country.Brexit won't mean the deaths of hundreds of thousands, or millions maimed, traumatised and displaced.The cheerleaders of the Iraq war saying Brexit destroyed a country based on false pretences is grotesque. 
Well! Who would believe it? Theresa May has taken a leaf out of Nigel Farage's book and is already reneging on the promises she made to Tory "rebels" to get the Brexit Withdrawal Bill through. Why continue to believe in the rule of law when the Government behaves like this? 
Tory ‘rebels’ hold key to Brexit outcome, not Jeremy Corbyn, as the FBPE seem to think . It’s down to the maths,stupid.Today those same Tory ‘rebels’ folded when put under slightest pressure. They are Tories and will always put themselves before the country. 
So I was interviewed by @RTUKnews tonight on the Westminster Brexit votes. I’m not sure Ruth will be happy  
No doubt #FBPE will be blaming Corbyn for Tory Government avoiding a major defeat on its #Brexit bill. After all a minority opposition can always beat a majority government by simple tactic of lying about the mathematics of the voting system eh?  
When David Davis used the term 'constructive ambiguity' to describe his approach to #brexit, he meant 'I am a liar who makes stuff up on the hoof, depending on who's asking, to fool the public into trusting me, with the intent of stopping a Corbyn government at all costs' 
Who needs a referendum? They've just stripped our parliament. #DissolveTheUnion 
In spite of the referendum fraud, in spite of the collusion with foreign powers, in spite of the rise of the far-right - Theresa May continues to drive the UK to the cliff edge where economic doom is certain... #BrexitShambles #EUWithdrawalBill #BrexitBill 
Just so delighted to recall that “Brexit Means Brexit”. Glad such an informed consensus has been built on a detailed prospectus and rigorous plan. 
...the Brexiters wanted to give Ministers a passport to crash out with no deal, if MPs don’t accept the PM’s #Brexit deal. Parliament said ‘no way’ today - hence the big concession. A good day for parliamentary democracy. 
It's been a day of wrangling and compromise, but the government has dodged a major #Brexit defeat on the #EUWithdrawalBill. 
It isn’t about Brexit any more, not that anyone could say what that was about. Now it’s just about keeping May and Corbyn in their jobs. 
The wheels are falling off the Brexit clown car. But so many remain MPs are still sat inside it screaming "LOOK I DON'T LOVE CLOWNS BUT THE PEOPLE MADE ME DRIVE A CLOWN CAR I MUST DRIVE THIS CLOWN CAR INTO THE SEA".History won't judge them kindly.  
Hard to feel anything but resentment for what happened tonight.Scotland didn’t elect the Tories.Didn’t want an EU Referendum.Didn’t vote to leave the EU.Didn’t back Theresa May’s Brexit.MSPs voted against losing devolved powers.Ignored by Westminster.#BrexitBill 
Today should have been....•Lee resignation followed by 5 or 6 more•On that momentum, a strong win for the meaningful vote•ERG sobbing into their vodka glasses•Brexit forced to calm the fuck down•Hoey deselectedReality is pretty poor in comparison. 
Britain's May defuses revolt in parliament over Brexit plans  
Pity the hardcore FBPE’ers who spent ages abusing Labour supporters and Corbyn on the Brexit votes. Turns out Labour don’t have a majority and it was actually down to the DUP and Tory rebels, who, barring two of them didn’t rebel (as usual). Maybe focus on them next time? pic.twitter.com/b7ZW8o8wN4 
Brexit is a series of needless self-inflicted public humiliations, driven by arrogance and incompetence.We threatened to block the EU. Then it turned out we actually couldn't do that. Now we are whining and begging.If you're going to make threats, at least do it competently.  
Once again so called "Rebel Tories" feted by FBPE voted with the govt against ammendments designed to prevent a Hard Brexit.Corbyn's Labour meanwhile voted for these ammendments and for a meaningful parliamentary vote.Its time for FBPE to realise who its true enemy really is. 
Meanwhile in the sane world, the anti brexit Libdems are cracking on trying to win even more council seats. If there was ever a reason to vote Libdem, it was the todays shit show #fbpe 
I'm not rehashing this. Brexit is the Tory's mess. They called the referendum, their top MPs campaigned for it and they are in charge of it now. Go talk to them about it. 
The fact that the Government left no time to discuss the implications of Brexit for the Irish border will not be lost on the people of Northern Ireland. I would imagine the people of Scotland will be making similar reflections. 
Currently dominating UK press: It’s been revealed how a Russian ambassador groomed those who funded the Brexit campaign with a sizable deal. The same exact Brexit campaign led by Steve Bannon elbow pimple/friend and trump worshipping fool, @Nigel_Farage. 
If today has shown anything it's this. Jeremy Corbyn can't & never has been able to stop Brexit. We need to put an end to that nonsense. What he can do is try & get in government so we can make the best of it. I'm a Remainer, it might not be popular opinion, but that's how it is. 
As we celebrate Parliament NOT having a ‘meaningful vote’ on #Brexit - would someone kindly remind me of the point of Gina Miller? #EUWithdrawalBill Gina is as pointless as 
Less than a month after Ireland’s major abortion referendum, Argentina is considering legalizing the procedure. Here's what to know  
Brexit is a wonderful moment for Britain and the wider world — but only if leaders make the most of it  
After today’s vote, there is now no chance of a ‘no-deal’ Brexit says Robert Peston:  
1 - not undermining the negotiations, 2 - not changing the constitutional role of Parliament and Government in negotiating international treaties, and 3 - respecting the referendum result. 
On the meaningful vote, we have agreed to look for a compromise when the EU (Withdrawal) Bill goes back to the Lords. The Brexit Secretary has set out three tests that any new amendment has to meet: 
Hear that sound of a can being kicked down the road? That’s the Tories’ Brexit plan. Ignore media spin of any victories for Theresa May. This is weak, weak, weak.Labour MPs overwhelmingly voted for a meaningful vote on a final deal. Tory MPs overwhelmingly voted against. 
Angry about the #EUWithdrawalBill? Join us, and tens of thousands of others, on June 23rd for the #PeoplesVoteMarch to demand a public vote on the #Brexit deal. Pledge to march with us at:  
This is total chaos!! This is definitely not how Tory rebels will be viewing today. May's lack of a majority means she has no authority over anyone which makes it practically impossible to negotiate and deal with Brexit. Shambles.  
My lasting impression of watching the brexit debate on parliamentTV (where you can watch what happens during divisions) was the sight of Frank Field an Kate Hoey palling up with Tory brexiteers and patting them on the back. 
well done Denis Skinner, the only labour mp to vote against the Brexit power grab.  
With one reckless tweet, Alastair Campbell accidentally reminds everyone why the Labour right is finishedBy @bexsumner #Brexit 
Thanks @joannaccherry for raising offensive conduct of Tory MP Ian Richard Peregrine Liddell-Grainger shouting "suicide" when @IanBlackfordMP asked Speaker what options were open to Scottish parliamentarians about their concerns over lack of time to debate Brexit & devolution. 
David Liddington smirking to Mundell after filibustering out any debate on the devolution amendments to the #Brexit bill.Absolutely disgusting.  
Italy, Ipsos poll:How would you vote in an eurozone membership referendum?Remain: 63% (+9)Leave: 37% (-9)Field work: 30/05/18 – 31/05/18Sample size: 1,002 
Any comment @acgrayling @campbellclaret @JolyonMaugham?It was OBVIOUS that Tory rebels were the key so why did you use all that political energy relentlessly attacking Corbyn? Assuming Brexit is your priority it is frankly mystifying  
Today we had thirteen votes on Brexit and I voted to get on with the job thirteen times.  The residents of North East Derbyshire spoke clearly in both 2016 and 2017 on this - and I'll keep voting to ensure Brexit happens.  The Govt must be given the space to negotiate. 
Strongly shambolic leadership as MPs vote on Brexit amendments | John Crace  
May offers rebels HUGE concession paving way for SOFT Brexit...  
Putin's geopolitical strategy has been highly effective. West pulling back from international commitments (Brexit, Iran Deal, etc). Russia has leveraged fact that many western whites value white supremacy over democracy into geopolitical gains. Internal US issues will increase.  
Don't be fooled by the Government winning all the Lords amendment votes.The Tories have caved on the Dominic Grieve amendment. As I see it. If the Government can't agree a deal by the end of November, MPs can take back control on Brexit negotiations. Win win for EU= A sell out. 
Just think about that for a minute. @IanBlackfordMP asks what options are open to Scottish MPs to get a proper debate on devolution & Brexit - after it was cut to 15 minutes - a Tory MP shouts ‘suicide’! Utterly appalling.  
 Arron Banks - we would 'lead people up the garden path if we had to' on Brexit.Time for a clean vote on the real options for ALL voters -  #PeoplesVote - march with us on 23rd June,meet at 12.00 Pall Mall. Please watch & share   
Grim. @joannaccherry asks Speaker whether, when discussing options for MPs seeking debate on devolution & #Brexit (denied today), it was disorderly for a Conservative to shout "suicide" across the chamber.  Speaker reprimands the MP for "distasteful" language. #euwithdrawalbill 
2/2 "Not undermining the negotiations, not changing the constitutional role of Parliament and Government in negotiating international treaties, and respecting the referendum result. We've not, and will not, agree to the Commons binding the Government's hands in the negotiations." 
Today Westminster said there was no time to discuss impact of Brexit on Ireland - any wonder more than 83% of people locally have no faith in Westminster to represent their concerns  
I still don't believe for one minute there'll be riots if Brexit runs into the sand. That line has always been horseshit. 
Yes and we need to start the ball rolling now!! Bring our ministers up the road and finish this now!! The terms are now crystal clear and that is that Scotland will be sacrificed for Brexit!! NOT ON!! WE WANT OUT.  
 Any final UK-EU withdrawal agreement will need to win the approval of the European Parliament according to Article 50. If it doesn't, there will be no deal.Watch our video to find out more about the European Parliament's key role in the #Brexit negotiations. #Article50 
More heat than light from Banks today but one of most interesting questions was about a £77m transfer between two Banks companies, which begs even more qs about where Banks wealth actually comes from, and how he could afford Brexit. Latest from @AdamRamsay and I 
No one who believes in democracy can do anything other than recoil with horror from a system which does not permit any debate at all on the devolved consequences of #Brexit.  @GovUK is a travesty and a disgrace.  How can any meaningful negotiation take place after that? 
"The European Commission do not want us to leave, they do not want to give us a good deal, they want to punish us."Labour's @KateHoeyMP says parliament "gave the people the right to have their say" on Brexit.  
So how you going to spin it now, @ThatTimWalker? @UKLabour wanted a meaningful vote on the deal. Tories didn’t. At every step of the way @Conservatives have been the architects & implementers of Brexit. Tell me: HOW can @jeremycorbyn stop Brexit. #EUWithdrawalbill 
The only way to save Brexit is for Theresa May to go. It has to happen now. 
In years to come Theresa May’s handling of Brexit will be studied as a classic in how not to negotiate. These betrayals are epoch-making.  
Just been told by a woman in my street in Plymouth I couldn't park outside her house because 'you weren't born in this country'. I'm SCOTTISH for fucks sake. Is it now the case that the English see other British people as immigrants? Fuck Brexit. 
There is less than one minute to go in the "debate" on #Brexit and devolved powers. The only speech that will be heard is from the Tory minister. Disgrace. 
This afternoon/evening I’ve voted against 11 Government #Brexit amendments that were debated for just 3 hours, and which now leaves <30 minutes to discuss devolution issues. @theresa_may & Co have denied any proper parliamentary scrutiny. #EUWithdrawalBill 
BREAKING NEWS: Theresa May and David Davis just announcing post-Brexit trade strategy: Fire missiles vaguely in the direction of the USA and call Trump archaic rude names until he gives us tens of billions of dollars and a favourable trade deal 
This is a waste of time.Bring our MPs home and call a referendum on dissolving the union. 
Scottish Tory Ross Thomson incenses the SNP by asking that if Donald Trump and Kim Jong Un can strike a deal, why can't Nicola Sturgeon with the UK Government on post-Brexit powers  - "is it because they only care about grievance and independence?" 
Parliament is before our eyes becoming a conspiracy against the referendum result. I can’t quite believe MPs and Peers going down this track  
#EUWithdrawalBill. A half-victory (after partial government back-down) on the key issue of allowing #Parliament to have a meaningful vote on the #Brexit deal. Does this mean that battle will resume in Lords and come back to Commons again? 
#EUwithdrawalbillDo people still actually want Brexit to happen 
Europeans haven’t given up hope that Britain will change its mind on Brexit  
You've got to hand it to Theresa May... faced with a back bench rebellion, she bravely avoided defeat by giving them exactly what they wanted...I'm sure she's the best person to negotiate Brexit. 
So, have the hysterical #FBPE brigade *finally* twigged what the rest of us have known for months?That if they want a second referendum, or to stop Brexit (ain’t gonna happen!), they need to go after the @CONservatives.#EUWithdrawalbill 
.@Nigel_Farage gives his take on the latest Brexit news and THAT summit between Donald Trump and Kim Jong Un. Watch:  
This would not be Brexit.  
This is sadly correct. If Con Remain MPs didn't trust May to get best Brexit deal they should have sought to switch her for PM they did believe in. Instead they've kept PMTM but cut her off at knees - with Brussels knowing Commons not behind her. Vandalous  
UK firms protect profits as Brexit looms, shifting costs onto employees (as they always do). In/out of EU never was UK workers’ problem: capitalism was and is.  
Corbyn's LAB will vote for 14 of the 15 amendments. All with good reason. None will be won because the Tories & DUP have a majority & the so called 'Tory rebels' are cowards. LAB want a jobs first, soft Brexit. The Tories want a hard Brexit. People will suffer.#EUWithdrawalBill 
Government just won every vote comfortably. #Brexit #Dontbelievethespin #Theproofisinthelobby 
It's all Jeremy Corbyn's fault, he could stop #Brexit at any time but he just doesn't bother. With the support of the Tory rebels, he could ... oh wait#EUWithdrawalBill 
Calm down everyone. #Brexit is in motion. We are leaving EU CU and SM. It’s happening. 
The government has survived some crucial votes over Brexit. Sky's Beth Rigby explains the concessions they've made to win.  
"Something was definitely starting to change this afternoon and that’s why they conceded." - Tory RebelThanks to the thousands of you that wrote to your MP and demanded that Parliament have a 'meaningful vote' on this Brexit deal!  
With Trump about to hammer the EU wouldn't it be a good time to leave the EU. . . .Dear God we had such a wonderful opportunity to be a great country again but May and those grasping treacherous sh1ts in parliament have sold out the brexit vote for personal gain. 
BREAKING: In a narrow vote, Parliament has voted to leave the running of the nation and the Brexit process in the hands of The Daily Mail, The Express and The Sun. 
If every leave area MP voted today, in the EU withdrawal bill, exactly how each of their constituencies voted in the referendum, it would be a big win every time for leave. MPs are clearly not representing their  constituents. 
Post Office unveil official Brexit commemorative stamp  
The fbpe/libdem blame Labour for Brexit bunkum is like a waiter insisting that Table A foot the bill for Table B, who left the restaurant without paying. It is an absolutely surreal situation to witness, and one which apparently intelligent people are pushing #bremainwingnuts 
Sick to the back teeth of parliament. What the hell has brexit got to do with them. We were asked to vote & we voted to leave the EU. They didn´t like it so they pissed us around for two years & now have just about scrapped the idea. Americans would never have taken this shite. 
Moment Tory MP strolls through anti-Brexit protest outside Parliament shouting ‘Go Brexit’ at Remoaners  
Every country in the world is a rule taker. The EU is itself a rule taker, and so too are its member states. Stop using 'rule taker' as a pejorative term to describe a certain Brexit position and open your eyes to reality. 
While we wait for Govt amendment on meaningful vote on Brexit one thing should be clear to Labour MPs fantasising about centrist party with Grieve, Soubry et al. They are Tories. They don't give a shit about your project. Capisce? 
Seems the #FBPE cultists who continually berate @jeremycorbyn over Brexit were barking up the wrong tree .It was the Tory "rebels" all along #EUWithdrawalbill 
Just voted for #Amendment19 to give Parlt a #MeaningfulVote on Brexit deal 
Only thing that could stop Brexit is to get Tories out of government, bring in Labour's policies to get the country back into shape, protect citizens' rights & livelihoods properly, change rhetoric on immigration & and address the structural poverty that drove many to vote Leave.  
I don’t believe the Brexit referendum voting slip provided an option for:“Give a minority Conservative government unlimited powers and end British Parliamentary sovereignty.”I think I’d have remembered something like that. 
Britain's May defeats rebellion in parliament over Brexit plans  
Six Labour MPs voted with the government against a meaningful Brexit vote:  Ronnie Campbell, Frank Field, Kate Hoey, Kelvin Hopkins, John Mann and Graham Stringer. 
Devolution to get a total of 15 mins as part of Brexit debate. No time for meaningful discussion or vote, will be taken up mostly by government minister. Complete farce. SNP MPs should walk out the chamber. 
Dave Brown on Parliamentary opposition to the Brexit Bill- Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
“I know that you’re all Remainers… You’ve got a vested interest in trying to discredit the Brexit campaign.” donor @Arron_banks criticises the MPs questioning him about the Brexit campaign and alleged links to Russia.  
Slowly, laboriously, TMay is inching towards a pretty soft Brexit that doesn't break up the gov or her party. Chance or design? Quite looking forward to the papers in 20yrs time, I can tell you. 
Just found out that @Anna_Soubry caved in and voted with May. So all those fucking idiots praising her for her brave anti-Brexit stance look like even bigger fucking idiots. When will you learn? Tories don’t revolt against their paymasters. #EUWithdrawalBill #fuckingidiots 
So, remarkably, No 10 coming out of this quite well. Remainer rebels think they have victory while an ERG source tells me it was Part C of Grieve amendment (parliament can direct Brexit if no deal by Feb 15) that was “least welcome” (the bit the government hasn’t conceded on) 
Hello #FBPEsHope you’re all having a great day.Do you now understand Labour, Corbyn, cannot stop Brexit?The Tory ‘rebels’ should’ve been your target.You’ve wasted your time.Regards. 
Met 2 Irish senators in Westmin tonight .. so asks "Would you guys given all this (Brexit chaos) like to still be in UK like Scotland" ... They were very certain independence best. 
The British Imperial Labour party have collaborated with the Tories for 40 years to sell Scotland out in exchange for Ermine robes. Brexit is no different 
Not a single victory won by the government on the #EUWithdrawalBill will make Brexit any less destructive. Not a single job will be saved. Not a single bankruptcy avoided. MPs have voted to make the nation poorer, and have threatened the ongoing existence of the United Kingdom. 
This afternoon I have voted for a #Amendment19 which would give Parliament a #MeaningfulVote on draft Brexit deal, against undemocratic ministerial power grab, and against a fixed ‘exit day’ #EUWithdrawalBill 
Media salivating all day about a possible defeat for Gov over #Brexit.It turns out the Gov won easily, by 26 votes.Biased  anti #Brexit media can't hide their disappointment.On such an important vote why did 28 MPs not vote? 
We deeply regret that the UK has decided to leave the EU. But the EU27 will stand united to preserve the interest of European citizens in this very difficult #Brexit negotiation. Thank you @MichelBarnier for your work & report to the @EPPGroup today. 
With every Brexit vote, we should be bloody terrified this is the nature of our political debate. Dissent equals traitor. Difference deserve violence. Hang your heads in shame, Farage and Dacre.  
Will more ministers follow Phillip Lee and resign over direction of Brexit? Let’s get rid of all the Remoaners!  
My conclusion from today, as so often before, is that May is good at surviving at home -  by putting off hard choices and making concessions. Not clear this works so well in Brussels, where she is being driven to a soft Brexit of transition, CU and much of SM 
"There is growing evidence which shows that the Brexit policy our government is currently pursuing is detrimental to the people we are elected to serve."Conservative MP Phillip Lee explains why he has resigned as justice minister.  
It's starting to look like the hordes of FBPErs who desended on every mention of Corbyn for months were wasting their time. Like we all knew they were. Labour can't stop Brexit. 
If I had known about the Brexit tragedy, I would not have moved to the UK.If I were younger, not here for 23 years, I would have asked my wife for us to move to France (nearly happened over 20 years ago and again more recently).Now, I'll stay until kicked out. 
So much for Brexit being about “taking back control of democracy”, the government just rejected parliamentary sovereignty by denying MPs the right to a meaningful vote. Absurd. #EUWithdrawalBill 
It all depends on the concessions now, but they’ll obviously be weaker than the Lords’ amendment. Once again, when Parliament is asked if it wants to control this hopeless Government’s cack-handed Brexit, it shrugs and say’s “Nah, not so much thanks” 
If WW1 was lions led by donkeys, Brexit is donkeys led by asses. I hold the Westminster parliament in utter contempt.  
The SNP is voting to prevent the UK leaving the EU after a referendum. It is therefore obviously justified for Pro UK parties to prevent Scotland from leaving the UK after a referendum. Rather stuffs the SNP doesn't it? 
The Government has won by 26 votes and defeated the Lords Amendment for a ‘meaningful vote’ by MPs on the final Withdrawal Bill. Great news! The only ‘meaningful vote’ was the verdict of the people in Referendum of 23rd June 2016. 
If obsessive Remainers spent half as much effort putting pressure on the Tories, as they do attacking Labour, we might actually win one of these key Brexit votes one day..It's almost as if mitigating Brexit comes secondary to Corbyn bashing....  
Hope you feel even more stupid today, @acgrayling.It is the @CONservatives and them alone who “keeps the Brexit nightmare going”. #EUWithdrawalbill 
14 Remainer rebels were given personal assurance just now by @theresa_may that their concerns about MPs getting proper say on final Brexit arrangements - a "meaningful vote" - would be met in new government amendment. Just enough to have defeated government today, by a squeak! 
Too many Tories/rebels putting fear of a democratically elected Corbyn govt before allowing Parliament a #MeaningfulVote on #Brexit P*ss poor #PaperTigerRebels 
BREAKING: Prime Minister Theresa May wins vote in parliament on #Brexit, compromises to avoid rebellion  
Theresa May has met with 16 Tory rebels to make a deal as long as they voted with the government. This means No Deal is better than a Bad Deal off the table. She has sold us and Brexit down the river, she may have won the battle today, but she has lost the war a disgrace to us. 
Govt wins critical amendment vote - but at what cost?  Has May made yet more concessions to the enemies of Brexit?  Probably. Never in our worst nightmares could we have imagined how a British government could destroy such a strong negotiating position.  
MPs have voted against the Lord's amendment to have a meaningful vote. Brexit was supposed to be about taking back control, ensuring decisions are made in Westminster with full parliamentary scrutiny. Sad day. 
The Tories just voted to prevent giving Parliament more say over a future withdrawal deal–locking power in the hands of the PM & her chaotic Cabinet.Hugely damaging decision, which I fear increases the risk of a destructive hard Tory Brexit. But we must keep fighting  
So given the disdain shown towards Scotland at WM today, how do we get consent for a second Indy referendum?Somehow I don't think "pretty please" will work. 
Hope we don't live to regret Tory MPs buying Theresa May's assurances on a Brexit "meaningful vote" instead of voting for taking back control and Parliamentary sovereignty 
We just lost the right for Parliament to have a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal. So much for Parliamentary sovereignty. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Two earth-shaking moments in British and Canadian Parliament committees today investigating the Facebook/CambridgeAnalytica/SCL/AIQ — Bannon/Mercer/Farage —Brexit/Trump transnational voter data/fake news investigations. You absolutely must watch the clips in the thread below. 
So that’s it. Meaningful vote on #Brexit voted down 324 to 298. Words fail me  
Yes!Govt *wins* motion to reject Lords Amendment No 19 to #EUWithdrawalBill (which would have both given MPs a say on final deal *and* power to halt Brexit without a deal – the ‘Hotel California’ amendment, thus keeping us in #EU indefinitely) by 324 votes to 298.Huge result. 
Delighted that the Government has agreed to introduce an amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill which will give Parliament the voice I always wanted it to have in the Brexit process. This justifies my decision to resign and makes it a lot less painful. 
The Government has approved the holding of a referendum to remove the offence of blasphemy from the Constitution. It is expected to take place in October, possibly on the same day as the Presidential election. 
One big outcome from today’s circus = no deal Brexit just about dead. Government compromise gives MPs power to veto it. The threat of UK walking out of talks no longer serious (not that Brussels thought it was anyway). Rees Mogg & co truly on the back foot — how do they respond? 
So it looks like the Tories won’t have to wait for Brexit to destroy the UK, they are doing it in the HoC right now. This is the day British democracy is shown to be an empty vessel. What a sad day for the nations. 
Statement from @CharlieFlanagan: Referendum on removal of the offence of blasphemy will take place - possibly as soon as October. 
Does Parliament work by “personal assurance” now? By a PM whose gov’t has done nothing but lie and try to spin its way through #Brexit? @sarahwollaston @Sandbach #EUWithdrawalBill 
Brexit vote: Victory as Tory rebels back down on threat to challenge May over vote  
Arron Banks - "The Leave campaign was outgunned in every possible way. You had the battleship of a campaign, but you chose the wrong strategy......and the reason you did that is you didn't understand the underlying issues that were driving the #Brexit referendum."  
WORRYING: Theresa May does deal with Tory rebels that Commons will be able to direct Brexit negotiations if there’s no deal by November 30th this year.And within 7 days of May agreeing Brexit deal, a motion to approve the deal must go to Commons. 
A Brexit that leaves the UK half in, half out would be a disaster. As one of Britain’s many friends abroad, please accept my assurance that you don’t need a customs union to prosper, says former Australian Prime Minister @TonyAbbottMHR 
Yet again the actual opposition to a disastrous Brexit isn’t the Leader of the Opposition or even the main Opposition party, but the Conservative back benches.  
I've always feared Brexit would lead to fascism & this is a big step along the way. Although I sympathise, no MP should give into threats...otherwise the fascists have won & will threaten more. The MP must get protection, vote with their conscience or resign.  #EUWithdrawalBill 
We’ve now entered dictatorship arena . Our democracy has been overturned and power handed to a few entitled men in a back room under the guise of the ‘ will of the people’. Remind anyone of anything ? If you’re not terrified , you’re not paying attention. #Brexit  
How the hard Brexit bores and the toff-owned tabloids are trying to bring East European-style "democracy" to Britain...  
LATEST: MPs vote on Lords Brexit blocking amendments.The government has won a vote blocking the removal of the exact time and date of Brexit. 
As more and more shit is exposed and coming to the fore in the brexit debacle... does anybody actually think that brexit is or ever was any good for britain and its citizens... seems to me that its hugely destructive and so not what was voted for or promised 
The "Will of the People" is a concept being used now as the fascists used it, to delegitimise opposition to the government. We must work tirelessly to erase this wholly anti-democratic notion from our political culture.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
The right wing press barons are part of a Kleptonationalist axis stretching from Trump to Putin via #Brexit and the nationalist right, whose disparate elements are united in the goal of destroying liberal democracy.We are now engaged in a fight to defend democracy!#StopBrexit 
Gerard Batten MEP - "Theresa May is a Remainer who doesn’t really want to leave and as you have found out she couldn’t negotiate her way out of a wet paper bag." #Brexit  
#FBPE: "The 'Tory rebels' will save us from the nasty Brexit! Oh shit. They've voted with the government. Again.I know. Let's blame Corbyn!.......FFS.....Sigh!!! #EUWithdrawalBill 
Follow the logic with me:People voted for Brexit because they didn't trust the establishment to act in the interests of the people.And throughout the Brexit process, all we've seen is the establishment acting against the interests of the people.#EUWithdrawalBill 
Here we go Dominic Grieve now effectively in charge of Brexit legislation. It’s death by 1,000 cuts. A really nasty establishment stitch-up.  
Ken Clarke is right.Brexit is being rammed through the House of Commons - forcing MPs to scrutinise 200 Lords amendments to the EU Bill in just one sitting.Brexiters are manipulating parliamentary sovereignty to get their own way.#EUWithdrawalbill 
Nothing says 'taking back control' like handing over massive constitutional powers to a party that couldn't get elected on its hard Brexit manifesto and had to bung a bunch of religious bigots £1bn to stay in government. 
Most nauseating aspect of #EUWithdrawalBill debate so far, apart from diehard Remainers disingenuously trying to pretend their aim is *not* stopping Brexit, was Soubry & Wollaston fawning praise on Phillip Lee resignation as junior minister to defy wishes of his own constituents 
Dover, this twit is your MP. Be afraid of his #Brexit,  be very afraid.  
If Stephen Kerr MP had a thumping majority, and his constituency voted Leave I could understand his obsession with a hard, no deal Brexit.But Stirling votes 67% Remain, and he only scraped in by 100 votes. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Justice minister Phillip Lee has just “shocked colleagues by resigning over the Government’s Brexit policy.”Ministers cannot hold their jobs & oppose Govt policy. Apparently he wants to speak his mind. That’s all we know right now.   
No deal Brexit looks exactly like the Brexit I voted for   #EUWithdrawalBill 
Brexit, and everything about it, belongs entirely to the @CONservatives. To all those hysterically demanding @jeremycorbyn “stop Brexit”, do you NOW, finally, realise why he can’t? The path the Shadow Brexit team have pursued, led by @Keir_Starmer, has been entirely right. 
Nothing angers Brexiteers committed to the principles of Parliamentary sovereignty & elected representatives taking back control more than when Parliament exercises its sovereignty and takes back control. #Brexit  
The referendum vote wasn't about a bad deal or otherwise. It wasn't about a deal at all. It was a vote 2 leave. Whatever it takes. Who do these people think they are 2 say we can't leave without a deal? Of course we can. Just fucking do it. We don't need a deal; we need to leave.  
The #EUWithdrawalBill could have been one of the most important moments in post War history and effectively killed a hard brexit in its tracks. Debate went on for hours and this man said.... Absolutely nothing.  
We've been quiet for too long. The fight back starts now. On July 5th, Manchester will be host to the first Left Against Brexit event - starting a nationwide tour. Join us:  
We already had a #MeaningfulVote - the referendum!  
But the fbpe brigade told me all Corbyn had to do was oppose Brexit and all the Tories would revolt and it would be all over. How are they gonna spin this to be his fault? 
Today and tomorrow, Labour plan to frustrate Brexit by voting against key legislation in Parliament. If you want them to respect the result, tell them. 
The voting has begun, and yet there's been barely a scrap of debate on the substance of many of these technical & crucial amendments, including on Parliamentary scrutiny. It's Brexit in a nutshell - ill-informed, misunderstood, rushed through for no sensible reason. 
With the honourable exception of some brave souls on all benches it seems the vast majority of MPs have chosen party over country.When people are hit by Brexit induced poverty they will be furious and not many MPs will have the political credibility left to lead. 
It was the duty of the @BBCNews to rigorously question and examine #Brexit and those promoting it, to test whether it matched up to the many promises, and was fit for purpose. In this task the BBC has absolutely and totally failed. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
MPs vote 324 to 302 to disagree with a Lords amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill, meaning the amendment fallsIt would have given extra scrutiny to statutory instruments used to amend EU law retained after Brexit 
We haven’t had a functioning parliament since the day it voted for Article 50. It’s time everyone accepted this and stopped fannying around with the belief this is same as other issues which have been reversed. Brexit is on, it will be hard, and it changes everything permanently. 
Deal is: Govt agrees the Commons will be able to direct Brexit negotiations if no deal by November 30 this year. A veto ceded to MPs on how it proceeds from then onwards. That's a BIG climb down. 
So May looks set to win and lose. She will win today’s vote on “meaningful vote” in a few minutes but she has had to concede - as a result of pressure from Grieve and @DrPhillipLeeMP - that parliament will have more meaningful vote on Brexit (will be written into bill in Lords) 
I can't believe that anyone in Scotland watching the absolute clusterfuck that is Brexit and the way the fascists in the Tory party (and their billionaire pals) are totally undermining the democratic process, could still vote to be part of this Union. 
Me when people tweet at us that our MP said something else ridiculous re Brexit  
No wonder we are still hooked on Dad’s Army – in Brexit Britain we are reliving it  
The Government’s shambolic Brexit negotiations are putting our economy, our jobs and our rights at risk. That’s why we’ll be using the vote in Parliament this week to ensure Britain gets a better Brexit deal. Here’s our plan #EUWithdrawalBill 
Brexit Minister @Feorlean says there are sanctions that could be applied if the UK Govt ignores Holyrood's refusal to consent to the EU Withdrawal Bill. They will have to look at how they work with "such an intransigent, impossible group of people" 
This is not the kind of society we believed Britain to be. Brexit has brought out the very worst in our society, the very worst.  
Heated debate in Lords today on Government removing anti-Brexit Tories from committees. Disgraceful abuse of power. Government won by just 4, & only because Labour front bench abstained - as it now routinely does rather than oppose Brexit, alas 
Owen Smith and Mike Gapes heckling their colleague Frank Field for having the temerity to point out that voters in Labour constituencies backed Brexit. 
Looks like Chief Whip has bought off moderate Tories with promise of “structured discussions” on the Grieve amendment. That doesn’t sound very water tight to me. #Brexit Bill. #meaningfulvote 
A couple of MPs have warned against sending our Brexit team "naked to the negotiating room". But maybe that should be our strategy. Tell Brussels to give us what we want or Davis removes the thong. 
WATCH | "We're now having debates on things like 'meaningful votes', but we already had a meaningful vote - the referendum!" @CharlieElphicke voted Remain but now he respects the will of the people, like a true democrat! Support us at  
WATCH @AndreaJenkyns: Brexit Legend  
Austria, OGM poll:European Union membership referendumRemain: 56% (-11*)Leave: 44% (+11*)* compared to the Austrian European Union membership referendum 1994Field Work: N/ASample Size: N/A#Brexit #Österreich #Austria 
Proud (& loud) to be one of the 17.4 million people who voted for #Brexit. Democracy will prevail!  
Let them celebrate. Everyone needs an occasional break.Mueller and his team are steadily working away.British Parliment is holding tough hearings on the Brexit/Russian/CA ties.The Parkland kids are rolling out a voter registration bus tour.And Manafort's heading for jail. 
These #EUWithdrawalBill amendments illustrate once again how there is no organised opposition to Brexit in parliament. The majority of voters, businesses and experts are all against Brexit. It is already harming the UK. And yet this majority is not represented by the opposition. 
Right that @KateHoeyMP highlights that the Lords amendment is little more than an attempt to wreck, frustrate and ultimately overturn the referendum result 
And again: no version of the "meaningful vote" amendment would allow the Lords alone to "stop Brexit". It's unfortunate that Ms Hoey feels the need to resort to false statements.  
Not only would the meaningful vote amendment give Barnier a free pass to walk all over the UK, it would allow Parliament to reverse Brexit, as Labour, Vince Cable, and the Lords who proposed it have admitted. MPs cannot in good faith support it  
Tory minister wanting second Brexit referendum who resigned; "Sometimes when a majority of our people want something that is against the good of society, government and parliament have a responsibility to protect us."Because fuck democracy! 
Aside from the hyperbole involved, this is a somewhat difficult argument for Grieve and others who have just been telling the House that rebellion today is *not* about rejecting Brexit.  
Labour's Kate Hoey warns that the public will "see through" the Lords amendment, which she argues is about reversing the referendum result and preventing the people taking back control - she’s bang on.They might think we’re all thick and will look past this, we won’t. 
'people, economy and culture' badly affected by Brexit, says resigning minister Philip Lee. what is clear from this debate is that the country is not coming behind this government's version of Brexit 
Kate Hoey MP proudly speaking in favour of a destructive Brexit her constituents didn’t vote for #EUWithdrawalBill 
To all of the people bigging up @Anna_Soubry today because of her fine words about the dangers of hard-right Brexit, just remember that she actually voted in favour of Theresa May's hard-right anti-democratic EU Withdrawal Bill at the 1st stage. 
Kate Hoey: "People in the country want to see Brexit done well." Millions of us want to see it not done at all, you hopeless sham of an MP. #WithdrawalBill 
Labour Leaver Kate Hoey says she is rebelling against her own party by not backing the Lords on a meaningful vote - says it is dressed up as parliamentary democracy but they really want to stop #brexit - it is disingenuous she says  
I welcome the Government's acceptance of family reunion for child refugees post-Brexit. This has always been a cross-Party effort, with particular support from @nickymorgan01 @heidiallen75 @yvettecoopermp @sheehanshas to name a few #EUWithdrawalBill@safepassageuk 
A great shame to watch members of my own party tell the British people they didn’t know what they was voting for. This is a clear attempt to frustrate Brexit and undermine our Government.  #EUWithdrawalBill 
#EUWithdrawalBill  We voted leave EU 17 million people. We’re leaving The Single Market & The Customs Union. Stop bloody trying to derail BREXIT. 17 million fed up with this nonsense. Just grow backbone get on with it. Today’s politicians couldn’t organise a pissup in a brewery.  
Parliament's betrayal of the people is not courageous, it's shameful. You're not delivering Brexit, just treading water, wasting time and saddling the UK with a watered down (non) Brexit.  
.@DrPhillipLeeMP: Brexit policy being pursued by our government detrimental to our constituents. Crikey 
Phillip Lee now likening Brexit to the death penalty. Says MPs have a duty to reject it, however popular it may be with public 
Brexit bill negotiations enter frantic final hours - Come on MPs back putting yourselves in control! Back the meaningful vote amendment!   
If you believe a #peoplesvote would stop Brexit then you're effectively admitting that the will of the people isn't behind it anymore.It really is that simple.#EUWithdrawalBill 
British Constitution Rule No. 1: Parliament is sovereign.  Parliament could itself reverse Brexit or order a public vote and give the decision to the people. The executive answers to Parliament, which represents of 'the will of the people'.  
Arron Banks, the ugly face of Brexit: "The immigration issue was the one that set the wildfires burning, that’s why we did that."  
Anna Soubry intervention extraordinary - talking of death threats and police protection against MPs based on Brexit stance, saying attempt to silence people “must stop”  
Never forget that Anna Soubry has cause untold harm to her constituency through her unflappable support of austerity. So, if you are against Brexit but for a better Britain championing her is like making a serpent your friend.  #EUWithdrawalBill 
Government faces hugely difficult decision: cave and accept Grieve amendment, and win vote - though concede there is no possibility of no-deal Brexit; or stand firm and face humiliation of loss, and of ceding negotiating sovereignty to MPs 
Irony is truly dead when Anna Soubry can furiously shout about Cabinet Ministers undermining the Government when she (and Ken Clarke) have rebelled against the Government on Brexit at almost every opportunity in the last 18 months 
No @Anna_Soubry..with all due respect this isn't about what you believe in...its about what the people who voted in a democratic proccess believed in & selected.. this isn't about your constituency..it's about the total electorate which voted #Brexit .. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Breaking: Barnier just confirmed EEA+CU is possible for future relationship.Hugely inferior to membership IMHO, but undoubtedly the least damaging form of Brexit. @Keir_Starmer @hilarybennmp @IanDunt @joncstone @JenniferMerode 
UK Democracy?Yes/No Referendum with no detail or planGovt with 49% of seats from 42% of votesUnelected House of LordsTory Govt controlled by ideological extremistsLords & Parliament over-ruling each other88% of national newspapers backing right wingWe need a big shake up 
Wow. @Anna_Soubry tells Commons that one of her anti-hard Brexit colleagues had to attend public engagement with SIX armed undercover cops cos of death threats 
That Rees-Mogg plan in full:- Parl votes down the deal- no confidence motion- 14 days passes (cf Fixed Term Parliaments Act)- there is a general election- a new Government forms- it formulates a policy on what to do on Brexit But it doesn't matter 'cause we're already out.  
Anna Soubry just stated that her constituents didn't vote for a 'Hard Brexit' before stating that 52% of her constituency voted leave. So what type of Brexit did they vote for? #EUWithdrawalBill 
“It is based on the proposition that out there on the continent they don’t know there are divisions in the cabinet.”Conservative Ken Clarke rejects the argument that voting against the government’s Brexit bill will undermine the Prime Minister in negotiations with the EU.  
Dominic Grieve: The irrationality of the debate on the details of brexit is truly chilling.. as a result the ability to have a rational debate is evaporating. If we don't achieve a deal at all.. we will face an immense crisis & this will be catastrophic#FBPE #EUwithdrawalbill 
Probably the most telling - and least surprising - bit of this debate on the EU Withdrawal Bill is David Davis admitting he hasn't had a chance to properly read Dominic Grieve's amendment. He's only the Brexit Secretary, to be fair. 
Attended a workshop today led by one of the world’s largest economics consultancies. Brexit came up. Their view: 15 studies done on impact, 1 by a bunch of lunatics, other 14 agree. More consensus among economists that Brexit is disastrous than among scientists on climate change. 
Breitears thought we'd roll over after the referendum.Hello Britain... We're still here.  
What a finale to my #Remainathon adventure! I was in a black cab chatting to the Leave voter cabbie about Brexit when he spotted a car with Lord Heseltine. Bless him, he kept up with it to Euston & refused to take the fare so I could speak to him! Lord H says we can #StopBrexit ! 
You should tell them very clearly: Brexit is an internal Tory psychodrama which got out of hand and is now ravaging the sovereignty you thought you were taking back control of.  
The Stop Brexit protesters, camped opposite parliament for most of the last two years, have a new hero  
I intervened on @EdwardLeighMP: We had many hours of debate and decisive votes before we sent the article 50 letter. That is the point when Parliament decided to back the referendum. We can’t keep chopping and changing. #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
To me the most frightening question of all is, why is it worth so much to them to make Brexit happen? What can justify this complete trashing of everything that used to be regarded as principled and moral? 
.@M_AndersonSF Tells the European Parliament @Europarl_EN meeting in Strasbourg that the British Government doesn't care about the people in Ireland and that the DUP does not represent the people in the North on Brexit.  
“I need more time to think” the Solicitor General for England tells Dominic Grieve, the Brexit debate presumably having crept up on him unexpectedly. #BrexitChaos 
Brexit is already damaging our economy, reveal the latest growth stats from the OECD.The Brexit we were promised is impossible to deliver. This is exactly why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal:  
Remainer-stuffed Parliament is on a collision course with the very people it is supposed to represent:  #Brexit 
“All this #Bill does - it is not the #EU Negotiating Bill - it is simply to implement the will of the people. #Parliament! Don’t stand in the way  of the will of people! Implement their will!” says #Tory #Brexiteer #SirEdwardLeigh!  #BBC #SKY #LBC #Brexit 
Government in form of Brexit minister Buckland is negotiating with Grieve on meaningful vote in course of debate. Very nineteenth century, and shows how worried ministers are they about to lose 
Rees Mogg says the remedy here would be a vote of no confidence, if a Government has confidence, it should be allowed to negotiate treaties...Grieve says that would mean triggering a General Election five weeks before a cliff edge Brexit 
Stirling voted 67% to remain in the EU. 33,112 people. 18,291 people voted for Stephen Kerr (37.1%)He has a majority of just 148. Stephen is backing BREXIT. 1 of 13 Scottish rubber stamps for Theresa May.  
Grieve: The irrationality of the debate we are having on the details of Brexit is truly chilling - House is legitimately looking at the details, the ability to have rational debate evaporates.. No deal will be catastrophic  
How is our economy doing since the Brexit vote? We are told it's booming but the reality is...  
"I really am worried, the irrationality of the debate we are having on details of Brexit is truly chilling." 
I suppose we should be grateful that DExEU Ministers have seen fit to return to the front bench after a 30 minute absence   during the critical debate on the EU withdrawal bill. Hardly showing respect for Parliament. #Brexit #FBPE 
If Parliament can vote against Brexit, they could do the same if the SNP won indyref2 Makes such referendums pointless doesn't it? No point having them 
The real threat to democracy comes from those who use the terms traitor & enemy towards ppl holding different views to their own.  #Brexit  
Brexiters very often talk about Remainers trying to refight the referendum. Honestly I don;t see a single one in the Commons doing that, but every single Leaver seems to be. 
BREXIT: Life moves pretty fast.  
Have written to MPs urging them to defeat Tory amendment on border infrastructure and to support Lords amendments on Single Market & Customs Union + Labour on meaningful vote. Urgently need a plan and not just a vision to change course of Brexit negotiations #EUWithdrawalBill 
Labour MP @JohnMannMP: Labour voters in the Midlands and the North voted in large numbers to leave the EU. How will we explain to them that an unelected House of Lords - if their amendments are passed - can overturn both the Commons and the referendum?  
On the day a neo-Nazi terrorist pleads guilty to plotting to murder a Labour MP, and a Tory MP claims at least one MP won't vote as they wish on the Brexit bill because of threats, these headlines are beyond irresponsible.  
Over half-way through the 3 hours allowed for debate on 6 of the Lords amendments, & so far only the Brexit Secretary, the Labour & SNP shadow ministers & Ken Clarke have made speeches. Simply ludicrous to cram so many important issues into such a short debate. #EUWithdrawalBill 
Brexit donor Arron Banks admits giving Trump campaign phone number to Russian government  
Cameron called #Brexit ref simply to shut up a few Tory rebels in his own party.Few ppl held strong feelings  beforehand. There'd been no protests or marches, there was just a jumped up berk called Farage making waves that r/w agitators jumped on.#Brexit, is a nation conned 
Some progress on @AlfDubs campaign! Help us keep up pressure to stop Govt cutting help for child refugees after Brexit. Govt has just accepted my amendment (ii) to let lone child refugees join aunts & uncles. Now need pressure for my amendment (i) to stop siblings being separated  
If every leave area MP voted today, in the EU withdrawal bill, exactly how each of their constituencies voted in the referendum, it would be a big win every time for leave. MPs are clearly not representing their  constituents. 
Interesting to observe that whilst my colleague @PeterGrantMP speaks on behalf of @theSNP, 3rd party & biggest party in Scotland, Secretary of State has left his seat on front bench & is chatting, back turned to house. So much for the respect agenda #Brexit 
Had Tories like #kenclark argued so eloquently against austerity that their government imposed on working Britain as they do Brexit, parliament wouldn't be debating today the #EUWithdrawalBill b/c the referendum wouldn't have tipped us into the clutches of the extreme right wing 
A voice of sanity from the North. Watch John Mann’s powerful intervention in today’s Commons Brexit debate.While Tory traitor MPs scheme with the opposition to undermine Brexit and shamefully betray millions of voters, some MPs like Mann bravely stand up for what is right.  
This is ludicrous - Express splash makes clear consequences will be at election time. Remain now wish to block Brexit AND shackle the press.  
Brexit is a big deal, not a done deal.We're taking our #PeoplesVote message to the streets - and we'll be taking to the streets with our march on June 23rd. Will you be there?  
Central to an understanding of Brexit...  
Romanian MEP tell me to “go home”. I will once we’ve got real #Brexit. Perhaps he’d like some of his countrymen back?  
Whipping Labour MPs to abstain on #Brexit EEA amendment is whipping MPs to support Theresa May & her Government,  against best interests of Labour votersHow did Labour find itself in this position? 
Ken Clarke on #Brexit ‘I have never known such a weak parliament’ and urges MPs to take control if they don’t like the final deal  
Ken Clarke demolishes absurd Davis argument against Parliamentary control over course of Brexit: “Leave would not have won if voters had been told ‘you are voting to give power to the govt to do anything it wants’” 
This is a false statement. No version of the "meaningful vote" amendment would give the Lords alone the power to revoke Brexit.  
No collusion though, right @realDonaldTrump ? "Brexit funder Arron Banks handed the Russian ambassador a telephone number for Donald Trump’s team after his election win - because the Russians wanted to get hold of the transition team”.Traitors & Liars 
Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP opens the debate on the EU Withdrawal Bill: 'This Bill has a simple, clear purpose - ensuring the whole of the United Kingdom has a functioning statute book on the day we leave the European Union' 
"The Lib Dems will be seeing to push to a vote a final say on the Brexit deal. That is what people want and that is what people deserve" @thomasbrake heading in to vote on #EUWithdrawalBill 
Look, @Theresa_May is taking us in circles. Why leave the #EU only to try and get back what we've already got? No, we can't find an answer either. This video in 15 seconds explains why #Brexit makes no sense. Please RT.  
I will be gutted if Brexit is blocked, on the other hand it will reveal that all these years we have not actually been living in a democracy 
Any Labour MP who votes to let this Government carry on with Brexit negotiations unchecked by Parliament should be stripped of the whip and deselected. It's not a Remain/ Leave thing - it's basic refusal to do your job, and grossly irresponsible. 
Great to see a growing number of .@UKLabour MPs led by @frankfieldteam @KateHoeyMP and @JohnMannMP coming out for a proper Brexit! Old Labour coming back! 
Before people harp on about how much integrity Phillip Lee has for resigning over Brexit, might be worthwhile having a peek at his voting record #justsaying 
There will be literally no continuing purpose to MPs who cave in to govt depriving them of any power over direction of #Brexit. If they vote to deny themselves a meaningful vote, there is absolutely no point to them as so-called democratic representatives 
John Mann, Lab MP: how will we explain to the people an unelected House of Lords had overturned their decision in referendum? 
I urge you, people, to watch the debate on the BBC Parliament TV channel on the #EUWithdrawalBill and you will witness some appalling treachery of MPs who are confusing the whole issue with one aim - to block #Brexit All Blairites are totally in the pockets of the EU. 
UKIP leader slams PM on Brexit. Here’s how it should have been handled. #ForTheNation 
UK Gov with all sorts of excuses to avoid a “meaningful vote” on Brexit deal ... which would be really ironic if each of the 27 member states and the Euro Parl does but the UK Parl at Westmin doesn’t! :)) 
WATCH: @MPphilwilson makes the excellent point that the PM put her hard Brexit plans to the public in a General Election last year & the British people rejected that. There is no mandate for a hard Brexit. #PeoplesVote 
For all their false rhetoric over the last year, today is the day that the 13 Scottish Tories really have the opportunity to do the right thing for Scotland. I suspect, however, that they will put party before country. #Brexit 
Labour's Shadow Brexit Minister @mtpennycook claims that no Lords have said that the purpose of the meaningful vote amendment is blocking Brexit. Here's one of the leading supporters of the amendment @Lord_Bilimoria saying that it is - twice 
Commission is trying to get UK to stay in a CU and fully aligned with the SM, including free movement. Effectively in EU (minus MEPs) thus stopping Brexit. Meaningful vote would help the EU, means it will offer the UK zero. Thank goodness May has prepped for No Deal. Oh... 
Looks as if females started turning their backs on Brexit sooner than and in larger numbers than men (shopping prices?), but both males & females now think it’s wrong to leave, from the YouGov tracker.Thanks to @soechristian for this excellent graph of cumulative YouGov polls. 
This morning, I asked @GregClarkMP to outline how Govt will secure the future of the automotive industry, which has seen such uncertainty over recent months & is now faced with further job losses, partly as a result of fears caused by potential of Govt's reckless 'no deal' Brexit pic.twitter.com/9GrGHm9i0P 
This is what courage and conviction look like. Country before party when you know the country is being damaged by government chose route. May other ministers and MPs find guts and leadership —— Justice minister Phillip Lee resigns over Brexit policy  
I voted and campaigned for remain and this afternoon I will be voting for Parliament to have  a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal. So I can vote down a rubbish Brexit deal. That is how I am reflecting the views of Bristol West. Standing up against terrible Tory Brexit  
Corbyn ‘ordering’ Labour MP’s to abstain on upcoming crucial Brexit votes would be laughable if it weren’t so seriously misguided. This from a man who voted against the Labour Government ‘97-‘10 countless times. I hope the majority have the guts to ignore him. #BrexitMeltdown 
I'll now omit every time DD loudly shouts about people trying to reverse the referendum btw, because it is tiresome. 
Commons: Intervention by Labour's Frank Field to say how much he supports the government in opposing a Lords' amendment to give Parliament more influence over the Brexit negotiations.Pathetic, from a member of the so called Opposition. 
Pleased to get the 1st intervention in on ⁦@DavidDavisMP⁩ #EUWithdrawalbill speech pointing out UK Govt breaking their pledge in #GreatRepealBill White Paper to make changes to retained #EU law by delegated legislation only where “necessary” #Brexit  
David Davis unable to say what a “meaningful vote” be about... a deal vs no deal OR a deal vs current status quo.Even at this stage no meaningful thinking on Brexit#UKshambles 
David Davis: people keep using the phrase "meaningful vote" but what they want is to reverse the result of the Brexit referendum 
So, in his response to me in the Commons just now, @DavidDavisMP admits his proposed fake meaningful vote amendment - which he wishes to replace the real meaningful vote amendment passed by the Lords - will give the Govt a passport to pursue a ‘no deal’ Brexit. 
Letters: The EU referendum vote explicitly meant leaving the single market and the customs union  
David Davis arguing @UKHouseofLords amendments to #EUWithdrawalBill are a threat to the #Brexit process - it's called parliamentary scrutiny. @ChukaUmunna right to call him out on it. 
“I know that you’re all Remainers… You’ve got a vested interest in trying to discredit the Brexit campaign.”’s Arron Banks criticises the MPs questioning him about the Brexit campaign and alleged links to Russia. 
On the Sun's "do not betray the people over Brexit" graphic, 24 out of 27 features actually represent Remain-voting areas.  
We did it A legal route to safety for child refugees in Europe is being kept open after Brexit. A special thank you to @AlfDubs @YvetteCooperMP @NickyMorgan01 & @heidiallen75 for your tireless campaigningThanks to everyone for standing up for a child's right to family reunion 
takeaways from this:1. lord adonis is the father of brexit2. lord adonis fucks 3. lord adonis has fucked a train at least once  
It's my job to vote today to try and limit the damage done by this government's reckless Brexit strategy. It's your job to march on London to stop this madness all together. @BathforEurope #ExitfromBrexit #FBPE 
DUP rejection of soft UK Brexit must mean NI special deal, says @StephenFarryMLA  
As anti immigration forces gather around Brexit, it's good to remind ourselves what we stand for. This beautiful film from @bemis_scotland goes to the heart of who we are and what Scotland wants to be - welcoming, inclusive and aw jock Tamson's bairns. 
We have a representative democracy. There is not one type of Brexit. There are lots of different options. Why should May, with a minority government decide without parliament not having a say? I would love to know what the will of the people is today. And why that is less valid. 
Today the Government have used parliamentary chicanery to rule out all prospect of a serious debate on the future of the Northern Ireland border. This is a scandal. So much for Parliament taking back control. #FBPE #Brexit 
Young People’s Minister @MareeToddMSP and I had a good discussion about young people’s involvement in , and views on #Brexit when @cisweb helped us launch the recruitment for the Children and Young People’s #Brexit panel which will inform @ScotGov on key issues. 
Ah, memories of the heady days of the Brexit campaign two years ago. Here am I on the phone to the Russian embassy  
So just to get this straight, #brexit was a vote to take back control by handing it unchecked to an unelected leader of a minority government which does not have to respond before Parliament or allow the people another chance to voice their opinion? #EUWithdrawalBill 
#PhillipLee is  someone who put country over party and that is a rare quality in politicians and business people today. #brexit  
Meet Phillip Lee MP - resigned today to destabilise Govt & thwart #Brexit: because it was 'wrong' for the British people to vote for Brexit.Lee voted to trigger Article 50.Bracknell: 53% LeaveIf you won't listen to your own voters, why did you even stand for election mate?  
Holy shit. I didn't know that the 2008 crash was only a 2% fall in GDP, and Brexit is predicted to be an 8% fall!! That's terrifying.  
This is where Brexit has brought us. And yet, we are urged to plough ever onwards.Shame on everyone indulging and promoting the fearmongering, that voting with one's conscience is somehow traitorous.  
Brexitear to me "after brexit we can pick our own expiry dates for our own food and not be dictated to by Brussels". Me "don't you have to put the date that the food actually expires? *silence* 
"After eight years of budget cutting, Britain is looking less like the rest of Western Europe and more like the United States, with a shrinking welfare state and spreading poverty."-@nytimes#austerity.... and now #Brexit.Both brought to you by the  @Conservatives#Article19 
Today's vote on the Brexit meaningful vote is the most important one over these next two days. It will decide whether Parliament has the final say on the EU Withdrawal Agreement. 
Brexit is going well.  
When Brexit happens, and it will, remember it was Jeremy Corbyn's Labour who enabled the tories to get it through parliament. 
Just voting against the Government’s attempt to curtail debate on #Brexit Bill to just 12 hours. On, as Vernon Bogdanor reminds us, the most important Commons debate since the Norway campaign debate in 1940.   
If you want the softest possible Brexit (or no Brexit), if you don't want us to crash out of the Single Market, if you think EEA option is best, START MAKING THE PRO-IMMIGRATION ARGUMENT YOUR PRIORITY. If ending FoM stays the big red line that can't be crossed, we get nothing. 
I should have added because some of my followers are younger than me (!) & appear not to know - the poll tax was abolished when it brought Thatcher down. Brexit disappears with Mrs May; just as Suez did with Eden & appeasement with Chamberlain  
To be clear, I did not steal "hacked" emails from Arron Banks. I was shown them and I then reported Mr Banks and Mr Wigmore to the authorities because it was concerning that LeaveEU officials were in discussions about Brexit and large financial deals with the Russian ambassador. 
Brexit.  
"If this is what taking back control looks like, I am amazed."WATCH: @Alison_McGovern on #AllOutPolitics today, calling for Parliament to have a say on the Brexit process ahead of tonight's votes.  
Philip Lee's behaviour is totally out of order. He was elected to represent his constituents & deliver the will of the British people. The 2017 @Conservatives Manifesto committed us to leaving the Single Market & Customs Union. He should lose the whip! #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
@Anna_Soubry goes public with rumour doing rounds: "at least one" MP will not vote with their conscience on Brexit today because of "threats to their personal safety, to a member of their parliamentary staff and members of their family" 
Well said Ashley. He backed Remain in the Referendum but has graciously accepted the Democratic result and is absolutely right to fully support the Government on this. All British Parliamentarians must put UK first.  
"We'll make a success of Brexit", says country where businesses can't sell things for a pound 
THREAD on the bizarrely ill-informed piece by @cjbickerton and Peter Ramsay on Brexit and the Irish Border. Demonstrating yet again how British elites understand little or nothing about Ireland (and don't want to waste time trying to gain understanding) 1 
The march last night against brexit. We are not going to let this go. We already a pain in the arse for leave, but we're organised and quite frankly... Just warming up. X#fbpe 
BBC News - David Davis says referendum 'irreversible' He can say what he likes. Doesn't make it true. They are all running scared because they know they are fighting a losing battle. Good job we're all intending to keep piling on the pressure! 
As @DrPhillipLeeMP quits over  a headless #Brexit, this morning's Matt feels *even* cleverer.@theresa_may is stuck. The Westminster votes are the mere illusion of progress. Britain is spinning political donuts...all smoke &  screeching tyres, but no actual forward momentum. 
‘@LeaveEUOfficial: “We look forward to seeing their representatives in Court.“Brexit will not be beaten, and neither will .” 
Non-binding. Non-binding. Non-binding. Now that the government knows it’s a fucking terrible idea, you just write a fucking cracking speech about how we’re all going to move forward with British chins held high and socks up and rah rah rah, & dump Brexit in the fucking bin.  
Friends of Lee tell me:Done on principle that he backs a meaningful vote, can’t back Government today.Not a coordinated effort, but many ministers share general concerns re Brexit strategy.Named a minister they think will follow soon.Expectations of a leadership contest. 
David Davis:Being inside Customs Union stops us making trade deals for ourselves.60% of UK trade is outside EU that’s where new jobs are coming from.EU Commission said 90% of future trade growth is outside #EU & we want to make something of that#Brexit 
Philip Lee accepts the Brexit result but wants to Remain in a Customs Union and wants to negotiate acess to the Single Market.His position is virtually the same as Jeremy Corbyn yet to FBPE he is the devil whilst any Tory like Philip Lee is Lauded.Total Hypocrites. 
Does #Brexit bother you at all? A poll to measure support/apathy vs active resistance against the Withdrawal Bill.Thanks for voting and please share widely. 
Our second edition ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ as Minister quits Government live on stage saying their Brexit policy is ‘detrimental’ to the interests of the country  
Doubtless many Brexiteer MPs will be citing the Will of the People during today’s debates. Here’s a reminder of how the referendum vote breaks down. Maybe better to call it the Will of Some of the People.  
What I don’t understand about #Brexit is how relatively few public figures or activists are pushing for the workable compromise that surely most voters would prefer. As Leave & Remain voters respectively, LBSProtect & I have sent this to our MPs today, aided by @GAtypical.  
.@theresa_may has given MPs JUST 48 MINUTES per amendment (on avg) to decide our future, sounds sensible. RT if you think this is crazy. #PeoplesVote #TuesdayThoughts #Brexit  
‘@Steven_Woolfe: ‘Class war’ is being waged across the UK and Europe. “A snobby sect that thinks the lower classes are too thick, too dumb, too stupid for voting for populists and Brexit.” 
Brexit Secretary David Davis says referendum 'irreversible'  
The Westminster elite is making a mess of Brexit - that's why we're marching for a #PeoplesVote - join us on 23rd June! 
“We are not going to be reversing the result of the referendum” @WalkerWorcester #bbcdp 
Hours before the Brexit vote and a conservative MP resigns with this statement.Holy shit May is in trouble.  
Hats off to the courage of Philip Lee. No petulant threats no tantrums no ultimatums. His local businesses warned him that our present position on Brexit would damage jobs. He put his constituents before his party. Burke would be proud 
WATCH: Lord Kerr, architect of Article 50, argues that if the Brexit that was promised isn't delivered by the Gov, then they should put that deal back to the people in a #PeoplesVotePlease RT: 
The next British EU referendum will definitely carry out the will of the people.If they vote to remain.If they vote to leave again we will definitely have another referendum. 
Live scenes from the House of Commons #FFS#Brexit#PeoplesVote 
Arron Banks: “If there were a second referendum, I probably wouldn’t get involved with it. I wish I hadn’t got involved with the first one.”  At last we agree on something. 
GOVERNMENT CONCEDES ON FAMILY REUNION FOR UNACCOMPANIED CHILDRENThe government have just accepted that, after Brexit, unaccompanied children will still be able to reunite with parents, grandparents, siblings AND aunts and uncles in the UK!  
If you never buy another James Dyson product,you'll be doing the UK economy a great favour. His means of production is outside the UK; his money is hidden offshore; and he wants Brexit so UK doesn't have to comply with forthcoming EU tax-haven laws #DontBuyDyson #StopBrexit 
This thread destroying The S*n’s latest ridiculous Brexit front page is going viral for very obvious reasons  
I do appreciate your position & know brexiters are not all racists etc! But I think the survey shoulda said, “would you like the govt to do a 2 year viability study of Brexit options (at a cost of £500M?)” Or whatever. They just didn’t have the info. None of us did.  
Corbyn abstaining when 70% of Labour supporters want Brexit stopped is a kick in the teeth. What a coward. What a wretched excuse of a leader. 
'Parliament vote cannot reverse Brexit' says David Davis.  What has the UK come to when we have such senior politician like Mr Davis continually bullying his peers and lying to the people.  
“It removes another one of the Jenga pieces from what is a pretty shaky tower” @bbclaurak on Dr Phillip Lee quitting ahead of Brexit vote #bbcdp 
That is EXACTLY what I did Gina. I was a big supporter of the EU as a younger man but looked at the facts, put country before party and went against my Party's leader and voted leave. Philip Lee, yourself and others must accept that.#Brexit  
Dissident republicans have been "effectively recruited as the armed wing of the European Union." Wow. @GoodwinMJ @David_Goodhart you have both signed up for 'the Full Brexit'. Do you agree with this poisonous nonsense?  
In the wake of Brexit vote, we are facing a chronic shortage of skilled workers, who do vital work in our public services. This is how @SajidJavid thanks them – yet more innocent people pushed into destitution as a result of dystopian Hostile Environment. 
One minister just said to me: ‘the thing about Brexit is it’s like the poll tax. It doesn’t matter whether you are for it or against it. It just can’t be done without bringing the whole house down.’  The poll tax brought Margaret Thatcher down 
The terms on which we leave the EU have never been put to the public. When .@theresa_may brings back her Brexit deal later this year, we will finally know what Brexit means. As a nation, we will have to decide if we accept it or not. Will your MP give you a final #VoteontheDeal? 
Foreign investment in Northern Ireland plunged by a seismic 54% in 2017, with Brexit cited as one of the primary causes. For 40 years, Britain thrived as the gateway to Europe but Brexit has ripped this apart. Please share 
The only way to read this coherently is if Andrew Adonis impregnated Britain with the Brexit-baby and is now trying to pressure it into getting an abortion   
Is Brexit  going to be... 
ANGER: Remoaner backstabber Dr Philip Lee could face deselection after resignation over Brexit.Politicians must not overrule the will of the people. 
#Brexit was Putin's 1st successful attack on western democracy in 2016.At a contentious Parliament hearing, major LeaveEU officials Arron Banks & Gary Wigmore are being grilled about Russian connections, data & a cash trail.Sound familiar?Livestream: 
Thank you to constituents who’ve contacted me to: stop Brexit, Brexit tomorrow, stage a 2nd Referendum, not betray Brexit, support every Lords amendment, get rid of the Lords, back the PM, sack the PM & remember who I represent. It’s possible I may not satisfy you all 
So Labour are going to abstain on today's brexit votesAs ever, the biggest shitbags in parliament. 
Oh dear Phillip Lee an MP I have never heard of has resigned over #BrexitA Remoaner MP for a Leave voting constituency. Bracknell folk must be thinking Xmas has come early.  
Justice minister Phillip Lee resigns over Brexit policy  
If a minister is in cahoots with Lord Adonis about Brexit then probably best that he/she resigns immediately as clearly cannot be trusted.  
You stood for parliament under a manifesto that promised to deliver brexit. As you know brexit means leaving the EU in its entirety. You are a charlatan and should resign from Parliament. We are absolutely sick of lying politicians. This will never be forgotten-in the party or UK  
Brexit Bill comes back to Parliament. Big day for democracy; the Island voted for Brexit, Britain voted for Brexit, so I will be supporting the Government to do the wishes of the British people. #BrexitBill 
After a hopelessly compromised referendum that had Russia’s finger on the scale and could spell chaos for the country, Corbyn’s courageous stance is ‘abstain’. What a joke. 
Fucksake. In a non-binding survey, 35% of UK voters expressed a desire to leave the EU. Got it? Put another way: 65% of UK voters DID NOT ask to leave the EU. If you assert that - come what may - democracy *requires* the govt go through w Brexit, you’re being dim or disingenuous. 
It is vital that MPs respect the result and mandate of the referendum when voting on the EU Withdrawal Bill today. Anything less would be ignoring the wishes of the British people. 
Well argued and perfectly timed piece by @AgataGostynska on the key meaningful vote #Brexit issue – especially given the surprise resignation of @DrPhillipLeeMP #meaningfulvote 
The MPs are looking distinctly unamused. And Arron can't answer basic questions about his insurance company's finances. Arron: "What's this got to do with the referendum?" @ianlucasMP: "You are Brexit's biggest donor it has everything to do with the referendum" 
I know from personal conversations at least 4 other ministers who are likely to resign over Brexit. I doubt they will go today - though I hear there is one I haven’t spoken to who might. It will happen in November when Mrs May presents her treaty. They will support a referendum 
Justice and human rights minister @DrPhillipLeeMP resigns over refusal of government to support meaningful parliamentary vote over final Brexit deal. Interestingly, he frames it as a human rights issue  
 Italy, Spain and Greece want out. The EU are bullying us. There are too many different countries.@mrjamesob demolished three Brexit soundbites in just one call. 
Theresa May hanging by a thread as PM after Tory Justice Minister QUITS to vote against Brexit 
Arron: "I"m not going to answer any more questions on my financial affairs."IT'S ALL KICKING OFF! @andywigmore "What relevance does this have to the referendum"(QUITE A LOT) 
UK human rights minister Phillip Lee resigns, saying: “I believe the evidence now shows the Brexit policy our government is currently pursuing... is detrimental to the people we were elected to serve.”   
Vacuous centrist MPs like Chris Leslie helped cause #Brexit in the first place with their Thatcherite neoliberal economic policies. When Corbyn was one of the few Labour MPs opposing Tory austerity, Leslie was supporting it. Never mind #BINO, Leslie is #LINO: Labour In Name Only. 
How current failing Labour Mayor "runs" London is affecting generations of Londoners right now.More Londoners voted to Leave EU - including Customs union & Single market than voted for Khan to be MayorSadiq, stop trying to frustrate Brexit - focus on keeping Londoners safe...  
Never forget. This man asked people to vote on #Brexit. Without defining what Brexit meant. Without carrying out any projections of consequences. All in an (unsuccessful) attempt to settle an internal Tory party feud. He then knighted his mates and f***ed off into the sunset.  
#EUWithdrawalBill Lords Amendments in @HouseofCommons.... @alisonthewliss & I appropriately attired with Alice in Wonderland symbolism.... #RabbitHole #Brexit #BrexitChaos 
using Brexit as a way of re-balancing the British economy is like redecorating with a hand grenade 
Boris Johnson proposes a "Brexit bridge" to Northern Ireland. He wasted millions on the failed London Garden Bridge project and then trolled himself by proposing a bridge to France. It's time we introduced a "three bridges and you're out" rule. 
Banks: "We didn't have big data and artificial intelligence working on the referendum." Below...a cutting from Insurance Times.  
The #LewishamEastByElection is taking place this Thursday.A vote for @Ros4LewishamMP in #LewishamEast is a vote for: Clean air A final say on Brexit Schools to be proud of  
That’s a result. 98% of business audiences at #FTBrexit conference say Brexit makes Britain worse off. Note: this is not a scientific poll  
Trump & #Brexit are 2 sides of the same coin: a coordinated attack on the global system that has ensured peace & prosperity since the Second World War.  This is why I'll be marching for a #PeoplesVote on 23rd June and in opposition to Trump's visit to UK on 13th July.#TrumpKim 
Uh oh. More porkies? Arron just said none of their 40 actuaries worked on the Brexit campaign. This is precisely NOT what they've said before...and anyway evidence published in Observer makes it clear Eldon employees work for LeaveEU & vice versa 
That the SNP's line on today's vote is all about who is "standing up for Scotland" says everything about them. This isn't about Scotland versus anyone else! It's about ensuring a catastrophic hard #Brexit doesn't befall ALL of the people across the UK who would be harmed by it. 
BREAKING Phillip Lee, the Justice minister who quit the Government over Theresa May’s Brexit policy, could be deselected by his local party in Bracknell. Dr Lee is set to be called to explain his decision to resign to his local party in Bracknell a week on Monday. 1/3 ... 
Tory minister Phillip Lee resigns over Brexit and demands second EU referendum in damning blow to Theresa May 
The EU is watching the House of Commons today. If they think our commitment to Brexit is wavering, Britain will pay for it in the negotiations. The British people voted to leave the EU. That means exiting the Single Market & Customs Union. Let's listen to them #EUWithdrawalBill 
Precisely. We can honour the referendum without making terrible choices. Making our constituents’ jobs safer is more important than making our jobs easier.  
FFS I thought I’d listen to 5 minutes of adopted, vengeful, hate filled, adopted DJ James O’Brien just to see what he was saying about North Korea, Trump and Brexit. Conclusion:  O’Brien is nasty and ugly on th inside and out, he is also deluded and verging on mental illness. 
"Don’t be fooled by the Remainers' pseudo-radical posturing against Putin or Brexit-backing businessmen. It’s ordinary people they loathe. As all conspiracy theorists do." Brendan O'Neill on Arron Banks and Russia 
As well as the Brexit debacle ... In normal times this is EPIC misgovernment.  And the cheeky Tories in Scotland try to blame Scot Gov for shortage of medical staff when the Tories cause the problem.  
Tory MPs must put country before career, patriotism before party, and Britain before a bad #Brexit in this week’s key votes in Westminster on the EU withdrawal bill: 
thrilled Royal Mail to produce stamps to mark 50th anniversary of Dad'S  Army. So why why are they still refusing to do any to mark brexit 
Arron Banks just tried calling my credibility into question because I reported LeaveEU's dealings with the Russian embassy during Brexit to British and American intelligence. Well what was I supposed to do? Just keep it secret like Isabel Oakeshott? 
And your lickspittle support of the Tories on Brexit is going to make unicorn houses appear by the millions, right?  
I wonder how many of the "Scottish" Tories will vote against Brexit today standing up for the constituents, or will they just roll over as the cannon fodder they are?13/13 I'm betting on rolling over 
Brilliant from @adamboultonSKY who has just asked some Tory woman (I've just started watching) to name one country which has offered a #Brexit trade deal better than the one it has with the EU. If only the @BBCNews had such quality journalism. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Damning judgement of Government’s reckless and chaotic handling of #Brexit by former justice minister @DrPhillipLeeMP. Theresa May is stumbling towards a disastrous outcome that few if any voted for in 2016.  
Didn’t see this coming: “Tory minister Phillip Lee resigns over Brexit in dramatic blow to Theresa May”  
Exactly this. If there was a referendum on abolishing Income Tax it would certainly win. And ruin the country. No government should take action to harm the country no matter what.  
This has got to be one of the hardest decisions a gov’t minister would take so I have total respect to him for standing by what he thinks is right regardless of which side of the debate you are on @DrPhillipLeeMP #Brexit  
Tory MP Phillip Lee isn't any more anti-Brexit than Jeremy Corbyn. Yet, according to the Patron Saint of #FBPE, Lee is "a man of principle" and Corbyn is the devil incarnate. 
WATCH: Tory minister Phillip Lee dramatically resigns live during speech and demands a second Brexit referendum 
MP Philip Lee stands by Govt on Brexit for 2 years.Monday: Theresa May appeals to MPs, incl Lee, at 1922 Comt meeting to back Govt position.Tuesday: Lee resigns as Govt minister over Tory Brexit plan.Her position weakens by the day. 
Huge respect to @DrPhillipLeeMP for standing up for a #peoplesvote and putting country and constituency before careerMPs, be brave, and be on the right side of history on Brexit  
The demand for a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal will only grow. With new facts about the consequences of leaving the EU coming to light every day, it is clearer than ever that Brexit is a big deal, but it is not a done deal. (4) 
Brexit will affect generations for generations. Brexit is going badly not just because of incompetence but because it is impossible to deliver in the form it was promised, and it is the people of Britain who will suffer the consequences. (2) 
THREAD: The resignation of a Government minister who has immediately gone on to endorse a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal is a hugely significant moment. (1) 
Terrifying to think that Brexit is to liberals what Iraq was to the Left.  
LeaveEU's Arron Banks and Andy Wigmore are about to answer questions at the @CommonsCMS committee on what they were doing with the Russian embassy during Brexit, their relationship with Cambridge Analytica and where exactly LeaveEU got their data from...  
Truly astonishing to read some of the powder puff articles about the impact of up coming Brexit Bill vote on Scottish Parliament. Another example of Scotland’s voice potentially being ignored and the Scottish media remain passive! 
Justice Minister Phillip Lee quits the government over #Brexit, saying he could not support "how our country's exit from the EU looks set to be delivered"  
The Tories can’t get a good Brexit deal. It’s structurally impossible because if internal dynamics within the party.  
I don't agree with @DrPhillipLeeMP about the idea of holding a referendum on the Brexit deal. But I admire his honesty and integrity. So much classier to resign on principle when nobody is expecting it, than to threaten resignation but never follow through. 
Quick Reminder: a year before the EU referendum and her Bad Boys of Brexit book, ⁦@IsabelOakeshott⁩ and ⁦@LordAshcroft⁩ went to Russia looking for dirt on David Cameron. Doesn't this all seem a bit odd in retrospect? 
Brexit monopoly money!! Superb work by @BathforEurope ... a 50 guineas note and a £350m note. Zoom in to check out the myriad comedy details. 
Phillip Lee likened Brexit to public hanging — outlawed by parliament despite public support. FULL THREAD OF HIS SPEECH BELOW 
Tory minister Phillip Lee has resigned saying he can't look his children in the eye following May's Brexit policy. Big blow on the day of crucial EU withdrawal votes!  
1) MPs on all sides, a few thoughts on #BrexitWhilst you are all buried in amendments & counter amendments, and the frisson of whips & rebellion, it's worth putting 3 basic facts in front of you, for your considerationIn summary, Brexit is wrong for UK 
This should not need saying, but: In a healthy democracy MPs should not be threatened by the media for standing up for their constituents. And in a democracy people should be allowed to change their minds. #Brexit  
#Brexit update: Today MPs vote on whether they should mark David Davis’ homework. He’s keen that they shouldn’t (he claims that risks him getting a lower final grade), which convinces me that they should, on behalf of us all. #BrexitBill 
Remain-supporting Conservative MP Phillip Lee has resigned as a Justice Minister saying he will be able to "better speak up for my constituents."His Bracknell constituency voted 53.2% leave.He should be de-selected and a pro #Brexit Tory selected in his place.He is a disgrace,  
.@DrPhillipLeeMP has announced he is backing a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal too - very significant @peoplesvote_uk 
Heading to Westminster and looking forward to voting with other @theSNP MPs to protect Scotland from a hard #Brexit. Will @RuthDavidsonMSP's @ScotTories MPs stand up for Scotland? Or will they blithely follow their whips and vote to make Scotland worse off? 
Well done Phillip. Country 1st. Churchill would have been proud of you. #Brexit is madness. Businesses are leaving and the negotiations are floundering. You have the support for your principled stance of us all. @BritishInEurope @The3Million 
Search on for Phillip Lee election address from last year - did he state that he was anti-Brexit or challenge the manifesto line on the issue? Or did he, in effect, allow a false prospectus to be presented to electors on his behalf? 
Excellent news that @DrPhillipLee wants the people to have the final say on any Brexit deal. He’s showing the courage of his convictions that many of his colleagues - and, indeed, the Labour leadership - lack. 
The way we Brexit will affect generations to come. It is vital that Parliament has a #MeaningfulVote.  The Grieve amendments strike the right balance and I support them.  I have consistently voted for a #meaningfulvote since 2016 - whilst trying to ensure we get a sensible Brexit 
Bracknell Forest voted 53.9% to 46.1% for Leave. Which of his constituents is Philip Lee planning to represent?#Brexit #BrexitBill 
Fellow leave voters.We need to be ready. The referendum has proved the lie that is our democracy. We need to stand unified at a General Election as Brexit candidates. A one time coalition of people sick of the LibLabConfidence Tricksters. Nothing else will work for us now. 
Wow. Uk justice minister Philip lee has just resigned in protest at gov’s Brexit strategy. His letter is quite remarkable  
"In my medical experience, if a course of treatment is not working, then I review it. I also have a duty to get my patient’s informed consent for that action" Dr Philip Lee on Brexit.  
PM warns that any defeats on the EU #brexit withdrawal bill will send wrong message to Brussels. What, that an unelected leader of a minority Government CAN'T compromise the future of the entire country without the permission of Parliament? 
Wow. Government Minister resigns and backs a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal.  
Hadn’t expected ministerial resignations to start so soon. The fact that they have started now, rather than when treaty is presented in November, significant. By Nov we will probably have Cabinet ministers going. Brexit probably isn’t happening, after a people’s vote to reject it 
Remain-supporting Conservative MP Phillip Lee has resigned as a justice minister saying he will be able to "better speak up for my constituents and country over how Brexit is currently being delivered" 
If Brexit is worth doing, then it is certainly worth doing well; regardless of how long that takes. 
Respect to Dr Phillip Lee for putting his country before party and personal interests, which is what we are sent to Parliament to do.I have spoken to at least one other Minister who is as disillusioned as he is with this whole #Brexit mess. Will they follow his example?  
I voted to remain in the European Union and have not changed my view that  continued membership would have been the better strategic course. Even so, I believe that it would be impossible and wrong to seek to go back to how things were before the referendum. 
Indeed Brexit will damage UK GDP by 2% or 6% or 8% ...the UK Gov preferred option is 6% damage in an FTA, but accepting of 8% damage if negotiations fail and default to WTO.  Context: 2008 crash was a 2% GDP damage event.  
It seems that one #Conservative MP is willing to put country before career, patriotism before party, #Britain before a bad #Brexit Will there be any others?  
Remarkable attack on PM’s Brexit strategy by resigning minister that it is “detrimental to the people we serve” 
Well - minister resigns over Brexit on day of big vote - tightens up the numbers too... rebels suggest there may be more in coming weeks, who can not continue to back the Brexit plan - Lee was at yesterday’s 1922 meeting  
Walking the Brexit line when you’re an organisation devoted to easy communication across borders can’t be easy. And Dad’s Army, brilliant though it is, is also a Leaver’s wet dream. So hats off to @RoyalMail for these new stamps, which illustrate the dilemma nicely 
From Jeremy Corbyn's statement on the #EUWithdrawalBill:"Labour will only vote for a final Brexit deal if it delivers a strong relationship with the Single Market based on full tariff-free access and ensures no loss of rights and standards."Sounds perfectly reasonable to me.  
Corbyn before the economy.Corbyn before jobs.Corbyn before the poor.Corbyn before the NHS.Corbyn before stopping a hard Brexit.Corbyn before country. Seems like Labour have set their priorities. And we aren’t a priority. #StopBrexit 
Philip Lee resigns over Brexit. How many other ministers will be looking at the conscience and wondering if they can support a policy that knowingly makes people poorer? 
Dir Phillip Lee becomes the first minister to resign so he can vote against the government on Brexit. More to follow? 
There were audible gasps in the room this morning when @DrPhillipLeeMP resigned. He used his speech to tear into his party’s right wing and Brexit. Says it is “hard to countenance” being in a govt which is “breaching such fundamental principles” as protecting the public 
BREAKING Tory minister Phillip Lee resigns over Brexit 
The Sun says anything but a hard brexit is unpatriotic.Its laughable that a newspaper whose organisation who haven't paid tax into UK for 30 years, and is owned by a foreign tax avoider living in the USA should lecture anybody on patriotism regardless of your viewpoint. 
Philip Lee’s resignation big. I’ve been predicting for some time that anti-Brexit ministers would start resigning. There are more to come 
Looking forward to seeing every Tory and Labour MP today voting in accordance with Brexit commitments made in the manifestos they were elected on. As public servants they’ll surely honour the public will. #Brexit 
@cliodiaspora - wonderful to finally meet you. The empathy, commonsense & solidarity shown by the women at the event last night emphasised that women must be more involved in politics but more specifically speak up about the human cost of Brexit.  Thanks to @RupaHuq for hosting 
Wow - Justice minister Philip Lee has just resigned, to speak out on Brexit policy..  
Jaguar Land Rover are moving to Slovakia, Rolls Royce expected to announce 4K job cuts, Poundland’s gone into administration, house of Fraser are closing stores.. why can’t people see while they’re worrying about Brexit the tories have already fucked the economy. 
BREAKING - @DrPhillipLeeMP has just resigned from govt over Brexit - he says policy is 'detrimental' to the people and that govt has to protect its citzens from what the majority voted for 
It's fantastic to see the Royal Mail finally commemorating the three stages of  #Brexit.  
I am incredibly sad to have had to announce my resignation as a minister in Her Majesty’s Government so that I can better speak up for my constituents and country over how Brexit is currently being delivered. Statement to follow shortly on my website. 
The main Brexit campaigns linked to Arron Banks raised £12m ahead of the vote (mostly from Banks). But they only declared how £1m was spent. Yesterday, Leave EU's Comm's director Andy Wigmore told me he has "No idea" what they did with the remaining £11m:  
Dilbert's "Elbonians" nail what #Brexit is really about.#StopBrexit@abcpoppins @BrexitBin @MarieAnnUK @thomasbrake @Andrew_Adonis @JolyonMaugham @WomaninHavana @terrychristian 
#brexit is a shambles.  Few MPs likely to show courage & put the country 1st this week.  Time to take back control. March with me on 23rd June for #PeoplesVote on the real options.  Meet at Pall Mall at 12.00 & march to Parliament Square.  Please watch & share my video message 
"I believe that the evidence now shows that the #Brexit policy our Government is currently pursuing on the basis of the 2016 referendum is detrimental to the people we are elected to serve". #BrightBlue 
Imagine being MPs today preparing to vote for the right not to be able to vote on matters critical to their country and constituents. Has there ever been a worse example of the shirking of responsibilty. What the f**k did they get into politics for? #Brexit 
Can't we swap May for Trump, if only for 24 hours. That should prove long enough for him to get us a great Brexit deal. I'm so sick of the mediocrity in Downing Street and the useless cabal around her. 
Brexit offers us the chance as a nation and a Party to look at what sort of country we want to be. For me, the choice is clear: we must reclaim the true conservatism of Shaftesbury and Disraeli and others and model Britain as a compassionate force for good. #BrightBlue 
Thanks @DavidLammy for adding your name to Amendment 19a of the #EUWithdrawalBill. 19a gives people - not the politicians -  the FINAL SAY on Brexit, including the option of staying in the E.U. Make sure your MP has added their name to Amendment 19a:  
MPs of all persuasion should remember that all of the population is 'the people', only some of them want #Brexit. We will all suffer the consequences of a lack of empathy today. Please do the right thing for our country, even if that is to the detriment of your party #EmpathyDay 
In Bad Boys of Brexit banks boasts of winning referendum on social media. His connections with Cambridge Analytica have been highlighted elsewhere. But how did  do so much on social media but not record *any* spending on online advertising? 
Another Banks campaign, Grassroots Out, received donations worth £2.5 million in the early months of 2016 – however, the group claims to have only spent £232,000 between 15 April and the referendum on June 23. How was all this pre campaign spending possible? What was it on? 
First the bankers moved, I did not care I hate the bankersThen JLR moved to Slovakia, I did not care, I drive an old bangerThen Toys R Us collapsed, I did not care, I don't have kidsThen House of Fraser, I did not care, I shop in Poundla...Shit!#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Economic recklessness —> Austerity —> desperation —> Brexit —> Economic recklessness —> Austerity —> desperation —> ?Break the downward cycle now. Ditch Brexit and fix Britain. 
Also, alternative headline: Arron Banks Admits Russian Interference in Brexit Vote  
We have no idea how the main Arron Banks linked campaigns spent £11m on the European referendum:   - by me, ahead of his DCMS hearing today. 
How MPs vote on #Brexit will affect the UK for generations to come. They must force the Government back to the negotiating table to agree a deal that works for the country, with membership of Europe’s Single Market and Customs Union at its heart. 
MPs vote on their OWN future!A “Meaningful Vote” happened when 17.4 Million people voted #Leave & to break ALL ties with Brussels.MPs need to remember this over the next 48 hours.Betrayal of #Brexit will NOT be forgotten at the next General Election#EU 
MPs should protect our country from the Government’s Hard #Brexit by amending the EU Withdrawal Bill today. The Government’s reckless proposals will cost jobs, reduce investment and damage the UK’s position in the world. 
#Brexit minister David Davis said there would be no reversal of the decision to leave the #EU whatever the outcome of divorce talks. 
Currently working on two new pieces. One on Brexit/Russia and one on Trump/Russia. Trump story likely coming this week. 
In a truly free society, MPs should be able to accept fair criticism from the people, electors and media.Shutting down debate & criticism does not help the democratic process. 17.4 million people spoke in the referendum, & their voices must be heard & their will respected. 
No 10 accused of forcing through #Brexit votes before #Leave campaign investigation is published 
READ | A big day for Brexit that should never have been.  
Who will have the courage to come clean on Brexit? Good piece by @rafaelbehr.“There is orderly arrival in a second-rate location, or there is a fiery crash landing. That is what it means to honour the referendum. That is what it meant all along.” 
When the #DUP vote with May in favour of hard #Brexit today, remember it's against the democratic will of the people of NI. They do not speak for the majority, just their own self serving interests. 
People who met with Russian officials during key political campaigns, seeking support:   Trump's top advisers;   The NRA;   France's extremist National Front;   Brexit campaign leaders;  Nice club, there... 
This tweet has aged well. #powergrab #Brexit  
Today & every day I'll keep my promise to constituents: I'll never vote for anything that'll harm our community or country. Brexit included  
Sad to hear my old friend DD tell so many porkies on @BBCr4today. 1) If MPs vote against the Brexit deal, many European leaders have told me they would be prepared to move Article 50 deadline. So it’s simply not true to say that we would crash out. 
Vote Leave's cheating has been found out. 's cheating has been found out. Collusion with foreign actors, dodgy data and all with the backing of Rupert Murdoch and Paul Dacre... Brexit was a cheat, not the will of the people... #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles 
Genius.. the Brexit stamps have arrived..  
Every MP will be judged, as the damage of a hard  #Brexit gets worse, on how they voted this week & whether they had the courage to ignore intimidation like this & vote in their constituents’ & the country’s best interests.  
Britain should still be the best place from which to export to Europe or to service Europe - because it has the freest markets and a can-do culture.You can read my full comments on Brexit here:  
Beyond self parody @BorisJohnson How many billions of taxpayers' money do you want to waste this time? (We haven't forgotten 46mn you lost on other bridge folly). Yet more money that could be spent on British people wasted to fix Brexit mess. 
This is outrageous, bullying behaviour from The Express. They’ve lost the argument on Brexit, and they know it. Only one way to solve this impasse - a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit Deal. #FFS 
In her speech last night, the #PM completely got the need to leave the Customs Union saying if we do not, we will not have delivered #Brexit & “the political consequences would be devastating”.She is right. It would be a betrayal of the #EUReferendum & we would not be forgiven. 
I see the Royal Mail gave in and decided to issue special Brexit stamps after all.  
Whilst clueless politicos and the Harvard liberal elite downplay this historic moment, @realDonaldTrump shows the world he's a president who gets things done. If only we had him to deliver Brexit! #TrumpKimSummit 
Interview with @DavidDavisMP on #r4today should be compulsory listening for anyone who voted #Brexit2yrs after EU vote & he cannot give one example of ANY PROGRESS he's made in negotiations.He has no idea or credibility. 
These new Dad's Army stamps, following in the wake of the failed campaign for a Brexit stamp, feels like some top notch trolling by the Royal Mail.  
Next two days in Commons overturning the whims of an unelected & unaccountable House of Lords to ensure the instructions of  British people respected over #Brexit. @daily_politics 
This is the big #Brexit change - Europeans are no longer "coming over here, taking our jobs", they're "staying at home, taking our jobs".Well done, #Gammons! Well done!  
Next time someone in Ireland asks me why people in UK aren’t far more worried about Brexit and aren’t en masse demanding answers I’ll point them to this #r4today between David Davis and John Humphreys. Not only no light not even any heat. 
BBC boss in a nutshell:Tory Brexit Secretary David Davis peddled a load of myths and lies on #r4today without being challenged and held to account by his mate John Humphry’s. The BBC has therefore become complicit in spreading fake news. 
If Grieve amendment goes to a vote, I think it could become today’s big vote. Because most MPs despair at idea that we could have a no-deal Brexit, and this amendment would give them power to veto such a no-deal withdrawal. But as I say, I don’t see how @theresa_may can accept it 
MPs must respect the will of the people. Don’t block Brexit!  
Some 'news' presenters don't seem to want world peace, if Trump brings it. In the same way, economic collapse of the country seems to be preferable to Brexit success for Theresa May. 
Grieve’s amendment seeks to give parliament power to veto no-deal Brexit. I assume ⁦@Theresa_may⁩ cannot accept it, because contradicts her assertion that “no deal is better than a bad deal”. She would say amendment will undermine her negotiating position. This vote tense! 
Humphreys talks of "us" and "them" regarding UK and EU in interview with David Davis on @BBCr4today .... Feels like England World Cup Football commentary comes to politics of Brexit. 
Unbelievable. John Humphrys on @BBCr4today actually pushing David Davis to be even more insane on Brexit than he already is. 
What a brilliant piece of writing by ⁦@rafaelbehr⁩. Essential reading for anyone who wants to understand what’s really going on with #Brexit despite yet another pretended show of Tory unity on #EUWithdrawalBill 
Today and tomorrow, all MPs have the opportunity to pass the EU Withdrawal Bill, secure a smooth Brexit transition, and send the PM to Brussels in the best position to get the best trade deal for Britain and the EU. Time for a united front.  
The mighty Rachel Sylvester is right. All this Brexit farce lacks is a dodgy dossier  
No @paulmasonnews - any @UKLabour MP who votes for a Pro-EU amendment is representing the vast majority of #Labour voters and members, who not only want to limit the damage of #Brexit, they want us to oppose it outright. As @Remain_Labour will continue to do. 
A quite brilliant demolition of both parties in their handling of Brexit. And the most reckless self-harming decision of them all: triggering Article 50 without the faintest idea what Brexit would look like. Damn them all:  
"Remainer MPs say they want a 'meaningful vote' on Brexit. Well, they had one, along with the rest of us, two years ago. This isn't about parliamentary scrutiny, it's about politicians thinking their vote matters more than ours", writes @Tom_Slater_ 
Every sentence on this by @rafaelbehr is great. On Brexit, the absurd delusions therein, and where we actually are. As failures go, historic.  
This, from @Keir_Starmer, couldn’t put it any clearer. This is NOT about defying the ppl / overturning Brexit. It IS about working in the interests of the country NOT @theresa_may.“It’s Brexit crunch time. Theresa May’s no-deal disaster is not an option” 
“Don’t undermine Brexit negotiations. That’s my job.” 
Today the DUP will vote against the will of the People of Northern Ireland. They will also abuse democracy by refusing Parliament a final say on #brexit 
Good morning everyone. Rather boring news this morning, too much hype regarding the Trump talks in Singapore has led to a very weak document signing and of course we have great hype on the Brexit talks leading again to nothing of substance. Circles of nothingness.St. Andrews.  
.@VinceCable quite rightly picks up @piersmorgan on @GMB for saying Labour supports staying in the Single Market. Jeremy Corbyn does not. He is failing to do his job as leader of the opposition and is waving through the Conservatives’ chaotic Brexit. 
Our 15 favourite responses to today’s Sun front page  #thesun #brexit  
The UK will be much worse off under EVERY Brexit scenario. Theresa May's preferred bespoke option will cost £615m per week. That is a potential loss of 22% of the NHS budget - The £350m bus claim was a falsehood...#StopBrexit #BrexitShambes #r4today 
Brexit: Letwin fudge amendment on customs union IS in interests of Conservative Party unity but is NOT in UK economy’s interests - industry are *desperate* for certainty & decisions. @LibDems @BBCPolitics @mrjamesob 
Thanks Matthew. Will you be standing by the factual accuracy of this piece in 3 years? I'm curious because you co-authored this piece from 2015 which falsely claimed the Vienna Convention would protect all rights of @BritishInEurope after #Brexit.  
Good grief, stick to the news please...this is worse than Faisal’s daily doom-laden Brexit narrative tbh 
Lots of tough #Brexit votes over the next two nights.We must regain control over immigration policy, be free to make free trade agreements, and control our laws.That means leaving the Customs Union.Otherwise, as the #PM says, the political consequences will be “devastating”. 
Do we need to remind you both Conservatives and your crowd stood on a manifesto commitment to implement Brexit. That's a rather big fact you continually ignore.  
What on Earth are @NickyMorgan01 & my own MP @S_Hammond doing crafting amendment with Bill Cash & Jacob Rees-Mogg?An undefined ‘Customs Arrangement’ means nothing.My MP promised in GE2017 to fight hard Brexit. Teaming with JRM to leave the Customs Union... is hard Brexit.  
*your reminder on a crunch day of #Brexit voting in parliament that around half of Britain's population have no idea what the Customs Union is or have never even heard of it* #r4today 
Pure Hitler fascism! EU amendments are not about whether we  leave, they are about how we leave. Nothing in  the referendum referred to that...so the issue is who chooses. Parliament? Or the Mail, Express and Sun with Jacob Rees Mogg & his Brextremist ERG group?  #PeoplesVote 
Historic couple of days coming up. We'll see @RuthDavidsonMSP 's MP's go against the wishes of their constituents, to deliver legislation that will damage Scotland's economy and reduce our quality of life. Ruth is OK with this. #partybeforepeople #Brexit 
."The truth is that Brexiteers don’t give a flying frig for Ireland, North or South –that includes Irish unionism & the DUP.[The DUP has] helped to construct the wicker cage in which unionism will be torched to appease the gods of Brexit.". by @fotoole 
Never mind David Davis’ letter. With still more job losses announced, MPs who vote with the Govt on Brexit are either creeps or brain dead. 
Amendment: Should Brexit create a Ministerial Monarchy that trashes Parliamentary Sovereignty by allowing ministers to pass and scrap laws as they like?#EUWithdrawalBill 
What makes Sen. Kamala Harris different from other democratic candidates? Find out what she thinks when she answers Iowa voters' questions at the #HarrisTownHall with @JakeTapper. Tonight at 10p ET only on CNN 
This is the bare minimum for parliament to be in control of the key decisions on Brexit before next March  
These front pages of today’s The Sun and Daily Express are a hit with me!  #Brexit  
Right-wing British tabloids screaming "betrayal" of Brexit they want to legitimise... 1. Pollution...  
So much froth and blather but the actual options for May to land Brexit are simple: there's a runway in Brussels or there's crashing into the sea.  
Exciting news for the Telegraph as Royal Mail caves in and agrees to produce stamps commemorating Brexit  
BREXIT FAILUREThere are two basic rules of negotiation; knowing what you want & not going into a negotiation unless you are prepared to walk away. Theresa May’s Government has FAILED on both accounts.  
Is this how we are going to compete with the rest of the world in trade post Brexit? The signs are there to see despite DNA agreements and DD whistling in the wind. #costofbrexit We can and must stop Brexit  
OK, Today is huge. Today we find out how sensible our MPs are. Whether they'll let Brexit be a disaster, or whether they'll fight to protect British jobs, British Rights, and British Prosperity. #EUWithdrawalBillThread of relevant tweets: 
Any Tory MP who's thinking of betraying Brexit over the Withdrawal Bill today must not forget this promise. We certainly won't.  
With the tabloid Union flag waving today, a timely quote from Fintan O’Toole in The Irish Times: “Boris Johnson’s outburst reminds us that Brexit is an English nationalist project – it cannot allow the English bulldog to be wagged by an Irish tail.” [Or a Scottish one?]  
Boris Johnson calls Brexit warnings ‘mumbo jumbo’. But they’re true | Polly Toynbee  
I’ll say it again:The economic & material well being of Northern Ireland will spiral downwards in the event of BREXIT completing, and it will be especially bad if WTO tariffs prevail.Business here rejects BREXIT.Citizens here rejected BREXIT: 
Here's our message to MPs ahead of historic Brexit vote — Great Britain trusted you, now you trust Britain  
EU commissioner says ‘tide is going out on the high priests of #Brexit’ and raises prospect of second referendumPhil Hogan says Brexiteers are in a state of ‘panic’ as public starts to see through ‘lies’ 
If an MP thinks Brexit will be the salvation of our country & bring peace and prosperity to every section of our community they should vote with May today. If they don’t, they must ignore the populist press/party bosses and vote for the Lords amendments.  
When MPs vote today, they should remember the will of the people.Last year May asked for a bigger majority to deliver the Tory vision of #Brexit. The public resoundingly said no.The Tories had their mandate removed. The will of the people is NOT a Tory #Brexit. 
How can MPs support the self-harm that Brexit is, when as @brexit_sham says there's *a growing realisation that Brexit may have been delivered via the activity of foreign actors whose raison d’être was the destabilization of the EU*? #EUWithdrawalBill 
Brexit is the will of the Kremlin, Cambridge Analytica, Arron Banks, Nigel Farage and the ultra right, arrived at by lies, fraud and industrial scale data manipulation. Any MPs who really care about the future of the UK will take this chance to stop Brexit in it's tracks.  
If the UK Parliament can block Brexit it can equally easily block Indyref2. What's it like SNP when your strategy comes back to bite you? pic.twitter.com/MGHzT2EryM 
Brexit is a massive case of self harm. EVERY possible outcome is will do a huge amount of harm to the UK. We need to stop this madness #StopBrexit #BrexitShambles 
Legal experts dismiss Rees-Mogg’s Brexit vision, saying it would breach WTO rules  
News Daily: Trump-Kim meeting and Brexit votes  
Today's Sun and Daily Express front pages corrected for accuracy #Brexit  
And there you go ladies and gentleman. Why Brexit should be cancelled in one succinct tweet from the brilliant @carolecadwalla #corruption #collusion #stopbrexit 
ICYMI -  During the referendum there was no suggestion MPs would play fast and loose with the result  
BREAKING: "18 year olds' summer holidays on the EU - or rather on the UK taxpayer" - Remainer MPs should read this before they vote:   Another #Brexit Facts4EU exclusive article.  
THE Daily Express issues a warning IGNORE THE WILL OF THE KREMLIN AT YOUR PERIL #Brexit  
There’s a growing realisation that Brexit may have been delivered via foreign actors. Has the time arrived to put our country’s interests before party politics by officially informing the EU to seek its support in suspending the Brexit process? 
In Brexit showdown, May faces issue of 'meaningful vote'  
It’s good that another referendum is apparently shelved for now but Sturgeon won’t STF up ever. That voice will grate until she gets the message and sods off. Please let it be soon!  
Angel of the North sculptor Anthony Gormley opposes Brexit #justsaying 
Asia stock mkts rise as Trump & Kim meet in Singapore. Landmark US-N.Korea summit raises hopes to strike a deal. The combatants of 1950-53 Korean war are technically still at war. Dollar rises ahead of Fed meeting. Pound extended a decline as Brexit legislation goes to Parliament  
It was a full house at our No Pro-Rep Forum with @Wilkinson4BC in Kelowna tonight! People are very concerned about the NDPs upcoming rigged referendum on electoral reform. Here’s what you can do to help fight back:  #bcpoli 
I see @SenBlumenthal also asked about the date of the Kogan agreement. Again, Facebook's answer to the Senator is different than their answer to @CommonsCMS which was the result date of the brexit vote.  
Russian collusion during Brexit. Nobody should be even remotely surprised.  
BREXIT ON THE BRINK? 
Next part of the #PlayStationE3 interactive tour takes us to a post Brexit world  
Brexit backer Arron Banks to face MPs over Russia claims  
The big day to see who will put the good of the country before the good of their career. Yes, all you Blairites -Every speech you make     Every vote you take     We'll be watching you #PLPwatch  #Brexit  #ToriesOut 
Nicola Sturgeon has said she believes there will be a new independence referendum while she is First Minister.Bring it on! We're ready to go, when she fires the starting pistol!#ImWithNicola #IndyRef2 #Vote_YES 
Tory fudge and cowardice = no winnable Brexit amendment vote on Tuesday  
big love to my mum for coming with me today, just like she did for the @EuroMove_MK event on saturday, and like she has for every #StopBrexit rally and march since the start  fighting Brexit is a family affair!  (photo stolen from @StopBrexitMarch!) #Remainathon 
Scottish oil alone accounts for over 30% of UK exports - with the £ depreciating it's even more - Scotland cannot be sucked dry to prop up the UK and a Brexit not voted for by the people! pic.twitter.com/TB7UqhnL7h 
Stunning new poll shows that even a majority of #Remain #voters want to see the #referendum result respected, with the #UK taking back control of its #trade policy. A huge majority of  want #independence but #TheresaMay drags her feet!   #BBC #SKY 
Just the start - EU orientated manufacturing is going to leave. As we draw closer to Brexit EU buyers are going to look at sourcing EU goods - Scotland will be latched onto a decaying monster desperate for our oil, salmon and whisky exports - time to go.  
We also used to think smoking was a healthy lifestyle choice. But we didn't all carry on doing it once we found out it caused Cancer. #Brexit #BrexitMeltdown 
Lets make it quite clear @theSNP have plenty of mandates for #indyref2 & maybe if @theresa_may @Conservatives hadn't gone against the 75% that voted for devolution in 1997 by trying to retake devolved powers using #Brexit, then @NicolaSturgeon wouldn't be considering #ScotRef now 
I'm not a lover of The Sun newspaper. Not all us cheeky working class types read it! But! I've been reading tweets from some saying today's front page of The Sun is disgusting and offensive. If you find this particular front page offensive? You need to fuck off! #Brexit pic.twitter.com/LoBUetmsPg 
As we all head to bed I’m thinking of my #Remainathon friends and colleagues sleeping out now in London to support the push for #meaningfulvote. Ordinary people doing extraordinary things in the most challenging of times. We can  stop Brexit. But only together. #remain  
Thanks to @VickerySec we have coded evidence of voter suppression from Cambridge Analytica. But what about this during #Brexit from senior member of Leave Campaigns 'discouraging the vote'. Is this legal? And is it CA? @chrisinsilico @carolecadwalla 
Brexit secretary Davis to put his name to 'compromise customs amendment': BBC editor  
How a Journalist Kept Russia's Secret Links to Brexit Under Wraps || via TheDailyBeast  
It’s Brexit doing that. How many of those voting realised the promises of loads of money & the saving of the NHS were a pack of lies? We’ve been screwed by a load of conmen who can’t even now tell us how we’re to get out of this mess. 
Swiss Vote Down "Sovereign Money" Referendum  
Breaking: Sion's  2026 Olympic bid voted down. SLC 2030  has incredible public support and should (if necessary) make it through a referendum! #SLC #SLC2030 #SLCyouin2030 
This.I'm also sick of 27% (the proportion of people living in the UK who voted for Brexit) being rounded up to 52%.(This is not a disagreement with the earlier tweet)  
Outside the High Court for the all-night vigil for @abcpoppins legal challenge to Brexit  
That winning margin was just 1.9% of the population.All of this division, uncertainty and turmoil, for 1.9%. Really?Brexiters act like they are "The Only People" Parliament has a duty of care to 65m, not just 17m. That's what Parliament "forgets at its peril".#Brexit 
Brexit is not the will of the people.The majority now say Brexit is “wrong”, by a 7 pt lead.And the majority would now #Remain in the EU.So take back control @heidiallen75 @JDjanogly @S_Hammond @OliverHealdUK @NickyMorgan01 @neill_bob @Sandbach @Anna_Soubry @sarahwollaston 
WE HAD A REFERENDUM A DEMOCRATIC VOTE. YOU LOST. No ifs or buts, as PM of the day said, once in a lifetime vote, your decision WILL BE IMPLEMENTED. Enough said.  
Excited to learn that both Stonehenge & the Loch Ness Monster are in favour of Brexit...  
"Great Britain or Great Betrayal?" screeches The Sun.MPs may indeed want to ask themselves if they're prepared to facilitate the grievous harm to our nation promoted by Putin's kleptocracy & its greedy little far-right collaborators.#Brexit #PeoplesVote #EUWithdrawalBill 
Compare this headline in the Daily Express with this excerpt from a speech by Goebbels after a Nazi referendum victory in 1933. #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Jesus fucking Christ. Just look at the state of this shitty photoshopped vision of Brexit Britain in todays Sun: Stonehenge, the Shard, the Loch Ness Monster, Mr Bean, a Dalek, a rollercoaster ... pic.twitter.com/xWfeRqcSHu 
The Express might as well be quoting from Goebbels' speech after a Nazi referendum victory in 1933. It is shocking that we have major national newspapers trumpeting large undiluted chunks of Nazi ideology.  
Oh wow, now this is a sight for sore eyes. These guys are camping out ALL NIGHT at the High Court in London against the disaster that is #BrexitMakes you proud to be a #European #StopBrexit #Remainathon #PeoplesVote #FBPE @BBCNews @itvnews @Channel4News @theresa_may 
It’s also worth reminding these newspapers that the PM lost her majority when she put their desired Brexit to the British people last year. Their front pages conveniently ignore that rather big fact. 
Labour MPs contacted '40,000 times' to back a 'people's vote' on the Brexit deal, say Lib Dems  
It’s Brexit crunch time. Theresa May’s no-deal disaster is not an option @Keir_Starmer 
Daily Express tells me I have to vote in favour of ‘the people’ tomorrow. I will. I’ll vote every time to minimise the damage the Tories’ hard Brexit is set to do to the British people.  
what an amazing group of #WomenAgainstBrexit to speak alongside in Westminster. Brexit is a direct threat to the UK’s bedrock of human rights, equal rights and workers rights. Outside the EU we have no written constitution to fall back on. We need a #PeoplesVote! 
Boris ideas versus delivery:        Garden Bridge  Boris Island  £350m extra per week for NHS  Resign over any Brexit Bill to EU  Bridge to France= M.I.A  
I shall be saying a few words amongst many incredible people speaking at the #PeoplesVoteMarch in London on Saturday 23rd June!Come down & join in demanding a #PeoplesVote on Brexit  
Courageous @guardian journalist @carolecadwalla (who was chasing down the Russia and Cambridge Analytica stories before the U.S. media was paying attention) calls in to right-wing #Brexit advocate @Nigel_Farage’s show.Watch his cowardly reaction: 
As if I needed a reminder why I never buy @TheSun @dailyexpressuk You don’t speak for Britain and you don’t own patriotism. I will vote in line with my constituents, my conscience, and in sincerity for what I believe is best for my country. #Brexit @Open_Britain @WalesForEurope 
Nigel Dodds rude, condescending and combative on View from Stormont, couldn't stand it when @StephenFarryMLA spoke the truth and challenged DUP narrative: Brexit is damaging, people of NI don't want it, Alliance have been consistent in wanting to get best outcome for this place 
For once I agree with @TheSun, tomorrow is an important day for MPs. You do have a choice, betray Britain and vote for Brexit or put the great back into Britain at the heart of the EU. It is the right thing to do.That's right isn't it @TheSun?  
On @BBCNewsnight right now @andreajenkyns, who accused the3million of scaremongering over #citizensrights, still talking about 'walking away' from #Brexit negotiations. No deal would leave 3.6m EU citizens in UK 1.2m @BritishInEurope with very little rights if any at all 
When the DUP oppose a referendum on Irish Unity, you know it’s a good idea. Here’s just a few things they’ve opposed recently:  Marriage Equality Repeal the 8th Remaining in EU RHI Cost Controls  Referendum on Irish Unity 
Thing that makes me really mad about Brexit is the real impact it is having up and down the country day in day out against a background of lies and unicorn tears about how wonderful everything would be in this supposed "brave new world" 
Here we go. #Brexit Britain 2018. The face of intolerant, xenophobic nationalism. How did UK politics end up low as this?  
I wasn’t aware she blocked me until the Slug got caught with her fingers in the Russian/ Brexit, Pie  #IsabelOakeshott 
This is a direct result of Brexit. There are 10,000 people employed in that plant in Solihull. Ten thousand livelihoods  
This sums up Brexit in a nutshell because Northern Ireland doesn't feature  
This is what remainers sound like when they bang on & on about not wanting #Brexit   
Ireland tells EU it won't accept a Brexit border, PM says  
So that’s LandRover, Vauxhall, RollsRoyce, more banks than I can name plus a string of retail outlets all moving to the EU or going out of business plus 90% overall drop in foreign investment and this is nothing to do with Brexit? You’re not doing your jobs @SkyNews @BBC @ITN 
Think it's almost impossible to sum up just how monumentally crap Brexit is in a single image but bravo to The Sun for having a bloody good crack at it  
I would laugh if it weren’t so serious. My friend and colleague was killed in the toxic atmosphere of the referendum. This feels even worse. I will not be bullied. 
It seems some people still aren't getting behind Brexit. Maybe they'll be convinced if we manufacture some outrage so loud and deranged I think I can actually see a vein popping on that second capital L.  
28 years apart...It will never end #Brexit  
#skypapers Two bloody Remoaner bores on as usual. Skypapers worse than Bias BBC. Stig Abell & Jenny Kleeman. Both hate Brexit & Donald Trump. Yawn, Yawn, Yawn, Yawn, Yawn, Yawn, Yawn, Yawn, Yawn, Yawn.   
It is really astonishing that almost two years after the referendum PM has not developed yet new arguments against greater Westminster’s scrutiny over #Brexit. Lords amendment on the meaningful vote does not undermine UK negotiating position but introduces greater transparency 
Forget about Trump & Kim summit, Brexit, the World Cup….this sunbathing London fox has made my day.  
They’re getting worried #Brexit  
It’s Brexit crunch time. Theresa May’s no-deal disaster is not an option | Keir Starmer  
I’m Expressing myself in the most certain terms! @RuthDavidsonMSP will never be FM. Brexit will never be acceptable to the Scottish electorate. We have a fantastic FM in @NicolaSturgeon long may she reign. 
The PLP have been telt. Tories will behave like Tories and no matter how many snug little convos you've had in the bar, they won't help you. So you need to rally round the Shad Brexit Team and get on with removing May. #PLPWatch 
Somehow the @BBCNews managed to cover the dire manufacturing figures and the Jaguar Land Rover shift to Slovakia without the word Brexit being used. 
Every country in the world has a “customs arrangement” with the EU ... some just pay tariffs, but members don’t .. that is what arrangements do . #brexit 
‘Back me on Brexit bill or undermine EU talks, May tells Tory MPs.’MPs should be voting with their consciences, doing what is right for the country. They won’t be undermining our nonsensical negotiation position, because the EU has already dismissed it. 
I'm NOT asking for a SECOND Brexit referendum. I'm asking for a referendum on the final negotiated outcome...hence it would be the FIRST referendum on that issue.However, I AM asking for a SECOND Indy Ref for Scotland.Go ahead, call me greedy for referendums, I don't care! 
Clearly Brexit was the handiwork of a Russian troll farm  
Inspiring to host women against Brexit panel in mother of Parliaments including @cliodiaspora @eloisetodd @thatginamiller (with @schooltruth @CarolineLucas @DawnButlerBrent chipping in) as all around us government been conceding ground to rebels by the minute. Onwards! 
EXCLUSIVE Boris Johnson backs £15billion 'Brexit bridge' linking Scotland and Northern Ireland  via @Telegraph 
The notion of the "Will of the People" is absolutely toxic to democracy as it delegitimises the core democratic right to oppose government policy & portrays opponents as "enemies of the democratic will of the people". It is a device of dictators & demagogues.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Everything you need to know about the bombshell report linking Russia to Brexit.  
Yeah, I love Neil Kinnock. His speech at the Labour conference, when he stood up to Militant inspired me to vote Labour in every election since then. But the way things are going on Brexit, I won’t vote Labour next time.  
NEW: It’s Brexit crunch time. Theresa May’s no-deal disaster is not an option“After months of dithering, delay and government splits, there is a chance for parliament decisively to shape the course of the negotiations,” @Keir_Starmer RT to share 
Nearly 6 in 10 Scots see themselves anti-EU, while only 37% consider themselves pro.Per poll by John Curtice.Another myth shattered?#Brexit  
"The 48% don't exist anymore because most people who voted remain at referendum accepted the result & expect Govt to get on with delivering Brexit.What was 52% is NOW more like 70% - the vast majority of the country are behind delivering on #Brexit"#EU 
Parliament ignores the will of the people at its peril.Over 17.4m people voted for #Brexit MPs must deliver what we voted for.Please share if you agree.#Brexit #bbcdp #EUWithdrawalBill 
what’s: Brexit An aura An earlobe#LoveIsland 
Hayley said to charlie about Eyal “ I don’t want to talk about trees “Huns let’s just cast our minds back to that Brexit chat    #loveisland 
Remoaners are turning into conspiracy theorists: The idea that Russia masterminded Brexit is an elitist, feverish fantasy.  
Awesome. Another union pitches in with support for a #PeoplesVote. Workers are waking up to the threat of #Brexit to prosperity and are making their feelings known. They can’t be ignored.  
As the #WithdrawalBill makes its way back to the Commons tomorrow, a reminder that not a single Leaver has shown a single quantifiable benefit of Brexit. Tinkering with CM/SM/NI is irrelevant. Any form of Brexit will harm the UK economy and services irreparably  
MPs voting on the Brexit amendments tomorrow should remember their Shakespeare. This is the last chance they'll get to stand up for what they believe in. If they don't take that chance, they'll regret if for the rest of their lives.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Labour voters in #LewishamEast clearly see both @jeremycorbyn and Brexit for what they really are   
According to the English, Sunday express the Majority of Scots back Brexit and support Ruth Davidson despite the polls suggesting the complete opposite Desperation Scotlands FM Nicola or Ruth? 
So Brexiteers  How is your Brexit working out? Oh and unionists!! PAY ATTENTION TI WHAT YER BEIN TELT!! THIS IS HAPPENIN!! WAKEY FKN WAKEY!! The union is done!! Finished!! Britain ain't great anymore!!!  
Land Rover is the latest in a long line of companies stating they may move HQ and/or production to the EU if Brexit happens. NI may receive special deal to maintain no border. Growing calls for Scotland to begin talks with EU on continuing membership to protect its economy. 
Real proud of all you bEUtiful people out in London for the #Remainathon  tonight and tomorrow, y'all keep safe and create some kinda merry hell for those #Brexit fans. With you in spirit, keep on keepin on to #StopBrexit  #FBPE #Remain #PeoplesVote  
The Brexit referendum has no legal authority over any part of Ireland if you are a believer in the Irish Republic of Easter Week proclaimed in arms and sanctified by the sacrifice of Irish Republican martyrs.   
To my local MP....Ahead of the upcoming votes I ask you to please keep these two truths in mind:1) A No Deal Brexit would damage your constituency. 2) A majority did not vote for a Hard Brexit (certainly not #thisleaver)It’s on you @scottmann4NC#MPsStandUp 
We must stop Brexit, not soften it. There is no ‘better’ form of Brexit. It is a very, very bad idea. Its only silver lining is that it has exposed the utter corrosion of our political order: reform is imperative to deliver genuine democracy & grown-up government.  
Extraordinary - Farage on air refusing to speak to Carole Cadwaladr; it shows how Brexiteers are afraid of being questioned by journalists who actually have the fact on Brexit (& Farage's murky connections) at their fingertips. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
How hard does Putin have to work to manipulate his boy-toy to do his bidding?Has Putin's manipulation of child-POTUS affected:1) US elections?2) BREXIT election?3) G7 meeting?4) NATO Treaty?5) NAFTA Agreement?6) GOP?7) TTP Agreement?8) Your welfare, safety & security? 
Should really read 'the PM has warned rational Tory MPs they will undermine her negotiated position with the irrational Johnson, Davis, Rees-Mogg, and Fox, if they rebel on key Brexit legislation'.For sanity's sake we need a #PeoplesVote leading to an #ExitFromBrexit 
Rees-Mogg is either a liar or a man who simply doesn't care enough about the truth to check the accuracy of his statements, even when inaccuracy might harm millions. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
BREAKING: Blah blah, seek to place before the blah blah, nothing, blah, thanks Chuka, blah, Tory zombie Brexit survival blah...  
Tomorrow's front page ... MPs told: Don't ignore Scottish Parliament - Ahead of crucial Brexit bill debate, SNP demand a halt to Tory power grab to avert constitutional crisis  
EU citizens! Those African migrants are now safely off to Spain. Spain has a rich history of Islam, which turned out well for all involved. I foresee no problems. And I'm sure absolutely none of them will try to get to the racist UK, because of Brexit. 
One day Anna,  if you try  REALLY  hard,  you'll remember there was just'Remain' or 'Leave' on the referendum ballot paperThen if you try really, really hard, you'll realise there is no 'hard' or 'soft'Brexit .....There is  ONLY  Brexit  (Leave the EU, as on the ballot paper)  
☞ 9 Catalan politicians & grassroots civic leaders have been jailed in Madrid without trial, some of them for over 7 months, for organizing #Catalonia's independence referendum.#RogueSpain. Europe, open your eyes. #FreeCatalanPoliticalPrisoners 
The prime minister has warned Tory MPs they will undermine her negotiating position with the EU if they rebel on key Brexit legislation  
It appears that @Arron_banks has deleted this Golden Tweet from the EU referendum period, when he was exploring the 'Gold Play' with Russian Oligarch and a sanctioned Russian bank. Why on earth would he do that?  
Another stormy meeting of Labour MPs tonight on Brexit. Their splits will ensure deserved victory for @theresa_may 
It is vital to respect the Ref result for what it was: an opinion poll set up by our Sovereign Parliament to inform debate in the House. It showed about half those voting wanted to leave and half to remain in the EU. Gov misled us. It was not a decision referendum #A50challenge 
Jacob Rees-Mogg manages to raise Brexit to the art form of a stream of consciousness nonsense poem. 
At this point, it is probably easier to ask which Democratic nations Russia has not committed an act of war by criminally interfering in their Democratic processes.#StupidGate has ties to #Brexit via the Russians.#TheResistance 
I voted for #Brexit so that our parliamentarians can be held accountable for their decisions. Once UK sovereignty has been fully restored, I'm perfectly happy for our MPs to vote on whatever the topic of the day may be. Until then, I expect all MPs to respect our vote to Leave.  
2. Numbers for govt still dicey on 'meaningful vote' - how much power should Parliament have over final Brexit deal - they could still be defeated tomorrow 
Everything about Theresa May suggests she is a narrow-minded authoritarian nationalist. Her lies, insults and attempts to suppress democratic contention on #Brexit will neither be forgotten nor forgiven.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Back me on Brexit bill or undermine EU talks, May tells Tory MPs  Time for May to realise that this is about the country - not about her 
'Merci Brexit': Paris overtakes London as 'most attractive European capital'  
Do you feel foolish now Tim? Anything you would like to say in defence of Brexit? Brexit is really good because ... A. Russia loves itB. It will break up the UKC. It has encouraged the racist scumbagsD. It is ruining our economyE. We are a laughing stock#StopBrexit #FBPE 
When they vote in the Lords could the results be given as Names of those who voted for BrexitNames of those who voted against Brexit but not in receipt of EU moneyNames of those who voted against Brexit but receives money from the EU 
The parliament of Navarra calls for a Spanish referendum on remaining a monarchy or becoming a republic, saying it's a question that should have been put to the people 40 ago.  
UK, Survation poll:EU membership referendum18-24 | 83% REMAIN, LEAVE 17% 25-34 | 64% REMAIN, LEAVE 36%35-44 | 57% REMAIN, LEAVE 43%45-54 | 46% REMAIN, LEAVE 54%55-64 | 42% REMAIN, LEAVE 58%65+    | 35% REMAIN, LEAVE 65%Field work: 31/05/18 – 4/06/18Sample size: 1,628 
Labour down by 19 percent in #LewishamEast. But of course, this has nothing to do with Brexit. Honest  
Erm? Arron Banks on LBC admitting there was Russian collusion at a low level in the Brexit campaign?!  
This is the double of a dog we had when I was a child. Bisto! Coming back in spirit to fight Brexit  woof woof  
The consequences of remaining in a Customs Union... (a short thread)1) The EU would demand we keep the other 4 freedoms including freedom of movement “no cherry picking”#Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
Delighted to see @LibDems spokesman for Brexit Tom Brake @thomasbrake on stage at the #Remainathon rally! Keep fighting everyone! 
Sorry to interrupt the wall-to-wall hamburger and dictator coverage, but this a BFD. The billionaire who funded Brexit (Arron Banks) literally just told Nigel Farage in a live interview that "low level" Russian collusion maybe kinda sorta happened in the Brexit campaign.  
Those Tory MPs who refuse to support #Brexit should be immediately de-selected & replaced with Tory Candidates who will honour the pledges they're elected on.Voters are fed up to the back teeth with politicians who break their promises and think they know better than us plebs.  
The three people in this picture with Donald Trump have now confessed to colluding with Russia to rig the #Brexit vote.  
If the national disaster of Brexit goes ahead the #BBC will have to take responsibility for contributing to its implementation (by presenting it as a fait accompli from the date of the referendum) and the corporation will be finished as a public broadcaster.#bbcbias 
Clear message from Simon Allison of @ToriesVsBrexit at the #Remainathon rally in Whitehall:There are only two possible Brexits: 'Bend over and take the rules Brexit' or 'Bankruptcy Brexit'. We don't want either.  
This is a really great piece, by @anandMenon1. Both the Tories and Labour have nonsensical and unworkable policies on Brexit. We deserve better from our political elites (although I’m not holding my breath)  
If Russia did somehow influence the vote, they were very clever to do it so early... because my friends and I have wanted to Brexit since 1978  
EU commissioner says ‘tide is going out on the high priests of Brexit’ and raises prospect of second referendum Give the public a chance to think again! #PeoplesVote 
It's the #EU withdrawal bill vote.Some @Conservatives MP's perhaps need reminding of their Manifesto commitment on #BrexitHit RT now. Those tagged will see this message each time you do.@Anna_Soubry@NickyMorgan01@Sandbach@JDjanogly@heidiallen75@S_Hammond 
Breaking: the FBPE campaign for @JeremyCorbyn to “stop Brexit” is over. As many of us have said, repeatedly, there is no way @CONservatives would vote against their own. Tonight they have proved it. Anyone spouting the “stop Brexit” nonsense from now on will be blocked. 
Every side represented at the #remainathon Tories against Brexit alongside unicorn carrying Lib Dem councillor pic.twitter.com/TMVpvKYDMt 
Jaguar Land Rover is an Indian company. Many BREXIT unionists seem to think it’s a UK firm. It’s not bwwwitish. 
Quite a collection of Tory MPs who fundamentally disagree on the direction of travel on Brexit - and the amendment only commits to a Government statement “outlining steps” towards a “customs arrangement” by 31st Oct 2018.Another fudegorama.No Grieve, Soubry, etc... 
The Corbynite left are now blaming all these shop closures and job losses on Austerity rather than Brexit. So in other words, they can't deny that jobs are being lost, but they still can't admit that their great leader's promise of "no jobs lost through Brexit" was a lie. 
Dictator May warns Tory rebels ahead of crucial #Brexit votes on Lords amendments tomorrow.  @NickyMorgan01 has already capitulated, will @Anna_Soubry be next to cave in?Party and salary ahead of country. 
...the sponsors of this attempt to strip Parliament of the meaningful vote it has secured on the #Brexit deal in the Commons & the Lords are arch Brexiters. DExU Ministers Steve Baker and Suella Braverman, fmr ERG Chairs, always opposed Parliament’s meaningful vote. 
Most important moment on the EU (Withdrawal) Bill tmr: the vote on this amendment the Brexit Secretary is seeking to add to the Bill to give the Govt a passport to pursue a ‘no deal’ Brexit if Parliament votes against the PM’s Withdrawal Agreement. It’s vital it doesn’t pass...  
The guy who bankrolled Brexit's  campaign just admitted that "low-level" Russian collusion maybe possibly did actually happen. Holy crap. 
‘@Arron_banks: ‘Russian witch hunt’ and ‘fake news narrative’ used by losers to explain Trump and Brexit wins. “Sunday Times article was four pages of smoke from a single match, it was ludicrous.” 
Theresa May is leading Britain into Brexit's meltdown phase—The “out of the single market, out of the customs union” plan lives on in rhetoric onlyInstead there is:•“customs partnership”•as frictionless trade as possible•transition•backstop option 
EU collapse:- UK: #Brexit- Greece: bankrupt- Slovenia: populist win- Italy: anti-migrant gov't- Poland: anti-migrant gov't- Austria: anti-migrant gov't- Hungary: anti-migrant gov't- Sweden: anti-migrant party 1st in poll- Spain: independence Catalonia, looming elections  
Profile: Isabel Oakeshott and the 'Bad Boys of Brexit'  
There won't be a second independence referendum. The SNP & their Remainer friends have made referendums pointless 
WATCH | "You've got to see in the context," Arron Banks tells @Nigel_Farage  on @LBC, "there hadn't been a Russian witchhunt. It was only when Trump won that there had to be a reason, and for Brexit.""The @thesundaytimes article was four pages of smoke from a single match." 
What is the overlap between Brexit and the US 2016 Election? Mercer/Cambridge Analytica/Wikileaks. How are they connected to Russia? Mueller knows. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg pulling no punches on the government's "abject" Brexit display to date. He's ramped up his criticism in the last fortnight - it's certainly welcome and wholly justified!  
This sounds terrible. Securing short-term win, by throwing away arguably the most important opportunity to come from Brexit. Granted, 'arrangement' is vague...but so vague its ominous...  
Brexit Trade Deal ‘Will Get Done’ by Trump, Says U.S. Ambassador   
Another surreal moment in the history of Brexit.  
Very much looking forward to tomorrow and honouring the commitment made in the manifesto I was elected on - to vote with the government and back the democratic will of the people #Brexit 
Leader of the @libDemlords Lord Newby has a positive message on stage at the #Remainathon outside Downing Street; stopping Brexit is round the corner if we all keep on working at it.  
Wish I’d had the balls to have used my camera at the 1922 Meeting with the #PM just now!She was very firm on #Brexit and the need to be able to make trade deals (ie out of Customs U).The Party has its tail wagging.More confident for good results over the next couple of days. 
LBC giving Nigel Farage, Arron Banks and Andy Wigmore 25 minutes of totally unchallenged airtime to clear their own campaign of any wrongdoing on Brexit and Russia has to be a new low in British broadcasting. 
My latest, on Brexit Flight 2019 to, er ...  
Nigel: was there Russian collusion in the Brexit campaign? Arron: maybe at a low level. Interesting answer. 
Am checking with @theresa_may if she will be recommending a Police investigation into Soros interference into the Brexit referendum. 
Navarra's Parliament votes in favour to have a referendum: Republic or Monarchy  
Andy: "Not one penny or rouble went into the Brexit campaign". Arron now claiming "the source" of this was article in Atlantic Council report. Not true. This is so interesting...they both sound nervous & on back foot... 
What’s more important than the country to the @CONservatives? POWER. And they will cling on at all costs. It’s the 1% what matters most.They will never be forgiven for Brexit. Any @UKLabour MP who votes with them this week should hang their head in shame. #PLPWatch 
“No Deal means most #EUcitizens in #UK would become illegal immigrants overnight on 29 March. Unless #NoDeal proponents support a #backstop on #CitizensRights, this is what instils fear in our hearts.” @The3Million in @PoliticsMeans. #Brexit @InLimboBrexit 
Strong positive post Brexit piece by @GeorgeFreemanMP on the opportunity that Brexit offers us to forge our own path through innovation, tech & bio science.   
Conservative MP less than impressed by PM's appearance at 1922 committee: "I was expecting something more substantive. It was all motherhood and apple pie stuff about Brexit meaning Brexit. It's government by committee - like a parish council. I want to be led." 
"We need to send a clear message to the EU." Lucy Allan to support Government on key Brexit votes this week | Lucy Allan  
So lets get this straight. We're leaving the EU but the EU refuse to give us a free trade deal. The US are offering us a free trade deal along with the rest of the G7. Yet Mrs May is siding with Macron and Merkel? And she is the UK Prime Minister elected on pro Brexit Manifesto? 
1/ In August 2016, Trump "called himself 'Mr. Brexit' and nobody really [knew] why." cc @thespybrief 
Go get’em guys, sorry I can’t be with you all. We can and must stop Brexit. @SODEMAction @OFOCBrexit @Scientists4EU @euromove 
#Brexit Britain Part 2. Tata to move all production of Discovery Land Rover to Slovakia, wider manufacturing output falls 1.4 per cent in April and export growth slumping. Not a “bump in the road” aka Boris Johnson. The result of impending disastrous end of friction free trade. 
One of the worst things about Brexit has been the way the divides have if anything got worse since the referendum. As I discover every time I try to be even handed and upset people who thought I was on their side. 
America! Remember @nigel_farage? Aka Mr Brexit?!? Friend of Steve Bannon, ally of Trump, star of Russia TV. Turns out good pals & Brexit funder, @Arron_banks & @andywigmore were negotiating covert deals brokered by Russian ambassador! Counter-propaganda offensive launching soon.. 
I guessing the staff at Landrover in Solihull are today still thinking fondly of that ' Superb Brexit campaign in the West Midlands '. Not. 
#brexit Britain Part 1. Government whips to manage yet more British marginalisation and decline by voting down all Lords amendments to EU withdrawal bill.Meanwhile PM May can only express her “disappointment” about Trump’s attack on the west and its values at G7. She needs him. 
BREAKING: EU commissioner says ‘tide is going out on the high priests of #Brexit’ and raises prospect of second referendum#PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch#StopBrexit #brexitshambles 
The question of independence has never really gone away, especially with Brexit, so it would be reasonable to assume that the thought of an independent Scotland isn't that off-putting to investors.  
New polling by Opinium shows Labour voters favour staying in the single market after Brexit by a ratio of almost 3:1.  A clear majority of Labour voters in all regions - including those voting Leave - support a Single Market relationship with the EU in the event of Brexit. /8 
Patrick Blower on Boris Johnson criticising the UK government's Brexit talks strategy, saying it lacks "guts" and suggested Donald Trump could do a better job - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Turning into quite a good day for Corbyn’s preferred Brexit outcomes: Tory Remainers crying off makes it easier to argue that the EEA can’t pass, and fantasy EEA “with safeguards” amendment makes it harder to argue the EEA works for the UK. 
"The DUP enthusiastically supported Brexit but did so, one suspects, in the confident belief that it would never happen. Their Brexit campaign was a day trip to a British theme park, a chance to wave the Union flag...".@fotoole on top form. 
Brexit Minister .@SuellaBraverman refuses to give way to answer my question on what she believes is a 'meaningful' vote for Parliament.  Apparently because she needed time to complete her speech. She then promptly sits down, leaving an hour left on the clock! #Brexit #FBPE 
New BMG poll for Change Britain on post-Brexit trade: 71% of voters back leaving the Customs Union 64% of Labour voters want independent trade policy 58% of Remainers said referendum result must be respected  
Anti-Brexit protesters outside Parliament including Helena from Banbury. Big contingent from Oxfordshire planning an overnight vigil  
"Now Arron - it’s time to come clean - these Russia allegations are a remoaner plot to stop Brexit aren’t they??""My lawyer instructs me my answer is no comment""He's not denying it! Well there you have it. A remoaner conspiracy funded by George Soros. Up next, some racism."  
#brexit is spiralling out of control.  Few MPs are likely to show courage for the country this week.  Time for the people to take back control.  March with me on 23rd June for a #PeoplesVote on the real options - please watch & share my video message 
The only thing this generation of MPs will be remembered for is how they voted on Brexit.Those who plead ‘I knew it was a disaster but those whips were tough’ will go the way of Uriah Heep 
Marshall: "The relationship between Russia and the Brexit campaign now looks very much like what President Trump’s accusers believe happened simultaneously in the United States" (Prime access)  
Well done Brexiters. 'Project Fear' is now our 'Project Reality'. Go and stand outside the factory gates, look those worker in their eyes and tell them that Brexit is a great opportunity.  
Fellow Remainers - It would be great if you could join the #StopBrexit section of the #PeoplesVote march on June 23. And lets make it noisy, not just little groups of a dozen or so chanting or singing Ode to Joy but 100s or 1000s.  #Brexit #FBPE 
I voted for Brexit. Proudly. To exit the EU. Completely. Two years on, I'd vote exactly the same way. The screaming, hissy drama that ensued has convinced me what I knew all along. I voted correctly. 
. @thatginamiller  explains why she'll be taking part in the #PeoplesVote March - make sure you join us to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal!  
How many Tory MPs are in receipt of EU Money? As they have  a vested interest they should not be allowed to vote on Brexit matters. 
The effects of the 8th were awful for so many, the thing that stood out during the lead up to the referendum was the sharing of stories. So many stories. I met a man in Dublin Castle on the 26th after the result. This is his story. #repealedthe8th  
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "The people had a vote, 17.4million people. The biggest exercise in British democratic history - to leave the EU.“If you give people the second vote, what is that vote going to be about?" #Brexit  
Stonewall co-founder @mcashmanCBE addresses the crowd on the vital importance of making sure that the rights of LGBT people are not eroded, no matter how people voted in the referendum #EUWithdrawalBill 
Not at all surprised that Labour's front bench cannot answer the question of whether they support a final say on the deal or people's vote. When will Corbyn start representing the many? #Brexit #FBPE 
This is an important if sometimes uncomfortable read for all remainers. We need to project a positive vision that avoiding Brexit is the first stage in a wider reform of govt. and politics to make it fit for to solve the problems individuals face.   
Labour Brexit latest: Starmer been having lots of meetings with MPs in an attempt to minimise any rebellion, inc some today. I’m told at least 60 still plan to defy the whip and back the EEA. 10-15 from Leave seats to vote against it. Let’s see if things change after PLP meeting. 
Seems like this should be a bigger story - evidence of direct Russian involvement in the Brexit vote  
..."Paris is more attractive for foreign investors than London for the first time in more than a decade, according to a new report, which points the finger at Brexit as one of the main causes for the shift." 
we had the same problem with economists for Brexit - 1000 against and 5 for - and all the debates put one on one as if the argument was balanced = I mostly refused to debate with the crackpots which may have been a mistake 
British manufacturing unexpectedly recorded the sharpest fall in output for more than five years in April, declining by 1.4% and the trade in goods deficit unexpectedly widened by about £2bn.So much for #Brexit devaluation boosting output.#StopBrexit 
European Commission rejects UK's Brexit backstop plan over hard Irish border risk It's official! As expected, the EU think May's solution to the Irish border issue falls far short of requirements. What a colossal waste of time, effort & money. 
Corbyn. Is. Not. In. Charge. The. Tory. Party. Are. In. Charge. Brexit.  Is. Their. Mess.Yes? 
I need 31 lovely tweeps to get me to 7000 followers. I’ll follow everyone back. Let’s keep growing the #FBPE #Remain voice. Now is the time to dig deep like the #Remainathon guys in London demanding a meaningful vote. Brexit can be stopped but only if we stop it #WATON  
The tide is finally starting to go out on the High Priests of #Brexit, and not before time. There is a sense that the British public & business is finally seeing through their deception. More in my speech:  
British EU officials are stuck on a broken down train in perfect Brexit metaphor 
13)  In my first frame I said this thread will be good.  Perhaps I lied.  It's not good news that the Russians interfered with BREXIT as well as the US elections of 2016.  But it is good news that we're finding out about it now.  
Here's Corbyn sycophant Owen Jones criticizing Germany for imposing austerity on the EU, while supporting a #Brexit which will impose even more austerity on the British people. It's already put our economy at the bottom of the EU growth league.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
The man is a fantasist. Rees-Mogg: no need for customs checks at Dover in no-deal Brexit  
11)  It means our cousins over the pond were ROYALLY screwed by the Russians manipulating the BREXIT vote.  (And here I thought the Brits were the smartest cousins in our extended family of man.)  
Yes! Superb by transport trade union @TSSAunion who are now supporting a #PeoplesVote on any Brexit deal that govt brings back.See:  
The @TSSAunion have formally backed a #peoplesvote on the government's Brexit deal.With so much at stake for workers up and down this country, it is vital they have the final say. Please share  
Advisory referendum, as detained within the EU Union Referendum Bill.Iain Dale is talking about a leaflet and comparing it to legislation.What a wally.Reference: 
On 19 June the Divisional Court will hear @GoodLawProject's case against the Electoral Commission for mismanaging the Referendum. You can read our Skeleton here  and the Electoral Commission's Skeleton here 
Brexit will provide opportunities they said...They are liars. Brexit is the biggest financial disaster the UK has ever inflicted upon itselfScotland, It's NOW time for Independence before they damage our country too  
No 10 accused of forcing through Brexit votes before Leave campaign investigation is published  
Caller repeatedly says the Brexit referendum was advisory only, @IainDale’s response is savage 
See Nigel, your Brexit Buddies weren’t hangin’ with just any Russian Spy. Alexander Udod was trusted at the highest levels of Russian intel w Putin’s blessing to carry out plans to assassinate the Skripals with a nerve agent on UK soil. All of you guys #TREASONING w Trump 
The Customs Union and Meaningful Vote amendments will (hopefully) pass this week. Both supported by Labour. The EEA won’t pass - not supported by Labour.The lesson? Corbyn, whether he likes it or not, has as much power over Brexit as May. 
My old man has voted labour all his life, 63 in Sept but he knows brexit will cause where he works to closeVoted remain by the wayFor the first time in his life he does not want to vote Labour as they support brexitExplain to him why he should vote Labour to loose his job  
As the #WithdrawalBill makes its way back to the Commons tomorrow, a reminder that staying in the #CustomsUnion would block the major benefits of #Brexit: striking free trade deals across the globe and bringing down the cost of goods for UK consumers.  
Arron Banks (the billionaire who bankrolled Brexit's  campaign) "admitted passing over contact details for members of the Trump transition team to Russian officials and meeting w/ the Russian ambassador in London just 3 days after their Trump Tower summit." 
Here we go, the WTO rules of origin are beginning to hit home. Welcome to the bright new world of post Brexit WTO rule, bye bye car makers - OR we could stay in the #EU @peoplesvote_uk 
It's perhaps slightly unfair, but I find it difficult to take seriously Brexit advocates who now go on about sacred integrity of the UK when the difficulties thrown up for Northern Ireland were an entirely predictable consequence of their decision. 
All part of Farage’s distancing from UKIP so, after Brexit, he can join the Tory party of which he is de facto leader. Read all about it:  
BREAKING: @TSSAunion, a Labour affiliated union, joins Royal College of Nursing & Prospect to support a #PeoplesVote.With new facts on Brexit coming to light all the time, it's clear that more & more people are demanding a #PeoplesVote. 
Nothing to do with Brexit nothing to do with Brexit nothing to do with Brexit nothing to do with Brexit nothing to do with Brexit nothing to do with Brexit nothing to do with Brexit  
HOLY SHIT BREAKING NEWS The spy that was kicked out of UK after Skripal poisoning was the SAME spy that connected Brexit Boys Aaron Banks & Andy Wigmore to Alexander Yakovenko TREASON @dwinfrey72  tip @JedGarren 
British campaigners file US lawsuit against firms controlled by Arron Banks over Brexit influence scheme  
And here's some more foreign interference in the EU referendum, less than a week before the vote.Think I'm spotting a pattern here: you're allowed to interfere in foreign elections, but only if you go to Davos every year. Can @DamianCollins confirm? 
"Arron, now I'm afraid I'm going to have to be quite tough here: Would you say all these allegations are a remoaner witch hunt plot invented by snowflake cucks in order to sabotage Brexit?""Yes""Knew it. Next up, stay tuned for the news followed by some dog-whistle racism." 
FUN FACT: No one was allowed to participate in the Trump campaign or Brexit unless they had a minimum of two Russian contacts. 
The EEA option is a non starter for the UK, as Keir Starmer explains here.Tory Brexit can only be held to account through practical, realistic amendments, not through pointless ideological signalling. #PLPwatch 
I guess the BBC won't be doing much news related to Brexit today...  
Shocking! Foreign interference in the EU referendum: US banks donated a million pounds to the Remain campaign without declaring it to the Electoral Commission! Someone had better tell @DamianCollins to investigate 
Think it's just a few diehard Remainers who are against Brexit? WRONG! Look at all these groups that support @SODEMAction in their protests!#Remainathon #48HoursToStopBrexit#StopBrexit #FBPE #WATON 
LAnd Rover Discovery was invented at the Solihull plant nearly 30 years ago - production there now ending... as I reported in #brexitforensics there have been some quite tense moments between Govt and JLR over Brexit/ transition/ customs etc 
What's the likely explanation? Redwood let the cat out of the bag - Government is threatening businesses that speak out against Brexit, so they flounder around looking for something else to blame. But the truth is the truth and the high quality manufacturing jobs are leaving.  
'Don't swallow the lies of Boris Johnson and Jacob Rees-Mogg when they tell you what Brexit supporters voted for. Our research shows Leave voters don't want a hard Brexit'  
On Saturday, we exposed LeaveEU's covert relationship to Russia. Yesterday, @Nigel_Farage was too chickenshit to take my call and answer questions on his radio show. Today he invites in top Kremlin pals, @Arron_banks & @andywigmore. Britain: meet the men who gave us Brexit  
Sick of Brexit?Then help the country ditch it. Everyone is sick of it - and it’s doing nothing but clog up parliament, get in the way of other issues and burn mountains of money for no gain.You can’t get anything fixed until you ditch the deadweight of Brexit. 
@Andrew_Adonis Carole, this is truly delightful . So the BBC want "balance" between someone who seems to have covered up extremely serious evidence of Russian interference in the 2016 UK EU Referendum , and you simply wanting to get all the facts out into the public domain. 
As far as I can see the Govts and Corbyns line on Brexit (and potential as well as real job losses) are not far apart... maybe in theory they are supposed to be... In cruel practical matters both approaches are despicable... 
‘A huge cache of leaked messages show how Eurosceptic Tories have repeatedly pressured the news outlets inc @bbcnews @bbcr4today to shape coverage of Brexit – and joked about cutting off a BuzzFeed News reporter’s testicles’ #StopBrexit 
In September then JLR boss told me that the Slovakia factory was a “hedge” for uncertainty over post Brexit customs uncertainty for their integrated supply chains...  
Did Russia buy Brexit and subvert Britain's democracy?Until we know the truth, it's folly to press on with BrexitWas it will of the people or the will of Vladimir Putin?MPs on all sides: history will judge you by your vote todayWinston Churchill is watching@ElectoralCommUK 
Jacob Rees-Mogg claimed this morning that "there will be no need for checks at Dover" in the case of a No Deal Brexit.In reality, the Freight Transport Association has warned that a No Deal Brexit would lead to 17-mile long queues at Dover. 
How a Journalist Kept Russia’s Secret Links to Brexit Under Wraps  via @thedailybeast 
Labour tiring, Lib Dems coming up on the outside, Tories slipping back, it’s now a 2 horse race in the final stages! Send Corbyn a message! Stop Backing The Tories Brexit #FBPE #lewishamEast #LibDems 
With my brother @TonyBurke2010, Unite’s leader in Uk. He knows brexit’s costs for workers and industries.  #weareUaw#UAW2018 @UAW 
 TSSA delegates meeting at Annual Conference in Leicester have today voted overwhelmingly to campaign in favour of a referendum on any Brexit deal agreed by Parliament once they are aware of the deal on offer. 
.@TSSAunion joins the @ theRCN & @ProspectUnion in backing a #PeoplesVoteWith the Gov in chaos, new facts coming to light every day & a whole series of Brexit promises being broken, it's clear that we need a #PeoplesVote on the final deal. Please RT: 
#Brexit Trade Deal ‘Will Get Done’ by #Trump, Says U.S. Ambassador.  “There is a lot of capability and willingness and no matter what the challenges, we will get something done.” #ThankYouTrump #BestPresidentEver #MBGA 
Stunning new poll shows that even a majority of Remain voters want to see the referendum result respected, with the UK taking back control of its trade policy. A huge majority of Brits want independence but May drags her feet! 
The sad thing is there are workers at Jaguar Land Rover who voted for Brexit and must now deal with the reality of voting themselves out of a job 
Brexit Trade Deal ‘Will Get Done’ by Trump, Says U.S. Ambassador   
Poll pours cold water on conference referendum talk  
Extensive discussion with @ChiefConPSNI @PoliceServiceNI on legacy, bonfires,brexit, policing board @moneillsf @GerryKellyMLA @LindaDillon81 
FUNNY BREXIT MOMENT 427: the morning I went to buy a croissant at the same time as @MichelBarnier was getting some for @DavidDavisMP 
The next Labour government will ensure that everyone has a unicorn to call their own. It doesn’t matter that Brexit will cost us £19bn a year, as we will magic the money into existence to spend on unicorns. A unicorns first Brexit!   
Follow @carolecadwalla because she will ferret out the truth on #Brexit  
The #EUWithdrawalBill agreement between 'Welsh' Labour & the Tories represents a "clawback of power to Westminster" says Prof John Bell of Cambridge Uni & will set a precedent for other forthcoming Brexit Bills. From now on Wales "will not be allowed to dissent".  
I also collected signatures for various candidates & Save Our Schools referendum at various nearby locations. Once again, I met Dems who thought they were basically alone. A lot of them lived in my legislative district & we shared complaints about our State Senator, Debbie Lesko. 
Laugh today because tomorrow we'll watch you weep and squirm.Brexit is fraud.#remainathon 
Desperado. Because the massive disruption associated with breaking up the U.K. would be a breeze and no one is remotely concerned over that given what we’ve seen with Brexit.How can someone undoubtedly intelligent be so intellectually dishonest?  
Exposing the naked truth of Brexit.@ali__samson#FinalSayForAll#FBPE#remainathon 
Moscow also had its hands dug deep, literally, into Brexit. There's still so much more to understand here. Why was Nigel Farage showing up in the media spin room advocating for Trump during debates?  ...  
Brexit won’t affect car manufacturing in the UK, as there won’t be any car manufacturing left by the time we leave the EU.  
Furious. Voted Labour at every general election since I was old enough. My first Lab MP in the 80s was Red Ken. Thought the Rev Tony not left wing enough & opposed the Iraq War. I'm a party member, & utterly anti-#Brexit. Corbyn & Milne are Stalinist loons.  
What a difference a Brexit referendum makes  
British MPs are calling for the police and parliament to investigate links between millionaire Brexit donor Arron Banks and the Russian government, after it emerged that he met the Kremlin’s ambassador to the U.K. 3 times, rather than once as he claimed.  
The Dublin-born musician, Bob Geldof has given his backing to a growing campaign to force a second referendum on Brexit 
This is why we need all hands on deck to donate $, phone bank & canvass for Democrats in Nov. “For Am voters, it means understanding the real stakes of this year’s midterm elections. They are a referendum on American ideals that are older than any of us.”  
Brexit Britain's loss is in the EU's gain...this is only the beginning so get used to it. All business common sense tells you that if you are a manufacturer, you are much better off in the Single Market and the Customs Union. Time to stop this nonsense. #PeoplesVote 
Arron Banks, the UK's biggest Brexit donor, traveled to Moscow in Feb 2016 to discuss a multibillion dollar opportunity to buy Russian goldmines. "Extensive contact" w/ Russians continued while Banks and Nigel Farage were in the US campaigning for Trump.  
No you're clearly a very privileged right kind of immigrant who could  vote in the EU Referendum. A right which was denied my EU citizen wife and mother of 3 British born children and all my British born family living in EU. That's my point. 
@afneil @AndrewMarr9 ‘Huge cache of leaked messages show how Eurosceptic Tories have repeatedly pressured news outlets inc @bbcnews @bbcr4today to shape coverage of Brexit – and joked about cutting off a BuzzFeed News reporter’s testicles’ #StopBrexit 
Glad to see @TSSAunion has backed a people’s vote on the Brexit deal; tribute to @Manuel_TSSA. The unions are on the move! 
Citizens' Assembly on Brexit: what does it tell us about the kind of Brexit people want and how we could do democracy better? Article just out in @po_qu (£)  
“The British people voted for border controls. Not more unskilled, mass migration after Brexit.”   
Daniel Hannan served as the first director of the European Research Group (ERG), authored 'Why Vote Leave' and co-founded the official Brexit campaign - but now he claims May's deal could be worse than staying in.The government are making a mess of Brexit. Spread the word!  
Just announced Jaguar Land Rover is moving all production of the Discovery to Slovakia. Cost of #Brexit beginning to really harm the UK now. We must stop Brexit now. #JaguarLandRover 
Latest on the Labour Brexit policy  
Tonight at 8pm ET I'm hosting a #TwitterChat to answer your health, fitness and nutrition-related questions for #ChronicPain. Be sure to tune in! 
Actually, the Brexiter MEPs have been milking the system for years; work-shy but with full pension on Brexit. Of couse, there are those Brexiter MEPs who had to resign:  
If anyone is still under the illusion that #Brexit was not rigged they are living in a dream world from which they are quite happy to see others suffer and die as a result of their actions #FBPE 
It seems to me that our economy is not celebrating Brexit with enough patriotic vigour. Leaking investment, jobs and productivity....I’m sure the blue passport production will save us though....oh.. 
Brighty on Jeremy Corbyn’s Brexit position - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Russia is run by a corrupt ex-KGB officer who views the break-up of the Soviet Empire as a massive disaster.He wants to restore the Kremlin’s glory by undermining the West. Brexit is a bomb planted underneath the UK as part of his hybrid warfare.Why aren’t Tories angrier?!?  
One of our members received this ignorant reply from her Tory MP.  "I have no idea how you can say that “people have changed their minds” given that you live several thousand miles away.If you have complaints about Brexit then I suggest you contact your own MP in Spain." 
Hardly surprising that many MEPs want to stop Brexit. Must be hard saying goodbye to an extravagant salary & benefits on the taxpayer.  
Documents raise new questions about Russian role in Brexit  
This isn't to blame Dacre for the referendum outcome alone - I'd look at forty years of slow decline for major parts of the UK instead - but if we're up in arms about influence operations, we don't need to look further than the home-grown media 
The Conservative party traditionally upheld the Union.A hard Brexit is heading for  Scottish independence and a united Ireland.Well done, Brexiteers - an empire that once spanned the globe is to be reduced to a little England (and possibly Wales ?) 
Apparently controversial opinion: Dacre was more influential, by orders of magnitude, than Putin and Cambridge Analytica in the Brexit referendum 
Bristol Greens urge local MPs to back important vote on staying in the Single Market  #Brexit #EUWithdrawalBill 
My goodness, the @instituteforgov report on Whitehall's Brexit preparedness makes for cheerful reading on a sunny afternoon: 
Brexit mustn’t damage the greatest city in the world. My fellow London MPs and I will look at the Brexit deal and take a view on whether we think it’s good enough for our constituents and our city. We have one common goal: to give people a final #VoteontheDeal 
So, #Russia was behind #Brexit. The same Brexit that benefits Russia the most through the weakening of both the EU & the UK, and divides the West as is part of Russia's military doctrine. Who would have thought.  
For the record, the @guardian did not "hack" Isabel Oakeshott's computer. The only hack in this story is Isabel Oakeshott for putting her personal interests ahead of Britain. She withheld information about Russian involvement in Brexit. She knew what she was doing. 
Top Line:European Commission says that the UK backstop “will lead to a hard border” post Brexit with Ireland, because it doesnt cover regulatory, ie Single Market considerations.Comprehensive rejection.  
#EUWithdrawalBill   There is 291 days to Brexit day. When UK leaves the EU the fight is not over for leavers.Total Independence is the red line.No to Customs union. No to Single Market. No to Customs alignmentFree trade yes, but we will revert to WTO rules if necessary 
Disingenuous’ Jacob Rees-Mogg gets utterly schooled AGAIN by clued-up caller on Brexit border checks  
That's because #Brexit can only be delivered if we have full control over our borders, trade, and laws. Anything else sees Britain remaining dependent on #Brussels, without any voting rights. 
It's encouraging that such a prominent figure within the Labour party, Sadiq Khan, has voiced his support for a soft Brexit. @LibDems have pushed hard for cross-party cooperation & for politicians to put the country's interest before their internal party politics. #ExitfromBrexit 
Some of the unionist leaders like @miqueliceta are in it for personal glory at the expense of all else, including their own principles.It was not long ago that Iceta was talking about the right to a referendum for self-determination. Today he's defending State repression.  
Very  point. Many UK pensioners have income tax deducted at source in the UK even if living abroad in a EU country. Why weren't they given a Brexit Referendum vote!  
And to those who see this as the fault of Brexit: possibly, but we await Royce's explanation. Still, how would that explain why Royce’s workforce shrank by two thirds since 1973, the year the UK entered the EEC (EU)? Clearly, we have a problem with globalised neoliberalism. 
For months they told us the leadership should be trusted on brexit. Labour is boxing clever, they said. Now as the leadership oppose EEA they tell us it isn’t of interest to working people & we should shush. At least have the courage to make the argument for your hard brexit FFS. 
Brexit is the UK’s suicide  
As a #migration lawyer, great to stand with #Brexit Minister @Feorlean & Polish-Scot @jullllll__  to show that Scotland  welcomes #EU citizens who have chosen to make their home here 
Remoaners are trying to wreck #Brexit. They have no clue. They hate the idea that the British people want to be in charge of our own destiny. The #EUWithdrawalBill must be passed without wrecking amendment. That way we can continue the process of making the #UK #BetterOffOut. 
Or - as I see it - an astute piece of politics by Corbyn and Starmer to try and get the best result possible from the disastrous Tory/UKIP Brexit.I trust Corbyn and Starmer on this.Lib Dems and Alastair Campbell etc are free to say what they like but can’t deliver anything.  
Scotland really is an oasis of stability and sanity amid the chaos of #Brexit. And we won at cricket too ! Outstanding.  
Yet more evidence of Tory ineptness and chaos over Brexit, and how they think the law doesn’t apply to them!   
Frankly, the ability of so many lefty movers and shakers to totally flip their previous views of immigration and Brexit in response to the leadership's capitulation does not bode well for the left holding any future Corbyn government to account. 
How journalist @IsabelOakeshott kept evidence of Russia’s secret links to Brexit under wraps and denied it ... until journalists @carolecadwalla and @peterjukes got the same evidence and published it. 
While the Westminster bubble obsesses over Barnier’s latest salvo or the wording of complex legal jargon, the public simply wants Brexit to happen, says the @Daily_Express 
Everything you need to know about the bombshell report linking Russia to Brexit's Leave campaign  
Interviewed for a campaign director for Brexit in Trump Tower, saw Donald Trump,,August 2015. Exactly when @comey was first made aware of Russian interference in the US election per his testimony. @gchq @cia @fbiwfo 
“The 48% do not exist anymore, because most people who voted Remain at the referendum accepted the result and expect the Government to get on with delivering Brexit,” says BrexitCentral’s @isaby 
EU27 governments are advising businesses not to use British parts in goods for export. "Brexit will have consequences for exports outside the EU. After Brexit, parts made in the UK no longer count towards this minimum production in the European Union."  
Spot-on by Dominic Lawson: the same WTO-ruled EU-US trade which our own anti-Brexit #EU Ambassador Darroch praises is what Remainer-Hammond's Treasury says wld be unmitigated catastrophe.#ProjectFear 2.0 scare-mongerers can't even get their story straight 
And you said voting No would protect our EU membership. You lied.You were warned Brexit = indyref2. You don't get to whine about it now. 
WATCH: ‘Disingenuous’ Jacob Rees-Mogg gets utterly schooled AGAIN by clued-up caller on Brexit border checks [VIDEO]  
The True State of the Brexit Britain Economy  
Issues for further discussion on UK note on #brexit temporary customs arrangements include implications for existing EU rules; is it a backstop?; impact on FTAs?; fraud risk w/ VAT; need for multiple adaptations by business & authorities? 
Remain is out in force today. So many sensible, fact based tweets. Brexit is dead.  
I’m sick and tired of the bleat that a second vote on Brexit would be undemocratic. Is it undemocratic to have a General Election every five years? Should the Liberal Party still be in power because Asquith won in 1910? Voters in 2016 had no idea of the details of the deal. 
UK to apply to stay in European standards system after Brexit  
"When Remainers say Russia ‘bought’ Brexit, they really mean that Russia bought us, the apparently dim, gullible electorate. It isn’t actually Russia they fear and loathe -- it’s voters, and democracy itself."Brendan O'Neill on the Remoaner meltdown 
Leave and Remain MPs should back the meaningful vote amendment if they want to abide by the referendum mandate  
.@EU_Commission published today a set of slides on #UK customs paper, outlining issues for further discussion with our UK counterparts:  We also published an infographic on our backstop proposal for IE/NI:   #Brexit  
Capacity constraints + lack of investment post-EU Referendum = inability to increase manufacturing output, despite weak pound and buoyant global economy. Simples!  
Thread from Dec ‘17 on Mississippi Gov Phil Bryant’s ongoing ties with the UK and Brexit team  
Brexit will lead to the flight of talent, a collapse in European funding and loss of access to the digital single market - that's why more than 100 tech leaders are calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final deal. Help spread the word. Please share 
Theresa May appeals for unity on Brexit votes: The country doesn’t need a false unity, it needs a government to do what’s right for the country, not what’s right for the ⁦@Conservatives⁩. #peoplesvote 
Please read every word: this hedge-fund backer of Rees Mogg stands to lose his £500M bet AGAINST the British economy if brexit is STOPPED. He is betting that you will lose your job - and the dice are loaded in his favour.  via @ThisIsMoney 
His shirt is white, his passport is blue, his heart is English. Hard Brexit Harry Maguire  
You want the Remainers to trust Corbyn & Starmer, but the problem is that Corbyn sacked Owen Smith for calling for a 2nd referendum.So do we take Corbyn’s inaction as an indication he supports a 2nd ref or do we take Corbyn’s action as an indication he doesn’t want a 2nd ref?  
Interesting that Citizen Kinnock doesn't ask the Police to investigate why the Electoral Commission hasn't looked at the Remain overspending on the EU referendum 
What has Brexit ever done for us?6 yr low manufacturing output Lowest growth in major EU economiesCrops rotting in fieldsCity jobs goingCar industry under threatExporters no idea of rules next year Fishermen fear lost market accessTime for people's vote. 
I don't know whether Arron Banks has colluded with Russia, but what I DO know is that the Hungarian-American George Soros had a HUGE amount of influence over the Remain campaign, and he continues to try and sabotage Brexit #bbcdp 
In the #Brexit referendum in 2016, there was no noticeable difference in voting patterns between men and women. Polls conducted since the referendum show that more women now think the decision to vote to leave was "wrong" in hindsight. #WomenAgainstBrexit @RemainerNow 
Democrats risk getting swallowed up in a midterm that may just turned out to be a referendum on culture rather than a brake pedal on Trump. #TheGreatRevolt  
Meeting between David Davis & EU negotiator Michel Barnier lasts just ONE HOUR as Barnier walks out...I repeat: EU don't do negotiation - never have, never will...Let's stop wasting everyone's timeNo Deal is THE Best Deal...#Brexit #Leave #EU & Go #WTO 
Average Annual Manufacturing Growth:1948-1979: 2.60%1979-2017: 0.42%Free Market Privatisation lead to Austerity.Austerity lead to Brexit.Blaming Brexit (which hasn't even happened yet) for everything without confronting the underlying issue is a dereliction of duty. 
As the son of refugees I couldn't continue to support the Conservatives - #Brexit has contributed to what I believe is their lurch to the right. Interview by @ShehabKhan in the @Independent.  #BrexitShambles 
The country just do not seem to have control on anything anymore ,  cant handle Brexit can’t handle the killings stabbings shootings rapes acid attack etc etc the list is endless , what ever happened to our country ? It’s heart breaking  
If you believe that the people should have a say on the final Brexit deal then make sure to attend out #PeoplesVote March on the Saturday after next! Sign up here: 
The EU is busy bribing Remain MPs for their votes against Brexit. But let’s hide this by talking about the Russians again.  
A lawsuit has been filed against Arron Banks, the billionaire who bankrolled Brexit, alleging that data mined by his companies in the UK was brought to the Univ. of Mississippi, where the companies sought to create their own version of Cambridge Analytica. 
Will you email your MP to ask them to support a meaningful vote on the #Brexit deal?Without a vote at the end of the Brexit talks the gov’t could ram through a miserable deal or crash out with no deal at all. Email your MP through the link below 
What has Ruth Davidson achieved for Scotland?What has Ruth Davidson achieved in her political life?I'd like to see a list of Ruth Davidson achievements?Anyone? #ScotRef#Brexit#indyref2 
The Brexit Ultras are still peddling no deal,  the most damaging result possible for the people of the UK. They don’t want you, or Parliament to take back control. They want to take control for themselves.  
As we embark on a busy week of Brexit decision making, I head in to @UKParliament absolutely clear that my Mansfield constituency voted 71% to Leave the EU, and that means control of our money, borders and laws - exactly as @theresa_may has consistently articulated. (1/2) 
Dear @JeremyCorbyn,I understand your euroscepticism. But if Brexit happens and the purse strings of Westminster are tightened, it's those who are already worst off, who'll be hit the worst.  
You would think twice about having an operation if the surgeon and anaesthetist were under investigation by police & the GMC.  You wouldn't buy a car if the salesman was being detained. Brexit should NOT go ahead until various investigations of those involved are over 
EU must recognise that the referendum result was a vote to end free movement. Maintaining such an immigration system would be unacceptable to the public 
Oxford for Europe  is arranging buses from Oxford to London for the great anti-Brexit march, June 23rd. They’re affiliated to Britain for Europe, which has details of buses from all over Britain . 
You’ll have to give ground on customs union, Tory #Brexit rebels warn Theresa MayTory MP Sarah Wollaston said she was also “minded” to defy the whips by backing a Lords amendment on giving Parliament a meaningful vote on an exit deal.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Brexit fears are beginning to taint London, with investors now judging Paris as their best European city  
Delighted by announcement from @KeithBrownSNP of help for SMEs preparing for #Brexit An initiative we at @ChangeLtd also argued for in our recent report on Brexit and Scottish Business.@scotgov #exporting 
If there’s a ‘no deal’ Brexit by 29th March 2019 - it means the UK has no safety net. Immediate end to single market, freedom of movement, customs, travel, CAP and at present, no contingency to deal with the chaos.We all need to get our heads around this. The clock is ticking. 
'Catastrophic' no-deal Brexit a real possibility, says Vince Cable  
BoJo says Trump is the solution to Brexit but it's clearer by the day that he isn't interested in a fair deal. America First means Britain Last. To find a better solution, join us here:  Please RT 
Looking forward this week to a united Labour Party, respecting democracy whilst holding the government to account on their chaotic hard Brexit agenda. #PLPWatch 
A vote for Labour under Corbyn is a vote for Brexit. Don’t be taken in by the ‘Remain tolerant’ Labour candidate.  
Brexiteers claim that Brexit Britain will be a leader in world trade but it can't even sustain Poundworld.And that's before #Brexit even happens! 
Please write to your MP with your name and address to ask them to support amendment 49 of #EUWithdrawalBill, but also in particular amendments 1 (#customsunion), 19 (#peoplesvote) and 110 (#EEA). I have! Also read excellent thread by @GuitarMoog Please RT. #FBPE #WATON #brexit  
Just a quick reminder of what #Brexit has done to the UK:23/6/2016 - 1 GBP = 1.3051 EUR11/6/2018 - 1 GBP = 1.1391 EURA 12.7% reduction in buying power. Where we used to, say, buy 100 tomatoes, we now get 87 for the same money. #Brexit is such a benefit to us all!? #PeoplesVote 
Well done guys, keep up the good work.  Get those people to talk to their MPs too.  #brexit is madness and can be stopped.  
We’ll make a success of Brexit, says country where businesses can’t sell things for a pound 
When he’s right, he’s right #Brexit :)  
HOPE not hate has decided to campaign against a hard Brexit, because we believe it will make Britain poorer and much more unequal, creating conditions that will make a far-right surge more likely. Read why we're against a hard Brexit:  
UK manufacturing suffers worst month in more than five years. ONS data reveals fall of 1.4% in output for the month. Analysts had expected an increase of 0.3%.#ProjectReality #Brexit damages the economy and jobs. 
Evidence mounts that beyond trying to orchestrate Trump’s election Russia may have been backing Brexit.  
How many of these MPs will try to wreck the #EUWithdrawalBill this week - delivering #Brexit in name only & risking the collapse of May’s government, leading in turn to a Marxist takeover?RT to show you want them to vote down the amendments and deliver #Brexit  
Trump, Brexit and the perils of Fortnite.  
If you've not yet written to your MP ahead of tomorrow's debate on #EUWithdrawalBill help is at hand:A template letter urging your MP to vote for:1. Membership of customs union2. Meaningful vote on #Brexit deal3. Removal of fixed exit date 
Just to be clear, Chris Edwards built this chain from a market stall, he discovered you could import from China at a low cost and make a higher margin - then the arse fell out the pound in june 2016 resulting in "high product cost inflation" 
Pro-EU Members of the European Parliament have taken to vandalising parts of Britain in “defiance” of Brexit. Pathetic.  
I ask Taoiseach if it might be prudent now to start planning for hard Brexit and hard border. He says provisional planning for hard Brexit has been ongoing, but not for a hard border: “Ireland won’t be installing a hard border on the island. It’s not going to happen.”  
Summary:1. The ‘bad boys of Brexit’ have some big questions to answer.2. Of course, I won't be asking any questions about lying and cheating in the Remain Camp.3. After all, I write for the Guardian.4. Where comment is free, as long as we agree with it.5. That's all, folks!  
In 2015, before Referendum was called, top issue for Brits was immigration. There was no mention of sovereignty, global trade or the EU. One must surmise that Brexit is rooted in xenophobia, whipped up by UKIP and reinforced by Russian interference & other forces. #Remainathon 
Very succinctly put by the Rt Hon Dr John Redwood MP.  Read the rest of the article here:   John Redwood believes in democracy and in delivering #Brexit.  
The most avid Brexit supporter I know has just switched his argument from “freedom to trade with the rest of the world” to “not sending money to Brussels”. It’s a sample of one, but I find it significant. The arguments are dying; the tide has turned; Brexit is on the ebb. 
I asked Karen Bradley MP: “Did the Government ever carry out a security assessment on Brexit & the Irish border? If so, was it before or after the referendum, and why is the NIO keeping this information from the public?” The people deserve transparency. 
Pro-Brexit Journalist had evidence of ties between Russia & the Brexit campaign in Summer 2016Isabel  Oakeshott says she didn't realize the stunning extent of Banks’ dealings with Russia until 2017. But even then, she kept it secret during investigations 
I was in France for meetings last week.  Brexit came up & after I had told a French colleague that Scot voted to remain, he asked "why does Scot stay in the UK when people vote one way and get another thing?"I explained what a unionist was.His response "they are brainless"  
The Brextremist elite blame everyone for the Brexit crisis except those most responsible: themselves  
I’d like to hear Corbyn explain exactly how his ‘jobs first Brexit’ works   
Julia Hartley-Brewer does not care if the #Brexit vote was a result of interference by Russia.It got the result she wanted so what the hell does the rule of law matter?Brexiters seem determined to live in the past - this one in the period before the 1867 Reform Act.  
Brexit: Damage to UK economy already happening, according to new foreign investment report  
If Brexit is ruined, the government will never be trusted to govern us again. @theresa_may 
Oh pleeeeeeease...... all he ever talks about is Brexit blah blah brexit....  
And the same for ME and everyone else I know who voted #Leave#Brexit @JuliaHB1 
52% of the British Electorate                          Vs   Childish "Stop #Brexit" graffiti                                Who will win??  
‘Brexit concerns making global investors more reluctant to invest in Britain’ Shock.  
'"Russia connection" beefs up need for people's vote on final Brexit deal'. This is why I'll be marching on the 23rd June  backing the call for a #PeoplesVote - join us! '"Russia connection" beefs up need for people's vote on final Brexit deal'  
I think its fair to say the argument for Brexit being "the biggest democratic vote in British history" is now a lie like everything else the Leave campaign said. But at least we get Blue Passports right????   
It is one thing for commentators to suggest the American president is forming policy based on a Russian blackmail threat, but @guyverhofstadt is the former Belgian prime minister and Brexit coordinator for European Parliament H/t @isaacstonefish 
Brexit devaluation and Brexit  business confidence leads to...lowest manufacturing numbers for five years. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
#LBC James the plank O’ Brien on now. Biggest bore on radio. Loves spreading doom & gloom. Can’t stop crying       because 17 million voted Brexit. All of us would vote again for Brexit you imbecile. Worth voting Brexit just see you crying every day & night.   
Labour, and only Labour, offer the best of both worlds with their Brexit position. It can be almost ‘as you were’ for remainers while leavers have their vote respected, and Labour are offering policies to tackle inequality and poverty. Both of these conditions can be met. 
BREAKING: Brexit cancelled after some mong wrote it on a road  
Both the Tories and Labour are trying to sell us Brexit unicorns  
"Leaving the Single Market and Customs Union, a “hard Brexit”, would wipe £5 billion off the Welsh economy. For a country that is already the poorest among its neighbours, Wales can’t afford this stormy outcome and neither can our people." @JonathanPlaid 
If you want the FINAL SAY on the Brexit deal (including the option of staying in the EU) contact your MP and ask them to get behind Amendment 19a NOW! 
Aside from the amendements on EEA/SM/CU this week, the amendment on the ‘Meaningful Vote’ is absolutely essential if Parliament is to be anything but a rubber stamp for the rest of the Brexit process. 1/ 
Theresa May says she hopes Brexit preparations will be complete by end of transition.... but that 'for technical reasons' they may need more time.Question is how long?We @instituteforgov compare Brexit timelines to other major govt programmes 
48 hours of anti-Brexit protests are taking place in London today and tomorrow.  
Whilst Brussels isn't perfect, have to agree the contrast in openness between the EU and HMG is chalk and cheese. I can appreciate why they went for secrecy at the start, but the UK Govt has been losing the Brexit PR battle so badly for so long it just seems senseless now.  
I had a great time campaigning in Brixton for a @peoplesvote_uk, here’s what the people we met thought about a vote on the final Brexit deal!  
Why won't Eeyore's Treasury tell us how they came up with their latest Brexit doom-mongering?  
all part of the promised Brexit dividend no doubt  
No proof. What about Soros funding that is trying to stop Brexit and the funding of Antifa thugs in military style tactics and violence?  
MUST-READ from @OFOCBrexit's co-founder @Femi_Sorry - as a Remainer talking to Brexit voters about their views, I realised we all want the same thing: a say in the final deal #PeoplesVote 
Damage to UK economy from Brexit already happening, according to new foreign investment reportReport found ‘marked increase' in UK outbound investment in 2017, particularly in financial and business services  
Please contact me if you’re targetted by a Facebook Messenger advert from this organisation asking you to lobby your MP to back HMG on Brexit legislation. Oliver Heald’s constituent’s in #Hertfordshire have been targetted this morning. Cc @carolecadwalla @peterjukes 
Let me get this straight.Tory PM calls Brexit ReferendumTory leavers commit multiple frauds and lie their tounges blackTory PM activates Article 50Tory "negotiators" are totally incompetentTories have a working majorityBut it's all Jeremy Corbyn's fault.Is that right? 
.@MhairiBlack: The Tories are using Brexit to take back control - for themselves.  
Lots of people saying that they weren’t “brainwashed” by Russia’s Brexit influence efforts. Whatever brainwashing is I don’t think anyone is suggesting that /1 
Lord Lawson: "I don't think anyone voted for Brexit because they were hoodwinked by Putin." What influenced your referendum vote? Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @CCHQPress | @Conservatives 
BREAKING: Britain's manufacturing output falls the most in nearly 6 years, casting fresh doubt on the health of the economy  
What strikes me in EU’s position on Trump and Brexit is the extreme conservatism. Even small changes are seen as imperiling the deep atomic order of the cosmos. Nothing in history or politics supports this way of looking at the world 
With Brexit reducing UK attractiveness overall according to this report, there is certainly no room for complacency - but the detail of this (which is well worth a read) shows another year of outstanding Scottish success in attracting investment.  
Labour MPs contacted '40,000 times' to back a 'people's vote' on the Brexit deal, say Lib Dems   
significant foreign interference in the EU referendum REMAIN CAMPAIGNGeorge Soros (AMERICAN )£400,000 Goldman Sachs (AMERICAN)£500,000JP Morgan (AMERICAN) £500,000Citigroup (AMERICAN) £250,000Morgan Stanley (AMERICAN )£250,0001 AMERICAN president openly encouraging remain 
Tomorrow's vote on the EU Withdrawal Bill could be last chance to prevent existing human rights protections being watered down after #Brexit. Here's why MPs must vote for #humanrights  
This is a politer version of some of the arguments I will make in ⁦@TheNewEuropean⁩ out Thursday. I think it overstates influence on referendum and understates Dacre evil and Rothermere weakness   
More nonsense from UKIP’s sole elected representative in Scotland.  Clearly he thinks everyone should leave Brussels next year - in fact staying & trying to mitigate the #UKIP inspired damage of #Brexit  will be vital to our short, medium & longterm interests.  
Sorry but there isn’t such a thing as a “sensible” #Brexit.  Continued #SingleMarket & #CustomsUnion membership will provide maximum available mitigation but still not as good as full EU membership.  Leaving isn’t “sensible” & Scotland didn’t vote for it. 
Poundworld in administration. UK is shutting down incrementally. Still think Brexit is good, we have not even left yet! 
All of these beaurocrats, Lords & MPs trying to stop Brexit are stuck in the past. The future is global and we're on the path to national renewal. #GlobalBritain #ChangeIsComing 
More job losses.... Maybe a result of brexit, who knows. What I do know is that the @DWP will treat these newly unemployed people like criminals because they’ve lost their jobs. 
No. NHS workers don't appear from nowhere. We train them. If we don't train enough, the NHS imports them. This is about UK Government policy, not Brexit. We didn't jon the EU to staff the NHS.  
That time Arron Banks got arrested after harrassing an employee. When she went to the police... he sacked her... but that was only after he'd offered her boyfriend  £30k to dump her. Oh those "bad boys of Brexit"... what larks... #ArronBanks 
The ‘bad boys of Brexit’ play into lovable rogue meme but their links to Putin demonstrate they are really a threat to democracyWere they played willingly, useful idiots, or do they just not care?If rule of law is to survive in the UK we need to know 
Less than two weeks to go till the #PeoplesVote March on 23rd June. Join thousands of people calling for a People’s Vote on the Brexit Deal! #FFS 
Finding out what makes Remainers tick. (Robert Tombs for Reaction on a new programme of study on the motives of Remainers and the stop Brexit crowd)  
Brexit seen from abroad. My latest Brexit blog post:  
Great to have @GeorgeFreemanMP writing today on the EU's anti-innovation approach to scientific regulation. The fmr Minister for Life Sciences explains how Brexit will allow us to leave "the slow lane of the global bio-economy" and become a global leader 
Barnier knows @Theresa_May will not walk away from a deal. That's why it will be at least 2022 before Brexit voters get anything like what they voted for.  
MESSAGE to ALL who want to stop Brexit@campbellclaret@acgrayling#FBPE etc etcThere are big votes in Commons this week. Please stop wasting time and political capital attacking Corbyn and concentrate on potential Tory rebels.Corbyn is NOT the enemy here@BestForBritain 
Poll: Does Brexit still means Brexit with @theresa_may ? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
Humphrys should go. He's over paid and over rated. People are switching @BBCr4today off in their droves. Bored rigid by the Brexit Tory gammon 
A Brexit bonus should have been that UK politicians have the fig leaf of blaming Brussels snatched away and be forced to own and account for their actions. No sign of that from this compulsively secretive government. They must be terrified. 
My ‘idiots guide’ to alternative Brexit options in light of Lords amendments. We are better off with the CETA++/SuperCanada Free Trade Agreement the EU is offering us NOW - their biggest deal ever! The Customs Union most idiotic of all  
Party before country - the only thing that matters to Tories & Labour. End Brexit then end this sick political order. “PM 'to appeal for unity' on Brexit vote - BBC News  
If you want a second referendum it makes sense to target Tory MPs.It is strange how much energy is expended on attacking Corbyn. He is not the problem. The problem is the Tory party. 
If Brexit was a business park... the latest illustration for The New European from @SKZCartoons. 
RT if you want the Brexit you voted for!   
Police & Parliament have been asked to investigate links between the bankroller of Brexit, Arron Banks & the Russian government. It has emerged that he met the Kremlin’s ambassador to the UK three times before Brexit. He registered that they only met once... #StopBrexit #r4today 
Must be galling to Brexiteer Anglosphere  believers for the promised sunlit uplands to see two of the main actors Canada & USA who are supposed to rescue UK's post Brexit economy to squabble like this between themselves.  
Gordon Brown thinks he knows WHY Brits voted for Brexit and it was NOT to fully leave EU. Like selling Gold too cheap, you have proved you are a fool & no one should listen to you!  
Damage to UK economy from Brexit already happening, according to new report  
Morten Morland on Arron Banks ‘meeting Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’ - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Austerity is ravaging traditional working class communities. Thousands are dying, millions are reliant on food banks, and young people are devoid of hope for the future. Brexit is important but changing the conditions that enabled Brexit is more so. We need a Corbyn government. 
Dear @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may I’ve worked out how you can break the current deadlock on #brexit negotiations & get a great deal with the EU.You go to Brussels meet Barnier and say, we realise we have a bargain deal already so we will revoke article 50 & #stopbrexit Thanks 
I'm sick of Remainer politicians self righteously proclaiming that they go against the Brexit vote for MY benefit. That's a lie, they go against me for THEIR OWN benefit. I wish they would serve MY wishes,  as they promised to! 
“The idea that Russia and some businessmen masterminded Brexit is nothing more than a chattering-class conspiracy theory. It is based not in fact, but in the feverish fantasies of sore-loser Remainers. These people are losing it”, says Brendan O’Neill.  
Brexit is exacerbating the staffing crisis in the NHS. Brexit threatens 100,000s+ jobs, especially in the NE & West Midlands. Brexit has already damaged the economy and sharpened austerity. #Brexit will hurt those who have least. It is the biggest issue for a generation.  
Both the Tories and Labour are trying to sell us Brexit unicorns - UK in a changing Europe  
If you listen carefully to what Corbyn&Starmer are saying (and don't rely on what they are reported to say), it is obvious that they are treading a difficult line politically but have deliberately left open possibility of a second referendum.They are *best* chance of having one. 
Corbyn's 'long game' re Brexit is not to save the UK from the ensuing economic damage but to let it play out and blame the Tories in the expectation of being gifted the next General Election. Seemingly, party before country applies to both side of the House. #StopBrexit 
Every @Conservatives MP needs to remember they were elected for a party committed to delivering #Brexit. Don't play @UKLabour's game. #VoteConservative! 
So true, only Brexit was on the ballot paper, and Cameron, Clegg, Osborne etc all made it quite clear it meant leaving the single market and customs union.The blinkered few desperately straw clutching and still beating this very tired old drum.  
There’s a reason Rees-Mogg, IDS, Fox et al - politicians who’ve never been known for their social conscience - are all breathy with excitement over Brexit... and it’s *not* to make your world a better place.  
But Dan, it’s increasingly clear by the way you keep changing your own Brexit proposals that you helped get us into this mess without a clue how to get us out. Now you complain when the grown ups try to sort it all out 
This is cutting it very close. Part of the problem is that everyday life in the UK on the surface seems barely touched by Brexit crisis. Price rises were absorbed as "stuff that happens" and much of the population seems to have switched off from Brexit  
“Angry, snobbish and pessimistic” extremist ultra Remainers seek to kill off #Brexit by inventing a Bond style Russian collusion story as to why millions voted to leave the EU. Instead look in the mirror & see the snooty, arrogant deism of the EU cult to know why.  
I don’t think anyone can ever say @AudreyCarville is being “over dramatic”. Referendum has been passed-this is not women being “difficult”.Healthcare should be available to all women no matter where they live.GPs should refer women if they refuse to provide care. @morningireland 
The last few days have shown what utter chaos Brexit is.-The Foreign Secretary is doing a "Keep Calm for Britain".-The Russia story keeps growing.-David Davis is playing hopscotch with the Irish border.Don't let us drift into a destructive Brexit. June 23rd. Join us.  
Scotland is not happy with Brexit. Never was and never will be. No wonder: Brexit is disastrous for Scots. But then again: Brexit is disastrous for the English too. Stay in the EU. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Nearly all Tory MPs will vote against Brexit amendments to save their party. Some Labour MPs will vote against the amendments to save their seats. How many MPs will vote to save their country? 
Brexiteer bets £500m AGAINST British businesses Crispin Odey is a classic disaster capitalist, looking to profit from instability Brexit brings.Read more about how this anti-patriotic short-selling works here:  via @ThisIsMoney 
March against Brexit in London on 23rd June!Make your plans now! Don’t miss this chance to stop the destructive consequences of Brexit and confront the disaster capitalists.#StopBrexit 
Tupperware Teereza Media Militia rallying cry for commons Showdown for Tory batshit patriotism or principles Basketcase Brexit, Bad boy love islanders Trump as  a ship sails the Mediterranean filled with desperate people the world closes its eyes and not a single tear falls pic.twitter.com/oyCDbxzbbX 
When Empress May and her crooked Junta tell you it is your “duty” to deliver Brexit - she is lying through her teeth. Your duty is to act in the best interests of the country who you are public servants to. 
ICYMI - @BillCashMP warned Brexit rebels could trigger a general election   
Morning! Euro Tory bark worse than its bite so May will probably win her Brexit votes in Parliament on Tue & Wed with a few concessions. Where Brextremist Arron Banks & Russia Go is more unpredictable. Discussing on @GMB in a mo 
This looks like a monster story currently being underplayed bc it’s all Korea all the time. Emails document Russian money backed Brexit, and Brexit leaders linked Russians up w Trump campaign and right supporting “journalist” buried the story?? Yowza.  
And who was backing Ted Cruz?  Why, it was Mercer, who donated $11 mil to a super pac supporting Ted Cruz. Mercer also donated the data analysis services of Cambridge Analytica to  Nigel Farage for Brexit. 
Brexit is even messier than critics expected. So what happens now?  
Brexit’s biggest bankroller, Arron Banks was secretly in regular contact with Russian officials from 2015 to 2017, according to a cache of emails not seen until they were published in Britain on Sunday.  
I still hold the only people supporting brexit are disaster capitalists and those fooled by them. 
So much for Brexit ‘patriotism’...Hedge fund tycoon Crispin Odey – who recently demanded Theresa May be sacked, saying she couldn’t be trusted to deliver Brexit  – stands to make huge profits from Brexit damaging the UK economy.  
PM 'to appeal for unity' on Brexit vote  
It doesn’t take a genius to figure out Democratic alliances of world powers is good for peace. It’s worked out so well people forget why they exist, and take them for granted. See: Brexit 
Because book sales are more important than your nation’s free and fair elections How a Journalist Kept Russia’s Secret Links to Brexit Under Wraps  
Documents raise new questions about Russian role in #Brexit  
Aren't there enough days for Aboriginal folk: National Sorry Day, Reconciliation week, NAIDOC week, Closing the Gap Day, Anniversary of Apology, Anniversary of 1967 Referendum, Mabo Day, etc.?What's wrong with one day that recognises our British roots and connection?  
Brexit preparation is costing “hundreds of millions of pounds” that could have been spent on researching new treatments. Instead, the money is being used to ensure supplies don't dry up after Brexit, drugmakers say.  
As Trump seeks to destroy the Western alliance, the midterms are a "referendum on American ideals that are older than any of us"    There is only one solution: Vote Democratic in November to protect our democracy. 
No, not exactly - maybe a bit of both. They wanted to upset the US election. They didn't know how far they could get. #Brexit proved a lot farther than first thought. They wanted to test the data weapon @GenFlynn stole from DARPA. They used location based cookies for that. 
Arron Banks ‘met Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’  via @guardian 
“With an Electoral Commission investigation into Banks’ financing of Brexit underway since November, you would have thought that the public interest of this story was more important than keeping the scoop for a book." Via @NicoHines:  
Brexit: 'The Will of Putin' #IsabelOakeshott  
#FT Nirav Modi story shows that the UK doesn't just have a sketchy Russian billionaire problem but an Indian one too. UK must follow rule of law, but much harder for UK to build new ties to India post-Brexit if India views UK as bolt hole for fugitives.  
Brexit, if it happens, will simply ruin this country. It ain't rocket science...  
Will somone in Gov't please explain why you are pressing on with Brexit after all that has been exposed: the lies, propaganda, electoral fraud, wanton damage to the economy & now this, by @carolecadwalla? It is going beyond reckless to treachery. How many of you are corrupt? 
"They represent only themselves and not the overwhelming majority of British people" .............Oh, the irony. #Brexit  
The EU referendum allowed the electorate to make a decision - Leave or Remain. MPs should honour the result.  
This is the crux of it. Ambassador Yakovenko oversaw the presentation of a multi-billion $ gold deal. And we know that 12 days after referendum, the deal took place. Sound familiar? Same tactics as the Rosneft deal...with Carter Page played here by @Arron_banks 
This story as as significant to Trump-Russia as it is to Brexit. And key figure is @Amb_Yakovenko - the Russian ambassador to London who's named in Mueller indictment of George Papodopoulos. He's the one who issued invites. He's the one who oversaw the offer of a $$$ gold deal... 
If you want a second referendum it makes sense to target Tory MPs. It is strange how much energy is expended on attacking Corbyn. He is not the problem. The problem is the Tory party. 
Dear America, you need to get to grips with story dominating UK press. Today, we reveal how Russian ambassador groomed the funders of Brexit campaign with offer of sweetheart deal. That's the Brexit campaign led by Bannon friend & Trump ally @Nigel_Farage 
What May has done to brexit is a crime. Vote against it. If it brings the government down then so be it. We'll have plenty of time to think about who to vote for next. I'd like to see a clear out of the tories and love to see May lose her seat. 
Fifteen thousand fascists marching in London, and liberals think Brexit can be explained by Russian spies. 
The referendum is void on so many counts. Continuing as if it were legitimate just proves the point: we’re undergoing a coup.  
Because, boys and girls, in Mr Corbyn's @jeremycorbyn #Brexit Britain, you are going to need every single penny. That's of course, if you still have a job.  
Guy Verhofstadt: Former Prime Minister of Belgium (1999 to 2008) and current European Parliament's representative on matters relating to Brexit 
MPs call for police & parliament to investigate millionaire Arron Banks [who bankrolled Nigel Farage's Brexit campaign] & his links to the Russian govt. Banks, his Leave EU spox Andy Wigmore & Farage campaigned in the US for Trump.HT @brexit_sham #Maddow  
MPs are calling for a police inquiry into Brexit...  
"As a policy, Brexit is beginning to look like the poll tax: attractive as a rightwing pet project but disastrous in practice."  
If only the British Prime Minister had some of Trump’s spirit in the Brexit negotiations.  
This tweet of 4 days ago is given added emphasis by the astonishingly incompetent position on #Brexit now taken by the labour party.  Following the Tory lead, it's all about serving their party interest, not serving the people.  
Translation: Putin interfered in the Brexit vote ... but as I support the side who won because of him I will throw all pretence of supporting a fair democracy out of the window, and am happy to have a malign influence who uses nerve agents on the streets of Britain meddling in it  
A few downsides are covered in DExEU’s own report...More generally: For every 17 that voted Leave, 16 voted Remain. So if just 1 in 17 (or more accurately: 1 in 34) Leave voters did not vote for your ‘no deal’ version of Brexit, then you can claim no mandate for it.  
UK: #IAmTommyRobinson #FreeTommy Enormous Crowds Gather at Historic Trafalgar Square Marching To White Hall. Monumental Speeches by Geert Wilders, Anne Marie WatersUnstoppable Patriotism #Brexit #UKpoli #FreeTommyRobinson #childtrafficking #Rotherham 
While this is (mostly) a fairly good criticism of Labour’s Corbynsceptics, on Brexit it doesn’t work: exchanging the average Tory MP for the average Labour MP does get you a softer Brexit.  
I’m positive he thinks she’s pathetic & weak with no backbone. Can’t stand up to the EU, probably won’t Brexit properly knowing the people voted for it. Gave her a chance when he first became president but now thinks she’s a waste of time. He wouldn’t be alone in thinking that!  
The campaign to discredit and eventually cancel #Brexit started in Britain the moment the win for Leave had been announced and has now reached its climax. Don't kid yourself that the EU was not behind it. Billions must have been spent from the EU secret slush funds on it. 
corbyn's surrogates don't want people talking about brexit, because it's the defining issue of the day and shows corbyn for the fool he is. 
“UK tech wins the top spot in European venture funding post-Brexit. Negates the idea that funding in the UK would dry up after Brexit.” via @CityAM Let me explain this simply for everyone: BREXIT HASN’T HAPPENED, YET. 
A microcosm of problems of BBC's Brexit coverage: treating as a matter of opinion something that's factually impossible. Just as Villiers (then NI Sec) opined pre-Ref that Brexit was irrelevant to Irish border, confusing the facts of CTA cf goods:  
The EU has spent nearly 50 years burrowing into this country, and sucking power and wealth from us through a million tiny channels:  #Brexit 
This for me is the key point.  Why would *any* UK citizen but especially politicians & commentators still support #Brexit whilst knowing it's in the interests of Russia & it's attempts to destabilise the west?It just makes no sense.  
The UK tech industry pulled in more than three times as much investment as any other European country post-Brexit  
First Minister of Scotland @NicolaSturgeon '...There will be a second independence referendum but the timing will be decided on when #Brexit becomes clearer.I believe Scotland will become Independent..my view is that is the direction of travel.'#Ridge 
Whether or not individual votes were influenced, the bigger point is in @IsabelOakeshott 's statement below.   If you know this Isabel, how can you be in favour of Brexit - I just don't understand.  
@HeadUKCivServ @DamianCollins  The only ethical way for the Government to proceed now is to completely stop "brexit" , withdraw A 50 , and carry out an investigation with the full participation of MI5, MI6 and GCHQ, so as to restore UK democracy. Then we must all reflect 
Remember this from January?"The chief executive of Rolls-Royce pledges the firm’s future in the UK just months after he warned staff that their jobs could be affected by Brexit."And now ...Rolls-Royce 'to axe 4,000 jobs', many in Derby.#StopBrexit 
When we were campaigning so hard for Brexit with virtually no money or resources I wish the media had let me know the Russians were behind it all I could have used some help . What a load of rubbish ! 
292 days till Brexit day, when the UK will become an independent nation again.The Government could easily cancel any transitional arrangements or custom agreements after Brexit day. The UK could still default to WTO rules & renegotiate a free trade deal. One that puts UK first. 
Sat 16th June 3pm-5:30pm we have Dr Philippa Whitford discussing the NHS and the threat of BrexitOur meetings are open to all. We want to hear a cross section of opinion so please bring along an undecided friend (for FREE).Pls click the link for tickets 
"Labour accepts the referendum result." That's what the manifesto said. That's the basis on which candidates stood. Front bench is pressing for a jobs-first Brexit in good faith. Now's time for all Labour MPs to back them. Unite for a new customs deal & a Labour govt. #PLPWatch 
SHAME ON YOU Hope you Lose you’re seat next election 
Wouldn't it be brilliant if tomorrow @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour said "After the revelations over the weekend it is clear that the referendum result is unsafe. I think the only right thing to do #StopBrexit"If he can't say that what about supporting #PeoplesVote ? 
The coming weeks could see the end of @theresa_may's premiership. Her chickens are coming home to roost. Brexit is a poisoned chalice which will destroy her & hopefully her vile Tory party. Now is the time for LAB to stand together & push them off the Brexit cliff.#ToriesOut 
Excellent piece. Many (myself included, I admit) have been reluctant to make too much of Russian interference in, & other irregularities of, the Brexit Referendum. But it's now clear that a miasma of illegitimacy hangs over the vote, and it's absurd for HMG to ignore that.  
Brexit Broadcasting Company @BBCNews nothing in the headlines re Russian involvement in Brexit, why am I not surprised. Shameful BBC #StopBrexit 
If every single MP in parliament don’t insist on full investigation, and withdrawal of A50 while we establish all / any foreign interference / links to brexit we know they’re not implementing it on behalf of ‘ the people’. #BrexitFraud#Brexit  
Guardian front page, Monday 11 June 2018: MPs call for police inquiry into Brexit donor's Kremlin links  
Brexit is a fraudulent conspiracy funded by Russia.  Almost every major proponent is tainted by association with Russian money, directly or indirectly.Criminal offences  have been committed by both the #VoteLeave and #LeaveEU campaigns.  These crimes are being covered up by .. 
How a Journalist Kept Russia’s Secret Links to #Brexit Under Wraps. A pro-Brexit journalist held back evidence of links between Russia and the Brexit campaign while playing down so-called conspiracy theories on TV.  
I don’t have any idea how Scotland beats England at Cricket, but just in case. It doesn’t make up for #brexit ok ? 
The fact that 2 years post the Vote #Brexit has not yet happened tells you everything you need to know about Western Governments belief in Democracy. 
Hayley thinking of all the trees we are going to lose after Brexit. #loveisland 
We Happy Few = Britain when Brexit is complete.GET ME MY JOY YOU GIT #E32018 
While Russian connections are in the news, a reminder that the wife of a former Putin minister bought a game of tennis with Cameron and Johnson for £160,000.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE pic.twitter.com/5NVk6o6ZtE 
Fed up with #Brexit?Going through with it will just make things worse!Join the march for a #PeoplesVote: June 23rd, London. 
So sick to death of the pathetic smear campaign by pathetic Remainer media elites, snooty politicians & EU cultists that millions of people voted to leave the EU because those Russians told them to. Like no one wanted to Leave until Brexit thought up by Russia! #silencebrexiteers 
Brexiter: “I’m a patriot. I support Brexit, which will cost us £29bn a year - money which could be spent public services. But we’ll make all of our own laws, even though I can’t name an EU ‘law’ that I’d change.”Remainer: “I’m a traitor. I’m anti-Brexit, because.. [see above].” 
Today’s revelations about the #Brexiters’ #Leave campaign in the #referendum are just the latest of several that trigger doubts about the result, argues @InFactsOrg : 
Yes, Brexit is a crucial juncture for our country.However, to many people I know, the squabbling and point-scoring of the two opposing sides seems like an argument about which self-serving, neoliberal elite should be exploiting us, not whether we should be exploited at all. 
Britain is dangerously close to a Brexit deal that is worse than staying or leaving the EU 
We had a beautiful day for our post-referendum picnic with lots of our volunteers, a newly adapted banner, and best wishes for our sisters up north. #RepealedThe8th #NowForNI Thanks @DebStudioTen for the photo! 
Jumping through hoops for someone who didn’t even know what Brexit meant. My God 
We're not leading the Brexit negotiations, but this week we can lead the country. "It would be a serious evasion of duty if Labour failed to seize this chance to protect our country from the rockslide of hard Brexit" 
He doesn't care how he got Brexit. He would sell the country to the Russians as long as we left the EU. It is because of people like this that we must #StopBrexit 
Unpopular opinion: @mattzarb is right. Proud European and socialist here. I still think it’s important to make the point that (now irreversible) Brexit will actually affect NHS budgets and the low paid, but the #StopBrexit crowd’s rhetoric hasn’t grasped what drove the leave vote 
“Shadow Brexit secretary @Keir_Starmer says withdrawal bill amendments are a chance to impose order on ‘chaotic’ talks”. It’s actually a chance to put the needs of millions suffering under the hands of this appalling government first. For goodness sake PLP UNITE #PLPWatch 
You never saw Brexit or Trump coming and for dreadfully clever people that hurts. So the desire to blame others runs deep....  
The leaders of the Brexit campaign are already preparing their we-were-stabbed-in-the-back excuses.They will never admit responsibility. 
Blair said afterwards he yearned for IDS to have offered at least some opposition on Iraq. I am sure in years to come May will say she wished Corbyn could have opposed her on Brexit. Like IDS, Corbyn will never understand what Opposition is about.  
Brexit-backing millionaire Arron Banks faces questions over Kremlin links.  
Very important that everyone in the PLP get behind Keir Starmer’s crucial Brexit Amendments that come before House of Commons this week. Let’s make June the end of May #PLPWatch 
Christopher Booker was pro Brexit before Farage could find his willie, but as he explains in his Sun Tel column today May didn’t promise to quit single market  
Crunch votes on #Brexit this week, choice for Labour MPs: - choose Corbyn and put May's stay in No.10 in jeopardy?- or chose grand standing, enable a hard Tory Brexit and keep your mates in the BBC and the Murdoch media happy? 
How a Journalist Kept Russia’s Secret Links to Brexit Under Wraps  
Not seen anyone who wants to reverse Brexit seem to get that the Leave campaign was centred primarily around more funding for the NHS, because that’s what most people actually care about day to day. Not the merits or otherwise of being in the EU compared to some other arrangement 
Brexit campaigner Banks says story on Russian ties 'absolute garbage'  
Oakshott & Banks along with Elliot, Cummings, Gove, Johnson and Farage are part of a fraudulent conspiracy to rig the EU Referendum by illegally using Russian money to finance campaigns in breach of PPER Act 2000.  @metpoliceuk should arrest them all. But they are not.  #COVERUP 
David Davis has warned the Tories will suffer a 1997-style defeat if the UK is still under the Brexit backstop at the time of the next election  
Brexit England can’t even beat Scotland at cricket. This is definitely a metaphor. 
Labour for 2 years:"Will the Brexit deal mean the UK is worse off?"No = Vote For ItYes = Vote Against ItTories for 2 years:"Shall we have yet another get-together at Chequers to again try and iron out our differences?"  
I strongly resent the insinuation that Russians influenced my vote re the EU referendum. What has always influenced my vote is this. x  
About to speak at @TSSAunion conference dinner. Jeremy Corbyn spoke yesterday - first time I’ve been his follow-up! ‘Rebuilding the railways after Grayling’ my theme, but I might get on to Brexit too 
A ground-breaking survey conducted by @AmmarMaleki with more than 19K respondents from all provinces of Iran: 70% would vote no to an Islamic Republic in a free referendum. Findings of this anonymous survey are in stark contrast to the Maryland survey (which wasn't anonymous)  
So @WendySiegelman or @LouiseMensch or @JamesFourM are any of you aware of Arron Banks:Big Data Dolphins & Mississippi UniversityBanks made a donation of £42,000 to UKIP a week before Briexit Referendum”UK residents shopping for cars and/or insurance dataSee page 3-6  
The Brexit state of play as of Sunday evening has not changed - as this short exchange between @davidallengreen @profalanriley1 @CER_IanBond shows 
I dunno - colluding with a state that wants Brexit, breaking electoral laws - I am no expert but pretty sure that cheating and collusion are bad things and given the messaging by  one might just might question the integrity of the referendum outcome  
As @Jon_Danzig writes in his blog, ‘The Tory’s majority was crushed in the General Election of 8 June 2017. Any sane Prime Minister would take that as a message from the electorate that the country didn’t want the #Brexit she was planning.’ Please RT:  
Remember.Joy, love and laughter are the greatest things we've got in this crazy little world of ours.Closely followed by beer, birds, football and Brexit.#OneLove 
Nicola made it clear many months ago...She won't call a second referendum until the people demand it.Edinburghs march could be the time to demand it in voice and numbers. 
The problem we face isn't the #Brexiters & #Lexiters in Parl including many in both main party leadership teams but the maj of #Remain MPs who consider 23/06/16 as the #FinalSay come what may...they are wholly misguided in the face of this flawed #Brexit; a #PeoplesVote is vital! 
If it’s too much to handle for FBPE-ers to read an opinion on Twitter that Brexit, while undoubtedly significant, isn’t most people’s most pressing day to day concern, then all I can say is all the very best if you get your second referendum 
Please retweet Brexit poll.Remainer elite deliberately destroying May's Brexit deal. They are working AGAINST our interests . Would you like to see them jailed? 
Brexit is collapsing. It is built on lies and cheating. And it is not the answer to the country’s problems.The majority of Labour voters and members want to #Remain in the EU, as do a majority of the public now. @UKLabour should #StopBrexit and call a #PeoplesVote. 
The ‘bad boys of Brexit’ have some big questions to answer | Matthew d’Ancona  
My Goldring E3 moving magnet turntable cartridge is being delivered tomorrow. I recognise this is of absolutely no interest to anyone, but it provides insight into the mundane tweetery to expect after we’ve had our Brexit wake. Oh, and I’m very excited!!!  
Equally, since it was not a binding referendum, there is nothing to stop parliament deciding that a tainted result should be ignored. Particularly when implementing it will do so much damage to the UK’s interests. But I am not holding my breath. 
Scotland voted decisively against #Brexit. There is only 1 elected UKIP politician in the country ( and he’s a joke) .  Now this - surely we have the right to say we won’t go along with the divisive, damaging anti democratic, crooked nonsense of #Brexit.  
Brexiteers claim Leave voters would still have voted for Brexit even if they'd known about Russian interference, that the £350mill for the NHS was a fib & our economy would be gravely damaged. So why not test their thesis with a 2nd Referendum? #FBPE #StopBrexit 
How a Journalist Kept Russia’s Secret Links to Brexit Under Wraps  via @thedailybeast 
Julia also dismisses the role of Banks's money in the Leave result, while saying she's grateful for his money in winning the referendum.  
Something fundamental must be going on for this to happen. Scottish optimism, English malaise & confusion maybe? A #Brexit effect perhaps?  
Arron Banks, the millionaire businessman who bankrolled Nigel Farage's campaign to quit the European Union, had multiple meetings with Russian embassy officials in the run-up to the Brexit referendum, documents seen by the Observer suggest.  
Don’t stand by whilst lives are destroyed. ‘Kayam was denied the right to vote in the referendum, as he was not born here in the UK. He has paid into the system and contributed to society, but he was not treated as such.’Help us fight for them#BrexitIsPersonal #FinalSayForAll 
Like Donald Trump, Roger Stone, Paul Manafort and Don Jr., the "Bad Boys of Brexit" like @Nigel_Farage, @andywigmore and @Arron_banks turn out to be faux patriots willing to sell their country out to the highest bidder. Must rid ourselves of kleptocrats.  
So it turns out that Redwood's sinister 2014 threat was not the only Tory attempt to silence business opposition to #Brexit.  
Spent a long day discussing Brexit with ardent remainers.  Bottom line is this: austerity, in or out of the EU, is an economic disaster for our country. Economists told us from day one, and the IMF told us years ago that it was damaging us. We have to get the Tories out. 
I think Labour in any future election manifesto must commit to a thorough investigation of the those who might have influenced #Brexit with a promise of prosecution for anyone who transgressed the laws. 
Arron Banks, the outspoken founder of the  campaign, held two previously undisclosed meetings with the Russian ambassador before and after the 2016 referendum  
I don’t defend anyone who takes Putin’s shilling in exchange for anything - not a Brexit campaign, not Labour MPs or journalists who appear on RT, not the UK Govt welcoming Russian billions to London, not any nation colluding by playing in the World Cup in that mafia-run nation 
This is the government perverting our democracy. Regardless of whether it is technically legal, this kind of action grossly violates the very core of our constitution, and the perpetrators must be very harshly punished.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
A pro-Brexit journalist held back evidence of links between Russia and the Brexit campaign while playing down so-called conspiracy theories on TV, reports @NicoHines:  
Quite simply, anyone who voted leave had absolutley no idea what they were voting for.Think about that.  We have fundamentally changed the country but have no idea what we are changing it to.Total insanity#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
That their generation of foster drinking casual racist brexit gammons are dying out and if they don't evolve they will go out of business.Probably that 
Sainsbury's are selling Brexit wizards. Want to keep non-racists away from your house? Brexit Wizard by Sainsbury's.  
European businesses advised to avoid using British components, to avoid their products falling below local content rules of international trade as a consequence of #Brexit and Britain leaving #CustomsUnion 
Before I unplug from the matrix for another day, may I just leave a heartfelt "Fuck you" for Banks, Wigmore, Mercer, Farage, Grimes, the Brexit Central Twats, Humphrys, Oakeshott, Bannon, Batten and every stupid fucking mouthbreather that bought ANY of their shit. Fuck Tommy too. 
The European Parliament's Brexit co-ordinator is having some fun  
I have no idea whether Putin tried to interfere in the campaign for Brexit. An investigation is needed.But Russia didn’t influence MY vote and I doubt they influenced anyone else. Desperate Remoaners are deluded to claim this undermines the legitimacy of the Brexit vote. 
Just when you think Brexit can’t get any more corrupt, it does.Meanwhile Tories and Labour collude to vote *against* amendments that might mitigate the damage and impose accountability.God the stink of it all. They’ll never wash it off.#PeoplesVote 
After two years toiling over the meaning of Trump and Brexit, elites are right back to chastising everyone for not sufficiently revering international trade organizations. They’ve definitely learned a lot 
I’m not saying the referendum has poisoned everything but I’ve just switched on Wallace and Gromit on BBC One and found myself wondering if Wallace would have voted leave or remain. 
No Theresa May, just as no Theresa May in response to Trump’s bullying afterwards.Brexit Britain barely functions on the world stage  
I am clearly naive.I would like there to be a second referendum and I assumed that is also the primary aim of many people on Twitter who say it is.But I am beginning to think that for some, their primary aim is actually to attack Corbyn.This is very disappointing to me. 
Keir Starmer urges Tory remainers to vote with Labour on Brexit  
Twitter meet my little girl, Ada. She's fucking awesome. Brexit. She'll sort it. Cancer. Cured. War, famine, inequality, racism? Quietly confident she'll have them eradicated by Thursday. pic.twitter.com/IU2ETay3Qs 
A GZero world was coming before Trump. 1. Brexit & EU weakening2. Rise of China & “the rest”3. Russia efforts to divide West4. Political institutions unable to keep up with technology. 
Finally the terrifying reality of Brexit is coming home  
If @jeremycorbyn announced that #Brexit should stop, there could be a snap General Election and @UKLabour would win with a landslide. Someone tell him 
A Q for MPs:If you were building a house & discovered there were significant problems with the foundations, would you continue to build regardless? I expect 'no', you would stop the project, take advice, then strengthen the foundations. Why is Brexit any different? #StopBrexit 
This cannot go on. The PM needs to take back control of our party so we can take back control of our country.This week everyone will see if Brexit really still means Brexit, says Tory MP @ABridgen 
I want all 3 of those things because I was born and raised on a council estate and my family lived on the minimum wage. If you allow Brexit to go through, you can’t have the other 2. You see Brexit as a means to achieve your ideology, but it will destroy my community .  
Says the newspaper that told its readers to vote for Brexit  
Brexit means...Leave the EU (in full) and allow Britain to:Repatriate lawmaking powers.Create an independent trade policy.Create a controlled immigration policy based on individual merit.End CFP and CAP.This was all made clear during the referendum campaign.  
WATCH | "What I really want is for the view of 17.4m people to be respected!" - @Nigel_Farage corners major Remoaner @Andrew_Adonis on his disgusting anti-democratic plot to sabotage Brexit. Support us at  
She's toast!' Theresa May faces new Tory threat to topple her over Brexit as EU prepares 'ambush'.    
MESSAGE to ALL who want to stop Brexit@campbellclaret@acgrayling#FBPE etc etcThere are big votes in Commons this week. Please stop wasting time and political capital attacking Corbyn and concentrate on potential Tory rebels.Corbyn is NOT the enemy here.@BestForBritain 
I see zero evidence Dems are terrified of Trump. I do see them going back & forth on whether squishy voters will be turned off if they think Dems are being too combative, but I’m pretty confident that by Sept/Oct this election will be 95% a referendum on Trump.  
Good job we have social media to get the real news out.The MSM are a disgraceThey don't report the news any moreThey just put out propaganda that matches their biased left wing,anti #Trump, anti #Brexit narrativeThe regulators should step in but they are part of the cover up  
‘As a policy, Brexit is beginning to look like the poll tax: attractive as a rightwing pet project but disastrous in practice.’  
See also: "Brexit voters in 2016" & "Brexit supporters in 2018".  
The foreign funding of Brexit connection should hardly come as a surprise. When will the DUP reveal the source of its donation made during the Referendum campaign.  
There is an important vote on #Brexit in the @HouseofCommons this week where the attempts by the House of Lords to damage the bill can be rejected.@uklabour are playing their Brexit in/out Hokey Cokey to deceive & confuse people & politicise.You cannot trust #Labour 
On the one hand this is v funny; on the other, this man is the European Parliaments chief coordinator for Brexit...  
Remember back in 2016 when we mused, "If Brexit could pass, Trump could win" not realizing it was for the very same reasons? 
Is someone “doing alright” if Brexit makes them fear deportation? Or losing their job? Or wrecking their plan for college?  
If you think that the Daily Mail having an editorial cartoon of Muslim refugees as rats scurrying into civilised Britain as  "out in the open news" I think you better update your definition.  #brexit  
Brexit is a huge distraction from the real problems the country is facing. Great thread on why we should hold a #PeoplesVote on May’s Brexit deal with an #OptionToRemain: 
I guarantee you, 100%, if you went into a council housing estate, and offered unemployed resident a choice between a job for £12 - 15 quid an hour, or a peoples vote on Brexit, every single one of them would go for the job. Brexit certainly is not 'everything' #butbutbwexit 
I stopped to talk to a woman handing out leaflets advocating a peoples vote on Brexit. She was thrilled to tell me that this was her first time doing this sort of thing as she has only recently been politicised. Amazingly, 4 million using foodbanks didn't rouse her but Brexit did 
Brexit campaigner Banks to face lawmakers over Russian links  
Julia Hartley-Brewer - "I’ve spoken to numerous people who voted Remain, as well as Leave voters who want the Government just to get on with it and deliver #Brexit. "This is literally becoming a national humiliation and capitulation and not a negotiation."  
Julia Hartley-Brewer - "It seems that every time that there is some sort of fundamental clash between Remain and Leave within the Cabinet – it’s Remain that ends up winning." #Brexit  
3. Theresa May called the 2017 GE to obtain a mandate for a Tory Brexit - she barely scraped by, only gaining a majority by prostituting herself to the DUP. Her Government have done nothing of substance since, apart from cause the Grenfell & Windrush scandals. 
2. The Labour Party should be a strong opposition, forcing the Tory/DUP government to enact real positive change, but internal power struggles & their stance on Brexit means they are weak. Those they purport to represent are being let down badly. 
Yes. Every Brexiter needs to reflect on the fact that Russia and Trump favour Brexit and then ask themselves what 'patriotism' really means. @DominicRaab @SuellaBraverman @GiselaStuart @johnredwood @patel4witham @andreajenkyns @MarcusFysh @DavidDavisMP @LiamFox @bernardjenkin 
If you're deluded enough to think the way to stop Brexit is to get rid of Corbyn, knock yourself out. But please, spare us the "Brexit will make Austerity worse" line, we're not buying your faux concern. 
Putin's attacks on free and democratic societies isn't limited to the United States. New documents show extensive meetings between the biggest #Brexit backer and Moscow officials. 
I went down to the border to pray Worrying about that Brexit dayO sisters, let’s go down,Come on down, do you wanna go downO brothers, let’s go downDown to the border to pray 
When Trump won, those who feared he would set off WW3 were mistaken: The problem is different: Regardless of what Mueller Investigation will conclude, Trump behaves like a Russian asset. He is doing incalculable harm to Western democracy; this is another reason we must not Brexit 
A number of Tory remainers will go against their own beliefs and back Theresa May during the Brexit bill vote. Why? Politicians always put their careers above everything else, even if their actions go against what they believe in and are detrimental to the country. Me on Sky:  
If you need an insight into the infantile nature of Corbynomics try this tweet. Aaron believes that Brexit will have no effect on jobs, wages, housing or government finances. It would be sweet if the attack on @eddiemarsan wasn’t so sinister. 
Tuesday. a series of crucial parliamentary votes on Brexit will take place. Including a vote which the Tories could vote to remove powers from the Scottish Parliament. Tuesday is likely to witness a full-scale civil war with the tories Lab abstaining and Scotland closer to Indy 
It's also bizarre and delusional how the very same elites who are widely despised, and whose failures and rejection led to things like Trump and Brexit, continue to prance around claiming to speak for all of "the American people." 
Is it time for a new referendum on Scottish independence? I’ll be asking @NicolaSturgeon ‘s newly elected Depute Leader @KeithBrownSNP What do you think? On my @talkRADIO show at 4pm.  #indyref2 
Go down the nearest high street and ask workers if they want a £12 minimum wage and social housing or a second referendum. In fact, let's do a video together and find out @eddiemarsan  - by the looks of it I think you might be surprised. 
Swiss vote to block foreign betting sites in referendum  
It's not often I read a headline in a state of total disbelief as I did with this one!!" MAJORITY of Scots BACK BREXIT as SNP support PLUMMETS from voters backing Ruth Davidson"I believe( someone told me once) that people actually get paid to write this crap!!!  
Just over 12 months ago more than 580 MPs stood on election manifesto promises to deliver Brexit; it’s almost two years since some 17.4 million voted for leave. This week the UK Parliament should reject anti-democratic attempts domestically and EU intransigence, without delay.  
Putin dangled:• Gold mines for triggering Brexit• Rosneft brokerage for electing TrumpGreedy, infiltrated traitors were glad to oblige.  
#Brexit is a defining moment in the history of our country. It has facilitated the rise in racial hatred and fascism.Do you want this to be the future for our country?  
As we approach a very important vote on #Brexit can I remind Conservative MP’s that the manifesto that they were elected on vowed to leave the Single Market and Customs union.*Cough* @Anna_Soubry *Cough* @NickyMorgan01 *Cough* @Sandbach *Cough* @sarahwollaston 
This is the Brexit coordinator for the EU parliament >>  
 Isn’t the strongest argument against Brexit that it’s now very obviously what a malignant foreign power wants for us? 
Disgraceful.. #Tories are taking Britain back to the dark days of the 70s, where attitudes like this were common. #TheNastyParty #Brexit  
'She's toast!' Theresa May faces new threat to topple her amid Brexit 'ambush'  
One of the worst things about Brexit for me has been the gradual realisation that such a large percentage of my own friends, family, colleagues and fellow UK citizens are in fact, as thick as shit. 
Russia didn’t invade nor does it occupy UkraineOver 96% of Crimea’s people voted to rejoin Russia in an overwhelming democratic referendumThe Obama administration destabilized Ukraine in the first place with a CIA-backed coupFind a new line Adam, this one’s beyond tiresome  
My scoop that UK intelligence thought the #Brexit referendum was so corrupted by Russian money as to be “not free and fair” is from November last year, five months before Oakeshott claims her emails were “hacked” this March. UKIC have always known.  
the "Brexit is literally the only issue anyone in Westminster should ever be talking about" crowd and the "lol you're a loser who only cares about Brexit" crowd really just deserve each other, don't they 
Dear Remain Troll: When you reach the age of 92 but travel to 20 cities and towns in Britain over 30 days to campaign for Remain in a referendum to stay in the EU: you then get the right to ask me a question. #Brexit  
100 percent reserve banking fails miserably in the Swiss referendum,  
Only the @Conservatives will get the best deal for the whole country, building a strong new relationship with Europe, while delivering on the referendum vote to get control of: Our money Our borders  Our laws 
Swiss vote to block foreign betting sites in referendum  
Head To Head With Nigel Farage On Brexit Bill Amendments  
To summarise: for literally years, a British ‘journalist’ has been sitting on evidence that the biggest financial backer of Brexit was offered a business deal by a Russian diplomat in the run-up to the vote, and enthusiastically pursued it 
Alan she went to RNC. She knew of Russian collusion. She’ll be bloody lucky if the police don’t go to see her. Helping Russia throw a British referendum is spying, don’t you think? Banks was spying. She knew it. She said nothing. 
Spain lifts financial controls on Catalonia, rules out referendum  
@IsabelOakeshott you are another useful fool. All you had to ask was 'why?'. Why did Putin want brexit? To weaken and destabilise EU and UK. And that is exactly what has happened. 
When so many attempt to turn #Brexit vote into conspiratorial plot or technocratic impossibility, danger we forget what really happened. This brill 20 min film reminder of importance of voters who dared to intrude on history in defiancec of establishment  
Oakshott on attacked the work of @carolecadwalla saying that she should concentrate on finding fault in the Remain campaign, knowing full well the corruption of Leave, having inflammatory evidence herself which she refused to publish. 
Hedge fund tycoon Crispin Odey, close friend of @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, stands to make huge profits from the woes of the UK Brexit economy. He's taken out more than £500m ‘short’ positions, essentially a gamble, that share prices will fall massively on UK firms.  
EU to spend €365 on the Common Agricultural Policy next 7y budget cycle: a full 28% of teh EU budget. Britain's agri sector is about 0.5% of the GDP. How can you justify such disproportionate spending? Why has Britain been bankrolling inefficient French farmers?#Brexit  
I see the EDL / UKIP / Brexit / Trump / Islamophobic / Free Tommy Robinson bots have been set to work trying to convince everyone that the police started the violence yesterday... People are being manipulated...    
Oakshott, “I was always going to release this information as it was in the national interest”. Yeah right. Why didn’t you do it before you where hacked then? You didn’t want it to harm Brexit, one of the biggest threats to our national interests ever! 
Theresa May refuses to roll back the 'hostile environment' We need a campaign against xenophobia to match the multi-decade campaign against racism. Vile xenophobes like May must be driven into the political wilderness. #StopBrexit #Windrush #Brexit 
So @CarolineFlintMP says if we go down the EEA route, "negotiations would be over in five minutes". GOOD. British businesses, UK citizens on the continent are sick of the uncertainty. £ would surge if the UK goes down EEA brexit route and we can look forward to a sensible deal. 
I've heard several similar stories. Many business leaders are apparently scared that its not just Govt. meetings they'll be frozen out from if they speak out about Brexit, but contracts too.  
Brexit means that an academic exodus is unavoidable.  Well articulated article by my friend and colleague ⁦@ruviz⁩ #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
I am the Leader of the Opposition. My most important duty is to oppose the vast majority in my own party who hate #Brexit, and therefore help a tired and poor Tory party lurch on. #ProudLabour 
Dear Mr Corbyn, your next career move:- stop Brexit- win next GE- nationalise to your hearts content- give NHS more cash- recruit nurses and doctors home & abroad- give workers decent employee rights- be the most successful Labour PM since Harold Wilson#BrexitIsFraud 
Paul Sweeney was standing as a Labour candidate- the BBC allowed him on to their BREXIT debate show to shout at Fiona Hyslop, #bbcbias #auob #scotref 
EXC: Former Deputy Head of the Tories in London quits saying: “Islamophobia is one of many issues in the party. There is a wider issue of the party lurching to the right since the Brexit vote – which has also clearly had a significant impact in the general outlook of the party" 
Some more thoughts from me on the EEA and why it isn’t an actual thing. Only read if you’re interested in facts.  #Brexit #BrexitMeltdown 
Putin wants Brexit because it weakens Europe. Arron Banks helped deliver it, with up to £21m. The best way to scupper both men’s goals is to stop Brexit. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Essential that the democratic decision of @ScotParl to refuse consent for devolution provisions in  #EUWithdrawalBill be respected : Sturgeon writes to Commons speaker ahead of Brexit bill vote - BBC News  
Labour's @CarolineFlintMP sets out on @daily_politics why Labour's Brexit policy would leave the UK with "no votes and no say" while accepting freedom of movement #bbcsp 
Cant FindReal/Del/PShop?@TheAcademy @rob_De_Niro #Harvey #Weinstein#Telford #TheFranklinAffair #PizzaGate #PedoGate@RoyalFamily #BuckinghamPalace @pontifex#internetbilloFrights #FreeJulianAssange #SethRich#SerenaShim #QAnon #TheStorm #auspol #brexit #BDS #CBTS @potus 
Scottish judge rejects attempt to get ruling on UK stopping #Brexit  
This is from the EU Parliament's Brexit Co-ordinator.  
A staggering 70 per cent of respondents said they were for the free movement of EU citizens who can live, work, study and do business anywhere in the EUIn that case just cancel #Brexit and let's get back to normality. 
The pound could be in for a wild ride when the U.K.’s Brexit bill goes to a vote in Parliament this week. Here's what to look out for  
They are talking on TV about the people trying to obstruct brexit. Why should anyone be allowed to obstruct the result of a legal, properly conducted vote. This isn't democracy this must be collusion with the government. Jail these traitors. Put it to the vote. . . .!! 
He may have voted Remain but he is not fighting the hard Tory Brexit today.  The only credible way to mitigate the economic damage is to stay in the Single Market.  By refusing to support Lords Amendment 51 to stay in the EEA Corbyn is missing opportunity to defeat the Tories.  
Perfect encapsulation of the sickness of US political discourse: a long-time GOP political operative blames divisions in the West, Trump's election and Brexit on ... PUTIN. So useful to have an omnipotent foreign villain: it explains all bad things & distracts from actual causes:  
I mean, I won't support you in that. I can't. I don't even really believe "post-Brexit" exists - not in the way you think. This will never be over.But, you know. Maybe I'm just too middle class to understand. 
How can anyone in Scotland still support this so called union? Beggars belief how Scotland is being treated. Equal partners my bahookey! Scotland 'not consulted' on no-deal Brexit contingencies  
.@DominicRaab today on @RidgeOnSunday on how the @Conservatives are working to get the best Brexit deal for the UK so we can get control of our money, borders and laws #Ridge 
Okay, I've watched it now, Fraser & I'm genuinely baffled. Marr says Banks gave Russian Ambassador, the Trump team's mobile numbers & you say, "Yes, I think this was main value to Russia...this [story] tells us more about how Russia operates than about how Brexit played out" 
Brexit Broadcasting Corporation?  
I HAVE A DREAM - MAY LOSES VOTE ON TUESDAY - RESIGNS - JACOB REES MOGG takes over - We Brexit, under WTO & keep our money 
Parliament and the Government now have to show they mean to implement the referendum. If they waiver in taking back control, then they will have failed the people they represent and they will have failed the country, says @GiselaStuart 
Farage is an elected MEP.  #UKIP were instrumental in getting and winning the referendum.  Who are you?  Who elected you??  What are your achievements?  Now be quiet.  
Let’s be honest hereIf the BBC invite @IsabelOakeshott on again then it’s clear that the BBC care more about pushing #brexit through than they do about journalistic ethics, honesty or credibility.  
Isabel Oakeshott is a foot soldier in the hard-right mission to divide Europe. You have to wonder if Donald Trump's chum Rupert Mugdoch has been sitting on information about the Kremlin and Brexit for as long as her. Maybe Bob Mueller needs to ask a few people in for chats  
If @BBCNews and politics shows give half as much attention to the 'Arron Banks colluded with Russia to manipulate a (marginal) Brexit vote' story as it has the hard-right Brextremists then a second Referendum based on what us known now would be essential. #Marr #bbcsp 
Recap.Farage denies he ever said Brexit would benefit the uk.Johnson says negotiations will meltdown.Davis threatens to resign.Nazi leader addresses fascist thugs in London and they attack police.Oakeshott reveals she new about Putin Banks Leave Eu links.In 1 week#FBPE 
Given that Arron Banks is in the news, here's a reminder that he wants to privatise the #NHS. Nothing of course to do with the business opportunities it would open up to his insurance business. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Whitehall collapsing in face of Brexit  
Now that the referendum is over and we can discard the demands of strategic solidarity: why did you all talk about fancying Simon Harris. What were you on about. Get a grip. 
Thanks to Leo Varadkar for coming out with this ludicrous statement 2 weeks after the referendum to remind everyone that fawned over him how much he despises the poor  
You can simultaneously understand that Brexit isn’t the focus of most people’s lives - and that Brexit will have a likely devastating impact on them, particularly if they’re already poor.  
Sorry, Fraser. That's what I thought you were saying. You said Russians meeting @Arron_banks had no connection to Brexit, irrelevant etc. But connections to Trump campaign looked significant. Happy to correct the record if I got wrong end of stick. 
BREXIT: When even the Mail runs with Aaron Banks’ trail of dirty money you know *something* is happening - unless, of course, you’re a reader of the paper - in which case it’s globalist elite, remoaner conspiracy, fake news by the left-controlled media...  
Proof that Brexit vote is more about party interest than national interest for many Tory MPs  
After the wreck of the G7 summit, dont overlook the Sunday Times reveal of deeper-than-understood Russian involvement supporting Brexit - and these comments.  
Isabel Oakeshott writes another book on #brexit TRIUMPH OF THE SHRILL @IsabelOakeshott 
This piece by the brilliant @carolecadwalla in today's Observer about Brexit/Russia collusion is absolutely extraordinary. Superb journalism - chilling discoveries. 
The problems faced by deindustrialised marginalised communities in Britain are not at odds with the needs of EU migrants. That logic helps neither, and it was that narrative that lead to people thinking Brexit was a solution to those problems. 
Key question remains unanswered - where did Arron Banks get £8m+ to fund Brexit campaigns? Today he’s widely been described as ‘insurance millionaire’ but @openDemocracy found v different picture of his finances   
As an under 35 year old, as we approach 2 years since the referendum, I want to say a big THANK YOU to older voters!It would have been far easier and more certain in the short term to vote remain, but you voted to protect my future.THANK YOU - I'm committed to #SaveBrexit! 
The only logical reason for recalcitrant Remainers pushing Britain to adopt vassal state status is either because they do not understand the implications, or they deliberately wish to make Brexit as difficult as possible in order to foolishly try and turn opinion against it. 
Ken Clarke - Next week we can begin to use the parliamentary majority in favour of a softer, sensible #Brexit. Underneath all these leaks from Johnson& briefings from Davis we're actually talking about the well being of our children & grandchildren#StopBrexit #FBPE #marr #bbcsp 
Less than two weeks until the #PeoplesVote March! Make sure that you are one of the thousands of people attending to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal!  
SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP on indyref2: Let's concentrate on dealing with Brexit, let's the build the case for independence and "we will bring forward that proposition to the Scottish people when it is right to do so" #bbcsp Scotland 
Calling Westminster. Is anyone looking into this fairly monumental question? @jeremycorbyn @theresa_may I’d like to know why electoral fraud, illegality and foreign manipulation is condemned in other countries but it’s fine in the U.K.? #Brexit is not above the law or democracy  
In a counter history you can absolutely imagine Corbyn being toppled as party leader in the chicken coup, Labour adopting ‘stop a Brexit’ approach before losing Stoke, and UKIP’s rise continuing to a cluster of Westminster sears. That was stopped by party members.  
Brexit brings permanent austerity, meaning none of the consequences of this disastrous government could be addressed. It is this generation’s deindustrialisation. 
What do you think had a bigger influence on Brexit? A) Putin and ‘the Russians.’B) This.  
The argument is very simple.The UK voted to take back control. ‘Soft Brexit’ is the polar opposite- it is giving up control. We would have no representation on EuroParl, EC or any other EU body, but would have to follow all EU rules.Being a rule taker is not what we voted for 
Nicola Sturgeon writes to Commons speaker ahead of Brexit bill vote  
WATCH | @CarolineFlintMP demolishes the lie that you can control immigration inside the EEA. She backed Remain in the referendum but respects the result - a true democrat!  Support us at  
"The Tories' cabinet Brexiteers have become at best spectators of Brexit’s slow-motion betrayal, and at worst its apologists."@Tom_Slater_ on the sorry state of Brexit 
Hard Brexit wasn't on the ballot paper, she knows as you do only about 1 in 6 people want to leave the single market. Caroline Flint isn't respecting democracy at all she's doing what she thinks is advantageous for her. #BBCSP 
Our glorious Brexit future awaits  
Most people aren't getting what they voted for in 2016.Brexiters are angry at a Brexit that is making us less sovereign than EU countries.#PeoplesVote 
Labour's EEA bickering is a tedious proxy argument. The real positions are:1. Brexit is shit but we have to do it because immigration.2. Brexit is shit, maybe there is a way not to do it!??3. Brexit is good because EU = neoliberalism. 
'It's a DENIAL of the result!' Edwina Currie DEMOLISHES calls for second Brexit referendum  
Farage just complained about opting into the EU Medicines Agency. (EMA)The EMA approves and works on new medical treatments. Pharmaceutical companies looking to get their drugs approved will seek approval in the largest market first.Brexit put the NHS at the back of the queue. 
Nigel farage and Arron Banks Star in VLAD'S ARMY #brexit  
Asked if the PM will be a “bloody difficult woman” with Barnier in the next round of Brexit negotiations, Brexiteer Tory Minister @DominicRaab tells @daily_politics: “I’m sure she will”. If only. 
Brexiteer Tory Minister @DominicRaab tells @daily_politics that it would be “unacceptable” for the Brexit backstop to continue past 2021. 
MPs must now deliver in order to respect referendum result or risk constituents feeling ignored' | via @telegraph 
Scott Clissold on Boris Johnson criticising the UK government's Brexit talks strategy, saying it lacks "guts" and suggested Donald Trump could do a better job - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Brexit "may actually leave us, in some ways in a worse position than we are now, for years to come" - #FarageOnLBCWell, @Nigel_Farage , if you don't like the negotiations, maybe we need a #PeoplesVote 
WATCH: @Keir_Starmer calls on Parliament to shape the course of Brexit and bring some order to the Government’s chaos.Please RT and share.  
Tory Remoaner Ken Clarke tells @daily_politics that “the general public” would be furious if May called another general election. True, but they’d be even more bloody furious if she doesn’t deliver on Brexit. 
"I was on the fence, but since the way the EU has treated us since the referendum, I now want us to get out"WE voted to turn our economic partners into our economic competitors! NOT THEM. I can't say this any more simply!#FarageOnLBC 
Lords passed amendments with No mandateRees-Mogg:Lords ignored Salisbury-Addison Convention that it should not stop manifesto commitments.The peers are making a mistake.It's become peers against the PeopleIn a contest the People always win#Brexit #EU 
Both parties, & the country, torn apart by differences over the type of Brexit. MPs should listen carefully to all the arguments & vote on the actual subject of the debate, not on internal  Party politics 
Mercer/Bannon interfered in Brexit referendum and used foreign nationals like Nix to work for Cruz/Bolton/Trump. 
“A controversial pro-Conservative Facebook group has been exposed as containing Islamophobic, homophobic and racist comments about public figures including Sadiq Khan, Diane Abbott and anti-Brexit campaigner Gina Miller.”  
Brexit is causing serious harm to our NHS, and if we don't stop it, we could end up with a worse situation than before the fallout of the vote. Ben is right, Brexit, despite not having happened yet, is on track to wreck decades of world-leading research programmes. #NHS 
Many people emailing to ask how I will vote this week. Plan to be in chamber to listen to both full days of debate but really don’t buy the argument that I should not vote for close EU links & soft Brexit for fear this would lead to a Corbyn Govt. 
The Brexit talks are completely different. There’s no status quo to fall back on. No deal next March means the UK has nothing.ALL, rpt ALL, of its trade is disrupted along with countless other areas of cooperation. It’s just not a credible threat. 8/9 
I hate Brexit because 52% of the country voted to make the other 48% excruciatingly tedious on the internet. 
You know what could actually change the course of Brexit, Mr Starmer? If you and your party developed some kind of backbone and actually opposed the whole disaster with some clarity.  
Isabel Oakshott journalistic ethics: Masses of emails linking leading Brexit campaigners to Russia: "No need to publish yet,we need to see these things in context" Single anonymous source claims Cameron snagged a pig's head decades ago: "This must be published immediately!" 
There was already a strong case for a public inquiry into the Brexit referendum and its aftermath. Stronger today 
Fantastic grasp of the complexities of negotiating Brexit by Keir Starmer. Britain could really do with this man in charge of negotiations.  
I’d like to invite @eddiemarsan to debate me on @novaramedia about this. Let’s talk about how #FBPE dons plan to fashion a pro-EU social majority in the UK post referendum, confront and transform the EU’s corrosive austerity legacy and dealing with its brutal immigration policy. 
The minor significance of the Irish border issue has been cynically magnified by Brussels, Ireland’s PM and Remainers generally as a ruse to stop Brexit:  
Richard Christian(port of Dover) - EU freight is processed in about 2 minutes & we handle 10,000 lorries a day which = 180km of freight. Non EU goods takes 20mins to several hours to process & this somehow has to be brought back down to 2mins post #brexit#FBPE #marr #ridge 
Oh, so the Kremlin was backing Brexit and here are the Brexiteers with Trump. By the way, did everyone notice that while Trump sabotage the G7, the Kremlin met with China, India and Iran? Anyone?   
Historians of the future will surely see the row over Brexit as extraordinary. Not because people disagree, but because an influential section of the country is refusing to accept the will of the majority as legitimate or binding:  
Eddie, mate, your hysteria makes you look more and more stupid.I HAVE been poor. I grew up on a council estate; rife with drink, drugs & violence.Brexit it or not, the answer is @JeremyCorbyn.You have sold out and do not speak for those desperately in need of a Labour Gvnt. 
‘People’s’ vote.Do me a favour.It’s a second referendum.You can add a spoiler but it’s still a Ford Cortina. 
Trump has tipped over our rules-based system on Paris climate deal, Iran Nuclear Deal, Jerusalem, G7 tariffs - attack of EU friends & support for Russia. Since the Referendum the circumstances have changed so we need a #PeoplesVote on the Deal. US word can no longer be trusted 
I’d rather remain in the EU. But that horizon is fraff without addressing the crisis in which we live - blossoming household debt, falling wages, half of young mums skipping meals to feed their kids. Reducing politics to Brexit speaks to a position of immense material privilege.  
UK signs £1.5BILLION trade deal as Brexit Britain expands on world stage  
So you can order both of my books on Russia’s involvement in Brexit, Trump, and beyond direct from small but brave publisher @CynefinRoad via #TheArtOfHybridWar is out now, the unabridged #AlternativeWar on June 21. (Both come out as ebooks the same date) 
As stories come out of arch-Brexiter Arron Banks colluding with Russia, the idea that Brexit was the 'will of the people' becomes a sick joke. Brexit leave campaigns broke spending rules, worked with Cambridge Analytica linked firms & colluded with each other/Russia #StopBrexit 
Do you want to break away from Brexit UK?Scotland:Yes 48No 52(Social Attitudes Survey)Northern Ireland:Yes 48.3No 51.7(BBC Poll)The UK is crumbling. 
One day after @carolecadwalla & @peterjukes broke explosive information about Putin's attack on the UK during the #Brexit campaign, #CambridgeAnalytica whistleblower Chris Wylie has announced he will provide even more evidence of Russia's involvement to a UK Parliament committee. 
“We are now entering the realms of a national emergency.” @thesun has regularly been speaking for the people on #Brexit. Is the @Conservatives party listening?  
.@NicolaSturgeon on #Ridge says if Northern Ireland gets a special deal in relation to #Brexit then she could not allow Scotland to be put at a  competitive disadvantage. 
Does anyone believe political journalist Isabel Oakeshott's account that for no particular reason she just let such incendiary files gather dust for around a year?#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Keir Starmer’s fine distinctions & debating points may go down well with m’learned friends, but they don’t make a comprehensible political message or strategy. There is only one which now makes sense for Labour: stop Brexit entirely. @MarrShow 
Labour’s @Keir_Starmer just told Andrew Marr, “we must have a single market deal.” He’s right. A hard brexit would be devastating for already struggling communities, giving the far right fertile ground to exploit. Have a read of this from @lowles_nick 
Superb performance by @OfficeGSBrown on #Marr.Perfectly articulated all the issues re Brexit. Gordon remains the smartest guy I've met in British politics. Looks much calmer & more relaxed now - & wiser, too. Time for a comeback?  
Does Brexit still mean Brexit? @Nigel_Farage is back, taking your calls live. #FarageOnLBC 
I’m not unbothered by it, I’m saying for many people who are struggling to pay their rent, to find secure employment, to put petrol in the car, Brexit’s not their most pressing day to day concern. FBPE Twitter has comprehensively proved my point with its frankly neurotic response 
Funny how the #FBPE brigade focus all their energy slagging off Jeremy Corbyn, even though Keir Starmer is in charge of Labour's Brexit strategy. It's almost as if #FBPE is just an excuse to slag off Corbyn. #Marr 
On #Marr they're discussing the fact that the National Parliaments of all EU countries have to ratify the deal. They get a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal. yet the UK government, (FAR more democratic than the EU, according to Brexit leaders), says our Parliament is irrelevant? 
I will be providing the DCMS committee with more information about the Russian embassy's involvement with Brexit campaigners on Tuesday. People need to know what happened and if Brexit was part of a Russian influence operation @DamianCollins @CommonsCMS 
An acquaintance of mine has a few twitter followers and runs a business. He was told (in writing) by a Minister that if he tweeted anything more that was anti Brexit he'd no longer get meetings with the Minister. He won't let me publish the "in writing" or the Minister's name. 
We’re about to see why Bannon, Trump & the toxic wing of Brexit worked so hard to legitimise shitehawkers like Breitbart & Infowars. As the truth emerges, the bogus ‘fake news’ accusations get weaponised. 
Nicola Sturgeon's message [which will be contorted by the MSM] is that Brexit will determine *when* she calls Indyref2, in the meantime Yessers should concentrate on putting forward the case for *why* we need independence. In other words, let's campaign. 
The day after we voted to Brexit the Remain lobby introduced the false narrative of "Hard" and "Soft" Brexit. The latter is code for Remain. The latter is the common goal of the political, media and corporate establishment. It looks like they will prevail AGAINST the people. 
We have seen a structural change in Brexit politics this week. Most Leave voters no longer think Govt intends to deliver. Huge ramifications 
I genuinely can’t help but feel that a flash mob of ‘In The Navy’, in full costume, down by Westminster, couldn’t help but lift the gloom of the impending monumental cock-up that is known as, Brexit. 
Here is Keir Starmer on #Marr to explain how Labour are helping Tories to get a hard Brexit. If not in EEA (single market) there will be a border in Ireland - Both single market and customs union needed as Norway/EU border and Turkey/EU border prove that!!! 
On our historic referendum for national independence, witless Gordon Brown says "you've got to ask: what do you do about it?"The hint was on the ballot paper, genius - LEAVE THE EU!  Support us at  
Tories do not have to love the Brexit bill but they must push it through, writes @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
I think Corbyn is the individual in the country who has more influence over the fate of Brexit than any other.  
Now we know  #Brexit vote influenced by 1. Kremlin gold2. Russian trolls and bots 3. DUP Dark money4. Mercer/Bannon's Cambridge Analytica working for free5. Campaign overspending, co-ordination and coverupBut these had no effect? Stop chasing Unicorns  @IsabelOakeshott 
Love that @FraserNelson, editor of the Spectator, says @Arron_banks' covert Russian connections has no relevance to Brexit. Russians wanted him, he says, because of connections to the Trump campaign. Amazing what lengths Brexiteers will go to to avoid what we call "news".. 
Remainers are running Brexit and signing us up to all significant EU obligations. Heading for de facto membership without representation.  
Gordon Brown so right to focus on the underlying issues that drove rejection of the EU in the 2016 referendum - job losses, stagnant wages, public services attacked especially our NHS. We need to restructure our economy and significantly invest in our NHS #marr 
Exactly. When @IsabelOakeshott wrote The Bad Boys of Brexit she knew there was a channel to the Kremlin for the Trump campaign via @Nigel_Farage & @Arron_banks. It is absolutely extraordinary that she said NOTHING for two years 
In any other era this would be career ending. In Brexit Britain, I’m not so sure.  
The majority of Scots do not want @NicolaSturgeon to call another independence referendum, according to our recent poll. Read more at:  
Why is Andrew #marr trying laugh off and lighten the Russia/Aaron Banks brexit story. What doesn’t he understand? Treason means treason. 
There are so many question-marks hovering over the referendum like flies over dung: “Arron Banks ‘met with Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’  
Please don't speak for every one of the 17.4, I voted leave and I'm sure I am not the only one now who finds this all this sinister, you attacked @carolecadwalla on Marr while knowing about these emails, this Brexit reeks... 
Just heard Fraser Nelson on #Marr say we are heading for a soft Brexit that will satisfy the majority who voted for it. WHAT? A "soft Brexit" = Remain. That is the opposite of what we voted for. 
Seems to me that the case for a judge-led public inquiry into spending and foreign influence on the Brexit Referendum campaigns is getting stronger every day. 
Odd for Amber Rudd to be writing joint Brexit articles with Iain Duncan Smith. Like her first conference speech as Home Secretary, pretending to be Theresa May. First rate politicians don’t kow tow to IDS. Diminishes her greatly 
#MarrThis was week when #Brexiteers ceased to give @theresa_may the benefit of the doubtNow there is no doubtPM is planning a Brexit in name onlyThat is not what 17.4m of us,in the biggest democratic vote EVER,voted for.#MayMustGoWe want a PM who will deliver a true #Brexit 
‘@Arron_banks: “I had two boozy lunches with the Russian Ambassador and another cup of tea with him. Bite me. “It’s a convenient political witch-hunt, both over Brexit and Trump.” 
Why the impossible case for Brexit is collapsing - and Labour’s opportunity to do the right thing for party and country. 
The @bbc is right up there with the “bad boys of Brexit” having backed them and given them airtime at every turn.  #marr 
The right wing tried to smear @jeremycorbyn with the lie that he was a Russian stooge. In reality, right wing pro brexit traitors were meeting with Russia and taking Russian money to betray our country. These people need to be investigated by the police.  
#marr fundamentally, whatever your views on #Brexit, if you voted to support it you were voting to support a Russian agenda.  If that doesn't make you pause for thought, are you really a patriot? 
I see the JC inner circle have started a concerted Twitter attack on the millions of voters who are denying JC a polling lead by putting country before CorbynAn attack that’s going to get more & more vocal as they realise Corbyn isn’t going to become PM whilst he backs Brexit 
EU referendum. News outlets give racist views airtime. Prominent anti immigration posters go up in what was a dog whistle of a campaign. Politicians like Farage enable bigotry. Nation votes Brexit. And 2 years on everyone wonders why there are fascist thugs on streets of London. 
 found to have links to Russian money and influence during referendum campaign. Our democracy has been hijacked.  
I'd be very interested to know if @jeremycorbyn would support scrapping Brexit, now it's been shown the whole exercise was fraudulent. 
Be in same place on June 23 for Brexit Freeom day. May isn’t delivering Brexit nor a UK that we want for our children. Join us. @VTerrorism @TrueFla 
Do you think Russia influenced the result for leaving the European Union? #brexit -  'downplayed Russian links' RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
11/~ for Britain it means even more that, despite Brexit, we have to orient to Europe first, emerging markets second: USA now a dud ally 
Journalist @carolecadwalla, working with @peterjukes, scores a first, exclusives in both the Observer *and* the Sunday Times, uncovering Russian meddling in #Brexit referendum. Or perhaps you believe @IsabelOakeshott's account of why she sat on evidence of interference until now 
Dear Brexit, won't be long now before we're burying your foetid, rotting, stinking corpse in a lead coffin. There will be much dancing upon your grave.Can't wait 
So involvement with a foreign power on a domestic vote in no way calls it into question? A foreign power that has aggressively been sabotaging democracy around the world including countries like America and France.Be honest. Brexit is a con to undermine Britain. 
Anyone who sat on all this, it would seem, puts commitment to Brexit ahead of commitment to journalism non?  
I will be asking Mr Farage about the ‘Kremlin gold funding Brexit’ scandal on his @LBC show at 1035 
Take a look at the world this morning, @AmberRuddHR . Do you think we're safer in a large trading bloc, or chancing our arm with Trump? Brexit means job losses and impoverishment, as you so ably argued before the referendum. 
MPs must now deliver in order to respect referendum result or risk constituents feeling ignored - The Telegraph  
A plea to Tory and Labour rebels to stick to their principles and back the Lords amendments this week. This may be the last best chance to counter the worst excesses of Brexit. Do not waste it 
A reminder to MPs across the house ahead of this week’s historic #EUWithdrawalBill vote We voted for #Brexit because our democracy is so important to us. The country expects to be heard.  
#bodylanguage This is the world in which if we continue with #Brexit we will be operating alone, as a country of 66 million, rather than part as a union of 741 million representing most of a continent. #StopBrexit 
May versus parliament: a showdown over Brexit with her own party  
Wouldn't normally do this but people need to see and understand what Oakeshott has done here......Here's her statement 
BREXITTheresa May doesn’t have the will or the wit to deliver a successful Brexit, she doesn’t even have the courage to deliver a “no deal”. As Gloria Gaynor once sang: Go on now, go, walk out the door. Just turn around now 'cause you're not welcome anymore...  
"Some MPs want to tie the Government’s hands on the CU, this will send a signal to the EU to offer us a poorer deal. We mustn’t weaken the Government in negotiations" @CarolineFlintMPLabour MPs in #Brexit constituencies must support the #EUWithdrawalBill 
The Russia connection that will hopefully see @Arron_banks and @Nigel_Farage in jail. Add to this @Jacob_Rees_Mogg's sizeable Russian investments and @BorisJohnson's friendship with Russian spies and a trend emerges - #Brexit is doing #Putin's dirty work. pic.twitter.com/ulN8i5VAZF 
BBC News -  'downplayed Russian links' . What an interesting headline. Surely BBC you can do better than that. The old Auntie Beeb would be raging that our democracy has been undermined.But not a word of indignation. Stop Brexit.#FBPE 
EXCLUSIVE: Arron Banks, the millionaire businessman who helped fund Brexit, was offered a business deal involving six Russian goldmines  
Two years on from the referendum. The 1,500,000 living in #destitution are still waiting to hear from the #government what the tangibe benefits of #Brexit will be for them. Will it feed them, cloth them, heat their homes or pay their rent? Will it? 
Russian government behind 75% of the EU Referendum Vote Leave Campaign's £16 million Budget.  
The establishment is again talking up allegations about Russia influencing the referendum, while completely ignoring the influence of Obama's blatant - Vote Remain or 'Britain will be at the back of the queue' - scaremongering.  
More credible evidence is coming forth regarding hostile foreign interference, to undermine democracy.  Clearly, regarding Brexit and the 2016 U.S. Elections, those responsible, all the way to the highest levels must be prosecuted. #Brexit 
.@potus has given us very good reminders of the madness of leaving EU to tie our future more closely to his America on the back of a Brexit part funded by Russia! Time to wake up people. #PeoplesVoteMarch June 23 
Brexit stinks. And they called us traitors and saboteurs. As @IsabelOakeshott attacked @carolecadwalla she was sitting on evidence of Banks collusion with the Russians. Wow! 
Violent extremists attacking police. This is Brexit.  
When May  proclaimed " Brexit means Brexit ", i bloody well believed her, she got my vote. More fool me, the woman is a liar, she is lower than low.  
REVEALED:  “What have you been paying for, for 45 years?” - Great Sunday #Brexit read:  
Why not @BBCNews ? Because if it’s bad for Brexit it ain’t on the Beeb  
Farage’s Leave campaign close to RussiansIn US, Russian subversion of democracy is under investigatation by FBISince we learned of Brexit Russian connection many months ago we have been asking where are police investigations in the UK?#Brexitgate 
This was the week when #Brexiteers ceased to give @theresa_may the benefit of the doubtNow there is no doubtPM is planning a #Brexit in name only.That is not what 17.4m of us,in the biggest democratic vote EVER,voted for.#MayMustGoWe want a PM who will deliver a true #Brexit 
Surely even you, Brexitteers, must feel a little queasy that Brexit was bankrolled by someone whose secret links to Russia are exposed all over today's front pages ?Why was Russia so keen to help ? Because Putin has GB's best interests at heart, maybe ? Think about it ...  
Hopefully treacherous Lords amendments, which attempt to kill #Brexit, will be thrown out.Then the Tory Brexiteer MPs need to write to Chairman of 1922 Committee calling for a leadership vote.#MayMustGo because she lied to usShe said she'd take us out of EU & we're staying in. 
Russian “asset” @realDonaldTrump repudiates G7 & international system of rules.Russian “asset” @Arron_banks worked to undermine EU & international system of rules. Banks & Trump coordinated with each other & Russia. @theresa_mayWhich “people” is #Brexit the “will” of? 
Join Radio Biafra London Live From Canada, At The International Biafra Genocide Exhibition And Biafra Referendum.#Genocide#BiafraGenocideExhibition#StopBiafraKillings#SayNoToWar#SupportBiafraReferendum @RoyalFamily@UN @hrw 
What if...—Trump is a Russian agent?—Most of GOP leadership is on the Kremlin payroll?—Brexit is a Russian con-job & rigged vote?—Right-wing billionaires are uniting against the people?—Russia is accelerating the onset of Climate Change to melt & open Arctic shipping routes? 
‘The dawning, sobering truth, as we have always argued, is that Brexit – soft, hard or medium-rare – is a disaster in the making that will render Britain a weaker, lonelier, poorer and uglier place’ @guardian editorial 
Very important thread - I encourage all concerned about the fate of Brexit (whether you voted Leave or Remain) to read, digest, retweet, put civic duty over partisan interest and force politicians and media to acknowledge and consider this obvious solution.  
It is critical we don't understand #TrumpRussia as a uniquely American event, rather than just one theater in Putin's global war on liberal democracy.The UK was attacked during the #Brexit campaign using similar tactics complete w/Russian connections.  
Message to Mr. Adler. You and your Sun et al colleagues carefully nurtured the constituency that you now find problematic. It's the same constituency that thought Brexit was about Polish plumbers. You're only worried now because you can't control them. #cdnpoli 
My contempt for politicians supporting this debased #Brexit & bringing our UK to an existential national crisis is beyind imagining.What the hell is wrong with these charlatans who risk so much for so little. What do we gain that's worth having? NOTHING. 
Tale of two referendums: U.K.'s Theresa May opposed Brexit and now has to implement it. Ireland's Leo Varadkar got what he wanted.  
Oakeshott questions the integrity of CC whilst in full possession of information that would destroy the credibility of LeaveEU and their senior staff - she now claims that 'in her opinion' it would have had little effect on the ref result! Who told her that, Ashcroft? 2 / 2 
Questions. Am I supposed to care that Trump won't sign the G-7 communique? Am I supposed to care about Brexit? Am I supposed to care if the alliances of the capitalist/imperialist countries fall apart? I hope not. Because I don't. 
Why does this seem so familiar...didn’t someone say like 17months ago the Brexit fubar was a straight up Russian Hybrid/Cyber Op...to wit Twitter told her she was crazy and an Alt Right Troll.It’s like Groundhog Day 3.0, Right @LouiseMensch ?The saltiest of tears for her haters 
Why did Oakeshott sit on this for months ? Surely this makes her complicit with those who colluded with the Russians ? This could have changed the whole course of the referendum.  
"I had 11,000 emails on the Brexit campaign but I let them gather dust in my attic for a year". Those journalism skills tho 
Why would Brexit campaigners leak sensitive FBI docs and intel to the Russian embassy in London? More to come. 
Hard Brexit fan & unethical lying BBC journalist Andrew Marr will do everything he can on his show later this morning to shut this story down. #Marr 
suddenly i support brexit  
Trump has been an associate of Nigel Farage, one of the leaders of the #Brexit movement in the UK. They are both connected to Arron Banks, a wealthy Briton who helped fund the referendum.Banks met with Russian intelligence operatives before the #Brexit vote.  
So basically: it wasn’t Banks’ & Wigmore’s fault, even tho they lied & denied it while Oakeshott sat on those emails for 2 years, yet it’s no big deal as the ends justify the means? Will the last person with a shred of integrity switch off the lights at Brexit HQ! 
And soon after Trump called his candidacy 'Brexit Plus'  
FLASHBACK to Feb 2017: @carolecadwalla wraps up Mercer, Bannon, Farage, Banks, Wigmore with a bow. Now we know the Bad Boys of Brexit were offered a gold mine deal for Brexit by the Kremlin.  
This is where Brexit has taken us.  
Brexiters! You've been shafted.Brexit was funded not only by US hedge fund billionaires, but also by Russia. Because, obviously Russia has a strategic interest in weakening cooperation between western European countries.It;'s remainers, NOT Brexiters  who are the real patriots.  
What were all those Telegraph/Daily Mail headlines: traitors, enemies of the people, saboteurs? What did the Sun headline today: "Aggressive foreign powers hellbent on crushing Brexit":   How will Oakeshott's cover-up be reported? And the story itself? 
Arron Banks, the millionaire businessman who bankrolled Farage’s campaign to quit the EU, had multiple meetings with Russian embassy officials in the run-up to the Brexit referendum, documents seen by the Observer suggest.Banks gave £12m to the campaign. 
Dear brexadis I have been accused of being on @georgesoros payroll. I can assure that this is bollocks despite how happy I would be to take his cash to stop #Brexit. If any of you can get me on his payroll I will pay a finders fee of 25% so brexists get me on his fucking payroll 
Morten Morland on Boris Johnson criticising the UK government's Brexit talks strategy, saying it lacks "guts" and suggested Donald Trump could do a better job - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Brexit shows that under the right conditions (lies from politicians) a country can go backwards. The rights of citizens can go backwards. The EU was designed specifically to prevent that. It's there to protect people from reckless and callous governments.Help keep us protected. 
I've been reluctant to overemphasise the impact of Russian operations on Brexit. Without deep social tensions in the UK there would have been nothing for the Kremlin to take advantage of.But I do find how the latest Banks story has been downplayed on UK broadcast media odd 
‘Brexit is the best thing to happen for Russia’ #BrexitRussia #BrexitFraud #StopBrexit 
Proof - if proof was needed - that Trezza’s ToryKip Party will act only in self interest (and not for Brexit) to stop Corbyn.Last year, Mrs Windrush snarled at Corbyn across #pmqs ‘WE (who is we?) will never allow you to get in!’Her hatred for decency rose to the surface. 
#FBPE logicBlame Corbyn for not stopping Brexit, even though he can't stop Brexit.  
From the Rotten Boroughs of the 19thC to the Rotten Brexit of the 21stC.Nothing has changed!Arron Banks purchase of votes for Brexit is surely in contravention of the 1867 Reform Act.#Marr 
Who's @Arron_banks? He's the Bad Boy of Brexit seen here to left of Trump. In depth interview here. "Not a single penny of money has been put into Brexit," he told me. Though I never actually asked him that.. 
When will the Brexit Referendum result be declared null and void? @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn 
“Arron Banks, the millionaire businessman who bankrolled Nigel Farage’s campaign to quit the EU, had multiple meetings with Russian embassy officials in the run-up to the Brexit referendum...”  
Arron Banks ‘met with Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’ - including a trip to Moscow in February 2016 to meet key partners and financiers behind a gold project - Documents seen by Observer suggest multiple meetings between 2015 and 2017 
John Bolton: Super PAC paid Cambridge Analytica to agitate “national security voters”Donald Trump: Mercers funded Cambridge Analytica/Brietbart, sought stolen emails from WikeleaksTheresa May: her Brexit financed by Nigel Farage’s campaign that was offered Kremlin gold deals  
Our #Brexit politicians pander to these yobs while ignoring the great majority of responsible and educated young people who oppose #Brexit. #StopBrexit #FBPE  
America! Let me explain this. @Arron_banks funded Brexit. He's a close friend of @Nigel_Farage & through 2015-2016 was hanging out with Trump. We reveal he made multiple visits to Russian embassy during that time & was offered $$$ gold deal... 
Now plenty of evidence that Russia was simultaneously trying to destroy European Union through Brexit and USA through getting Trump elected. So far, with the help of Theresa Mays in UK and @GOP  in US, they are succeeding  
TODAY WAS A WATERSHED!TODAY BRITAIN DEMONSTRATED THAT ENOUGH IS ENOUGH!!We witnessed that ordinary people are ready to overturn our mainstream political parties & demand a new paradigm!But we must now keep up the pressure so let's show similar numbers for Brexit June 23rd !  
My day on twitter:People are dying needlessly because of the Tory policiesA : BrexitPeople are homelessA : BrexitWomen are having thier pensions stolenA: Brexitand so on and so on.Sick of it now 
As a #leavernow I stand shoulder to shoulder with Vladimir PUTIN'S Russia a hostile foreign power which clearly supports brexit out of a purely altruistic concern for the best interests of the United Kingdom 
Meanwhile Corbyn and Starmer cook up the really original idea of having and eating a Single Market access cake, hoping no-one will remember that the Tories tried the same thing 18 months ago, with a predictable lack of success. #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Clara Ponsati made the excellent point today at snp conference that an independence referendum cannot be illegal in a democracy. #Catalonia #Indyref2 #scotref 
As Brexit, and fighting it, has taken over my life on Twitter, and my follower count has grown, I’m both humbled and struck by the diversity of the people interacting with me here, all kinds of people united by anger at what’s happening and committed to fighting back. > 
The whole Brexit process should be paused at the very least while investigations into the involvement of foreign players in our democratic process are carried out. While the US have ongoing investigations & multiple indictments, WTF is the UK government doing? 
So how long before the Mercers are implicated in the conspiracy with the Kremlin to trigger Brexit and install Trump?  
I am a huge fan of our country.I am a huge fan of democracy.Brexit is not in the best interests of our country.Brexit is not an act of democracy. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
At the EU referendum, 7 out of 10 Labour constituencies backed Leave. Only 7 out of 222 of its MPs did the same:  #Brexit 
Why? the case of a Brexit quid-pro-quo with Russia was clearly explained with very few missing pieces. 48 hours after this alleged deal was closed, Christopher Steele says that Carter Page was offered the brokerage of the Rosneft deal. 
Vladimir Putin Rides his British mare Banski in his historic victory over Britain at the battle of #brexit  
BREXIT, Trump, far right in Europe, far left in Mexico, disinformation trolls.... Russia’s fingerprints on destabilization are everywhere.  
Extraordinary stuff in @thesundaytimes on #Brexit #Russia these allegations must be investigated. 
Theresa May is surrendering Britain to a Brexit that satisfies no one:  
Funny how the British #media never discovers any financial links between the EU and the UK politicians and mainstream hacks who basically eat from the hands of Brussels and Berlin but bangs on about Russia's influence on #Brexit 
July 5, 2016: Russian goldmine deal worth billions goes through. Brexit funder Arron Banks was offered investment opportunity. July 7, 2016: Carter Page and Trump team allegedly offered brokerage of Rosneft sale, according to Christopher Steele.  
I think it will be a healthy thing when the Daily Mail - once its new editor is installed - also starts to report on Brexit without fear of favour  
#FBPE So Russia bought #Brexit with £21m of Arron Banks money in return for which he gets a gold mine or three!! Referendum NOT the #WillofthePeople  We must have a #PeoplesVote 
EXPLOSIVE article by @carolecadwalla @peterjukes !!! BREXIT backer Arron Banks  ‘met Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’  
Front cover of tomorrow’s Sunday Times with leading story on Arron Banks & Leave EU Brexit links to Russia  
Here's @arron_banks tweeting 24 days after the EU referendum on his recent gold & mining purchases. Were they Russian? Was it the deal that the Russian ambassador introduced him to? Questions, questions...  
The gold deal offered to @arron_banks went ahead on July 5, 2016 - 12 days after the referendum. He refused to give us comment on whether he invested. On July 17, 2016 he tweeted: "I am buying gold at the moment & big mining stocks"  
With the Arron Banks revelations on top of all the other emerging interference in Brexit, @jeremycorbyn we IMPLORE you to show you are a man of principle who genuinely has the best interests of our country at heart. Act to #StopBrexit, @UKLabour must vote for the EUWB Amendments 
It seems that, to put it politely, Arron Banks had a memory lapse about many of his meetings with the Russians in the run-up to the referendum. Now why would he forget things like that? #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Many congratulations to the courageous & hard work of the team of British patriots responsible for tomorrow’s front pages on the relationship between the #Brexit campaign & the Kremlin. 
BREAKING:#Russia officials offered gold for #Brexit.by @carolecadwalla & @peterjukes#BrexitGate #KremlinGate #HybridWar #DefendingDemocracy 
Emails by Banks & his sidekick Andy Wigmore reveal an extensive web of links between Banks’ Leave[.]EU campaign & Russian officials.Throughout Brexit campaign & after, Banks & Wigmore had repeated contact w/Russian officials to discuss business deals & "other mutual interests."  
Brexit is becoming a national HUMILIATION fumes Hartley-Brewer as she calls for May to GO   
NEW: Emails reveal that Arron Banks, the millionaire businessman who helped fund Brexit, had three meetings with the Russian ambassador to Britain — raising explosive questions about attempts by Moscow to influence the referendum result. 
Oh, so now Brexit is supposed to have been organized by Russia. Where does the idiocy stop? Have any of these journalists ever met a Trump or Brexit voter?  
The next Brexit row: immigration  
EXPLOSIVE: Banks and Wigmore seem to have been promised gold by Russians for Brexit.  by @carolecadwalla 
BREAKING: Funder of @Nigel_Farage's Brexit campaign met with Russian embassy officials multiple times & offered multi-billion $ gold dealNew from @peterjukes & me  
MAIL ON SUNDAY: Brexit: new secret Putin connection #tomorrowspaperstoday pic.twitter.com/W0auQ34MG9 
Can we have another referendum yet?  
The EU plans to ambush Theresa May by reopening freedom of movement if she wants frictionless market access. Could this finally be the straw that breaks the Brexit negotiations. See Sunday Times 
Fascist thugs on the streets of London today - attacking Met officers and running riot. Brexit has done this. Pretend it isn't if you like but you're in denial. It's made hate, violence, thuggery and racism acceptable. If you voted for it - you fucking well own it. #TommyRobinson 
“Arron Banks, the millionaire businessman who bankrolled Nigel Farage’s campaign to quit the EU, had multiple meetings with Russian embassy officials in the run-up to the Brexit referendum, documents seen by the Observer suggest.”  
Just catching up on yesterday’s #loveisland despite the obvious that Adam is an absolute idiot, and Hayley is the fakest person around...I’m actually shocked that she didn’t even know that Brexit is a thing  
Britain is dangerously close to a Brexit deal that is worse than staying or leaving the EU, writes @DanielJHannan 
Arron Banks ‘met Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’  
Some more detail from @carolecadwalla  - @Arron_banks ‘met Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’  
I have seen documents showing the Russian embassy in UK facilitating financial transactions for UK nationals during Brexit. I have also seen documents about the Russian embassy receiving intel on Brexit campaign and leaked FBI documents. This is a serious matter @DamianCollins 
Revealed: Brexit backer’s golden Kremlin connection #tomorrowspapertoday  pic.twitter.com/hQMmxjko8s 
Arron Banks ‘met with Russian officials multiple times before Brexit vote’  
Is Brexit going to turn into the Trump/Russia probe, with allegations of collusion and wrongdoing a normalised part of background furniture? Or are we approaching a smoking gun? I have no idea right now, but will sleep on it as going on LBC to discuss at, er, 7 tomorrow morning  
BOOM!"The Observer has seen documents which a senior Tory MP says, if correct, raise urgent and troubling questions about his relationship with the Russian government." 
The whole country now has a real need to step back and do a reality check as to where we actually are with regard to Brexit, and the unbelievably ridiculous proposals being put forward by people in charge.#PeoplesVoteMarch #StopBrexit 
The British people don't want a "revote" on the referendum, they want a new vote on the terms of the final deal with the EU and if it's not satisfactory, a chance to remain in the EU. 
Brexit was strongly supported by Putin who wishes to see the U.K. weakened, some of those who purport to be patriots are completely the opposite. #brexitcorruption 
This is admirable, but really, don’t you think #Brexit deserves some of your attention?Please stop #Brexit.Thank you.#BrexitMeltdown 
Ok, so full chapeau to @thesundaytimes for revealing the frankly shocking news that morbidly obese shit salesman Arron Banks was committing treason. Only problem is, if it was proved beyond doubt or question that Satan shat the Leave Campaign, Gove is Hitler, BREXIT will... 
June 23, 2016: Brexit vote. Which we KNOW was affected by Cambridge Analytica/SCL/Russian Influence. Robert Mercer, Nigel Farage and Andy Wigmore were involved. Details here:  
Real people in Chester really worried about #Brexit deal who really want a People's Vote on Chester's oldest bridge today chesterforeurope@gmail.com @Mcr4EU @Labour4EU @ChesterLibDems @LibDems @Labour4EU @Liverpool4EU @BestForBritain @Gogs4Europe @SleafordLibDems @StuartBudd1 
terrific scoop on Russian meddling & Brexit in tomorrow's Sunday Times (with some commentary from me). Please buy it or read it online 
1/The Biggest enemies of the U.K. attaining a good Brexit deal are the Germans and French.Let’s take a step back in time to 1944 and the D day landings.The Enemy was Germany and we were trying to freeThe French.83,000. British and Commonwealth troops made that Landing. 
Did you remind them, @vincecable:- how @LibDems enabled Brexit- how @LibDems went in to coalition with the nasty @CONservatives- how @LibDems betrayed people over tuition fees & the bedroom tax - how @LibDems enabled austerity - how you were rejected over a 2nd referendum? 
Actually we have the worst government in history precisely because we have the worst leader of the “opposition” in history.  “Of course I will support your crazy, jobs go first Brexit Theresa.  Love JC.”  
Whether the @UKLabour approach improves on the EEA or not, it's only a plan if we're in Govt. We're in opposition. We should seek to defeat the Govt, defeat Hard Brexit and open up Single Market options followed by a #PeoplesVoteWrite to your MP here: 
UN expert proposes Catalonia referendum, given Spain's political change  
SCHEER AT THE LACOLLE BORDER! GOOD JOB showing Canadians how different you will be as our next PM & Conservative Government. We need referendum on immigration. It's high time. Thank you. #cdnpoli #CPC #TrudeauForTreason #TrudeauMustGo #Border #BorderActionNow #migrants 
Back from an inspiring #SNP18 in Aberdeen with friends and comrades old and new. Strasbourg tomorrow to keep up the fight on brexit. Scotland voted to remain, we’re working on that.  
Amazing turnout today at out action day in #LewishamEast campaigning for @lucyvsalek. Lucy is the only candidate standing up against a Tory-Labour hard #Brexit and fighting to ensure we have a #PeoplesVote with an option to #ExitFromBrexit. Good luck Lucy! 
Keep in mind, crowdfunding is how a lot of US based evangelical groups and activists are going about the business, it's exactly what they did in Ireland ahead of the 8th referendum.  
Whoa!Arron Banks who helped fund Brexit lied about his meets w Rus Amb to Britain (he said they had 1 while it was really 3)One of the meets happened 3 days after his meet w Trump Nov 2016.Banks admitted that he handed phone numbers of Trump’s transition team to Rus officials  
The Times: Exclusive: Emails reveal Russian links of millionaire Brexit backer Arron Banks 
Met with German friends today, both highly skilled health professionals who have worked in NHS for many years, moving back to Germany because of Brexit and Home Office behaviour. This is the reality of Brexit, impoverishing our country for no benefit. My heart breaks. 
Brexit will turn out to be the biggest political scandal of our time. It’s unraveling fast but the full permutations of who was involved will take years to be investigated and for appropriate actions to be taken against them. Healing will take much longer.Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
I have personally seen these emails/documents and informed both British and American intelligence about them months ago.  Brexit looks like it may be part of a coordinated Russian information operation.  More to come.  
Just imagine what the protest marches will be like if brexit is scuppered?  
Congratulations to @thetimes who have come up with the ultimate #Brexit - #TrumpRussia exclusive 
The UK is still sliding closer to a very dark future. This isn’t about Brexit as such, but it is all connected. Just think about the xenophobic hate the EUref unleashed. #PeoplesVote march on 23 June must be *huge*. Please come join me. And everyone bring more people with you. 
Meanwhile, my child has to get two British people to write him a good character reference and pay £90 so he can become British to be safe post Brexit. Born here, like these thugs, but he has to earn it. Because his mum is French. God, I'm angry. Wine and twitter off.  
Great thread. But you should have been informing people of the risks before the referendum, Pete. Not campaigning for Leave. You tacitly supported far right demagogues’ lies to get you over the line. Well, guess what; if you choose to ride a tiger, it might just eat you.  
The British businessman who funded Brexit has admitted that he "handed over telephone numbers for members of Trump’s transition team to Russian officials."  
Exclusive: Emails reveal Russian links of millionaire Brexit backer Arron Banks — says he handed over phone numbers of members of Trump’s transition team.   
With a boost from Rihanna, #Barbados rejects homophobia & elects first female Prime Minister. Her party is committed to a referendum on LGBT+ issues & won every seat in parliament, despite anti-LGBT+ smears. READ   via @76Crimes. @CaribEquality @EC_Equality 
And there it is. Nigel Farage, Arron Banks & Donald Trump. When the common denominator is Russian contacts & contacts between Trump's crew & the Brexit crew, collusion is the wrong word. Conspiracy seems entirely possibleH/t @dwinfrey72@FelisDave@LouiseMensch@ericgarland 
It’s slowly starting to happen.  First #Brexit, then Trump and now ...Anti-Elite Conservative Doug Ford Wins Landslide in Ontario, Canada. Italy populist party won’t its 2nd confidence vote.   via @BreitbartNews 
Things you won't learn from BBC News #18 Boris Johnson's dad wants Brexit re-run over 'obvious' Russia meddling 
.@Arron_banks, the businessman who helped fund Brexit, had three meetings with the Russian ambassador to Britain — raising explosive questions about Moscow's influence on the referendum. Emails by Banks and @andywigmore were shown to The Sunday Times: 
Emails reveal BREXIT was a RUSSIAN OP!   
So the #Brexit folks (@danarohrabacher's friend, Farage, and Wigmore)  were doing the exact same thing that the Trump fam and surrounding #MAGAs were doing. Not surprised one bit. No doubt the real story is much worse. (Murdoch owns The Times.) 
This is a bit messy. Arron Banks’ ghostwriter, also the ex-Sunday Times political ed, has emails which show the Brexit campaigner meeting the Russian ambassador. But she says they’ve been hacked. And now the Sunday Times has seen them.  
There is nothing patriotic about Brexit . It is the single most unpatriotic weapon used against UK since WWII. Those responsible will be held to account . Their cheerleaders may want to reflect on their support of those trying to undo our Union. #Brexit  
Arron Banks of Leave. EU had "repeated contact" with Russian officials throughout #Brexit campaign to "to discuss business opportunities & issues of mutual interest".And we still don't know quite how Banks was able to pour so much cash into the campaign. 
‘This doesn’t change the referendum result.’ Maybe not, but there should be a public inquiry into how we hold referendums in the future in the UK  
Putin’s Brexit.  
Oh my god. The leaders of Leave might actually have been traitors successfully working with Putin against the UK government? That's outrageous, it's shocking, it's... it's... it's, not even remotely surprising is it? Sorry, I tried to be shocked. Really I did. #brexit 
EXPLOSIVE: Emails given to @CommonsCMS show Bad Boys of Brexit had “extensive web of links” with Russian officials.  
Now Brexit - the Russian connection. Tomorrow's S Times looks interesting  
Brexit's Arron Banks met with the Russian Ambassador to the UK in Sept 2015. That bloody month & year has been popping up all over #TrumpRussia. The Times are now saying they have more info, to be revealed soon@LouiseMensch@thespybrief@ericgarland 
Exclusive: @thesundaytimes reveals Russian links of #Brexit backer Arron Banks w/ @ShippersUnbound @IsabelOakeshott 
I'll be speaking to MPs next week about the threat Brexit poses to workers rights. if you're also working class and/or young and/or a labour member like me, let me know if you've a particular opinion/fact/question that you want them to hear and I'll try my best to pass it on!  
It’s all about Putin. It always was. Brexit, Trump, fake news, ‘populism’, the normalisation of racist lies. Destabilising the West was alway’s Putin’s only chance of avoiding Yanukovych’s fate & hanging on to all the cash he’s stolen. Sunday Times required reading tomorrow.  
EXCLUSIVE Leaked emails reveal previously undisclosed meetings between controversial Brexit donor Arron Banks and Russian ambassador, who was very interested in Donald Trump... 
Brexit is becoming a national HUMILIATION fumes Hartley-Brewer as she calls for May to GO   
Powerful editorial from the Guardian calling on Labour to lead the debate on Europe - please read and ask your MP if they will join in voting for #amd51 on Wednesday to stop hard Brexit!  
Arron Banks, the millionaire businessman who helped fund Brexit, had three meetings with the Russian ambassador to Britain — raising explosive questions about attempts by Moscow to influence the referendum result  
For comparison, the financial crisis in 2007 led to a GDP drop of only 2%Brexit = drop of 8%Get out Scotland whilst you can before you're dragged into this catastrophe!  
"Labour, the so-called party of the people, is currently mired in a debate about whether it should ignore its millions of Leave voters or ignore its millions of Leave voters while pretending it isn’t.”@Tom_Slater_ on the Brexit mess we’re in 
Having criticised him for saying nothing on Brexit for a while happy to RT this. Would be even happier if Labour maintained consistent robust aggressive stance against the Govt on Brexit  
Gina Miller is charging £13-£33 to hear her views on Brexit on 29 August at the Cadogan Hall. 30 pieces of silver would be more appropriate. 
“Though nothing has changed. But still we remain. Still we remain. Still we remain. But will we remain?”#Brexit @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn @vincecable @iBluestone. #Sydney #CommonGround 
Retired Brigadier and patriot Stephen Goodall, 96, is a veteran of the second World War.He'll be marching for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal on June 23rd. 
Retired Brigadier & patriot Stephen Goodall fought for this country during the second World War to secure Britain’s place in a peaceful & united Europe.In this powerful video, Brigadier Goodall explains exactly why we need a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal.Please RT:  
David Davis and Theresa May on a collision course over Brexit? Not to worry - only the country's future at stake... Pause for a moment: #SAvENG #WorldGinDay #rEDRugby #marr and watch this:↓ 
Why are you, the ex ex ex ex Transport Minister on shows every other day to talk about Brexit?  
Matt on Brexit and the World Cup - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
The gini coefficient measures disposable income inequality - the higher the score, the greater the inequality.The UK is the most unequal country in northern Europe.This may be one factor underlying #Brexit - but does anyone imagine Brexit will make things *better*?#PeoplesVote 
Jeremy Corbyn: "When it comes to Brexit, this government has delivered more delays & cancellations than Northern Rail" #Marr #SAvENG 
At #Millennifest, investigating the pig’s ear that the government is making of Brexit with @vincecable and Dominic Grieve #PorkiePies 
Jeremy Corbyn asks when the Brexit white paper will be published?Theresa May: No answer 
The Government promised a “detailed, ambitious and precise” Brexit White Paper this month setting out their negotiating priorities. Once again it’s been postponed.The Tories are botching Brexit and risking jobs and our economy in the process. 
I've been talking to young people at #Millennifest about #Brexit and about what a future outside the EU could mean for them. Huge backing for a #Peoplesvote including full support from fellow speaker & Labour MP @TulipSiddiq 
With @Mcr4EU @No10Vigil at @Parklifefest. This is what young people think of #Brexit  
Check out Stephen’s statement from referendum, versus his profile pic now and what he’s saying now.We’re all wiser than on that day - and people deserve a vote on any deal so the government’s plans -and the Brexit project as a whole- are held to account.  
This Govt’s Brexit strategy has been characterised by confusion and indecision. My job is to press for the best deal for Londoners, and I urge MPs to put aside party politics and act the best interests of our city, and country, in next week's EU Bill vote. 
'It's a deep slope DOWNHILL!' Former EU Commissioner says UK will get THIS Brexit deal  
I'm very confused by the argument of many on left Twitter that brexit isn't the main priority.Isn't socialism about taking the means of production into the ownership of the people?Won't leaving the EU hand that ownership to unscrupulous businessmen and oligarchs? 
“Brexit isn’t about Scotland. It isn’t even about Britain. It is about the Tories." #SNP18 
Rounding off the day with some #StopBrexit activism! Some beautiful European stories here — plus a very clear message on Brexit and #PeoplesVote! And so delighted to meet @theSNP MP @DeidreBrock ... we’re on a roll, fighting to stop Brexit, no Extrawurst available!  
Brexit is becoming a national HUMILIATION fumes Hartley-Brewer as she calls for May to GO  
Theresa May must get a grip on Brexit fast or risk being the Prime Minister who bungled the negotiation and sold 17.4 million Leave voters down the river, warns @TheSun 
John Curtice there on BBC2 reviewing the SNP conference and lack of a shift to Yes over Brexit 'The SNP need to make the public more upset about Brexit'. Hence the BBC/MSM in Scotland underplaying the effect of Brexit in Scotland 
Mate, from what I've seen, you've had quite a few people explain to you how Brexit has already begun to fuck up their lives and told you not to be so unbelievably patronising about it. Also LMAO, yeah, it's just little you against the mob, no one else tweets views like yours.. 
Anna is moaning that her mailbox is full and she misses constituents emails as a result.Its funny, she doesn’t give a damn what her constituents think about #Brexit. The majority of whom voted leave Cc @BroxtoweCons 
I sometimes think Alastair that your visceral unthinking hatred of Corbyn clouds your thinking on Brexit as also on other issues. Might I suggest a more sophisticated approach, after all he is the person most likely to order a second referendum?  
Oh no! The au pair industry is collapsing due to #Brexit! How shall the champagne socialists and metropolitan elites ever survive?!  
The Brexit problem in another tweet. Leavers have mentally left the European Union. But years on they're still entirely clueless as to how actually to leave the European Union.  
The only blockchain implementation that helps voting is the one we saw in the Catalan referendum.  
Labour's prized kipper constituency has turned against brexit. So Mr Corbyn can stop worrying about them now and implement the will of Labour members, voters and MPs: start opposing brexit.  
Really pleased this went off  tip for #FBPE-ers..... telling people you disagree with that they’re “twats” and “idiots” won’t win anyone over. No wonder Remain lost the referendum. God help you if there’s another one. Prepare to get your arses handed to you, imho 
Dear Alastair @campbellclaret I want a second referendum I support Corbyn It is significant Corbyn has been careful not to rule out a second referendum Corbyn & Starmer are *best* chance of a second referendum Please start targeting potential Tory rebelsBest wishes Tom  
Why would Remainers want to be involved with a Brexit party when Brexit is overwhelmingly the most critical issue and will severely impact all other issues?I honestly don't think you understand the seriousness of the problem.  
Why did the Brexit supporting Sunday Times run this on its front page? Why did Johnson say this knowing it would be leaked? They're preparing you for what is to come.  
It's time for MPs to do their democratic duty by respecting the referendum result and the manifestos they were elected on, says the @Telegraph 
brexit means brexit  
FM: “My sense as I travel this country is that people have had enough of the despair and the despondency of Brexit. They want to be inspired by the hope of a better future instead.” #SNP18 #ScotlandCan 
Please continue to support our brave Pro-EU MPs who continue to put country before party and will come under attack next week from the Brexit press and party whips @heidiallen75 @JDjanogly @S_Hammond @NickyMorgan01@neill_bob @Sandbach @Anna_Soubry @sarahwollaston #FBPE 
Keep in mind, this isn't just about trans people.What we saw in Ireland recently, with the UK TERFs proposed talk ahead of the abortion referendum, was a deliberate attempt to derail the work feminists in Ireland were doing. TERFs are the union-busters of feminism.  
When it comes to #Brexit, as a Brit living in the EU I feel invisible. As a Remainer, I feel abandoned. As a voter, I feel neglected. I am one of 1.2 million Brits in EU who are being used as bargaining chips along with EU in UK.Day & Mavis couldn't give a hoot. @Bremaininspain 
Over a million people have attended the #FreeTommy march today. They're getting bigger and bigger. The government should start shitting themselves. #FreeTommyRobinson #TommyRobinson #FreeSpeech #DayForFreedom #UKIP #ForBritain #BritainFirst #Brexit #Conservatives 
Also, circular bloody argument whether it's more important to elect Labour to reverse austerity or campaign against Brexit at possible cost of Lab votes is TEDIOUS AND POINTLESS. Until/unless there's an election soon, Lab's potential "better Brexit" is a bloody moot point anyway! 
These are dark days for Brexit, but the EU is in much greater trouble than we are, writes Janet Daley 
If you want to stop Brexit, the last person you want on your side is Tony Blair. The second to last person is Alastair Campbell. 
Trafalgar Square right now: a very large gathering of the Gammon to “Free Tommy.” This is the Pandora’s Box that Brexit has opened; open and blatant support for fascists, neo-Nazis and law breakers. And when Brexit goes wrong, here are the foot soldiers for what comes next.  
"Courage"?You can't even handle an email from a pensioner without reporting her to the police ffs . #Brexit  
Don't miss @haymarketbooks event Race and Nation in the Age of Trump and Brexit with Gary Younge and Keeanga-Yamahtta Taylor / 16 June at 18:30–21:30 @ConwayHall  
Putin won. Accept it.It's become clear that Brexit was meant to shut the UK out of the safety and prosperity of Unity.Ditto for the Russian-GOP Coup in America.Time to strategize with the reality that Heads Of State will not sacrifice their countries' survival for ours.  
Must be nice to be in a position to look down on the people whose entire lives and livelihoods have the serious potential to be or are already being fucked up by Brexit and be like 'chillax man, stop naval-gazing'...   
Govt admits advisory EURef was not constitutionally valid decision of the Brit Ppl. UKParl has not voted a decision. SC has ruled Govt cannot act alone. Therefore A50 trigger+Brexit legislation are unconstitutional. When is Parl going to pull the plug on Brexit? It's illegal!  
I don't usually comment on the execrable KTHopkins but her own tweets make it absolutely clear that in addition to being a racist and fascist she is a Putin tool, cheering for Putin and his brutal mass-murdering ally Assad. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Donald Trump has just said he would like to see a Tariff free G7 area. That's good for Brexit as well as a being good for the UK. 
. @HenrySmithUK will lead an Adjournment debate ‘Proposed ban on foie gras imports ‘ on Wednesday 13 June . We ask MPs to support this debate. We urge for a ban on Foie Gras imports in our Blueprint ’ Brexit: Opportunities For Animal Welfare’ handed to No10 in January 2017  
Here is the link to my conference speech  earlier today - thanks to those who asked for it !  Scotland's Brexit Minister Michael Russell's address to SNP conference - The SNP  
May accused of delaying deal on Brexit again by ordering another Chequers Cabinet lock-in - but only after the crunch EU summit in June has already taken place  
We are responsible for this fiasco not the EU. We had a referendum that split the UK down the middle, pitted young v old, nation against nation. We treated the GF agreement with contempt. We assumed the EU would compromise their principles. This is us. Own it 
French press Le Monde it's  brexit crash or no more red line, can't be both, U.K.  jas 2 weeks to make it happen, EU will not accept any extension period Moment de vérité pour le Brexit  
A letter in today’s DT says that the risk of a hard border in NI is by itself sufficient to rule out a no-deal Brexit. Why? Because of fears that the IRA would attack the border posts. So let’s spell it out: The IRA is able to stop Brexit — if we let them. 
Here in South Wales, a hard Brexit could lead to the closure of Airbus in Newport, Ford in Bridgend, the Tata steelworks in Port Talbot....but yeah, those are just "elitist" concerns. 
A 7 point Tory poll lead? I’d love to ask the people they polled what their rationale is. Is it the NHS catastrophe? Is it the seismic losses on RBS? Is it the careering towards hard Brexit, or the undemocratic Tory approach? Is it the racism? Or is it that Tory PR is duping you? 
Totally agree. We need bigger businesses than mine shouting about the disaster that is #Brexit to the media!!! 
"Parliament has never voted on whether to accept the advice of the advisory EU referendum."Stop scamming people out of their money for something you know is complete codswallop  
Africa’s old and new hydrocarbons markets have an opportunity to further entrench the continent’s position as the world’s hottest oil and gas frontier in 2019.  #OOTT @energy_african @Centurion_Law @AfricaOilPower @cnbcafrica  via @madeitinafrica 
Well it's not "irrespective of Brexit" is it. It's directly caused by Brexit. I'm concerned about alleviating poverty and I think Brexit will massively impact that challenge. People aren't focussed on it as some irrelevant parlour game. 
People driving brexit have not got the first clue about or interest in business and I wish more prominent business people would speak more publicly and openly about Brexit related impact  to their staff and beyond. 
Brexit's why my pay was frozen for 2 yrs, why there's been hire freezes across  industry, why my colleagues aren't sure they can remain in the UK. People whose entire career consists of piggybacking off Corbyn's fame can fuck off lecturing me on how little Brexit impacts my life.  
Hard week but #Brexit voters mustn’t lose hope as we fight for our freedom from the shackles of the #EU. Chin up and keep fighting. The #British lion WILL roar!  
one more link to my post on Labour's Brexit policy then I'll stop tweeting about it for a bit  
Georgia teaches Hayley a thing or two about #Brexit... pic.twitter.com/T6Hn5DACKl 
The people deserve the final say on Brexit. But @jeremycorbyn won't fight for that right, despite his voters wanting an #ExitfromBrexit. Make sure your MP supports amendment 19a NOW, giving you the final say on Brexit, with the option of staying IN the EU:  
Many of us are still trusting that May actually meant what she said,as in Brexit means Brexit,not brexit-lite.I dread to think what will happen,if she's sold us out.Brits do not forgive treachery.They just don't.Ever. She'd best have an ace up her sleeve.  
If we get Brexit wrong, you teenage ninny, voters will realise there is even less money for a Corbyn government to waste. That will make them even less inclined to take the risk in 2022 
@mattzarb You clearly have no idea.My cost prices went up 15-25% in a year - b/c of #Brexit.I’m *literally* having sleepless nights worrying if my 2 shops will survive - b/c of Brexit.I employ 9 people, they could lose their jobs - b/c of Brexit.*Nothing* is more important. 
Scottish seafood industry braced for devastating £80m Brexit hit  
Get rid of May and nothing changes. Both parties still Brexiter central, Labour still unelectable.Get rid of Corbyn and suddenly Brexit is opposed and Labour are electable.  
“Brexit isn’t about Scotland. It isn’t even about Britain. It is about the Tories." #SNP18 
Former ice cream van man Owen Smith had “strong views” on #Brexit. When he overstepped the mark and broke collective responsibility Corbyn sacked him from the front bench. That’s leadership.Compare and contrast to Theresa May...  
Church-going pensioner 'left living in fear' after Remain-backing Tory MP reports her to the police over email criticising her for backing Brexit rebel amendments and not supporting the Prime Minister  
Let’s examine the propaganda in this “disinformation-busting” tweet:-Mention of Crimea (border change through a referendum) but not e.g. Kosovo (border change through NATO overlordship);-Linking of Putin w/ Stalin;-Russian “dezinformatsiia” is from e.g. French “désinformation”  
Even worse. Why should just over a third of the electorate which turns up vote in a government which is progressing a hard #brexit option which only 7% of voters appear to support? Something's rotten in the state of British democracy. @acgrayling 
Liam Fox:"There is No mechanism here by which EU can keep UK in ANY arrangement any longer than which we have specified.There has to be an end to the period.We said we are Leaving EU in March 2019But we have to Leave!We have to be outside #EU"#Brexit 
Behold, the Blairite mindset. If they’d screamed half as loud about Austerity as Brexit - it’s unlikely we’d be leaving the EU. Unlike Campbell and co, millions in this country are suffering worse fates than Brexit already.I voted to Remain. Centrists made that toxic.  
It’s the “business reality” of low wages via imported labour that made a lot of people vote for Brexit. The idea is to introduce a new reality, where workers are paid more. A large part of the Brexit vote is labour vs capital, and labour is winning.  
No, the key issue is improving life chances and living standards. You do that by redistributing wealth and to do that you need to sustainably create wealth. Making this harder only entrenches existing privilege. That’s why the Tory right supports Brexit. 
I have been saying for years that @Conservatives are the party of the working class. Labour have abandoned their political base. To keep these voters we must deliver proper #Brexit  
Labour voters overwhelmingly support a vote on the final deal. We know this. So, why does Corbyn continually hide away from the evidence and the facts? He is ignoring Brexit and has done for a long time and Brexit will render his manifesto promises redundant. #StopBrexit 
Matthew Parris has some excellent advice for Tory MPs who know how ruinous #Brexit will be.But will they have the courage to put country before party?#PeoplesVote 
The Brexitometer reflects a lot of concern about Brexit in Southampton. The need for a #PeoplesVote is becoming clearer. 
Packed fringe @theSNP @YSINational in solidarity with Catalonia @ClaraPonsati “a referendum can’t be illegal in a democracy & IS not illegal in Spain- Spanish judiciary is committing illegal acts, there is no separation of powers in Spain. They put Spanish unity above semocracy!”  
If you’re so insulated from reality that you can’t see that Brexit threatens EVERYTHING — jobs, NHS, investment, workers/human rights, housing — then you might want to rethink your priorities. Stop confusing your sectarian loyalties with the country’s main issue. “”  
Mrs May’s ‘away day’ at Chequers to finalise her Government’s position in the Brexit negotiations  
He has destroyed May over Brexit for the last few #PMQs you clown.#JC4PM 
Fascist clown whose actions have led to the almost certain break up of the UK accuses EU negotiator who's job it is to clear up his mess, of trying to break up the UK.You just couldn't make it up.#Brexit  
Clara Ponsati tells #SNP18 that “a referendum is never illegal in a democracy”. It was the “duty” of the Catalan parliament to organise a vote because they were “ignored” by Spanish authorities  
Quite honestly we couldn't give two hoots about what you say, but know this, we are watching what you do with regards to #brexit - unequal laws - wasting our hard earned taxes on your immigrant virtue signalling - appeasement of EU - and not sacking incompetents like Sadiq Khan!  
Something we all want to know. Who is Juncker? I didn’t get a vote with his name on a ballot paper. #Brexit 
Social housing has to be fit for human habitation as well and Tory slum landlords arent very keen on that - they keep voting against it. This is the post Brexit future. Slum dwelling for you while they live off the state in luxury. Socialism for the slum owner 
SHOCK warning as May is SURROUNDED by Remainers !!...NO SURPRISE THERE THEN !!....Her and Corbyn need to wake up to the fact....THE UK MAJORITY DO NOT NOW WANT ANY FORM OF THEIR "MAD, MAD" BREXIT !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
Democracy didn’t stop on 23 June 2016.Join the Green Bloc at #PeoplesVoteMarch to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final terms of Brexit  
When interviewed at the pointless G7 shindig, the hopeless and out-of-touch Theresa May came out with "nobody said Brexit would be easy". Oh yes they did.  
Because the one thing we've all learned over the last three years is to treat opinion polls as sacred.Britain has been in decline for years because of austerity. We need to win Remain and Leave voters to elect a socialist government to end austerity and deliver a soft Brexit.  
So why trailing the most incompetent government of my lifetime? Down to people fighting to stop Britain’s decline? If you won’t see link between Brexit and all these other issues I despair  
Aha, @Nigel_Farage has realized what anyone with a modicum of political knowledge already knew: #Brexit is bonkers. & he's covering his back by pretending it COULD have worked if we didn't have a useless PM.Brexit was always doomed.#StopBrexit NOW 
There has never been a better time to have a referendum on Irish Unity.Yesterday’s Lucid Talk Poll, last year’s elections and Brexit show the conditions have already been met.We are entering an historic era.We are the history makers. 
Labour will only win by building a coalition of Remain and Leave voters, and addressing the multiple issues - other than Brexit - affecting people's lives. Your approach completely fails to do that.And he hammered the Tories on Brexit 72 hours ago.  
That would mean 1. Humphrys being properly informed about Eu and WTO law. 2. the Beeb changing its policy ‘if it’s bad for Brexit it ain’t on the Beeb’.  
RT! Brexit not your cup of tea? we CAN do something about it - ask your MP to support Amendment 51 on Wednesday and lets stop Tory Hard Brexit!  
He dedicated the entire set of questions to Brexit. And announced a new frontbench amendment this week, on top of the customs union amendment and meaningful vote amendment he will be whipping for. He’s allowed to tweet about other important issue too. 
Thanks to Blairites harping on about staying in the Single Market, the Tories are increasingly seen as the only Brexit party. As a result, Labour are hemorrhaging Leave voters. When will the #FBPE brigade realise they're helping the Tories? Or is that precisely the point? 
Irrespective of political beliefs, it's beyond doubt that more than enough evidence has been amassed to bring into question the validity of a referendum decided by just 640,000 voters, the Brexit process should be suspended until a full inquiry can report. 
I didn’t say they were not important. But they will count for nothing 1. If labour don’t win and 2. There is not a credible plan for Brexit. As things stand 1 unlikely because 2 unaddressed and he so clearly couldn’t care less about it 
A good #brexit is as impossible as a vow of silence from Nigel Farage says @Feorlean at #SNP18. #Brexit is about keeping the Tories in power at all costs & at the expense of democracy in Scotland #ScotlandPlaceInEurope #FBPE 
Bernard-Henri Lévy has convinced himself that he is the man to stop Brexit  
Firstly, you do not know this, it is an assumption based on your worst fears about the post Brexit settlement. Secondly, austerity has done profound economic damage for the past 8 years and has set the country back decades. An economic policy enacted..... while we were in the EU! 
Brexit will do great economic damage, which will affect everyone's incomes, pensions, futures, prospects. It will leave every UK govt for the next 20 years financially wrecked. It's not an abstruse constitutional argument. It's a profound social, political and economic one 
Ladies and gentlemen, I present you with #Brexit and the “will of the people”... 
David Davis has warned that the Tories face a 1997-style defeat if (as looks likely) they botch Brexit. James Forsyth has the lowdown in his Sun column:  
If Brexit is the biggest issue affecting your life then you must be doing alright. I’m happy for you. Most people have to worry about more pressing issues than the UK’s post-Brexit institutional arrangements. Stop confusing your only concern with the country’s main priority  
May actually uttered the phrase 'Nobody said Brexit would be easy' yesterday, sorry but they did, they really, really did. 
David Davis's Brexit ministers were reportedly prepared to resign with him in a "triple resignation" pact amid the backstop row on Thursday  
Amendment 19a on the EU Withdrawal Bill gives YOU the final say on the Brexit deal. Theresa May doesn't want it to go to a vote. Make sure your MP supports the amendment for a final say on the deal, with the option of staying IN the E.U.:  
No. Actually, I don't think the vote arising from the Referendum was democratic, it was defective. And even if it was, I don't believe it gave this government a mandate to do what it is currently attempting to do.  
My wife’s just landed in Rome and called me: ‘That was easy getting through customs. But the queue for non EU was enormous. What’s going to happen when we leave the EU’?Me: Don’t worry, it’s not going to happen. #Brexit is dead.  
“Brexit doesn’t mean Brexit...I think there has been a conspiracy to arrive at this situation....”Watch Michael Portillo’s devastating charge against govt remainers in answer to Andrew Neil’s question....  
With less than a year to go until we leave the EU next March, it is now up to all of us to take concrete action to stop Brexit. Here are seven things you can do  
Kaneing: #LoveIsland Rant 4 (Boners, Bellends, and #Brexit)@LoveIsland @carolineflack1 pic.twitter.com/oXJ0iP1CDF 
Theresa May follows Mussolini, Goebbels and Oswald Mosley in invoking the authority of the "Will of the People", a concept which delegitimises political opposition & demonises political opponents as enemies of the people.(Thanks to @SimonBruni)#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Her grasp of how democracy works is alarming.  She's happy to accept a voting majority to win her seat to become and MP but doesn't accept the majority vote for Brexit. Then she votes against her own party and Government to try to sabotage Brexit.A traitor. A thick traitor.  
Worrying the number of Remainers who want to subvert Brexit without properly understanding the legal relationship between the EU and its member states.EU law trumps member state law. That's why it's undemocratic and that's why we can only restitute our sovereignty by leaving. 
I bet you a dollar and a doughnut that Italy leaves the EU before Britain does, and they've not even held a referendum yet 
The biased BBC has once again stacked its Dateline London debate show with a full panel of anti-Brexit commentators. Appalling.  
Leaver threats of violence if #Brexit is cancelled are yet another reason to stop Brexit. It would set a very dangerous precedent if threats of violence were seen to be effective in influencing government policy.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Surprised to hear Nigel Farage repeat the fallacy unchallenged on @BBCr4today this morning about having to be prepared to walk away.To repeat: Fine, if walking away leaves status quo. Walking away from Brexit talks means cliff edge and furthest distance from status quo 
The OECD’s latest outlook for the UK shows economic growth virtually flat-lining as the US and EU forge ahead. Brexit-related uncertainties are dampening confidence in the UK's economic future. Nobody voted to be poorer, that is why the people must have the final #VoteontheDeal 
Oh look. Corbyn has an eye on a wide range of issues and isn't letting Brexit bog Labour down the way it has bogged down the Government.  
As far as self owns go, this is pretty spectacular. He could’ve just said ‘Why is Corbyn so quiet about Brexit?’ Instead he lists all the very worthy things Corbyn is highlighting, many of them *only* Corbyn is highlighting  
Farage warns UK will be in even WORSE position after Brexit in FURIOUS attack on May.   
Brexit is being betrayed by both Labour and the Tories. Who will defend it? It’s down to us, the people, as perhaps it always was. ‘How?’ is the question we now need to ask ourselves.My @spikedonline column 
Theresa May and DUP furiously hit back after EU insists Britain’s backstop Brexit plan must have border in the Irish Sea  
One amendment would leave open the option to extend the deadline for Brexit  
Dominic Grieve - Talking about a #PeoplesVote... the EU is very respectful of countries constitutional orders.. every EU interlocutor that he has raised this with thinks we'd get an article 50 extension if we needed it to hold a referendum to approve a deal.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
There’s something tragi-comic about British Ministers scrapping like ferrets in a sack over the details of a Brexit back-stop plan, when we all know that Barnier will reject it anyway. 
Theresa May is fucked.David Davis is fucked.Boris Johnson is fucked.Michael Gove is fucked.Liam Fox is fucked.Nigel Farage is fucked.Jeremy Corbyn is fucked.John McDonnell is fucked.Keir Starmer is fucked.The ERG are fucked.Leave. EU are fucked.Brexit is fucked. 
Brexiters finally admitting what Remainers have said all along. We will all be worse off after Brexit. How long Brexit poverty goes on depends on the hardness of the Brexit.A No Deal will be a generation.  
Remain-backing Tory MP reports church-going pensioner to the police over email criticising her for not supporting the Prime Minister and backing anti-Brexit rebel amendments:  Yet another politician showing utter contempt for freedom of speech. 
This is cretinous.In most negotiations, no deal just means a return to the status quo, Eg, we don't agree to sell you widgets and you don't get to buy them.A Brexit no deal leads to all current arrangements becoming null and void. It is totally different. 
Her Eddisbury Constituency voted to LEAVEBut @Sandbach is trying to stop #BrexitOne of her elderly constituents writes to her to complain of her treachery & MP reports her to PoliceCrime is up 36% in Cheshire and she is wasting Police time like this?She should be de-selected  
Tell this to your MP today ( )Wake up and see what your votes will do to your country? Brexit is a disaster and must be stopped, your careers will be better served by protecting the UK than pandering to the Tory far right. @thomasbrake 
This is a useful distillation of the ‘walk away’ delusion. Ordinarily, ‘walking away’ from a negotiation entails retention of the established, pre-negotiation status quo. In the event of a no deal Brexit it would entail walking towards an unknown destination with our eyes closed.  
Two years after #Referendum, the warring #Tory factions are still incapable of agreeing a starting position for the negotiations on the key #Brexit issues, let alone finding a way forward that wouldn’t damage our economy  
Makes me glad I became French when I read this....What is Brexit  madness doing to my ex-wonderful  ex-country ?  
A lot of people mocking Love Island girls for not understanding Brexit well most of our politicians don’t either.Those young women are just kids. They rely on their wise elders not to fuck up their country until they get to grips with it. They have been let down. 
Isn't he simply ensuring that the carnage of Tory domestic policies doesn't get lost under the radar - whilst everyone is blinded by the chaos that is #Brexit ?Keir Starmer is the Party Spokesperson on #Brexit.  
The #Tories are literally killing its own citizens with their unnecessary savage cuts... kids going hungry, working families using food banks. #Brexit is not at the top of their list. You need to start attacking the evil  #Tories and get your priorities right. #Idiot 
I wrote this - about how there will be a BIG problem with the NI border with Brexit - in JULY 2016!Why is this supposedly such a surprise problem TWO F**KING YEARS LATER?#IncompetentGovernment 
New interview: Benedict Cumberbatch On Journey Of ‘Patrick Melrose,’ More ‘Sherlock,’ Brexit, ‘Dr. Strange’ & Pay Equity Transparency – Deadline  
The Brexit illusion in one sentence. "Barnier is determined to keep on salami-slicing the UK position until  this country is left with almost none of the benefits of Brexit."If Brexit were a viable project, it would not matter what Barnier did.  
The UK was allocated 15% (€4bn) of all agreed funds under Horizon 2020. This funding was vital for research on some of the biggest issues of our time, including healthcare and climate change. It is clearer by the day that Brexit will not play out as the Leave campaign promised. 
Striking how many of these Brexit campaigners choose to disrespect Westminster - the very parliament they wished to “take back control.”  
I  never promised Brexit would be a huge success @Nigel_Farage has said & it might cost the country in the short term. But when I asked him why he’d said it he seemed keen to blame someone else - it is, he says, Theresa May’s fault ⁦@BBCr4today⁩ 
BREXITERS 2016:"There is NO chance Brexit could lead to the break-up of the UK. Project Fear!"BREXITERS 2017:"The EU needs the UK - it will come running to us cap in hand."BREXITERS 2018:"Help! The EU is breaking us up!"#BrexiterLogic 
Anti-Brexit group backed by billionaire insider George Soros lines up 40 MPs for its campaign to keep Britain in the EU:  
IMO Corbyn is respecting the democratic process and doing the best he can, without the necessary numbers in parliament, to ameliorate the damage being wreaked as a result of the ToryKip #BrexitShambles. No such referendum would be held, let alone be won, that's why it's different 
Hayley is absolutely right. Brexit could result in fewer trees ... if Liam Fox gets his way.Read how the government plans to spurn its environmental responsibilities here: #LoveIsland 
It's time for MPs to do their democratic duty and back Brexit - The Telegraph  
DELAY: Brexit trade proposals won't be revealed until after EU summit.Tick tock, Theresa. It would be nice to have a PM with a bit of vision and a belief in Brexit. 
That moment when you realise it'll be the younger generation paying for Brexit and not you because you're a middle aged gammon.  
An exuberant David Davis told me and @georgeeaton just after the vote for Brexit that as we left the EU there would be a “cascade” of free trade agreements on what he called “Independence Day”.  What a huckster!  
"The people made a decision -- that decision has to be implemented."@BrunoBrussels defends the vote in Brexit and the Battle for Democracy, a spiked film] 
[Laughs in Brexit]  
This is the @HouseofCommons Paper on Brexit & Financial Services & it's damning. "There is little certainty over what will happen next and a gulf between what the industry wanted at the start of the process and what it looks as though it will achieve now."  
Theresa May to hold Brexit peace summit for feuding cabinet NOT *ANOTHER* ONE !!!THERESA - THEY'RE *PLAYING* YOU !! - THEY JUST WANT ANOTHER JOLLY AT CHEQUERS ! 
The problem with the Brexit “negotiations” is that we have very little to offer. Even the term negotiation is a misnomer. The EU can exist happily without us. We however are economically dependent on a good deal. We’re the jumped up corner shop demanding special terms from Tesco 
UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson appeared to suggest Donald Trump would handle Brexit negotiations better than Prime Minister Theresa May, according to leaked audio obtained and published by BuzzFeed News  
May says she can't sack Boris because he has "strong views on Brexit".  She's right. Leaked recording shows he thinks a "Brexit meltdown" is coming. He knows he is untouchable and May is too weak to do anything. He will continue to undermine at every turn! Shambles!! 
Having some fool shouting "why don't we just leave!" week after week to rapturous applause on @bbcquestiontime might be good telly for some but doesn't actually help the country or help inform people on #Brexit, it just keeps the UK population in ignorance 
I realise a week is a long time in politics but only three days ago Corbyn stood up & nailed May to a wall over Brexit at PMQs.  
'It's a Brexit Bermuda triangle!' Andrew Neil launches HUGE rant at May over Brexit delay   
BBC News - Arron Banks refuses to appear before Commons committee . BBC starts article by outlining Arron Banks concerns that MP’s are taking part in a witch hunt. Should be highlighting how Referendum was compromised by this man. BBC Bias.Stop Brexit #FBPE 
LISTEN | "There are 17.4m of us crying out for proper, strong leadership" @Nigel_Farage speaks out on the dangers of letting Theresa the Appeaser get away with her plot to impose a fake Brexit on Britain. Support us at  
Perfectly nice Brexit spoiled by a French orchestra conducted by a Scotsman feat. singers & players from England, Ireland, France, Germany & Spain - amongst others...    
Leave voters are rightfully angry at you. You are there to represent your constituents, and you stood on a manifesto that promised to respect the referendum result and take us out of the EU, including SM and CU. Eddisbury voted Leave. You should be deselected @Conservatives 
Bias or populism at @BBCNews? Massive crisis in #Brexit, lack of planning laid bareSo a Johnson tape is "leaked" saying "Trump would do better"BBC then get on Farage, a Trump supporter, to agreeStory becomes "Gov is weak" rather than "Brexit is a mess" 
He's never been a leader of anything and he left the Labour Party. His only notable intervention in Brexit has been a speech in a rice warehouse followed by what was clearly a paid promotional tweet about rice pudding. Why there's any faith in David Miliband is really beyond me. 
One day arseholes like Campbell will stand up and admit the pivotal role New Labour's strategy of triangulation and pandering, coupled with neglect of their own heartlands - 'they have nowhere else to go' - played in bringing Brexit about. Until then their words are worthless.  
Is that why you reported a pensioner to the police, for asking you to represent your constituency on Brexit?  
In her pursuit of a hard Brexit, Theresa May is willing to throw out.... food standards, environmental laws, the devolution settlement, workers rights, cheap NHS medicine, frictionless trade, human and citizens rights, the economy, the Good Friday Agreement, car manufacturing.... 
Ron does a runner (again): it’s always someone else’s fault for Brexit champions, isn’t it ?  
Parliament approved an ADVISORY referendum with no checks or balances, NO PLAN for a leave win. The vote had NO legal effect and Parliament has not voted to leave.UK is a parliamentary system so the democratic part happens in GEs and MPs vote for You.  
If you truly think that Brexit is the biggest issue I suggest you go to some of the poorest areas in the UK and ask people who have been pissed on from a great height by the likes of @campbellclaret , Blair and neoliberalism in general. Lucky you if it's *your* biggest issue. 
An unprecedented political crisis and the most important Parliamentary Vote in decades but the BBC's home page puts Brexit at Number 3 spot in the sidebar. Sky is trouncing the spineless BBC.  
Some high level evaluation on Brexit. Essential for Paper 2.   
Not only has May undermined Brexit but she is also destroying the Special Relationship with the USA.  
The reluctance of prominent members of Leave organisations to appear before Commons committees undermines the legitimacy of the referendum outcome 
Remember that both Labour and Conservative MPs were elected on a promise to deliver #Brexit.  MPs must, in obedience to their manifestos and the referendum result, strike down any attempt to thwart Brexit.  
John @johnredwood it wouldn’t matter if I sang Jerusalem every morning to the postman in my Union Jack mankini. Brexit is what it is. An impossible to deliver mess. The term project fear is only used by people who don’t like facts. Please stop lying to our country. Thank you  
May is hapless, an instinctive Remainer and an enemy of Brexit. I couldn’t care less what she publishes  
And the person who will ensure that Britain suffers economic and social catastrophe is Jeremy Corbyn. His continued support of right wing Tory Brexit is the greatest betrayal of the British people in British political history.  
LISTEN | Brexit hero @Nigel_Farage explains how Theresa May's gutless negotiating style is hurting Britain, and what she can learn from a patriotic leader like @realDonaldTrump. Time for her to read The Art of the Deal! Support us at  
The DUP seem wedded to idea that EU are attempting to “annex” the north - but what have #BREXIT #RHI #ToryAusterity #MarriageEquality #AchtAnois got to do with Barnier & Verhofstadt? 
"Investment in our schools should never be seen as a burden on the taxpayer. Without the skills for the economy of tomorrow, how will the UK survive and prosper in a post-Brexit economy?”  
Most extraordinary thing about Foreign Sec’s “leaked” comments is not the nonsense about Trump.It’s the fact he acknowledges the pain Brexit will cause. “Coming Brexit Meltdown”.A generation’s prospects - in their 20s, 30s, 40s - set aside for some unspecified future gain. 
Advance orders now being taken:United Kingdom -My Part In It's DownfallOr'How I manipulated the will of the British people to fill my own pockets' Hard, err Soft err whatever back ByMayCorbynJohnsonFoxDavisForeword byFarageLastword byA ParnallNo #Brexit 
What does this noisy gaggle of third rate, ‘we know better’ Westminster-bubble Remainers think will be the reaction up and down the country if it manages to use Parliamentary trickery to overturn the referendum result? Perhaps they think they’ll be heroes?  
The metropolitan political commentators still don't understand the provincial voter on Brexit.Since the referendum Brexit is not seen as a party political issue.The electorate know both sides want to sabotage it.The voters are more astute than you think  
Grexit and Brexit negotiations teach us one lesson.You do not negotiate with the EU.You get rid of domestic traitors, consolidate your power, and get out, as long as you have adequate international support. Not one word needs to be wasted on European summits. 
#Brexit 10 are going on holiday, 5 picked the hotel but now it turns out it's only half built, the beach is next to a sewer pipe and the price is 75% higherAbout 7 of the 10 people know it'll be the worst holiday ever but are going anyway because they've paid the deposit 
Labour on the road to nowhere...EU double agent @jeremycorbyn continues his hard Brexit tango hand in hand with Theresa May...a decent leader with an effective frontbench based on merit we would be 15 points clear providing a proper opposition to this shambolic Tory government  
Observe the last Brexiter clinging to the lie that Brexit will make us better off. Farage, Johnson, Hannan and the rest are in full "it's going to be bad but it isn't our fault" mode. You can only get honesty from this man by dressing up as an investment portfolio.  
Ex-Remainer Richard Madeley says it’s time for us all to back Brexit  
In last 24 hours @jeremycorbyn has tweeted on fire brigade, LGBT, Lewisham by election, safe standing, railways, Trump tariffs, anniversary of lost general election, Orgreave miners ... Brexit? Not a peep. Total abdication of leadership on biggest issue of all. 
He’s deflecting. Brexit is breaking up the United Kingdom.  
'Paralysed by Brexit, May is leading us into a zombie apocalypse' | @BrianReade 
With the Government incapable of agreeing its #Brexit policy in time for this month’s crucial EU summit, our sovereign Parliament must take back control of #brexitshambles in the vital votes next week. 
“If you look at the process of these negotiations – nobody ever said it was going to be easy”Untruthful Theresa May 8 June 2018The Disgraced Liam Fox is but one exampleA Tory #Brexit?   A Titanic Disaster..  
Anybody who thinks Trump should be in charge of the #Brexit negotiations should read this devastating report of the chaos in the White House on Trade and China  policy  #Boris  via @financialtimes 
Boris argues that the Irish border doesn't really matter to big business, and discounts what it means to ordinary people. His argument during the referendum was to discount what mattered to big business, and listen to ordinary people.  
Why was Farage on @BBCr4today as ex ex leader of a party at 2% in the polls that just lost almost all its council seats, when most pressing question John Humphrys had to ask was how Trump would handle Brexit?I’m available to give my views on how Ghandi would manage Arsenal 
Suffering from Brexit anxiety? You could get free counselling  
This is madness and unnecessary. #Brexit can and must be stopped. If you’re business will be damaged you must say so loud and clear to your MP NOW! The Brexit myth of no-strings frictionless trade  
‘Scotland has had these years around the independence referendum of reimagining itself and thinking about its future’Try to catch this great wee exhibition by migrants who’ve made Scotland home if you’re in Glasgow this weekend @AmparoFortuny @DrAlakbarov 
John Humphrys should join Paul Dacre in the bygone era if he thinks the question of the hour is to ask Mr Farage what Trump would do in charge of Brexit @BBCr4today 
Nigel Farage on the idea of Donald Trump running Brexit: Trump "walks away from things - he quite enjoys it". But Theresa May won't walk away under any circumstance, Farage tells #r4today 
Jeremy Corbyn has led a Party an overwhelming majority of whose MPs, members, voters and constituents' interests vigorously oppose Brexit to a point where it has done *nothing* practical to stop us crashing out: "Article 50 has to be invoked now". ENDS 
At last election most of the 17.4m who voted for #Brexit voted Tory or Lab cos both parties promised to take us out of EUIt is now clear the Tories & Lab lied to us.At the next election they will vote for a party like @ForBritainParty who will #BrexitNow & will keep their word. 
Did I really hear John Humphrys ask Mr Farage what Trump would do if he was running Brexit? 
A brilliant 20 min summary of #brexit #border issues explained by those in the border region itself - inc. farming, small business, manufacturing, commerce, & young people.In the Balance - Brexit, Business and the Border. From Newry! @bbcworldservice 
Theresa May's 'Conservative In Name Only' government is not conservative - they are selling us out on Brexit, and undermining families and free speech.@UKIP is true 'small c conservative' - for the nation, the family and free speech. 
This is enough Tory rebels to defeat the government’s hard Brexit and keep us in the single marketCan I ask you, @ThangamMP , as an opposition whip, to assure me that you will not be asking your @UKLabour colleagues to abstain on this amendment? 
This is such a sad state of affairs, Please take heart and keep battling. You and the millions others have a voice to shout out loud Brexit is madness, it can and must be stopped. @peoplesvote_uk 
Is #r4today really facilitating a hypothetical conversation on how Donald Trump would negotiate Brexit? With renounced social commentator, Nigel Farage? Now might be the moment to cease calling yourselves a 'flagship news programme'. 
Personally I find professional media commentators giving it the "I didn't think we did this kind of thing until brexit" *particularly* enraging. It was, quite literally, your job to know that we were doing this kind of thing. Nobody hid Yarls Wood from you.  
“Time for ambition and hope over despair of Brexit”: ⁦@NicolaSturgeon⁩ to tell @theSNP conference later today  #SNP18 
John Humphrys patronisingly admits that the @BBC has failed in its duty to inform the public on Brexit. Maybe @BBCr4today listeners are too stupid to understand the complexity? 
May to hold away day in July to thrash out what the UK wants from #BrexitFFS it's 2 years since the vote and less than one year till the UK leaves.How can anyone say they knew what they voted for? if the govt doesn't know yet? 
NO DEAL BREXIT looks exactly like the Brexit I voted for in the first place. I am struggling to see a downside. READ:  
'Paralysed by Brexit, May is leading us into a zombie apocalypse'. - Excellent from @BrianReade  
Brexit is a disaster. Whatever happens long short medium term the damage is there,if it happens it will be permanent.Someone will be held to account for this. That is a Brexity FACTThis is whyHannan, Farage, Banks, Wigmore, Cummings et al are on the run.MPs next?#PeoplesVote 
Brexit: Please tell me what May has achieved? She has asked the EU if we can stay inside EU structures for another 18 months, agreed to pay them tens of billions and made a few (limited) concessions on EU citizen rights. 99% still to do, the clock is ticking. 
Up to now Brexiteer Tory MPs like Peter Bone have accepted the dither and delay so long as #Brexit was delivered at the end of the day.They have now realised that the PM has betrayed them.It is now only a matter of time before the PM is removed because of her deceit on Brexit.  
Sanders-Inspired Activists Push Referendum for Universal Health Care in Washington State  via @truthoutWe need support from within WA & outside of WA. If you believe in #UniversalHealthcare, RT, donate, send good vibes. #Yeson1600 
Fewer NI people feel British than other UK regions - survey: Brexit has changed how many of us feel. We don’t want to be associated with the inward looking chauvinism of UKIP inspired Britishness.  
November 6 is not a referendum of the left or right.  It is so much more than deciding between red and blue. It is deciding who we are as a country,  and who we want to be.  I will chose hope.I will chose tolerance. I will chose equality.I will chose love.  
Brexit trade proposals will not be published until after EU summit: A hopeless government which can’t even negotiate with itself let alone with the EU. Time to think again.  
Pharma industry leaders are calling for a deal to sort out how medicines will be transported between the UK and Europe after Brexit — as fears grow over shortages  
"Sky News has learned that British consumers may lose the right to capped international phone bills across the EU after Brexit."#Brexitshambles#StopBrexit 
DUP should look very carefully at this poll and see the dangers to Unionism if they persist with their uncompromising hard Brexit approach.  
Benedict Cumberbatch On Journey Of ‘Patrick Melrose,’ More ‘Sherlock,’ Brexit, ‘Dr. Strange’ & Pay Equity Transparency  
Brexit problems in a Tweet:Leavers are unable to distinguish between a real plan and sentimental dreaming. Or won't plan because it will wake them up. The EU has basically stood by whilst Leavers knock themselves out by banging their heads into a wall they insist doesn't exist 
Debunking myths:1. Electoral reform is a non-partisan issue 2. The Ontario NDP had a surprisingly democratic way of achieving electoral reform in their platform3. An electoral reform referendum is about to happen in BC and the left party (The NDP) is actually in power  
No, @BBCNews. It’s not just a “another referendum” on Brexit.It’s the first vote on the real facts and the real choice - between May’s Brexit deal and an #OptionToRemain in the EU.Run a fair campaign, with fair coverage - and let a #PeoplesVote decide, with a #FinalSayForAll. 
Brexit: More MPs back new referendum on the Brexit deal.Now 40 MPs sign up to #Remain campaign group @bestforbritain’s plan for a vote.MPs should call a #PeoplesVote on May’s Brexit deal, with an #OptionToRemain. 
Crimea reunited w Russia in a referendum AFTER West openly backed & helped orchestrate a violent Putsch w a Banderite vanguard overthrow the dem elected Ukr govt & then wage a bloody war of subjugation on east Ukr that has killed 10k+. Why would Russia WANT to associate w G7?!  
More support for a #PeoplesVote on May’s Brexit deal. Let’s compare what she negotiates with an #OptionToRemain in the EU.Once we have all the facts, we need an option to #StopBrexit. 
There is something very wrong about which the people know nothing. May is now so outrageously out of step with commonsense and making a pigs ear of brexit yet the tories are doing nothing. She is destroying the party and they are letting her. Why do they all want their P45's ? 
Your stupid Brexit is breaking up the United Kingdom you fool.  
On this, our divided country is unified... Brexit is a shambles.  
Look at that. The Northern Irish feel more European than British.Also in these polls, 28% said they used to support NI in UK... but Brexit now makes them prefer NI in a united Ireland.Brexit is causing big political shifts in Northern Ireland. Read:  
Nix's keeps it up until the end, there's no link between SCL and AIQ, he has no option, but @DamianCollins throws a hand grenade into the room by telling Nix they're looking at further evidence from @VickerySec 13/14 
'More questions than answers' in UK Brexit offer - Barnier  
My job is campaigning against #Brexit.I pay VAT to the Inland Venue on all costs.I have worked as: waitress, barmaid, cook, cleaner, tour guide/activity leader, au-pair & project led arts projects funded by O2Anything else people need to know about my employment status?  
There will be no sweeter irony than the DUP and Arlene Foster messing up so badly with #Brexit that they helped move us towards a united Ireland quicker than anyone could have expected.  
U.K exports to the EU 27 ... first port of call France / Belgium / NL -their countries will have to process every single export before it reaches its destination - will they want to collect vat and duties for another country ? .I sense a meltdown and they didn’t even want brexit 
Brexit: crisis means crisis - if Brexit means Brexit, crisis mean crisis. This is a territory none of us want to visit. We have but weeks now before we slide inexorably into that crisis, passing the point of no return...  #Brexinfo. 
I agree, Nick. However there’s nothing that reflects the interests of the country in:1) allowing Brussels to control UK trade policy, without any say2) no say whatsoever in EU rules and regsThat wouldn’t be Brexit at all, and you all know that.  
Well its looking more and more like Gibraltar , Scotland and Northern Ireland is a price worth paying for tax avoidance brexit and Wales will now be called the New West Midlands English Water company - which is nice. 
Oh.Power to the British Parliament post Brexit. So said the Leave people.But not over Leave people who may have done dodgy things. Oh no.  
These figures are really quite astounding! Only 10% if all Brits think #brexit is going well and 73% thinks it’s going badly. #brexit is far more complicated than most politicians had anyone believe & its maybe not the “easiest deal in history”.Fed up with it? Be #remainernow 
Fury as Soros-backed group launch bid for second Brexit vote  
A Pensioner emailed #ToryRebel @Sandbach to express her anger & disappointment in the #Remainer Conservative MP for being disloyal to the government over #Brexit votes. Sandbach then REPORTED HER TO THE POLICE for being “abusive” & blocked her emails.  
Britain since the EU referendum....  
'Brexit is the END of political order' MEP attacks struggling EU   
Pensioner sends email criticising MP for trying to frustrate Brexit.MP passes email to police. Britain 2018.  
9 hours and not one retweet (save this one)Mundell is an insignificant nobodyHe hasn't a scooby about fishing or fish processingOr BrexitOr Scotland's mood towards his Tory paymastersOr its mood towards him  
Neck and neck isn't languishing in the polls. But if you want to ensure we are languishing, get Corbyn to follow the #FBPE brigade's stance on Brexit.  
’They make Brexit IMPOSSIBLE!’ Peter Bone MP DEMANDS May fires ALL Remainer staff  
The @LibDems deserve your support in the #LewishamEast by election.If you oppose #Brexit & are sick of the far left takeover of the Labour Party & right wing Conservatives leading on plans to leave the EU then give them a shock. Vote for @lucyvsalek 
You, Nigel Farage, are the one breaking up the United Kingdom with your fascist attempt to whip up the crudest and most intolerant form of English nationalism. But don't worry, we crushed your sort in 1945 and we will do so again this time.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
All the smart, middle class, educated Russians hate Putin and all the smart, middle class, educated Turks hate Erdogan. Remind you of anything? #Brexit 
Everyone's patience is running out. Coasting along making endless concessions doesn't look much like delivering BREXIT.  
Love Island contestants discuss Brexit  
The Brexit "negotiatons" are a masquerade.There's not really anything to negotiate. The UK has three choices: leave on terms dictated by the EU; leave with no agreement; don't leave.That's not negotiation. May forfeited that the day she issued her red lines. 
You've evaded our question 4 times and now you've gone to bed. Just say it, Brexit makes Stoke on Trent poorer. Be honest with your constituents.You know that Brexit means less. The average family is £900 worse off already. Any Brexit makes that worse. Would you agree? 
If, after all the evidence has been presented, you still support #Brexit then, unless you are rich & will get richer from Brexit, you are one or more of the following. Take your pick: Gullible, Xenophobe, Racist, Fascist, Bot, Troll, Dorries, Harpy-Sewer. That is all. 
Many congratulations to Sir @bernardjenkin - really well deserved. Lot of fine public service including during Referendum. 
Absolutely right. And the single worst thing that could happen to the working class is for @UKLabour to stand by and let #Brexit happen. Brexit will hurt most those who have least.  
Hands up if you think Theresa's living on borrowed time? #G7 #BrexitMeltdown #Brexit #G7Canada #G7Summit 
on everything other than brexit, the guardian calls for "nuance" and implies the real genius of politics lies in balancing the needs of two opposing sides.when it comes to austerity and inequality, they fucking celebrate timidity pic.twitter.com/5T74GCPs5V 
Multi-million-pound campaign for second Brexit referendum says dozens of MPs have signed up  
We are ready. We've been ready since 19 September 2014. How more ready should we be? But all we're getting is more talk of delay. August puts the Brexit rope around our necks. The time is now!  
#LoveIsland has eloquently discussed the key consequences of Brexit:Food SecurityThe exchange rateLoss of Free Movement for British citizensLoss of TradeLack of funding for welfare(Video credit: @gullyburrows) 
Big Weekend PollHas your view changed since EU referendum Please vote and retweet 
Theresa May is planning another Brexit away day at Chequers. Last time she had one of those I went too. ICYMI, here's the thread (sorry for the bad language, but I was pissed off. Sorry for saying pissed off. Oh, sorry again). Anyway, the thread ...  
This really wouldn't surprise me!! There is a definite shift in the air  People are starting to realise the Brexit will be catastrophic.  
"Barnier is done with British whining". Typical for Brexit coverage in European newspapers these days.  
Open goal, open goal with UK gov position on Brexit and where is the opposition, where is the opposition? Jeremy Corbyn now beyond a liability to the people of the UK and certainly Scotland in light of this utterly incompetent and self serving government 
And if you believe in Brexit, you surely must see a way for it to improve ordinary people’s lives? Because if it doesn’t, what the hell is the point?There’s no way No Deal Brexit improves lives. So advocating it means you’re an evil, self serving, conniving  
Theresa May repeatedly says with certainty, " I'm going to deliver on Brexit, because that's what people want. "IF THAT WERE TRUE, that would be one thing.. Referendum was ONLY advisory in the first place,NOW that facts are known ..PEOPLE DO NOT WANT BREXIT .. She just lies ! 
If you advocate no deal #Brexit you’re ready to cause real pain to real people’s lives, just because you’re so ideologically driven and so ill prepared for Brexit that you can’t get a deal.It’s irresponsible in the extreme. 
Prime Minister Theresa May says she will hold Brexit talks with ministers at her country residence after the EU summit in June 
If you’re so sodding thick to think that walking away from  (no deal Brexit) is a good idea, I can do nothing for you.It’s absolute madness. It hurts  massively more than it hurts . It leaves  economically diminished & in eyes of the world looking foolish. 
Theresa May to hold 'away day' at Chequers in bid for Brexit cabinet consensus  
For Britain asks a question to @lucyvsalek @LibDems supporter -  how are the Lib Dems DEMOCRATS if they opposite the Brexit ref result? It's liberal fascism! Vote against career politicians. No more lies. Just honesty. Vote @AMDWaters FOR BRITAIN. #LewishamEastByElection 
So Eyal likes deep and meaningful chats... but picks the girl who;A) can't pronounce his name properly and, B) thinks Brexit means our trees get cut down!? #LoveIsand 
Not only Brexit Piers! If we didn’t have America as only no.1 Allies, we’d be invaded and overrun as were not taken seriously due to our politicians and pretty much a laughing stock... FACT! I fear everyday for the future of our country and our children! 
And they say we should have a second referendum as to many old folk voted leave... 
If Theresa May sacked Boris Johnson she knows that would lead to her being booted out and a Tory leader selection battle.That’s why Boris knows she will never sack himBut that’s no good for Brexit.May has to be forced out and a Brexiteer to become newPM.Time to move her out. 
Until your Jew-baiting, IRA-supporting, Brexit-expediting project has fucked off and left us alone, Abi.  
I've just seen a clip of Love Island contestants discussing Brexit, I won't divulge the depth of insight on display but to be fair, they're as clueless as most Brexiters, but funnier.#FBPE #LoveIsland 
#Brexit is upon us. The trees have all gone. Birds are nesting in the gutter, dogs are pissing against other dogs, the autumn section of the Next Directory is shot in a car park, coffee tables are made of meat. #HayleysBrexit #loveIsland 
Hey, @Theresa_May, you still need a good wingman for #Brexit? Give our girl Hayley a shout.#LoveIsland @LoveIsland #SaveTheTrees 
Look at all these post-brexit trade partners we have.  
Hayley volunteering with the Brexit Tree cutting #LoveIsland 
This excellent piece from @MarinaHyde is so apt I’m still trying to decide whether I should be laughing or crying.One day historians will look back and wonder how the UK managed to put this shower in charge of #Brexit. 
Getting ready for Brexit #LoveIsland⁠ ⁠ 
Brexit in the eyes of Hayley #loveisland 
Rip to all the trees being lost to Brexit next year #LoveIsland 
Your wcw thinks Brexit will mean less trees #loveisland 
“what do you think about brexit?” “what’s that?” “it’s us leaving the EU. we won’t be part of europe anymore” “does that mean we won’t have any trees?” Hayley is clearly the brains of the group #LoveIsland 
New Brexit Secretary #loveisland 
this bird never hearing of brexit sums up what kind of people go on love island 
“What’s Brexit?” Lord give me strength #LoveIsIand 
“definition of brexit means we get no trees?”  
Labour's position is worth a mention - it will harm the poorest in this country the most. The article summed it up perfectly "Instead, Labour whips will split the soft Brexit vote, letting Mrs May off the hook." You are helping the Govt deliver a hard brexit. Shame on you. 
Haylee thinking Brexit will leave us with no trees #LoveIsland 
Is she joking ‘ does brexit mean we won’t have any tree’s?’ Like WTF... I actually can’t believe the stupidity  #loveisland 
Hayley: “Does Brexit mean they’re gonna cut down all the trees?” #LoveIsland 
Did Hayley just ask “what’s that?” when she was asked about brexit...this girl needs to leave, she’s a full time dickhead #loveisland 
Wake up political Twitter, Hayley hasn't heard *anything* about Brexit#LoveIsland 
Brexit!!! So does,that mean we won”t have any cheese!  Hayley says..... 
Watching Hayley try to understand Brexit has just ruined my evening #loveisland 
What do you think of Brexit?Hayley: I don’t know what this isHayley: does that mean they’ll cut down treesMe: #loveisland 
Hayley said because of Brexit, we won’t have trees? God give me strength #loveisland 
Omg Hayley is not serious "what's Brexit" I can't #LoveIsland 
Shock Hayley doesn’t know what Brexit is  “so what we don’t have any trees???” 
I am SO JEALOUS that Hayley has somehow managed to avoid the entire concept of Brexit. #loveisland 
‘Imagine #Trump Doing #Brexit’: UK Foreign Minister Praises President, Warns of Brexit Betrayal. @POTUS could teach PM May how to do her job if only she would put Britain First like he puts #AmericaFirst 
Petition: If no agreement on the Ireland Border can be reached, Brexit must be abandoned.  
Brexit causes surge in support for united Ireland, poll finds  
ANDREW ADONIS: Theresa May is facing her High Noon  -  'Brexit is a power grab by neo-Thatcherites, led by Thatcher worshippers Farage, Lawson and Rees-Mogg, whose essential objective is ‘Thatcherism in one country’. 
After a few days in Brussels, most struck by how little the EU27 care about Brexit atm. More so than in run-up to December/March Council. Trump tariffs, Iran deal, asylum, budget more pressing. UK complains EU won't engage, EU complains UK has no position, nothing much happens. 
I’m firmly in favour Brexit now.  
British voters won’t forgive politicians for their betrayal of Brexit:  
Great meeting of ⁦@euinbrum⁩ this evening - Birmingham against Brexit!  
I hope this sober 'morning after' reminds BC of the point of #proportionalrepresentation - which we'll be voting on in a referendum in the fall. Lobbyists for major corporate elites & co hate #PropRep for a reason. They're not for the little guy, & nor is Doug Ford #pr4bc #bcpoli 
Remainers: The EU is absolutely not an Empire.Michel Barnier: Give us Northern Ireland. #Brexit  
⁦@Theresa_may⁩ ⁦@10DowningStreet⁩ visit to #G7Summit dominated by questions about recorded comments by Foreign Secretary about how Trump would be better at Brexit than her, calling Euro allies “the enemy” & more watch on ⁦@itvnews⁩ ⁦@NewsAtTen⁩ 
.@Tom_Slater_ on why the people must take back control of #Brexit, from this week's spiked newsletter.  
My passport expires in May 2028, so I know at least for my existence, I will always feel like I am a citizen of both Britain and Europe. But reality says we all must fight for the best deal possible and hope we can reform both the EU and Britain over time. #Brexit  
I love democracy. If 52% of the country wants more sovereignty, a better NHS, and a better standard of living, I will fight till my last breath to get them that.If the politicians they trust tell them Brexit will achieve that, but it has the exact opposite effect, I'll fix that.  
Just think how confusing Brexit would be if we hadn’t got Twitter to help us through.  
One benefit of a no-deal #Brexit catastrophe would be such a tide of public anger that we could prosecute and jail all the charlatans, liars and con-artists who had inflicted this disaster on the country.   But it still wouldn't be worth it!#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
PM distracted by G7  as CBI, IOD, BCC all say govt handling of #Brexit damaging for business. Still no answers on SM, CU, NI. MPs must park self-interest & have courage to act next week #peopleschoice #FBPE 
People don't have low wages because of Brexit.People aren't in low security jobs because of Brexit.They aren't using foodbanks because of Brexit.People are in a mess because of the Tory party. When will people point their focus at Tories? They arw literally killing us!  
We should judge people’s words on how truthful they are and how well aligned they are with reality. By that standard the entire Brexit debacle is immediately exposed as based in untruth and irrelevance. #FBPE 
so yet again a plan is shown the door by the EU but we knew that didnt we because brexit is shit  - we know iys shit,  the eu knows its shit the UKgov knows its shit even the great british public knows its shit they just wont admit it 
Piranhas have the slight look of a Brexit-supporting member of the House of Lords who now lives in Monaco...  
UK Foreign Minister Boris Johnson suggests Trump handle Brexit talks: 'He'd go in bloody hard' via @AdamShawNY 
Brexit memes Brexit. 
For two years I have been accused of scaremongering when noting that EU citizens are already right in the middle of the #HostileEnvironment. The settled status application process will make this even worse. How many more lives are to be sacrificed on the Brexit altar @sajidjavid? 
Amended Headline; The Guardian view on Labour and Brexit: too timid, too tactical, but would be political genius if it came from David Milliband. Lol. | Editorial  
Do you trust how the government is handling #Brexit? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
UK: 45% of voters in Scotland and 48% of voters in Northern Ireland support breakaway from England two years after the Brexit vote (Lucid Talk and YouGov poll). #IndyRef #Brexit 
Sensational YouGov poll suggests SNP would make sweeping gains in a snap general election, with support for an independence referendum also increasing  by @JamesKelly 
Nicola Sturgeon owns this CH4 journo who is clearly not interested in what Nicola has to say....Next time try sending him to May&let him demand domestic&Brexit figures from her in this ridiculous manner. Nicola responded with class and with truth. #CH4 #owned #Scotref #VoteYes 
COWARD: Arron Banks refuses to appear before Commons committee /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
.@Nigel_Farage: For once I agree with Boris – Donald Trump would do a much better job of Brexit  
This appears to be wrong on two counts.1) There are no benefits of Brexit2) Corbyn is a BrexiteerOther than that @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, you’re quite correct. 
Great evening with @SocDems marking the historic result of the referendum, the potential for change in the future and their new strong women candidates.  
Please help sell out the coach taking folks from Bude, Bideford and Barnstaple to the Anti Brexit March 23 June tickets  @TWDLibDems @NDLibDems @chalmersdavidn @LibDems @LibDemEurope 
Gross exaggeration. Of course, better to have no new friction anywhere, but if soft Brexit UK-wide rejected, need to have mature discussion on special deal & how east-west interface can be managed. Existing precedents to build on. Doing things differently hallmark of devolution.  
UBI, now supported by billionaire elites, will be paid out in central bank digital currency, once cash & banks have been abolished (Swiss referendum in 2 days!) & only in exchange for getting microchipped (that's how the central bank money will work). See  
Are you a brexity MP?• Trapped by Will of the People?• Scared of losing face?• Aware that Brexit is over?• Searching for a get out clause?• Looking for an escape route?Look no further! The kind people at #StopBrexit have provided you with: #PeoplesVote  
Sadly, nothing that shows the Shadow Front Bench or the Shadow Brexit Team in a good light ever makes its way to the mainstream media, it seems.  Corbyn is a threat to them. They are more interested in following Mandelson's Pied Piper tune.  
We want Brexit stopped, not modified. I has failed. It is dangerous. More than half the country are embarassed by it. Fight it as a national enemy, then fix the EU from the inside. 
Reminder: 'patriot' John Redwood advised investors to withdraw money from the UK economy. All the better to make profits out of an economic crash caused by the no-deal #Brexit Redwood advocates. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
It’s clear @BorisJohnson is right and that @realDonaldTrump would do a much better job of Brexit than @theresa_may.  
SPEAKER ANNOUNCEMENT!! We're delighted that Simon Allison from Tories Against Brexit @ToriesVsBrexit will be speaking at the special @No10Vigil/#StopBrexit rally in Whitehall on Monday! Night march follows! Info:  
Staggering really Brexit has achieved what the Irish nationalists haven’t managed  
Forget the G7. The world's seven largest economies (GDP PPP) are now China, US, India, Japan, Germany, Russia and Indonesia. Only one of them is in the EU.  #Brexit 
Don’t call it Brexit if it’s NOT Brexit!  
After #Brexit is cancelled, the magic money tree will have to be shaken one last time to fund a full public enquiry, and possibly to build new prisons to house the various Leave EU team fanatics, MEPs from a certain fascist party and others.#StopBrexitSaveBritain #FinalSay 
A Brexit on WTO terms would cost France billions a year and hit its cherished food and wine sectors hardest, a new report has found  
Boris Johnson, Britain’s top diplomat, suggested President Trump would do a better job negotiating Brexit than Teresa May  
Boris Johnson calls for more 'guts' in Brexit talks and suggests Donald Trump could do a better job. @toryboypierce asks: Do you trust how the government is handling Brexit, and does Johnson have a point here?  
Perhaps Barnier's trashing of our latest attempts to reason and compromise has driven ppl to hard Brexit. It certainly has done with me 
However critical I've been in my journalism, deep down I've had a naive stupid belief about Britain that we don't do this kind of thing here. Brexit's bashed that one on the head 
Tories move to 7 point lead over Labour. Never saw that coming. Maybe Voters don’t care about Brexit negotiating shambles.  
Brexit, the destiny-defining policy of the UK government, is being carried out by leaders whose hearts are not in it. Has this ever happened before, asks Charles Moore:  
(3/3) If you haven't already please write to your MP today ahead of Tuesday's debate. We don't have long to keep these children safe after Brexit. Write to them in 60 seconds --->  
(1/3) #BREAKING The Gov. has conceded to @AlfDubs amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill. They accept child refugees in Europe should still be able to reunite with their family (parents, brothers & sisters) in the UK after Brexit. (1/2)  
SCOT goes POP!Sensational YouGov poll suggests SNP would make sweeping gains in a snap general election, with support for an independence referendum also increasing 
27% of *UKIP voters* expected Brexit to go badly all along. What the hell, guys. This was your ONE THING. What were you even in it for?!  
Sky: “Boris called you a stupid old hag “PM:“ it’s true I am getting older , but will putting forward my Brexit proposals to the cabinet “Sky: “Boris said ,you weren’t fit to eat with pigs”PM : “had the chance to visit several pig farms and found them delightful creatures “ 
Mrs May is truly the most pathetic figure on the world stage and a member of the club that puts their survival before the good of their country. She hosts a cabinet of vindictive, clueless, self satisfied clowns.Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Bob Moran on Boris Johnson criticising the UK government's Brexit talks strategy, saying it lacks "guts" and suggested Donald Trump could do a better job - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
When it comes to #Brexit, as a British citizen I feel ignored. As a Labour Party member, I feel forgotten. As a voter, I feel unrepresented. I am one of millions who are being side-lined. May was not wrong when she called us 'citizens of nowhere' - we're nobodies to her. 
Your needing medical help. You Brits caused this You started Brexit Knowing full well Scotland was against it. Now you reap what you sow. 'au revoir' 'ciao' 'Fröhlichkeit' 'tioraidh'and Scotland is out of the UK #IndyRef2 
You can make more of a difference by holding your nose and voting Lib Dem if you're a Remainer. Why not send this serial Brexit abstainer a message? The only way to force a policy change is to show Labour they can't win without us.#LewishamEastByElection #LewishamEast 
Matt on moped gangs and Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Sarah Smith is again using the authority of the BBC to make the highly dubious claim that Nicola Sturgeon does not want an early referendum and is essentially in opposition to her own grass roots.  I think we're entitled to be told the source for that claim.  Put up or shut up. 
@BorisJohnson is taped saying @realDonaldTrump might do a better job leading Brexit negotiations. isnt he right? join me @lbc from 7 
Hooooooo boy. These LucidTalk numbers are pretty feckin funny.Looks like the DUP’s beloved Brexit managed to *swing* 28% towards a UIBravo  
May has just been on the news,saying she IS delivering brexit.......she must be the only one who knows that, we certainly don't . 
Whilst my attention was distracted with all the #Brexit new yesterday I missed this stonking gain for @LibDems from the Tories in South Oxfordshire.Sue Cooper recording a walloping 18.9% swing to LD from Tory.Great work by her and her team. 
Brexit: Best for Britain launches campaign for another referendum  
FAO fuckwits.Nicola and the SNP can’t call any legal independence referendum.Do you understand simple English?Maybe if we publish it in Scots you will understand.  
Keep calm – the Top Guns of Brexit have got our backs | Marina Hyde  
"I can't sack Johnson because he has strong views on Brexit" - disgrace to the office of PM and robotic to the point of invoking pity  
I don’t think anyone should be too surprised by this. It’s a perfectly reasonable reading of para 49 of the December agreement that the backstop was only for Northern Ireland @theresa_may was so desperate to get a deal she signed up to this  #Brexit #FBPE 1/2 
We are now at 168K Petition: Give the electorate a referendum on the abolition of the House of Lords  168,000 lets try to make 169K PLEASE PLEASE 
Bad Boys of Brexit reportedly bailing on their appearance before Parliament to respond to allegations of Data Protection Act violations, etc. #MississippiAnalytica 
Brexit has caused a surge in support for Northern Ireland wanting to leave the UK. You don’t deserve to sit in front of our flag in the European Parliament.  
I've come to the conclusion our politicians haven't a clue what  they're doing re Brexit.This realisation is slightly unsettling. 
Alexa, show me a woman in total denial about everything.#BorisJohnson #Brexit #BackStop 
."Blaming a lack of “guts” for the failure to deliver the extravagant promises made by Brexit campaigners might also be more palatable than explaining that some of those pledges — enthusiastically trumpeted by Mr. Johnson himself — were UNDELIVERABLE.". 
It’s easy to wax lyrical about everything that is going wrong with Brexit. But here are seven things you can do to help fight it  
Canada—mired in NAFTA negotiationsFrance—Macron is doing… fineGermany—Merkel is weaker than everItaly—just elected anti-establishment gov’t that can’t lastJapan—Abe beset by scandals; non-player on N KoreaUK—Brexit US—TrumpYeesh.#G7 #GZERO 
The Guardian view on Labour and Brexit: too timid, too tactical | Editorial  
Remember: one of the Brexit camp's main rallying cries was "Parliament taking back control". They didn't mean it.  
Speaking about Brexit & how we can stop it at 7pm in Birmingham ... no need to register, just come!  
Some of our #Brexit pieces take longer than you'd think, but people usually think they're worth it. This is one:  
People saying the EU has 'outmanoeuvred' the UK in Brexit negotiations.It's done nothing of the kind. The EU has just stood there in its corner, watching the UK beat itself up. 
GREAT BREXIT BALLS UP. EU is blackmailing us, they demand our loss of sovereignty for access to EU markets. It's not just a Faustian bargain, it's dumb. They need us more than we need them. We must be tougher. They'll throw rattles out of prams at first then return to sell to us. 
Theresa May refuses to answer question about whether @BorisJohnson is unsackable and should apologise for his comments on Brexit negotiations  
If you want free tickets to come see me interview economist & author Dambisa Moyo - on democracy, capitalism, Brexit, Trump & her provocative new book 'Edge of Chaos' - for a new series of @AJHeadtoHead at the Oxford Union next Tuesday evening, click here: 
I had a great time campaigning in Brixton for a @peoplesvote_uk, here’s what the people we met thought about a vote on the final Brexit deal!  
My bit on Boris Johnson and David Davis and all the Brexit hardmen  
The person who "lacks guts" is Bojo himself; well versed in the dark arts of the "accidental leak" but unwilling to resign and bang his hard Brexit drum in public. Having his cake, eating it, and throwing the icing at his PM. Pretty despicable stuff. 
What a disastrous state, TWO years after the #Brexit vote and with LESS than a year to go to leaving the EU, this is the best Theresa may can come up with. No plan, no vision for the end date, not a clue. Not a single one.#ToryBrexitShambles 
As stubborn as he is, Corbyn must accept he is wrong over Brexit and change course NOW. Rather than bask in a self indulgent jamboree on 16th June, he should get off his backside and fight the Tories as any decent Labour Leader would, to stop this #BrexitShambles @jeremycorbyn 
As I’ve been #BlockedByJohn he won’t see this to know that I am coming to the House of Commons on Monday. Will you join us @SODEMAction while MPs debate our #OptionToRemain petition and we have our last chance to influence them before #EUWithdrawalBill ? #Brexit #StopBrexit 
This is why we are leaving!#ThankEUGoodbye #Brexit  
Late to the papers after a delicious lunch ( I cooked it) I learn that Rothermere courtier & Dacre foe, Geordie Greig, is to be Mail editor, a bigger jolt than I predicted & a blow to Brexit’s Project Fear. No wonder Boris is panicking and trying to get sacked. 
Packed fringe meeting at #SNP18 on #Brexit & #UnionsinCrisis , presenting @cardiffuni & @EdinburghUni research , with comments from @StephenGethins & myself 
With Trump in the WH, the far-right in govt in Rome, UK chasing its own tail over Brexit, Germany still straining under the illusions of their neo-Ostpolitik, and FIFA headed to fete him during the World Cup, Putin must truly feel he's just about "avenged" the fall of the USSR.  
If not the incompetence of the Tory shambles govOr worse Labour being unable to pass themBut it's the fact that voters in England *want* this Tory xenophobic jingoistic to lead, not just for brexit but for decadesLet's grab our destiny and escape this madness Scotland! 
Peter Bone MP - "It’s not even a soft #Brexit, we are not coming out. The idea that there is a date in the document is an aspiration."The more I read the document the more depressed I got. It allows us to stay effectively in the EU indefinitely."  
If Scotland had a Labour administration, there would be no hope of independence, Brexit would be inevitable, Tory power grab would go ahead uncontested (see Wales) & the media in Scotland would be telling us how great Labour are... 
Am so pissed off with everything suddenly being the fault of brexit. No, it's the fault of the Tories and would be happening without bloody brexit. Get a grip people! 
Demand full Brexit now.  
First it's Vote Leave and now  backs out of attending the @CommonsCMS parliamentary inquiry. They are cowards running away from scrutiny. What are they trying to hide? If Brexit was won by cheating, it will be exposed.  
"People like Boris (Johnson) have strong views on Brexit, but so do I" - PM Theresa May responds to criticism from the foreign secretary over #Brexit negotiations 
The Lords have declared war on Brexit. Labour is selling it out while pretending not to. And the Tories are too weak to stand up for it against the EU’s arrogant attacks. This is serious: who is going to defend democracy in Britain?, asks @Tom_Slater_ 
#GuyNews Special Report: Remain Campaign Referendum Cheating  
One of the proudest moments of my life and one I will always remember.Everyday I wake up determined to fight for Battersea: fighting against a hard Tory Brexit and fighting for good public services, housing, and jobs  
My open letter to @Keir_Starmer urging him not to hand hard Brexit to the Tories on a plate and support the Lords EU Withdrawal Bill amendment calling for the UK to remain in the single market.  
If Brexiteers want to blame someone for the way Brexit is working out, they need to look not to Downing Street, nor Remainers, nor the EU27; but to a mirror, says @stephenkb 
Prime Minister Theresa May has told Sky News her views on Brexit are just as strong as Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson's and she is "getting on" with delivering Brexit 
The blue wave is happening. These elections are a referendum on Trump, and the results are damning.  
Michel Barnier has demolished Theresa May's Brexit customs plan and went on to say they're not going to be intimidated by us. Mr Barnier need not worry, Davis, Johnson, Fox & May are about as intimidating as a butterfly on valium. This Brexit thing gets more ludicrous by the day. 
Peter Bone MP - "What I would like to see is Theresa May fire all the SPADs and officials and civil servants that are making all the #Brexit negotiations impossible."  
The "Brexit problem" is that cancelling a treaty of enormous complexity is too difficult for people who had the wit to campaign but not plan, who had will but no forethought and who didn't expect to win. It is a Gordian knot; no Leave sword is sharp enough to cut it. 
NEW COLUMN:“Brexit means Brexit,” she said, and we were none the wiser. Better she had said “Leave means Stay,” and then at least she would have delivered on her promise.READ:  
Brexit isn’t failing because of Remainers, it’s failing because:- Brexit as promised was never deliverable- Brexiteers still can’t accept choices need to be made- Their sense of British exceptionalism means they think reality doesn’t apply to them- They’re not very good.  
I think it's well established at this point that B.C.'s PR referendum is complicated. Journalists can either repeat that ad nauseam for the next five months, or help people understand the potential changes to how they would elect MLAs in the future.I know what I'll be doing.  
Watch - The Tories have been so busy negotiating with themselves on #Brexit, they forgot they have to negotiate with the EU. They’ve been arguing over a fantasy ‘backstop’ that was never on offer from the EU.#ToryBrexitShambles 
Brexit: Best for Britain launches campaign for another referendum: - No ⁦@BBCNews⁩, a vote on the final deal. Not a rerun of the original referendum. We call it a #PeoplesVote! 
This English voice of Brexit bigotry thinks borders are other people's problems.#LeaversAreLoonies#PeoplesVote 
Boris Johnson’s leaked speech proves #Leavers are worried they won the referendum battle, but are losing the warTo say that things have not quite gone according to plan is the understatement of the century 
Brexit rendering Britain irrelevant. The new special relationship is with France .... and Canada  
It looks like the long-feared Brexit sell-out has moved a giant leap closer as David Davis’ ‘end-date’ is revealed as non-legally binding, says @TheSun 
That said, audiences for lots of the viral publications which boosted Corbyn in 2017 have since dropped substantially. Which all plays into the theory that Theresa May and Brexit could be in a different state if she'd called the election *after* the Facebook algorithm changes.  
73% of people think Brexit is going badly, including almost half of UKIP voters and the vast majority of people who had previously thought Brexit would go well.Are you with them? Join our call for a #peoplesvote here:  
UK signs £1.5billion trade deal as Brexit Britain expands on world stage  
‘Andrew Neil sounds stern warning UK has been 'outmanoeuvred' in Brexit negotiations’No one of sound mind ever thought that the UK would outmanoeuvre the EU.  
I'm not a conspiracy theorist but it does seem that the Royals either have a pregnancy or health problem each time the government falls into a new level of disaster on Brexit. 
No. The profound threat to the Union if Brexit proceeds was set out clearly before the referendum by many people including John Major and Tony Blair, who went to Derry to speak about it. You and your ilk dismissed it as Project Fear. It’s on you and the Brexiteers, nobody else  
Boris warns of Brexit 'meltdown' in secret tape...  
The Brexit vote has failed to deliver a surge in support for Scottish independence and instead has boosted the Scottish Conservatives, according to a report by Sir John Curtice  
BBC News - Brexit: Best for Britain launches campaign for another referendum . BBC run this story and a third of the article is attacking the campaigns funding. No mention of the Vote Leave scandal and funding. More BBC bias. Shameful.Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
@GiselaStuart @BBCRadio4  thats a lie.GE17 resulted in a hung parliament & £1B bribe to DUP. Ref was based on electoral fraud & maj ppl no longer want Brexit. There is no legitimate democratic mandate for Brexit.#StopBrexit 
Packed #marr on Sunday after (another) busy week in politics. Andrew is joined by former Prime Minister Gordon Brown (@OfficeGSBrown), First Minister of Scotland @NicolaSturgeon, the Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer and Cabinet Office Minister @DLidington. 9am BBC 1. 
Good numbers for the Tories, and dire for Labour. Despite Brexit?  
Brexit is so embarrassing - it’s like storming out of a room and then having to creep back in once you’ve realised you walked into a cupboard. 
We want a justice system that puts victims first, not another independence referendum.Help the campaign to stop #indyref2  
No matter how you twist & manipulate the result of the Referendum, the undeniable fact is that the Leave vote won. The deal was Leave - not leave eventually, not leave with strings attached, not leave perhaps. Mrs May & her team have made a real dogs dinner of entire process. 
Don't think he's exactly a trade expert  having heard him on @BBCNewsnight where he also said UK could simply Brexit and apply zero tariffs (ignore MFN rules) so no need for a border. Forgetting CCO, WTO, WCO rules etc Why does BBC constantly showcase such uninformed politicos? 
"Things are falling apart. #Brexit can't survive too many more weeks like this." by @IanDunt - on the money as always. Wish he would come to #Leeds some day soon! 
EU’s chief negotiator Barnier, has rejected that the whole of UK could temporarily stay in the customs union and elements of the single market to avoid a hard border on the island of Ireland after Brexit“Backstop means Backstop” 
Brexit is tanking. It's painful to watch, but even more painful is the pitiful sight of the political class struggling to understand the mess they have created for themselves and how to get out of it. Risible if it wasn't so serious. 
*Urgent Question* for @HouseofCommons given that next week there are two cases taking place which relate to the legality of Brexit, why is it that matters of constitutional significance & legislation that alter individual rights are not protected by the sub judice convention? RT 
Brexit backstop: An iceberg lies dead ahead, yet we have no plan - this is why we need a #PeoplesVote 
Translation: the EU wants to split up the UK.  Good.  Can we finally walk away now please?Original fact-based #Brexit research & news:  
From Europe’s top constitutional lawyer (who is a great Anglophile): Theresa May government thinks EU is Father Christmas.  Well worth reading the thread ......#Brexit  
Amusingly @Open_Britain - who bleat endlessly about Brexit lies - stand by this mistruth: "her offer of half-baked fudge on the so-called ‘backstop’ option has been wholly rejected by the EU. "EU: "This is not a rejection of the UK customs paper on which discussions continue." 
It seems like the UK is hurtling towards two things at the same time: a no-deal cliff-edge disaster and the implosion of Brexit. The question is, which will we reach first? 
#Brexit: Barnier questions May's 'backstop plan'.a) May's only plan is to stall long enought to impose her #BrexitShambles on an increasingly reluctant pplb) We should all question everything May's doingc) Let's just #StopBrexit & #Remain#FinalSay 
Just unbelievable. With the government in crisis over #Brexit, Corbyn and the @uklabour party are tweeting away merrily about seating arrangements at football matches and their own silly damp squib of a music festival. #PeoplesVote @Remain_Labour @Labour4EU #plp 
Earlier today @MichelBarnier set out the Commission’s initial reaction to the UKs proposal for the customs element of the Irish backstop. Very clear language on the need for much more work & much greater clarity by the June EU Council Meeting #Brexit  
Imagine what Sturgeon would have said if May gave an interview like this on Brexit planning.  
NEW @KTHopkins column: After Boris Johnson’s leaked #Brexit comments, it’s clear: “No deal may be the best deal”  | #UK #tcot 
The idea that someone who opposes #Brexit is somehow undemocratic is so feeble it really is surprising that anyone still thinks to voice it. The will of the people is now unambiguously to #Remain. #Brexit is dead and it's not coming back. 
Ha!So BoJo the clown (AKA known as UK Foreign Sec) believes that Trump would handle #Brexit better than May ?What he REALLY means is ;May should GO and let HIM handle things.(He has been compared to Trump ) 
Britain's sea ports handle an estimated £511 billion worth of goods, of which£228bn are exports. Most of the exports are sent to markets beyond the EU's declining customs union....So why is the entire #Brexit process revolving around £5.3bn of imports/exports with Ireland?   
This makes me feel sick to my stomach - a multi-millionaire saying he’d doesn’t want anyone to panic during #Brexit ‘meltdown’!?  
SHAMEFUL !Tory Arch Brexiteer BLAMES Civil Servants for chaotic #Brexit negotiations.NO Peter !It's the indeciveness, incoherence , sheer incompetence & in-fighting of the Tory Cabinet & overseen by weak PM which is to blame !! 
Yet another dire week for Brexit. Funny that - given it’s all supposed to be so bloody marvellous....or could it be as @IanDunt says that...‘the spectrum of failures on show reveals something about the brittle weakness of the project’?  
The #Brexit problem in a Tweet. Leavers have mentally left the European Union. Remainers have not. And the PM appears to be listening too much to the latter. 
There has been so much argy bargy over Brexit over the last two years that some of you may have lost track of exactly where we stand vis a vis leaving the EU and transforming into Global Britain.So, in a nutshell, here it is:We are fucked. 
Michel Barnier rejects May's UK-wide Brexit backstop plan  
Very ironic that those who spent 40 years saying that the UK should leave the EU because it didn't put British interests first are now shocked and outraged that the EU isn't putting British interests first in the #Brexit talks. How else did they expect the EU to react if we left? 
This week's Tory Ministers who under normal circumstances would be sacked:Javid, who told #marr he'd not repatriate British citizens illegally deported;Grayling, for the Northern Fail fiasco;Johnson, for saying Trump would do a better job of #Brexit than May.#bbcpm #c4news 
Hasn’t @BorisJohnson  got a point when he suggests @realDonaldTrump should take over from @theresa_may and lead the Brexit talks 
In Stormont with @M_AndersonSF and @NiallSF discussing Brexit, protecting the GFA and rights for all. Great to meet Jake & Emma DeSouza.  
Britain risks a brain drain after Brexit:•43% of 18 to 34-year-olds believe that high-skilled job opportunities will move from UK to EU after Brexit•25% are considering moving abroad as they believe that there are more career opportunities overseas 
Legacy:Will history books write that:Mrs May was a far-sighted leader who delivered the prosperity and freedom of Brexit to the British people?Or Was so weak and spineless that she snatched defeat from the jaws of victory and delivered us into the arms of our enemies?  
The government has treated Brexit, and real people’s lives, like a game. Well here’s the endgame. They’re not going to win it.Game on.  
'Theresa May has to show she's capable of putting her foot down with the European Union - the European Council summit in June is really her last big opportunity to show the country that she's actually capable of delivering the Brexit that she's promised,' says @HughRBennett 
The real Brexit showdown will come in the Autumn & @jeremycorbyn will have to come off the fence. So says  @Andrew_Adonis in this week’s Political Thinking podcast  Download here:  // Subscribe on iTunes:  
So with this predictable response from the UK Gov not accepting NI only backstop let me try to summarise where I think the last two days has left us in terms of Brexit negotiations 1/  
Brussels will not be intimidated by a Brexit blame game, says Barnier  
Sensational YouGov poll suggests SNP would make sweeping gains in a snap general election, with support for an independence referendum also increasing  
Barnier confirms everything we’ve been saying for months. Brexit means:1) whole UK in whole single market and whole customs union or2) sea border which divides UK internal marketIf you don’t like those choices, prime minister, you’re welcome to call the whole thing off  
Multi-million-pound campaign for second Brexit referendum says dozens of MPs have signed up  
We need a Brexiteer to deliver Brexit! 
WRONG.  They won narrowly by lying and the country now knows Brexit is a disaster.  The polls show we want it to stop. 
Next stop in Northern Ireland is meeting business and civic society leaders at @QUBelfast to get their views about current issues like #Brexit  
To all tweeting me or emailing. I can inform you that I have added my name to Amendment 19a to support a People’s Vote Referendum @peoplesvote_uk on the Final Deal with the option to reject it and stay in the EU 
EU Brexit chief rejects Theresa May's plan for Northern Ireland backstop to apply to whole UK  
Hi Boris.... How's Brexit going?  
Brexit: Best for Britain launches campaign for another referendum  
Was this the week Brexit started to fall apart?  
MUST-WATCH: Boris Johnson promised us 'sunlit uplands' after Brexit. Last night, leaked recordings revealed that it's more likely to be a 'meltdown'.Absolutely nobody voted for a 'meltdown' in June 2016. This is exactly why we need a #Peoplesvote. Please RT: 
Boris Johnson is right; if Trump were negotiating #Brexit, things may have gone better. Primarily because Trump would have sacked Boris Johnson as quickly as he sacked Scaramucci. Only one clown per circus. 
Man who fought for Brexit blames the EU for Brexit tearing the UK apart.  
Not indifferent to Labour people's point that they in fact lost their third election in a row a year ago, but it hugely increased chances of a better Brexit outcome, halted grammars, got some bullies out of Downing Street. 
And, incidentally, if they were campaigning to Stop Brexit, they’d be fully within their rights to do so.We live, supposedly, in a free society with free speech. If they thought the UK ending Brexit would help the plight of their fellow EU citizens here, they’re free to say so. 
Nigel:   It's time for you, and your colleagues and fellow Brexiters to speak out in public,  about the UK being sold down the river by the bunch of incompetents, posing as our government. Theresa May is a staunch and ardent Remainer and cannot be trusted  to carry out Brexit. 
50% of online abuse aimed at women comes from other women.Why on earth are you devoting time to mean comments on the Internet when you should be securing a Brexit vote that reflects the democratic will of the British people?For God's sake, make way for a proper leader. Now.  
To avoid any confusion between the EU backstop & the UK customs paper: I reiterate that our backstop cannot apply to whole UK. 4 freedoms are indivisible.  This is not a rejection of the UK customs paper on which discussions continue. #Brexit 
So it's official. The EU has rejected May's attempt to cherry pic. There's no way to avoid a hard brexit border between Britain and NI if NI stays in the customs union & single market and Britain doesn't. Scotland will soon demand the same status as NI, meaning the end of the UK.  
We have no plan for BrexitWe have no plan for the Irish borderWe have done zero prep for a No Deal BrexitNeither Gov nor Opp have any answersOf course Barnier will get what the EU wants. 
So much of what Michel Barnier said repeats exactly what he said a year ago.The EU has not given an inch, nor changed its mind on how to handle the Brexit process. 
Just been watching the news on TV. Its horrendous. What the hell does May think she is doing. We`re British, we're entitled to a little more respect that that conjured up by her brexit plan. For God's sake fire her and give the job to a patriot. This is our country not the EU's ! 
BBC run short story on Borisgate and then put arch Brexiteer Peter Bone onto to support his view and the call for a no deal Brexit. No balance again. This BBC bias has gone too far. The BBC must be condemned for no longer being there for the British public. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
The RBI Consumer Confidence Survey is a referendum on the economic incompetence of the Modi Govt But we must remember: #BasEkAurSaal pic.twitter.com/6Q9yrP0XMz 
Walk away. Declare the intention for unilateral free trade on Brexit Day. Hold an Emergency Budget and slash corporation tax for Brexit Day too. It's a game of chicken now. 
What a surprise, Brexit supporters aren’t going to get the Brexit they wanted.  What part of “You were lied to” do they not get?  Brexit was, and is, never going to result in Britain turning into Elysian Fields.  Not just short term economic disaster but also mid and long term. 
May: Brexit means Brexit.Barnier: Backstop means Backstop.Johnson: Meltdown means meltdown.Me: 4 million children living in poverty, 9,000 rough sleepers, 1 in 14 have used a Food Bank, 128,000 children without a home, Windrush...Tories Out means Tories Out. 
"We are not going to be intimidated by this form of blame game" - EU Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier on the UK's "status quo" position  #Brexit 
Barnier: The future of Europe is more important than Brexit. Close cooperation with the UK should be part of that future. 
BREAKING EU chief Michel Barnier demolishes Theresa May's Brexit customs plan declaring 'we're not going to be intimidated' 
Listening in between the words of @MichelBarnier press conference at the moment in Brussels, I think it will soon dawn on Brexiteers that the price of their Brexit is ultimately Irish reunification :) 
#Brexit reality revealed by Boris J tape. Would people have really voted to leave if there had been honesty about Brexit meltdown? Irony as he validates what he called project fear. Disgrace. He should go #FBPE 
Wait, where did this rumour about David Beckham cheating come from? And a divorce!?! I can barely keep up with Brexit, I don’t have the energy to deal with Becksit too  
He reported on Brexit, on Erdogan, on Putin, on Libya, on Iraqi Kurdistan. At the height of Trump’s campaign he did a whole episode on immigrant communities in Houston. He celebrated Rome’s working class suburbs with Asia Argento. He was always respectful, never exploitative. 
BREAKING: Michel Barnier says temporary "backstop" plans for Irish border after Brexit can't apply to whole of U.K.  
A clear message to Brexiteers from Michel Barnier, who says there is a lack of realism and reluctance to accept consequences of Brexit: "We are not going to be intimidated by this form of blame game." 
We have always argued that the people must vote on the final terms of Brexit.Join the Green Bloc at #PeoplesVoteMarch to show the government that democracy didn’t stop on 23 June 2016. Let's demand a #PeoplesVote  
it is in plain sight Ana, from here in UK and most of Europe it is obvious, Putin is interfering everywhere hoping to break us up and it is working - see Trump/Brexit/Lega etc 
Just remember that it’s all the fault of Remainers that Brexit is turning into a complete mess. 
No Brexiteer will argue with Boris on this. The Treasury and the Civil Service continue to bang the drum for Remain. Without a strong leader who is prepared to vociferously defend the referendum result, the Brexit that people thought they were voting for will never happen.  
Bregret, believing that Brexit was the wrong decision, has slightly increased among the public over the past 12 months. The main shift is among those who voted Leave in 2016 and then Labour in the 2017 election, 14% of whom now think that Brexit was wrong  
The Tories are delusional if they believe that the UK will automatically continue to participate on the same terms in EU affiliated programmes, such as Horizon 2020, following Brexit. When will Theresa May learn that we cannot have our cake and eat it? #ExitfromBrexit 
It's maybe not surprising that @theresa_may won't dare sack Boris Johnson,  whose life and career is a litany of atrocious behaviour and lies.What isn't as clear is why @BBCNews is so pro hard Brexit. What does it have to gain from the country being damaged and depleted? 
Lord Malloch Brown - This #brexit impasse is destroying us as a country.. destroying us! People all over the world shake their heads in despair. So what we're proposing is for May to bring back a deal & for it to be put to the people in a #PeoplesVote#StopBrexit #FBPE #bbcdp 
'Betrayed' 'Ignored' Westmonster's followers give their verdict on May's handling of Brexit!  May is a disaster. No, erm, balls.               #fo2eu. 
PM has 'full confidence' in Johnson despite leaked tape on Brexit strategy  Well we the voters don't have "full confidence" in PM May at all. Time to stop picking our pockets of £billions and tell the undemocratic EU to lump it. 
EU's Michel Barnier gives an update on the latest Brexit talks  
This part of the judgement int he Art50 revocability case is very important. It refers to the Meaningful Vote amendment (amendment 19) that is essential to avoid Parliament having only the illusionary choice between the deal and a catastrophic car-crash Brexit.Lobby your MPs!  
The Gov't pretend to be united but their panic is apparent as they run out of knives for each other's backsThe wheels of their #Brexit bus haven't just fallen off they disintegrated months ago whilst the truth they've try to hide floats to the surface#FridayWisdom #StopBrexit 
Another notable feature of Johson’s stupid remarks was his welcome for ‘breakdown, crisis, chaos’ that he envisaged Trump as Brexit negotiator (!) creating. Dominic Cummings wants this too.Idiots. Most people want stability, reliability, predictability, lives on an even keel. 
Great to attend @BestforBritain’s manifesto launch earlier. The government is in meltdown over a Brexit it can’t contain and doesn’t understand. It’s time to take back control - and give it to the British people. #peoplesvote 
Now that we all agree that Brexit isn't going very well and to #StopBrexit seems the only way out, who's to blame the most? 
Pathetic bunch of prancing quiffy hair nancyboys, these modern players. Heated pitches, leather seats for the subs, winter breaks. These spastics wouldn't have lasted five minutes in Northern Ireland when I served there at the height of The Troubles. Granite Brexit needed.  
Corbyn Shadow Ministers Braced For The Sack By Joining Commons Brexit Rebellion To Back 'Norway Model'So, Labour are the opposition and Corbyn will sack people for opposing the government? Sounds perfectly reasonable...... 
Which do you think most capable of delivering Brexit? 
Important to remind everyone of these facts: we have fewer nurses & midwives this year than last year because so many EU staff are leaving and so few are joining (they cite Brexit when asked). @malloch_brown @JuliaHB1 @talkRADIO  ( 
Can we make a pact?1) Can we agree NEVER again to vote for an MP who voted against Brexit.2) Can we agree NEVER to sleep again until the rancid House of Lords is abolished. 
"@ProspectUnion is not affiliated to any political party and our political independence is our cornerstone, but our message to all parties is clear: #Brexit is too important to get wrong."  
Brexit is a coup. A 21st century coup is not heralded by tanks along Whitehall. It creeps in with a *mistake* or weakness which a democratic process could correct, but the tyrants seize it, take control & strangle democratic process, abetted in this case by the Labour Party. 
Boris Johnson's deputy says there could be a second Brexit referendum. Think he meant 'SHOULD BE'  via @Telegraph 
17.4 million people voted for independence. No excuses.Listen to the people - fight for Brexit! @DavidDavisMP @LiamFox @michaelgove @BorisJohnson Support Westmonster:  
Breaking News................. Completely without warning David Davis hasn't resigned again today ..... more when we get #brexit  
Every team has had players busted for PEDs, some more than others. A handful of teams have a long history of positive tests. Only in New England will a single positive test turn into a referendum on the team, it’s coach, training methods and culture. Turn off your radios. 
Dear media1. Stop referring to the "will of the people" when referring to the EURef result, it was a slim maj. of just 650k people;2. Stop calling Brexit fans "Brexiteers", they're not swashbuckling heroes3. Focus on the facts not just feelingsThank you@lbc #bbcdp #wato 
The BBC is going to rebroadcast the entire EU Referendum again on Saturday 23rd June on BBC Parliament. From 9.55am-9pm. 
The BBC’s EU Referendum result live programme to be shown again in its entirety on @BBCParliament on the second anniversary of the vote. 
Brexit could keep UK economy 'in the slow lane’, says CBI.Britain could be overtaken by other economies, with #Brexit and protectionism putting investment at risk, says ⁦@CBItweets⁩.So hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit and #Remain in the EU. 
Stop hard Brexit. *Ask your MP to vote for Lords Amendment 51 to the EU Withdrawal Bill.*  
Me in 50 years when my grandkids come home from school and ask what it was like living through Theresa May and Brexit for a history project  
"The infernal aquarium" is now my favourite description of Brexit:  
I'm sure you don't read these replies, but just in case: you are about to destroy democracy and the Conservative party in the UK, if you betray #Brexit and deliver #Brino. There will be no forgiveness from the electorate, nor from History. You have forgotten the 17.4m. Resign. 
Brexit is in danger of being sold out.Gov may not manage to get a deal palatable to #Leave voters. Boris fears that we could still end up effectively in a customs union with the EU and closely aligned to their rules and regulations.#MayMustGo 
Brexit: A sorry tale of buyer’s remorse.73% of British voters and 70% of Leave voters now think Brexit is going badly - and we haven’t even left the EU.  
A Hard Brexit would wipe £5bn off the Welsh economy, says @JonathanPlaid. Wales can’t afford this stormy outcome 
ALEX BRUMMER: Philip Hammond is acting as a one-man road-block against Brexit but he ought to be straining every sinew in his body to ensure UK is in best position economically  
The really big finding from today's BBC poll in Northern Ireland is that one fifth of Protestant respondents said Brexit has affected their views on constitutional status. PS Care needed as the wording "may/would" is a little hazy  
We call on you to deliver Brexit and not to sell us out to The EU as you are currently doing. 
you're living in an alternative universe Theresa......try focussing on real crime, the impacts of rising immigration on our way of life and services, and Brexit. 
Tory MP @SCrabbPembs #HowWillBrexitBenefitMe?We didn't ask him WHO voted for #Brexit the people voted for it is not a good enough answer!We now need a choice based on the facts we've learned SINCE 2016 the ones we should've had before the vote was even considered#SODEMaction 
If @realDonaldTrump were leading the charge, then #Britain would've had #Brexit implemented the very next day after the #EU #Referendum! Instead we have @theresa_may the #LOSER in charge! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @Conservatives #ConservativeParty #TheresaMay 
Since when has Theresa May cared about what “The People” think? She wants Brexit for Media Moguls, Big Business and  Tory Donors. She doesn’t what “The People Think” with Leveson 2. Illegally Bombing  Syria for no reason. Selling and Destroying our NHS. Underfunding Police, Fire  
I think it is best if we leave them to their Brexit and step on to the world stage as an Independent Scotland  
#PeterBone: "I know it's difficult to remember but two years ago we had a  #referendum and we voted to come out of this wretched thing. While people  want to keep us in, the people voted to come out - so let's just do  it!"  #BBC #SKY #LBC #UK @ConHome 
The bungled #Brexit app is already a total disaster.  It only works on Android (and will never work on iPhone) It relies on glitchy facial recognition systems Third-party companies will process the sensitive dataRead the full story:  
UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson appeared to suggest Donald Trump would handle Brexit negotiations better than Prime Minister Theresa May, according to leaked audio obtained and published by BuzzFeed News  
On 19 June (also) the Court of Appeal in Amsterdam will decide whether the Court below was right to refer to the European Court the question whether we get to keep our EU citizenship if Brexit happens. /18 
Shocking. Irresponsible. Brexit is posh boys playing fast and loose with jobs and livelihoods. These people have never felt the consequences of economic downturns. It means lives ruined & areas like ours always hit hardest. I ask again - is this what you voted for? #BrokenBrexit 
WATCH | @PeterBoneUK: "I know it's difficult to remember but two years ago we had a referendum and we voted to come out of this wretched thing. While people want to keep us in, the people voted to come out - so let's just do it!" Support us at  
Sensational YouGov poll suggests SNP would make sweeping gains in a snap general election, with support for an independence referendum also increasing - #ScotRef 
All their messaging is based on this single point. And they justifiably claim to be sole protectors of Union, taking support from Labour. The danger for them is when enough see the Brexit damage and entertain Indy, then they get thrown out with the bath water.  
FM @NicolaSturgeon says @BorisJohnson is not fit for office after a secret recording discussing Trump & #Brexit leaked. #SNP18 @theSNP 
Amazing that polling day for the General Election was 1 year ago today!It is an honour and privilege for me to serve as the MP for Battersea.We need to keep fighting: To defeat a Tory hard Brexit, to properly fund our public services and to build council houses   
Letters: British voters won’t forgive politicians for their betrayal of Brexit  
We need MPs to add their names NOW to Amendment 19a on the Brexit bill, giving YOU the final say on the deal.Will @DavidLammy @Siobhain_MP @TulipSiddiq @VirendraSharma @wesstreeting @RupaHuq @coyleneil @annaturley @CatMcKinnell @bphillipsonMP  stand up and back Amendment 19a? 
“Shameful”. Watch Richard Madeley’s brilliant summary on #bbcqt of where we are on Brexit.   A Remainer who speaks for the whole nation. Superb.   May - ignore this at your peril.  
WATCH  | Puppet for George Soros and chief of the Remoaning 'Best for Britain', Lord Malloch throws a tantrum when caught out lying about Brexit.@JuliaHB1: "You may not think I'm a journalist but I don't think you're a democrat!"   
The lies poured out by the Tory Brexiters & #Brexit press are destroying our democracy. A public that cannot tell the difference between truth & falsehood is immune to reasons & facts, and will either retreat into apathy or become prey to the politics of unreason.#StopBrexit 
I’m ready for Brexit...  
Amendment 19a on the EU Withdrawal Bill gives YOU the final say on Brexit, including the option of staying IN the E.U. Will @RuthCadbury @stellacreasy @MikeGapes @margarethodge put their money where their mouths are and ADD THEIR NAMES to amendment 19a? 
"The only thing Boris Johnson is interested in his himself"WATCH: @RupaHuq slams Boris Johnson's leaked comments last night, where he praises Donald Trump's negotiating style and describes Brexit negotiations as in 'meltdown'.  
2016: "Brexit will be easy"2018: "HE WHO CAN PULL ARTICLE 50 FROM THE STONE ALONE SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO DELIVER A JOBS FIRST BREXIT" 
The Tories are happy to foster a damaging Brexit and let workers pay the price. Boris Johnson knows we are going to get a bad deal and yet he plods on regardless with his nonchalant attitude.  The Foreign Secretary is turning into a Trump tribute act #Brexit #BrexitMeltdown 
#WatchNow Prof Tanja Bueltmann in @PoliticsMeans on how #Brexit is taking away rights from #EUcitizens. Female EU citizens will be more severely affected by this. #WomensRights #PeoplesVote #FinalSay @cliodiaspora @EUWomenEU @The3Million @BestForBritain 
The more ideological Brexiteers may not be getting everything they want but they won the referendum 52:48 not 70:30. We need to leave the EU but in a way that reflects the interests and concerns of the whole country not just those who voted Leave. 
A post-Brexit Britain that wants to be global can’t operate with outdated infrastructure. From 'backstops' to tarmac, politicians must stop dithering and start implementing meaningful change. Today's article for @CityAM:  
Ever since the #Brexit vote the majority of the #government, #Parliament, the #civilservice & #Treasury have been trying to overturn our #democratic vote. They are on the #EU's side not the #UK's! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC #UK @ConHome @CCHQPress #TheresaMay @Conservatives #Tory 
Are Labour-voting Leavers the closest the Brexit debate has to a 'floating voter'? My article for @prospect_uk:  
FURY: We asked our followers what they made of Theresa May’s handling of Brexit. You guys didn’t hold back! “I have hung on & on, waiting for her to roar...It is time for the real committed Brexiteers to take control.” 
I want to hear the Prime Minister, Mrs Theresa May @theresa_may say that the Brexit vote was not only flawed, it was manipulated. I want to hear her say the Brexit plan cannot be delivered. I want to hear her call Brexit off. #HearHer 
Britain’s export sales soar by more than 6% and defy Project Fear predictions of a post-Brexit slump in trade  
While @theSNP meets for #SNP18 it's clear that support for Labour is in freefall across Scotland and the UK. Only the #SNP provide a strong, positive vision for #Scotland and an alternative to the catastrophe of #Brexit  
Boris has humiliated May once again. Calling her Brexit a shambles and suggesting Doris Trump would do a better job. Any boss worth their position would fire Boris. May won't  because she's scared of him. She pathetically weak. It's beyond humiliating. 
Deeply troubling: in Northern Ireland, support for staying in UK now has a wafer thin lead of only 3 points, with Brexit a significant factor in changing minds. Yet our Foreign Secretary dismisses concerns about the border as “folly”   
Love this argument. May has given them everything they wanted. But it isn't working because she is not pure of Brexit heart.  
The end of both the Labour & Tory parties is in sight. Brexit is the Tories’ Corn Laws moment: the split is terminal. Labour cannot hold its social democratic & socialist wings together for much longer: Corbyn is tearing it apart. In both cases ideology is put before country. 
Three big questions yet to be answered on how on earth #Brexit can happen without disrupting #trade and damaging our #economy : 
Theresa May agrees to ‘meaningless’ 2021 cut-off date in Brexit bodge to prevent cabinet walkout as senior official says Davis has been 'bamboozled'  
WATCH: @richardreedinno, founder of Innocent drinks, on #BBCQT last night making a powerful case for why we should have a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal after a chaotic week for the Government. Please RT:  
Just come across a synth patch called Hard Brexit :(  
The party of Brexit is popular with ordinary working people - this is exactly why the Tories MUST deliver. The modern Labour Party is nothing more than a middle class hobby horse, and voters recognise that.  
The disconnect between the mood at Westminster, where nearly all Tories--regardless of where they stand on Brexit--are very worried, and the polls is really quite striking  
Out of interest John, if you think Brexit is going to be such a success, why have you advised your clients not to invest here? It’s not going terribly well is it? In the meantime could you possibly tell me #HowWillBrexitBenefitMe and the British people 
Boris Johnson warns that Theresa May must show more 'guts' on Brexit or UK will be 'locked in orbit around EU' in secretly recorded remarks  
Boris Johnson has launched a blistering attack on the Government's Brexit negotiations strategy revealed in a leaked audio recording  
Man I’m a remainer BUT we lost the referendum. Get over it. Blimey it’s like when a despot cancels an election because he lost. This is becoming silly now. Make Brexit work and forge new relationships with other countries especially the Commonwealth ones. #Brexit 
John Redwood has blocked @WCullmac for describing Brexit as an *impossible to deliver mess* with a bit of humour added to her tweet. If you agree with Winnie, please retweet her. A message to Redwood & his fellow Leavers is an optional extra but please keep it polite. Thank you  
No one *wants* a referendum, but, with the Cabinet and Shadow Cabinet paralysed by Brexit, it looks like we *need* a referendum to get us out of this disaster. 
Blow for Corbyn.  Labour will be dismayed at thisSturgeon still the boss.     But why, with the chaos of Brexit, are the Scottish Tories apparently doing so well?  
.By supporting Brexit, the DUP has betrayed its voters & The Union.A United Ireland will be its punishment..... 
Speaking about Brexit yesterday George Soros said "Ultimately, it's up to the British people to decide what they want to do. It would be better however if they came to a decision sooner rather than later."Well unless I've been drunk for 2 years didn't we decide on 23 June 2016? 
Best for Britain recruits MPs to back second Brexit referendum  
Peter Bone MP:"It’s not even a soft #Brexit - we are not coming out!It allows us to stay effectively in #EU indefinitely.They’ve crossed the Red Line, it’s NOT acceptable & many of my colleagues on back benches won’t support it.And I certainly won’t." 
Britain risks a “brain drain” after Brexit. A survey has found that 25 per cent of 18 to 34-year-olds are considering moving abroad as they believe that there are more career opportunities overseas.  
Thank you @CatherineWest1 for supporting Lib Dem amendment to give the PEOPLE the FINAL SAY on the Brexit deal (including option of staying IN the E.U.). @ChukaUmunna Will you join your Labour colleagues and add your name to Amendment 19a? 
This. Betraying Brexit has consequences as May and her cabinet of quislings will discover.   
The May administration is banking on the 17.4m LEAVE voters electoral backing despite betraying Brexit. They will use fear of Corbyn to encourage support this. I believe many will simply refuse to vote for either, the betrayal has consequences. 
Polls fluctuate on public mood in NI, but this poll commissioned by BBC has very high figures: 42% favouring Irish unity, 62% saying Westminster doesn't reflect their lives, 42% support Stormont's return. 28% of unionists swing to Irish unity due to #Brexit.  
First Minister @NicolaSturgeon has warned the UK government that pushing through the Brexit bill without Holyrood's consent would put the UK into "uncharted" constitutional territory  
UK (Northern Ireland), LucidTalk poll:Irish Unification ReferendumRemain in the EU by joining the Irish Republic: 48%Leave the EU by staying in the UK: 52%#Brexit #Ireland #HardBrexit #EuropeanUnion 
HOPE not hate has decided to campaign against a hard Brexit, because we believe it will make Britain poorer and much more unequal, creating conditions that will make a far-right surge more likely, and more potent. Read why we're against a hard brexit:  
Neither hard, nor soft, just crap.  Theresa May has finally given us a version of Brexit that might - just - be workable:    Me for @prospect_uk 
47% now say Brexit was wrong decision vs 40% who say it was right.The gap has been steadily widening according to this YouGov series. 
Brexit: An extinction level event for the dinosaurs of British politics  
John my love it wouldn’t matter a fig if I sang Rule Britannia every morning to the postman in my Union Jack bikini. Brexit is what it is. An impossible to deliver mess. The term project fear is only used by people who don’t like facts. Please stop lying to our country. Thank you 
Now at the stage where #Brexit cannot actually be done. Brexit is supposedly 294 days away.This isn’t a question of whether it should be done or not, but if it can be.None of the central issues can be solved by the UK.Indefinite fudge, or stopping it, the only options now. 
Good old Boris saying what all us Leavers are thinking. Yes he is right if Trump was in charge we would be out know under WTO rules. Good on you Boris a true Brexit Man. 
He is absolutely correct.This document enables us to stay in the EU.Brexit is now over, unless we throw May out of Downing St.  
THE BREXIT ESCAPE ROOM: Your team enters the room and has 2 years to solve the puzzle. All the clues are just ramblings and make no sense. There is no good answer. You get locked in the room forever and have to eat each other. It also costs loads. 
Lord Malloch-Brown told LBC he's calling for a second referendum on the European Union to end the "fractious division" in the country.  
13/ All the people Will of the peopleThey all go hand in handHand in hand through their Brexit life  
Boris Johnson warns of “Brexit meltdown”. Brexit is putting jobs, public services and our NHS at risk.Hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit.#BrexitMeltdown 
9/ I lie to my colleagues, I sometimes lie to the public tooIt gives me a sense of enormous well being (Brexit life) And then I’m happy for the rest of the day safe in the knowledge there will always be a bit of my heart devoted to it (Brexit life)  
#Brexit risks UK citizens with carcinogenic chemicals and asbestos as we are forced to adopt falling standards in US trade deal  
Brexit means Brexit - Theresa May 2016Brexit means Remain - Theresa May 2018A sad pathetic apology for a Leader, an embarrassment to the 17.4m who voted for a unambiguous LEAVE.#MayMustGoNow 
Jessica from the off you have behaved in a rude, condescending manner, & sneer at people for being patriot. You look down at those who voted Brexit and clearly believe you are intellectually superior. Seriously why would I engage with somebody who doesn't have basic manners?!  
Johnson: "Meltdown"Farage: "Never said things would be better"IDS:" Dover will have severe delays"Hannan:"We never wanted Brexit"Dacre:" Au revoir"Lawson:" I'm alright Jaques"Is there a pattern here? 
Lucid Talk Poll out today demonstrates significant growth in support for Irish Unity.42% support for Irish Unity with 13% undecided.28% said Britain’s decision to leave EU made them more likely to vote for a United Ireland.Now is the time for a referendum on Irish Unity.  
If @realDonaldTrump was doing Brexit, he’d have promised the electorate that the EU would be paying to build a wall, already have started a trade war & torn up the Good Friday Agreement. Trump and Boris in competition for worlds worst diplomat.  
UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson appeared to suggest Donald Trump would handle Brexit negotiations better than Prime Minister Theresa May, according to leaked audio obtained and published by BuzzFeed News  
But don't worry about Brexit, we'll get a great trade deal with the USA to see us through, the bestest trade deal, all the cheap chlorine-washed chicken you can choke down ...  
Oh, I don't know.  Boris Johnson spoke the truth when he said that Brexit would be a Titanic success ... it is - Brexit VIP's have got in the lifeboats, pushing women and children out of the way#BrexitMeltdown@David_Cameron@Nigella_Lawson@Nigel_Farage pic.twitter.com/yTZN1e95j6 
It’s not the significance of the border now, you chump, it’s the significance that a 310-mile gap in the perimeter of the EU will have after Brexit  
#US Ambassador Robert ‘Woody’ Johnson in Birmingham last night:“I do not downplay that #Brexit will be a challenge – there is a lot to figure out. You can say it’s too complicated but as an American I say you simplify it.”He’s right.Some people can’t see the wood for the trees 
He threatened to resign over the Brexit backstop. He threatened to resign over his mate's work place wankathons - but David Davis remains.So just what is this curious chap up to? At the possible expense of my own sanity, I attempted to find out: 
Yesterday Davis almost resigned, and today Johnson says Trump would negotiate a better #Brexit. Finally the Brexiteers are getting restless in the ranks. She’ll be gone soon. 
Chart of the yearTwo big changes: collapse in Corbyn as "best PM" and rise in Brexit being handled badly  
UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson appeared to suggest Donald Trump would handle Brexit negotiations better than Prime Minister Theresa May, according to leaked audio obtained and published by BuzzFeed News  
Exactly the approach I have been advocating for years before the Referendum result was delivered. Tear up Article 50, tell the EU how we are leaving, don’t ask them how it can be done!  
Here's the best possible Brexit. You tell me if that's good enough:  
1. Gisela Stuart @BBCr4today: #Brexit is still the settled Will of the Ppl. It hasn't changed.ME: Still speaking fluent #Brexit BS..what planet R these #Brextremists on?#Brexiters & #Lexiters will lie through their back teeth 2 get their way not yours 
Daily Briefing: - Start of G7 Summit, or G6 plus one?- EU's Barnier to comment on UK PM's post-#Brexit trade border plan- Romania's Social Democrat leader awaits trial verdict 
The road to Brexit  
Boris is right. The Treasury is crammed full of pessimistic Remoaners who are terrified of seizing the opportunities that Brexit offers.  
Boris Johnson, in destroying the case for soft Brexit, just made the case for stopping Brexit completely. Thanks BoJo! @BorisJohnson 
Watch again as Julia clashes with Remainer Lord Malloch Brown over Brexit: “You may not think I’m a journalist, I don’t think you’re a democrat.” ▼@JuliaHB1 |  
You did so with tactical voting & the support of remainers. You're underestimating the impact of losing our support. Even with us you were 60+ seats short of gaining a majority gvt. You claimed 83% of ppl voted for pro brexit parties, you'll never misrepresent me again.  
This is not happy reading for either the #Labour or #Conservative parties.If we betray the #Brexit vote through excessive caution blind to the huge bargaining strength the #UK has with the #EU, the electorate will say ‘a plague on both their houses’. 
Boris Johnson suggesting that Donald Trump would be good for Britain tells you everything about the ignorance of the buffoon.This Tory Govt have destroyed the social fabric of this country - we were in a mess before Brexit. Only option to heal this country is to get rid of Tories 
Irish Government former Justice Minister, Alan Shatter, tells @TonightShowTV3 that Boris Johnson is a "twat". #Brexit @mrjamesob @Kevin_Maguire @campbellclaret@LabourLeft pic.twitter.com/VXhTzFn3Rc 
Remarkable interview. Complains about Leave 'lies' and demands a second referendum (people's vote), proceeds to lie, is called out on it and storms off air. The public purse is supporting these anti democratic parasites. Why?  
ANM POLL: VOTE & RETWEET!So who do YOU think would negotiate #Brexit better ? 
Simon Jack - When it looks like we're going to have a softer form of #brexit the £ is stronger but when it looks like we're going to chaotically drop out with no deal the £ goes down. There is exasperation in the business community about brexit & the £ reflects that. #FBPE 
So I *assume* Peter Robinson also believes if 50.1% voted to retain the union in a unity referendum that that wouldn’t be good enough either? Do you reckon? Really? #Democracy 
David Davis blatantly lied about the existence of Brexit Impact reports to Parliament & the public. He can't be trusted over Brexit or any point of policy.  Theresa May still having Davis, Johnson, Gove,et al in the Cabinet speaks volumes on the paucity of Tory talent #StopBrexit 
Amazingly, the British Brexit team has managed to agree on something. Unfortunately it’s something they already know isn’t on the table with the EU. I am sick to death of this tour of Fantasy Island as we head for the rapids, leading to No Deal Falls. 
Brexit has blinded our judgement. Boris Johnson should have been sacked months ago:Mirror Politics morning briefing 
There is one gigantic hole opening up in UK politics right now for a new political party. Both Consevative and Labour are not able to govern this country as Brexit has proved with the unwillingness of both to honor the referendum vote. 
End of free movement if we  #Brexit 'risks collapse of UK social care  
When Boris Johnson uses the millennium bug to suggest risks are exaggerated, he fails to understand organisation around the world spent enormous effort to plan for and successfully fix a looming problem with an unmovable deadline.The metaphor for Brexit planning failure is apt. 
.@GerardBattenMEP Boris is saying exactly what I was saying even before the referendum result was in. If Mrs May really wanted to leave the EU she'd have torn up Art 50 and told them how we were to Leave, not asked them how it could be done. 
The ‘Great Charter of Modern Britain’ which Will Hutton & I propose be issued on 29 March 2019 instead of Brexit. Read it in full here:  
Why can’t Nicola Sturgeon get the message? Scotland doesn’t want another referendum on independence. RETWEET this video to help make her listen.  
Michael Howard says Boris Johnson’s swipe at Theresa May is just part of Brexit’s “thrills and spills”  
Brexit is such a disaster it’s about time the BBC started talking about remaining in the EU with enthusiasm. Borisgate shows the real motivation behind Brexit and how low Brexiteers will go to try to win. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
"Brexit doesn't mean Brexit. The PM has been surrounded by Remainers. I think there has been a conspiracy to arrive at this situation."  
So high petrol prices are the result of a low pound. Low pound is the result of #Brexit.#Brexit is the biggest disaster for this country since the War.There is no advantage to leaving the EU.Why are we doing it? 
Rubbish, 'friends say it was disappointing he was recorded'. Classic Boris. Of course he wanted it out there. We want him to say it but also to amass the troops to get the Brexit 17.4m people voted for. Grow some Boris, stop playing games, time is short.  
I hate to say this, but I don't think the person who wants #Brexit the most is @theresa_may I think it, sadly, is @jeremycorbyn I voted twice for JC and #Labour in the GE. But, even though I live in a marginal, I will not vote this way again if Lab helps Brexit. It will be LD 
Disturbing how leading Tories regard #Brexit as a game of brinkmanshipThey demonstrate scant regard for our jobs, rights, and safety  
"Hi Theresa. Yeah I may have admitted on record that quote 'Brexit is in meltdown and honestly it'll be incredibly fucking damaging if you're poor but who gives a gammony shit about the poor' unquote. Am I fired yet?""I admire your honesty please stay in your job" pic.twitter.com/StyzlZa05e 
‘@PeterBoneUK: “It’s not even a soft Brexit, we’re not coming out. The idea that there’s a date in the document, well that’s just an aspiration.“The more I read the document the more depressed I got. Effectively it allows us to stay in the EU.” 
Boris Johnson reckons that Trump would do a better job negotiating Brexit than Theresa May.In separate news, I reckon my dog would do a better job as Foreign Secretary than Boris Johnson.#BorisJohnson #UselessTwat #LeaveLiars 
Two things are clear this morning. 1) Division looks like the ‘new normal’ in Govt - and No10 needs to find ways to persuade cabinet ministers to pull back. 2) Brexiteers are finally being forced to confront the uncomfortable reality that there are no easy/simple Brexit options. 
Brexit is breaking up Britain in so many ways already. It will get far far worse. Brexit is the biggest mistake any country ever made in a time of peace. #FBPE 
Don’t be fooled: the question would be ‘deal or no deal Brexit’ not ‘deal or no Brexit.’ It’s the latter we want & must have.  
On R4 Today Arch Brexit, Michael Howard backs May over Johnson in “leaked” (ha,ha) Boris speech row. In 2004 Howard sacked BJ from shadow cab for lying about getting Spectator colleague up the duff, so knows what a cad the fat fraudster is. Don’t sack him now, it’s what he wants 
Now you know: don’t panic during the melt down expected after Brexit. We will not protect you despite the fact we know what Brexit will do to our country. That’s the UK government right now. #FBPE 
READ: Britain risks being left in the economic “slow lane” compared with other developed nations as Brexit takes its toll warns the CBI (£)  
Michael Howard being really sensible on Brexit on radio now offering cogent political analysis. Only kidding, he’s still lost in a fantasy world 
The latest in the ever-increasing & pitiful “That’s Not My Brexit” canon ( ⁦@davidallengreen⁩). 
Would we honestly have to be listening to so many boring, sinister old failures quite as out of touch and hated as IDS - and now Lord Howard - on @BBCr4today if Brexit hadn't brought them back from the dead? 
How many more times do you need telling Jeremy,  It was tactical voting not an endorsement for you to pursue Brexit,  It was a vote against the Tories and NOT A VOTE FOR YOU.  WAKE UP!! 
The ‘sensible’ Brexit would have been2 years preparation 2 years Art 502 years Norway/EEA dealAnd then a second vote to see if people wished to go further. 
The government still has no plan for Brexit. Today we provide the roadmap to reuniting the country with a #peoplesvote - follow #peoplesroadmap! 
May is still pretending the backstop might never be invoked. Taking the British people for fools. Total disgrace. She is selling out Brexit. 
It’s a complete farce, Keir. People want Labour to take the lead on Brexit and say Stop Brexit, clearly an loudly. The world would be its oyster if it did.  
You were warned that the consequences would be dire. Now, one by one, you are all admitting that the Brexit fairyland was never possible. You have caused enormous damage to this country but you still want to go on - you are a national suicide cult. 
Was in Berlin yesterday for meetings on Brexit so missed most of the political carnage back here. Tory cabinet shenanigans once again making us a complete embarrassment abroad. Looks like “meltdown”is already happening 
Boris Johnson dismisses as ‘millenium bug stuff’ concerns about Brexit customs screw-ups. That’s the concerns of professionals like car manufacturers, the Freight Transport Association & @donnyc1975 who actually have to navigate customs. Johnson is beneath contempt. 
Why did #Quitters such as Banks, Lawson, Dacre, Ashcroft, and many others think it was okay to use their money, media influence & crooked data to buy the referendum result for foreign advantage? And why do you support this to the great detriment of the entire country?  
And now the utterly bogus notion that post-Brexit problems will somehow be ‘short-term’ appears to be the latest load of nonsense Johnson & co are being allowed to present as unchallenged fact. 
The #TemporaryCustomsArrangement is a total betrayal of Britain. May’s plan is not Brexit, its subservience to the EU! Surely now the Prime Minister should resign and make way for someone who has a backbone to at least stand up for our democracy and our people.  
We are Remain.We have strength in numbers. We will make our voices heard.Now is the time for every single one of us who can, to march for our country, for democracy and to stop Brexit.March for a People's Vote. London 23rd June.Details:  
It's not just Boris's mention of a Brexit meltdown, or praise for Trump : the whole evening is full of rubbish. It's 'beyond belief' that the Irish border is an obstacle, apparently.If I were a Tory donor, I'd want my money back. 
The #Brexit vote has failed to boost the Scottish independence cause and the SNP’s pro-EU stance cost the party seats in last year’s General Election, a new survey has found. 
Dear resigning club member,Your letter statesYou ‘expect’ to fully leave the club in 2021,You want ‘frictionless’ access to all club facilities after that date, butYou don’t want to obey all of our rules.The committee will decide on your proposal, when we get it.#Brexit 
The most shocking thing for me is that we have a senior minister who actually believes the Y2K millennium bug conspiracy. The reason that planes didn't fall out of the sky is because real experts fixed it. The opposite of Brexit where an idiot is in charge  
Confident anti-Brexit & anti-austerity case by Nicola Sturgeon on @BBCr4today 
Excellent. Let's walk away in March Theresa May's latest Brexit plan not 'workable solution', Guy Verhofstadt says  
If the Tories continue to kick Brexit down the road, (which it increasingly looks like), it can come to an abrupt end in the election of May 2022, when a united Brexit movement can take power, if we all stick together & fight every seat with one Brexit Alliance Candidate. 
I read 'The Treasury is the heart of Remain' as:  economics is the heart of the case against leaving the EU.  Charge a body with the job of appraising itself of the economics of Brexit, staff it with clever people, and that is what it will do. 
"it's positive, it's about hope not despair" says Sturgeon on BBCR4, immediately after firing off possibly the most negative and pessimistic line you'll hear all day:  "it's about whether we accept the inevitable decline & despair of Brexit" 
Two Things:1. Please March in London on June 23rd, if you can, & show the brexiters that it's Finally OVER !2 And when brexit is Over, do not forget that half our Politicians (Tories) voted in favour of trashing our Nation with brexit, and the other half  (Labour) LET THEM. 
Remain:Lost the referendumLost the subsequent electionIsn't the policy of either main partyIsn't supported by most UK mediaAren't negotiating with EUAren't creating policyAren't in governmentTell me how this ongoing catastrophe is Remainers' fault. Explain.  
“The time is right for a debate about the future course for Scotland.“Are we going to stick with the decline and despair of Brexit with the UK - or is there a better way forward for Scotland?” @NicolaSturgeon says on @BBCr4today #SNP18 
Only if you stop Brexit. Things have changed and I won't lend you my vote again until you do. 
Jeremy Hunt accepts that Brexit has contributed to widespread NHS staff shortages.The question is .@Jeremy_Hunt  - what will you do about this? Continue to watch as govt endangers the lives of the electorate? 
Johnson's view that NI border issue is "tail wagging dog" reveals total misapprehension about power of Dublin in Brexit talks... 
The line here is UK must be prepared to experience short term pain for long term gain. Do not remember ever seeing that on the Leave battle bus or being told that by Brexiteers during Referendum campaign.  
Boris Johnson admits that Britain is "not taking back control" under May/Hammond Brexit... should be heard not read   
Very significant breaking poll from Northern Ireland.  Taken with today’s Scottish results of Social Attitudes Survey & Scottish You Guv poll confirms that #Brexit has opened up the entire constitutional future of these islands - and that the dynamic is for change.  
Brexit is a total mess and it’s only going to get even worse.If Labour opposed Brexit and demanded a second referendum it would be a game changer. But Jeremy Corbyn is stubbornly refusing to do that. So Brexit staggers on, leaving the country paralysed with uncertainty. 
Brexit is stuck. The deal, if it emerges, will be rubbish.But Diane James is wrong to think we can just walk away. There are no safety nets in place for March 2019.The only practical solution is to ditch Brexit. Better luck next time, Brexiteers... and bring a plan next time.  
May will never walk away. She is spineless, paralysed with indecision, weak & frit. She was ‘selected’ by big business donors to Tory Party, working for them & with civil service & Common Purpose, all dedicated to stopping Brexit.52% were naive to think we ‘won’ in June 2016  
Boris Johnson has warned that Britain could end up “locked in orbit around the EU” in his most critical comments to date of the Prime Minister’s handling of Brexit\ 
“On Brexit, things are as clear as mud...we’ve got a Prime Minister ruling out membership of the Customs Union and Single Market but who doesn’t know what she’s going to replace that with” @NicolaSturgeon tells @BBCBreakfast #SNP18 
Theresa May talks about a country uniting behind her on #Brexit. Ha...she can't even get her Cabinet to unite behind her on it. 
Him (cheerily): “what were you talking about”Me: “Boris Johnson’s latest comments on Brexit”-“Oh yes I’ve seen them in The Times. But you did tell it positively right?-“How do you mean?”-“Well you lot ALL just aren’t positive enough, do you do happy stories” 
Johnson SLAMS Remoaner Hammond and Treasury for trying to RUIN Brexit in LEAKED recording  
Teereza’s Kafkaesque Brexshit Backstop Jackpop Crackpop Lollipop Flop, Ghost Town Britain where no one even has a Pound, Bozo the Clown Trump would go in hard on Brexit Tory Machete Media Militia goes in on Gay Police Epaulettes, Tories look to Corbyn Capitalism needs reforming! pic.twitter.com/cU5RxTmsdn 
Interesting, this :)The Mail makes its millions from exploiting anger, against immigrants etcPutting someone in charge who believes Brexit is a bad idea means the owner thinks tomorrow's big money will be about its negative effectsBeware Brexiteers ! 
As always foreign national broadcasters more interested in my views on Brexit & EU affairs than UK media. Here I am on RAI debating in Italian what the new Conte Government means for the Euro, migration policy & Russia sanctions as well as the parlous state of Brexit negotiations  
Now here's a Poll that will get you out of bed...The Reunification of Ireland is all about When now, not If...I would like to take this opportunity & thank the DUP for Brexit...Fewer NI people feel British than other UK regions - survey - BBC News  
The @BorisJohnson leak doesn’t do any damage to his image. This is what the public are all thinking regarding #Brexit. 
Boris Johnson has warned of a Brexit “meltdown” and suggested Donald Trump could do better negotiations. Is Boris the Brexit saviour? @JuliaHB1 |  
Theresa May’s inaction over Brexit is pathetic. She has been Prime Minister for almost 2 years and we are still unclear as to what her vision is for Brexit. 2 years of dithering, uncertainty and ineptitude has paralysed the country and made us an international laughing stock. 
SNP leader Nicola Sturgeon says she won't consider the issue of timing when it comes to another Scottish referendum until there's more clarity on Brexit.  
BBC Scotland reporter Andrew Kerr has just claimed the recent Indy marches are being held in order to "demand a second independence referendum". Are they? His 0640 report was one sided and loaded against the SNP and Indy. He's a very poor correspondent. 
“The time is right to have an open and honest discussion about whether there is a better future for Scotland than the despair of Brexit”: @NicolaSturgeon tells @GMB #SNP18 
Brexit meltdown folks. That’s where we are. We knew it and now our Foreign Secretary tells his chums about it. StopBrexitNow. Seriously. #StopBrexitSaveBritain #StopBrexit 
Johnson on Brexit:‘You’ve got to face the fact there may now be a meltdown. I don’t want anybody to panic during the meltdown.’Tories continue to gamble with the country.Downplaying of Irish border and admiration for Trump also deeply disturbing 
Imagine the affect on the Brexit preparations if David Davis was to quit.To do this, imagine everything that he’s delivered over the last 18 months having not happened.That’s a hell of a.... oh wait. 
BoJo secretly taped saying, "i never promised you a rose garden re Brexit". Maybe not, but you didn't tell us about the wilderness either. 
Crucial sentence from ⁦@guardian⁩ editorial: May ‘is ... prepared to blur the eventual terms in order to simply get Brexit – almost any Brexit – over the line in March 2019’ The biggest threat to having a #PeoplesVote, a fudge... 
Donald Trump 'tired of Theresa May's school mistress tone’ and will not hold talks with her at G7' - Translation - 'you don't matter. 
Boris Johnson has launched a blistering attack on Theresa May's handling of Brexit saying Donald Trump would have done it better. 
Labour also in melt down in Scotland looking at latest polls, now on track to lose all their seats again, Brexit key factor no doubt 
Scotland only has one choice: The economics of independence or the economics of Brexit. It's a no brainer. 
Brexit: May refuses to guarantee 'backstop' end date  
Brexit could keep UK economy 'in the slow lane'  
Why is it always this way round? Why isn't Netanyahu tweeting: "Good frank meeting, main focus was on need to keep Irish border open post-Brexit, guarantee Irish women's abortion rights."  
Make no mistake Ontario just like Brexit for Britain & Donald Trump for America,  the light of reason, compassion & pragmatism  is being snuffed out. It's never coming  back as long as you vote for populism and nativism. You have to start thinking for yourselves. #OntarioVotes 
Trump loves Brexit. Putin loves Brexit. 
Classy of you Gerald, but the people are not always right. If they were, we'd send every damn thing to referendum. The people know they aren't always right. That's why we have constitutions and courts and public debates and politicians. And elections. But classy of you anyhow. 
Every #Kurd had a dream of independence due to the injustice. @masoud_barzani was accused of many things but he was bold enough to push for a referendum & show the world that it was not only his dream or political agenda, but the dream of 93% of the nation whom voted Yes Powerful  
I think Proportional Representation fans have their slogan for B.C.'s upcoming referendum. #bcpoli 
Perhaps we could get her to intercede in the #brexit debacle?  
We live in the world of Brexit and Trump and Putin and Law&Justice and 5 Star/League and Doug Ford. It's a brutal cancer that's metastasized into every corner of the globe where we took our values for granted. 
U.K. proposals for Irish border would keep Britain in EU customs union after Brexit  
The midterm elections on 11/6 are a national referendum on democracy in America.Do you want a democracy? If so, vote for Ds.If you buy Trump's autocratic propaganda & think corruption/oligarchy work well, vote for Rs.Don't you dare sit out though. #Vote #DemocracyReferendum 
UK Gov using England's Brexit and a UKGov Brexit Bill, to overwrite the Devolution Settlement and The Scotland Act.A blatant, aggressive use of English MP controlled westminster, to shaft Scotland, take from Scotland, and abuse Scotland against the wishes of the Scottish people. 
According to Sir Richard Aikens, former member of the Court of Appeal, in the 6 years before Brexit, the ECJ had ruled against HMRC in £7 billion worth of cases brought by multinationals. Another £43 billion worth of claims were in the pipeline. Another reason to avoid the ECJ! 
Yes, all very well Professor Brian @ProfBrianCox , but, is there life in Brexit? Are there any signs of intelligent life in @DavidDavisMP? What is the meaning of Nigel Farage? Is Michael Gove proof that aliens visited earth? Is Boris Johnson's comb held in Area 51? 
The grim truth is that Theresa May has not just failed to deliver her promise of Brexit, she has deliberately manoeuvred to prevent it. Where is the challenge to her leadership from within the tories? It needs to come, very soon. 
Dangerous self-obsessive Boris Johnson has predicted a Brexit “meltdown”. He branded the Treasury the “heart of remain” - as Brexit talks approach a “moment of truth”.  He added that he is “increasingly admiring of Donald Trump"!!! #SaveUsFromTheBorisBrexit #StopBrexit #r4today 
I might have some sympathy about Steve Bell and the flak he's getting over his Razan al-Najjar cartoon if he hadn't been a total Brit Nat in the referendum in 2014.  
Ted Heath (the paedophile) conned us into the EUJohn Major signed us up to the Maastricht TreatyTheresa May ensures we stay in EU through the back doorTORIES ARE NOT FOR BREXIT 
.@LibDems #Brexit Spokesperson @thomasbrake has tabled the 1st amendment to the #EU Withdrawal Bill on its return to the @HouseofCommons. It demands the #British people have the final say on any Brexit deal.@lucyvsalek would vote for the amendment if elected for #LewishamEast 
The #Brexit right is composed of liars, charlatans, frauds, con-tricksters, embezzelers and criminals. It's a movement largely consisting of people who hate rules and laws applying to them. 
Trump would do a great job of Brexit, says Boris Johnson 
By opposing Brexit you betrayed your party, the manifesto on which you were elected and the 17.4 million people who voted Leave - the biggest mandate in British political history. By doing so, you have given those 17.4 million people the right to demand an explanation from you. 
All night I've engaged with SNP Moonies. Most if not all have dismissed Westminster approval/Section 30 Order as being completely unnecessary and also asserted they are now a majority.Not a single one can explain why their princess hasn't called a referendum though.Idiots. 
Have you noticed Hard Brexit fan Andrew Neil will happily criticise the government's negotiating of Brexit but will never ask a question that implies any criticism of Brexit itself, I mean when did he ever mention the UK's tanking economy since the Brexit vote? #BBCTW 
"Brexit doesn't mean Brexit, the key promise of the PM is now nonsense" says #choochoo Portillo"Is this what you voted for?" asks @afneil(Not sure Alan is listening too closely) #bbctw 
Brexit Divides Scots as More Warm to Economics of Independence  
Out now: EU Committee’s report on UK-EU relations after #Brexit:  
“You can do one of three things: you can decide to do a thing; you can decide not to do a thing; or you can decide not to decide. The last is the choice of weaklings and fools.” Stephen King#Brexit #strongandstable 
Boris Johnson attacks government's Brexit negotiation strategy  
Do you ever get the feeling you're losing? Cos it's beginning to look increasingly like you are...This #Brexit has nothing to do with the Will of the Ppl which 26.5% never justified this is about the ERG trying to impose its will on the Ppl...The Ppl are wising up. #PeoplesVote 
After today’s awful British pantomime the EU has to take the prospect of a hard Brexit very seriously/likely. May’s weak indulgence of the incompetence of Davis and the lazy malice of Johnson is a sign that Britain cannot or simply will not negotiate. 
The middle is falling out of middle England and the government is turning a blind eye and pretending that Brexit isn’t beginning to kill us off  
Everyone on the panel of #bbcqt And in the audience knows and is admitting Brexit is crap!Not a single unicorn  pusher in the houseYet they all seem to have voted remain but now think we have to leave no matter how bad!So so scripted and mirrors somewhat I’ve seen here.Fake 
Today was the 135th day parliament has sat since the general election.No Brexit legislation is yet law.There are only 40 more sitting days before MPs are expected to debate the final Brexit deal.Half the Brexit legislation hasn't been introduced yet.  
Richard Madeley seems like a nice person, but some of the things he is saying here are factually inaccurate. YoY GDP growth down to 1.2%,Q1 0.1%,Loss of FDI,Polling post referendum indicated that leave voters thought we were staying in the single market.  #bbcqt 
The weasel words of Theresa May - ‘deep and special relationship with the EU’ which we have already! & without the vast expense, destructiveness & pointlessness of Brexit - merely disgust. The whole Brexit thing is just so unbelievably stupid.  
Boris, the ‘millennium bug’ was headed off by one of the great civil engineering exercises of our time - billions of lines of code were rewritten and exhaustively tested. What’s your plan for Brexit ? 
yes - crushed by the bureaucracy who are 100% pro-EU + see Brexit as a disaster to be mitigated not an opportunity to be seized. even if she went you'd need to clear out defeatist/pessimistic top civil service + implement positive pro-growth, pro-worker agenda#PositivePopulism 
A vague question with no one knowing what Brexit meant allowing Leave to talk about the Norway model during the EU ref campaign & to insist there will be frictionless trade & giving Remain nothing to argue against isn't democracy. #BBCQT 
Yes. Why is the weekly £350m for the NHS not being delivered come hell or high water in the teeth of every difficulty with dogged resolution despite everything etc etc etc? (i.e. like Brexit...which is costing even more!)  
Boris Johnson has been secretly recorded accusing the Treasury of being 'the heart of Remain' and trying to ruin Brexit.He also said fears that a clean break with the EU would cause major trade disruption were 'mumbo jumbo'.Here's what else he said:  
You almost feel sorry for May having to deal with these incompetent egomaniacs,  until you remember she appointed them & she chose, needlessly, a hard #Brexit.  
Boris Johnson attacked Theresa May’s Brexit policy and praised Trump in leaked remarks from a private dinner  
Boris Johnson 'warns of Brexit meltdown'  
Another iconic Sun page, reflecting precisely the mood of the country #brexit  
A big fat lie from Damian Hinds. It's been made very clear from the EU that we can scrap Brexit if we like. We are the ones shooting ourselves in the feet, they are not the aggressors. #bbcqt 
The most significant finding of any Scottish survey or poll since the Brexit vote. @ScotCen @NatCen #ssa 
Why is Theresa May handling Brexit so badly? This is why. #bbcqt 
Innocent Smoothie man was terrible at politics during the referendum but he keeps going, getting worse. @bbcquestiontime 
Post colonial folly from the Fields of Eton. Only its greatest alumnus - George Orwell - could recognise the absolutist idiocy of his fellows. From 1956, Anthony Eden and Suezto 2018, Boris Johnson and BrexitRIP: the British Empire.  
Good way to end this messy Brexit day with a quote from Peter Bone on #newsnight: “I don’t care, I just wanna come out” 
"We're becoming a global laughing stock"@MirrorAlison says the Brexit negotiations have been shambolic #bbcqt 
BuzzFeed News has obtained a recording of Boris Johnson speaking to Tories at a closed-door gathering, where he gave an extraordinarily unguarded assessment of the UK’s foreign policy strategy, the Brexit state of play, and more. Here's what it sounded like.  
Nobody can say what was in the minds of the broad spectrum of people who opted for BrexitEven if some people imagined all EU citizens would be immediately deported, we'd suddenly be living in the 1950s and their hair and virility would return, so what?  They're wrong#bbcqt 
The reason Brexit isn't easy is because a largely ill informed electorate were invited to vote on something they didn't understand. Government knows that. And they know leave will fuck this country up. But nobody has the fucking balls to say it out loud #bbcqt 
"If you stay in the single market and the customs union, you're not leaving"@richardm56 says it is now time for proper leadership over delivering Brexit #bbcqt 
“I’d say there is a non-negligible chance that we might end up with this hard Brexit, not because people want it but because they can’t agree on what they’d rather have instead” - @FraserNelson #newsnight 
# bbcqt It says it all when a Remainer like Richard Madeley, who is non political turns around and says what a bollocks the PM is making of Brexit. Madeley even said people who voted Brexit did not vote to stay in the Customs Union and Single Market, somebody saying the truth.  
“Imagine Trump doing Brexit,” [UK Foreign Secretary] Johnson said. “He’d go in bloody hard… There’d be all sorts of breakdowns, all sorts of chaos. Everyone would think he’d gone mad. But actually you might get somewhere. It’s a very, very good thought.” 
Despite being soooooooo highly educated, the 48% never heard anybody saying Brexit meant leaving the single market and customs union.#BBCqt 
Millionth thing we weren't told before the referendum  
“It’s not even a soft Brexit, we’re not coming out” - @PeterBoneUK on the UK government’s proposed ‘backstop’ plan #newsnight 
Ex-prime minister Gordon Brown said Britain could be "paralysed" for years because Westminster parties have not "woken up" to the causes of Brexit #bbcqt  
Reflect on this : by her own admission to her own MPs tonight Theresa May says the #Brexit choice to which she has led her country is between the “unacceptable” & the “unpalatable”.  But there is actually a third choice  - the un-Brexit option which would also be un- May ! 
Anyone who disagrees with Boris Johnson's comments are not dealing in reality I am afraid. The same things are being said by thousands of members in our party & millions of people around the UK. The people of our great country deserve alot better. #Brexit #Conservatives 
.@NicolaSturgeon: "As well as the terms of Brexit being clear, I think we have a duty to set out the case for independence." #scotnight #SNP18 
If anything sums up the lack of understanding of NI of those responsible for negotiating #Brexit this is it.I live as far from the border as you can in NI and cross it about 10/12 times a month. If you live at the border, that's daily or weekly. #brexitshambles #breckless 
Kurdistan’s referendum was the right move at the right time, especially for places like Kirkuk, Shingal or Khanaqin. Iraq would’ve taken over those regions with or without the vote. But before that happened, the people could make their desire clear to the world. In black & white. 
The government is deeply unpopular. The Leave EU people have gone openly mad, likewise the UKIP people and the Brexit "personalities" like Mensch and er.... Carswell and er... anyway... The rest are all scattered. If there was a second referendum I'm certain "stay" would win. 
The winning margin for a border poll is 50.1%. That's it. If it's good enough for the Scots, Brexit and GFA then it's good enough for a UI. 
Rubbishing Theresa May and joking that Brexit is a mess. Just the kind of thing to guarantee Boris Johnson a promotion in this government 
I was one if many who worked on Y2K. Nobody noticed anything because nothing happened.Nothing happened because we fixed things.We fixed things because we understood the problemWe understood the problem because we didn't deny it's existence.Does *that* sound like Brexit? 
It is becoming very clear that the end result of the Brexit negotiations will be the UK as a helot state of the EU bound by all its laws and regulations but without representation on decision-making bodies. Westminster will agree to this and pay up endless billions. Betrayal. 
So Boris Johnson ensures Theresa May's catastrophic day comes to an end with him being secretly taped saying Donald Trump should handle Brexit & not so secretly saying Theresa May needs to show some guts. If you vote for these people it's time to have a word with yourself. #BBCQT 
Lie-ability Boris Johnson admitting Brexit will probably l be “far worse” than the deal he promised is the terrible admission of an entitled deceitful idiot who took folk for fools. Let’s overthrow the fibber and his fib 
I’m in the middle of three exit seats on this Azerbaijan Airlines plane. The people either side of me have just moved to other seats on the plane! Do I smell? Was it something I said? Is it cos I voted Brexit?! Not that I’m complaining. 
Boris Johnson says Trump could handle Brexit better and warns of 'meltdown' in explosive leaked recording  
Boris Johnson on Brexit:“You’ve got to face the fact there may now be a meltdown. I don’t want anybody to panic during the meltdown. No panic. Pro bono publico, no bloody panic.” Usually when someone tells you not to panic, it’s the time to panic. 
Oh my days.Let Trump Handle Brexit... An Explosive Leaked Recording Reveals Boris Johnson’s Private Views About Brexit, Trump And Russia  via @alexGspence #BBCQT 
'Hard Brexit Boris'... is just a self-serving lying opportunist tosser! #BBCQT 
Telegraph reporting poor relationship between May and Trump. Boris Johnson speech criticising her approach to Brexit and praising Trump.  Any other PM would sack him. But she is too weak to do that. What a pathetic shambles. 
Corbyn must know that Labour will sooner or later have to oppose Brexit -but he must also know when that happens he will be history. 
Boris can’t believe the Irish border has been allowed to dictate Brexit policy. He called it the tail wagging the dog.I can’t believe Boris is still Foreign Secretary so there we go. 
Boris Johnson has told a dinner of Conservative Way Forward donors that #Brexit is in danger of being sold out. Every Brexiter will agree with every word of this. At last a Cabinet minister stands up for Brexit.  
For both Tory and Labour leaderships, #Brexit is simply about trying to keep their parties together. Hang the interests of the country. Outrageous. 
Just heard Steve Bray on @BBCNews @ 10pm shouting:"SSSSSTTTTTOOOOOPPPP #BREXIT!"Epic job.Well Done!@SODEMAction 
How history books will remember Theresa May:Failed JAMs promiseHeld hands with nutter TrumpAllowed Brexit ChaosToo weak to manage ministersWindrush/Grenfell scandalsPolice cuts, crime increaseNHS cuts, deaths increaseMassive increase in destitutionWeak & Wobbly#bbcqt 
Calm down people. What Alan Duncan ACTUALLY SAID was that we COULD have a referendum with a choice of:1 Leaving with the deal or...2 Leaving with no deal!So before the remoaners crack the champagne this could lead to the hardest of hard Brexits. Fine by me#Brexit #backstop 
Chatham house rules would allow someone to leak a transcript but not attribute it, and then we'd have to guess who on earth could have said all that stuff about foreign policy and Brexit in a stream of conscioussness peppered with Latin. 
Screwing around with referendum dates to ensure you'll have a more favorable, lower-turnout electorate should be illegal. The only thing worse than this was NC GOP scheduling the 2012 same-sex marriage ban for when the GOP had a competitive presidential primary & Dems didn't  
Boris comparing the doomsday Brexit to Y2K again. The reason is simple, IT companies threw money and all their best people at the Y2K issues for years before.They did not appoint a couple of mouthy dimwits and hope for the best.. 
Bank Of America is refurbishing an 11,000 square metre office in the French capital to create a European trading hub that will serve clients once Britain leaves the EU in March. The building has capacity for more than 700 people and staff in London are being notified. #Brexit 
On the morning of the vote nearly two years ago, I tried to get myself to accept #Brexit. After two hours of brain ache I gave up and haven’t stopped fighting it ever since.  
Boris #Johnson : "Let Trump Handle Brexit" : An explosive leaked recording reveals."I am increasingly admiring of Donald Trump." Now we know Johnson's bonkers  
Both Davis and Johnson are looking to escape the blood bath about to engulf the Tory party. They are both savvy enough to know Brexit is about to implode and they want to avoid the blame. 
  Is this just a coincidence? #EU #UK #Brexit  
Brexit is so embarrassing - it’s like storming out of a room and then having to creep back in once you’ve realised you walked into a cupboard. 
Theresa May must show more guts on Brexit or the UK will be locked in orbit around EU:  
My colleague once again proving he's worth his salt as one of the best Brexit commentators out there.He’s bang on: from the Irish border to a ‘level playing field’, the EU wants to tie us to its orbit as closely as possible - why would they move beyond this ‘backstop’ position?  
It is on days like this that I am relieved I have not uttered a single word - not in an article or a tweet or in a broadcast - that has not been resolutely hostile to the madness that is Brexit. 
Christ, we are screwed. This is the Foreign Sec yesterday on Brexit negs: “You’ve got to face the fact there may now be a meltdown. OK? I don’t want anybody to panic during the meltdown. No panic. Pro bono publico, no bloody panic. It’s going to be all right in the end.”  
Given that your Government has produced several scenarios all of which say Brexit is going to be negative or in the case of walking away massively negative what evidence are you going to supply that this will save the U.K. a single penny?  
Trying to keep up with whether David Davis is quitting or not is like#Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Whisper it, but is Geordie Greig about to change the tone of Brexit Britain? | The Independent "Like so many of the Brexiteers, Theresa May might miss Dacre when he's gone" - we certainly won't! Good bloody riddance! 
In which a leaked tape of Boris Johnson warns there could be a Brexit meltdown, and Trump would be going in harder ...  
Johnson on Brexit: “I don’t want anybody to panic during the meltdown. No panic. Pro bono publico, no bloody panic” #sunlituplands  
Leak of fascinating & refreshingly sensible roundup by @BorisJohnson: “Govt so terrified of short-term economic disruption that it’s at risk of throwing away the opportunities presented by Brexit.” Border issues are “pure millennium bug stuff”.  
I really wanted Theresa May to succeed and to fight for Brexit even if it means another election. But this is not Brexit, it's betrayal. It's not compromise, it's capitulation. Conservatives must challenge her now #MayMustGo 
Today has been a very bad day for #Brexit Probably the worst it's had so far.Let's hope for more days like this!And a #PeoplesVote leading to an #ExitFromBrexit 
Putting remainer Geordie Greig in at the Daily Mail isn’t just big news it is revolutionary. This changes everything for Brexit and the consequences could be historic. 
honking at the idea that a remain ed at the mail will stop brexit rather than immediately begin to mine the deep deep seams of racism and bigotry that run through fbpe for all their worth 
Poll: Do you feel betrayed by #theresaMay On #Brexit? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
The darkest days for Brexit are the brightest days for our country  
May and the rest of the Brexit sellouts need to go now.  
Ignite the Boris. Mind you. Has a point on Trump and Brexit. Trump would have set fire to Article 50 + trolled Barnier until he retired hurt 
Cracking day meeting farmers in Cumbria, including the indomitable @JRfromStrickley. As one sheep man told me, 'these stonewalls aren't here for butterflies, they're here for livestock. Take the sheep away and they crumble'. Brexit always in view  
Relations between corporate Britain and the government are not so good (again) because of Brexit  
BREAKING: Brexit is over. I might be out of a job.  
This makes no sense you dimwit, I don't like May as she is moving the party towards social democrats, replacing freer markets, defending capitalism, small Gov, low taxes & personal responsibility choice for nanny statism, this isn't Conservatism! Oh & unnecessarily fudging brexit  
But many of us who voted remain accept the referendum result and are no longer remainers. I'm not sure you are right in your assumption. Theresa May has set red lines and has stuck to them. But perhaps we have to realise time has come for us to walk away from EU. 
Boris Johnson demolished Theresa May's Brexit plan at private meeting of Tory donors 
This right here is the biggest traitor to the British People.  #TheresaMay abandoning her rational, informed political beliefs to jump on a rickety band wagon to #Brexit unicorn fantasy land has doomed the UK and the future of her party with it! #toriesout #StopBrexit  
Peter Bone takes HUGE pop at REMOANERS in government after Brexit backstop revealed   
We’ll be doing an article tomorrow on how our followers are feeling about Theresa May’s handling of Brexit. Good, bad, ugly, we wanna hear from you. Let us know  
Boris Warns Brexit is in Danger of Being Sold Out  via @GuidoFawkes 
#MayMustGo I've been giving her the benefit of the doubt. I thought she was sincere when she said Brexit means Brexit. But I'm on the turn - and I'm sure that millions feel the same way. @BorisJohnson @michaelgove @DavidDavisMP 
If you think I’m stupid enough to get excited about England scoring a banger against some Caribbean farmers then you are absolutely right. Footballs coming home. Brexit means Brexit   
Alan Duncan should be sacked for saying this.Where in the Tory Manifesto of last year did it say  the Tories will hold a referendum on the final Brexit deal?If Maggie was in charge he would be out of the door by now.@theresa_may  is #WeakWeakWeak 
A week is a long time in politics (sk the saying goes) and even longer in the world of Brexit!So after this weeks news is Brexit likely to be :Please #retweet for a wide sample#Brexit #stopbrexit #PeoplesVote 
Let me explain it simple for you...so even you can understand.  Brexit voters don’t want anything to do with May’s backstop.  We would far rather take WTO and pay the EU nothing...  
New Daily Mail editor is a huge remainer.Remainer Tories are trudgingly implementing a Brexit they know to be insane.Now they'll be persecuted, correctly, by the Mail, for every harm they inflict on the country by Brexiting?YES, I WILL HAVE POPCORN! 
To be clear, this is Rt Hon Sir Alan Duncan MP, FCO Europe Minister, who backed Remain, and who last year said Brexit was down to working class voters 'throwing a tantrum'.  Appointed by Theresa May.  
Top @BuzzFeedNews scoop: @alexGspence has got a leaked recording of Boris Johnson at a private dinner last night talking about Brexit, Trump and Russia  
So there you have it then, the constant whining about Brexit going badly because of Remain supporters has absolutely no basis in reality at all. Brexit is simply a  disaster because it was, & continue to be, an extremely bad & totally unrealistic idea from the very start. 
Tonight the Government have tabled a series of amendments inc one that removes the meaningful vote. It is vital Parliament has a meaningful vote inc in the event of no deal with the EU. Wasn’t Brexit about Parliament getting back control? 
In other words @MayorofLondon you accept responsibility but, er, don’t. Londoners see zero leadership. Londoners see a weak, frightened police force (sorry, service) with priorities seriously askew. Forget Brexit. Forget Trump. Concentrate on upholding law & order  
DD threatens to quit, Alan Duncan floats 2nd referendum, now Boris attacks Treasury as 'heart of Remain'. Lots of competition, but cd this be govt's most chaotic day? 
Geordie Greig to be new Editor of The Daily Mail. Greig is a Remainer who currently edits the anti-Brexit Mail on Sunday. That's fairly interesting 
To be clear, the backstop is the only way UK has found to leave the EU and TM just called it 'unpalatable' *find synonyms*To our PM, #Brexit is now regrettable, unwelcome, upsetting, distressing, lamentable, repugnant, nasty, horrible, dreadful, hateful, distasteful and foul.  
Liam Fox - "there has never been a period where government have been asked to do such complex things as we're been asked to do around the #brexit process"Liam Fox 2017 -  a post-Brexit free trade deal with the EU should be the “easiest in human history”#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Post Brexit UK will become a 2nd hand dealer in used EU car regulations. A rule taker because the EU calls the shots at the UN’s global vehicle standard’s body. Read my blog on how Brexit will reduce our influence over life saving rules for car safety.  
Daily Mail shifting from Brexit to Remain maybe beginning of end of #BrexitBroadcastingCorporation. Eg retirement of John Humphrys, now he has no Paul Dacre to recite every morning? 
An Explosive Leaked Recording Reveals Boris Johnson’s Private Views About Brexit, Trump And Russia  
David Davis: a fantasist in charge of a fantasy Brexit | Suzanne Moore  
It's difficult to emphasise how much of a potential political earthquake this is.IF Daily Mail starts shifting its stance on #Brexit then the pressure on May & the Tories for a rethink will be enormous. Shares in a #PeoplesVote & an #ExitFromBrexit have just shot up in value. 
“Activists in Washington State are busy gathering signatures in the hopes of putting a universal health care system on the ballot for a referendum in 2018.”  (1/6)#YesOn1600 
Look at the Referendum campaign it wasVery Clear in almostEvery rally,Every speech,Every television debatePeople were saying,Leaving #EU meantLeaving Customs Union &Leaving Single MarketTo free ourselves & Cut all ties with Brussels#Brexit #Leave 
Tomorrow's front page: BREXIT IS A DISASTER WE ARE SO SORRY IT'S THE LAST GUY'S FAULT HONEST.  
There simply isn’t Julia. TM is a remainer, as are most MP’s in this country. They are out to derail brexit. We live in a country with limited free speech, and the illusion of democracy 
This is crazy. In her desperation to do a deal at all costs, May has wrecked Brexit and squandered the tories’ political advantage.   
At last a Cabinet minister stands up for Brexit…  
You've summed up truth succinctly & cogently. The federalist under the bed paranoia of Brexiteers is deluded. EU is a pragmatic organisation and not their evil empire EUSSR. Brexit only silver lining will demonstrate that shortly when the EU punchbag no longer exists for tabloids  
Boris Johnson has also blasted Philip Hammond and the Treasury as Remoaners who are not making the best of Brexit:  
EXC BOOM: Boris Johnson has warned that Brexit is in danger of being sold out, that we could get a deal that is unpalatable to Leave voters, and that we could stay in a customs union and closely aligned to EU rules  
EXCLUSIVE: Boris Warns Brexit is in Danger of Being Sold Out  
Today has not been a good day for Brexit.  
Reality check: It would always be impossible for the UK to participate in the building of Galileo once our own ministers and diplomats at UKrep in Brussels had stupidly allowed the EU to militarise the project in November 2016 as a ‘goodwill gesture’ after the Brexit vote.  
Boris Johnson's deputy, Alan Duncan, now says that a people's vote on the final Brexit deal is possible. Let's make sure the option to Remain is on the table too. Sign-up here:  
Last year Liam Fox said a post-Brexit trade deal should be the “easiest in human history”.  Not sure we’re in the most competent hands.  #BrexitChaos 
Michel Barnier (Chief Brexit negotiator for the EU) just asked me "Where did you learn to speak French like that, without at trace of an English accent?". Clearly he's not used to Brits with the skills for international dialogue....COUGH- "David Davis" - COUGH 
The main "achievements" of PM May to date in delivering Brexit?To introduce a two year "transition period" no one voted for.To introduce an indefinite "backstop" no one voted for.She IS a Remainer, lock stop and barrel. 
Very interesting question whether Geordie Greig as new editor of Daily Mail is good or bad for @theresa_may. It's definitely bad for the True Brexiters, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and @BorisJohnson. But she will be under less media pressure to tack towards hard Brexit 
Introducing #Brexit Tracker with timeline and post-ref polls and whether Britons think vote to leave was "right" or "wrong". Last 15 polls have lead for "wrong" to leave. Thanks to @PropertySpot @Jim_Cornelius @SybilleRompe @fascinatorfun @StatisticSingh @sumisuki for feedback. 
It appears that Brexit and the UK are not compatible going forward. It looks increasingly likely England’s Brexit will have to be cancelled or the UK will have to break up to facilitate the Brexit England wants. 
How many times do we have to tell Leavers, including politicians who should know better, that the right to oppose is fundamental to democracy, and that where it is denied democracy dies.#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
The choice facing the UK is between the “unacceptable” and the “unpalatable,” according to Theresa May. It’s no wonder she can’t bring herself to say Brexit will be worth it.  
UK Government proposes to the EU “that the territory of the UK would form part of the EU’s customs territory or creating a new customs territory comprising the customs territories of the UK and the EU”Brexit: from serious but not desperate to desperate but not serious  
Latest @Telegraph cartoon #DavidDavis #Brexit #Backstop #TheresaMay 
Some would say the PM deliberately dragged her feet over brexit. Either way, it was never to be driven by someone who's heart was to remain. TM you've failed the will of your people. It's been a shambles. Leave the  front door keys on your way out. 
Bottom of p2 - PM admits that her policy represents the choice between the unpalatable and the unacceptable. What happened to the land of milk and honey @BorisJohnson? Brexit has become disaster management and damage limitation.  
To the voters of the "safe" Labour seat of Lewisham East: speak for all of us when you vote in the by election next week and tell Corbyn what you think of his "jobs first Brexit" bollocks  
Huge implications for the Daily Mail’s editorial positioning on Brexit. The likely new editor of the Daily Mail, Geordie Greig, is a staunch Remainer. 
#quote "The contentious plan was amended at the last minute to say the proposed arrangement shd not extend beyond December 2021 – a year after the end of the Brexit transition period."She's kicking the can down the road - *again*I don't think people are going to stand for this.  
Shout out to the 6% of voters who thought Brexit would go well and still think it is. The power of faith. 
73% of all British voters and even 70% of Leave voters now think Brexit is going badly.  
This is @theresa_may’s letter to try sell what happened today. It’s remarkable for many reasons. But look at the yellow bits. I really have no more words left in my vocabulary to say something about this complete and utter Brexit madness. [Letter via @SamCoatesTimes] 
Watching any political debate on Television it’s likeThe Remainers won the Referendum.Each show has barely any Leaver MPs or supporters.Any Tories that are on voted Remain.No sign of any Leave Cabinet ministers.It’s a stitch up.17.4 million are going to be incensed. 
3 in 20 Leave voters think Brexit is going well. Have you met the 1 in 20 Remainer who agrees?  
& learn something about the EU! I've heard @theresa_may bollocking on about taking back control of our money, our borders & our laws. We have the £, set our own interest rates, control our own borders and make our own laws! Brexit is a travesty. 
UK Brexit Paper published today - a step forward on customs element of “Irish Backstop” text, but still work to do to achieve progress for June Summit #Brexit.   
Everyone thinks Brexit is going badly, the latest @YouGov poll shows. Remainers and Leavers are united in the knowledge that it is a mess.MPs must #StopBrexit and call a #PeoplesVote with an #OptionToRemain. 
So we have one Minister showing how weak Theresa May is and another saying a second referendum is a possibility. Yes, we have our divisions on Brexit, but these clowns are supposed to be running the country. The Tory party is in one hell of a crisis. #ToryBrexitShambles 
Why we will defeat Brexit in a people’s vote  
Interesting: Brexit referendum on final deal possible, says Conservative minister  
Broken Brexit. It’s just not working. Even Tories admitting it. This isn’t what people voted for. Time to think again.  
For 2 yrs the Govt has pushed the narrative that Brexit can't be stopped, that a referendum on the final Brexit deal isn't possible & that even if it were it would be undemocratic.Today, FCO Minister @AlanDuncanMP effectively admitted that's all nonsense 
Those who,follow me will know I am non-tribal - work with Tories, backed VL - but today shown Tory top brass as a disgrace to Brexit voters.  
IF the Tories do push forward with the Brexit Bill and without the consent of the Scottish Parliament, they will be opening a door that they can never close. 
Breaking: Referendum on modernizing how BC voters elect MLAs moves forward. BC government approves Attorney General's recommendations on #ProRep referendum. #bcpoli #pr4bc 
What comes closest to your view on how well Brexit is going? All Brits: 10% well, 73% badly Remain: 5% well, 85% badlyLeave: 16% well, 70% badly 
My decision to vote Brexit was well in advance of what Dominic Cummings said or did. I joined other Britons who chose full British sovereignty over EU federalism.   
In December @Jacob_Rees_Mogg told the PM he was concerned her red lines were ‘beginning to look a little bit pink’. He urged her to ‘apply a new coat of paint’ before she next goes to Brussels.Yet the ERG continue to tolerate more compromises and a further diluting of Brexit. 
If confirmed, this has extremely interesting implications for Daily Mail’s stance on Brexit. Under Greig, Mail on Sunday has been strongly pro-Remain  
Does your MP back giving you the FINAL SAY on Brexit, including the chance to stay in the E.U.? Amendment 19a gives the public the final say on Brexit -ask your MP to get behind it: #ExitfromBrexit 
So the lesson of the David Davis debacle today is that more compromises and a further softening of Brexit is on the way. 
Knew it. There’s gonna be a second referendum. Almost a certainty now. Get your walking boots on @Nigel_Farage, I’ll fire up the Quattro.#LetsGo 
BBC News - House of Fraser to close 31 stores . How strange the BBC does not mention Brexit, which House of Fraser blames in it’s official press release. More BBC bias. Brexit is the elephant in the room that the BBC dare not talk about. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
There's a consistent theme with Brexit. Every couple of weeks, an issue emerges that is "existential" for Brexiters. ERG-supporting MPs talk tough, threaten leadership coups and say they won't go along with any compromise, at all. The situation looks bleak. 
David Cameron's Referendum neded a Yes/No. Did Cameron gamble that people were so thick they wouldn't know what they were voting for and tick "Remain" out of fear. Turns out 17.4 million people were smarter than he thought, knew EXACTLY what they were voting for, & ticked "LEAVE"  
Matt on will David Davis resign over Brexit deal – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Brexit referendum on final deal possible, Foreign Office minister says - we believe that it is not just possible, but it is essential which is why we're having a March for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal on 23rd June!  
From @YouGov: when asked about how #Brexit is progressing, only one in ten Brits (10%) said they think it is going well, and three quarters (73%) think it is going badly... 
Imagine if the SNP won a referendum on independence only to find that the House of Lords stopped it happening & that they'd have to settle for independence in name only. This isn't democratic, nor is it tenable 
Now even Foreign Office deputies say that a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal is possibleJoin us on June 23 to demand that vote. The future of the UK should be decided by the 65 million, not just by 650 MPsRSVP, and let's make history: Please RT! 
Nadine Dorries MP - "We have people who are trying to perpetuate the myth that people didn’t know what they were voting for, and were in fact probably voting to stay in the single market and the customs union."People are telling downright lies when they say that." #Brexit  
Brexit Farse : Farage kids ask German passports. Lawson (Head Leave Campaign) ask French residency. Paul Dacre leaves the Daily Mail . David Davis wants to quit.. All Leavers want to Leave UK as Brexit becomes reality in 2019 
LONDON MAYORSadiq Khan's two years in office has cost Londoners dearly: Broken promises, spiralling crime wave & higher taxes. However, there's been lots of: Red carpet appearances, anti-Brexit posturing & his office has pumped out huge amounts of self-congratulatory propaganda.  
DD vs TM on Brexit is getting that "man convinced he can assemble IKEA thing without reading instructions, vs partner who knows he really can't" vibe 
Just another Brexit supporting @scottishlabour MP worried that independence is going to wreck their plans to increase poverty. 
"What an absolute & utter farce this has become."WATCH: @SDoughtyMP doesn't hold back as he slams the Gov's infighting over Brexit negotiations.  
Remainers are stealing our Brexit and nobody in the cabinet has the balls to do anything about it.  
Hold your horses ... This is the FULL @AlanDuncanMP quote today on possibility of a referendum on final deal...  
Why Labour could back a Brexit people's vote  
My tiny cameo in today's #Brexit excitement - annoying @MichelBarnier about the British customs proposal as he arrived to speak to trainees at the European Parliament. 
Time, Gentlemen, Please!EU official: “A backstop that would be strictly time-limited would defeat the purpose of a backstop.”Note to EU:Our Backstop is #Leave #EU & Go #WTOWTO currently has 164 members responsible for 95% of World Trade.#Brexit #EU 
What a rubbish offer. Remain MUST be an option, obviously! - otherwise this is a cynical gesture worth nothing. “Brexit referendum on final deal possible, Foreign Office minister says - The Independent  
Brexit leaders prove that the campaign to leave the EU was entirely driven by self-interests  via @LondonEconomic 
Alan Duncan is absolutely right to back the idea of a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. As a Foreign Office minister, and deputy to Boris Johnson, he must know as well as anybody what an utter shambles Brexit has become.Everyone needs to see this. Pls RT:  
There is yet more chaos in Gov as Boris Johnson's deputy throws his support behind a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Absolutely everyone needs to see this. Please RT:  
The problem with Mayism is that you eventually run out of time to negotiate Brexit  
May should take swift action on this. We don't need a second referendum. We need to start planning for Britain's post-Brexit future.  
My speech today at Europarl Culture Committee condemning the PM for rolling over to Brussels in Brexit talks.  
Stop kidding yourself. Corbyn no more wants the single market than he wants to stop Brexit, doesn’t want to Remain. He isn’t even going to soften it. He’s a Brexiteer. He wants a Hard Brexit and the economic collapse which will follow it. 
Brexit referendum on final deal possible, Foreign Office minister says  
"It would, I suppose, just be possible to ask the people in a referendum if they liked the exit deal or not."Boris Johnson's number 2 at the Foreign Office, @AlanDuncanMP, appears to be backing a #PeoplesVoteWill Boris back his number 2 & call for a #PeoplesVote? 
An Irish backstop and a customs union will never be the Brexit that people voted for, says @OwenPaterson 
This is turning into Brexit's darkest day:Britain could be stuck in EU for another year and pay for the privilegeBoris John's deputy Alan Duncan says there might be a second refendumPending: Government amendments ahead of Tuesday's vote 
Since the backstop fudge was agreed... - No10 has admitted ongoing payments to the EU are possible if it comes into force- A govt minister, Alan Duncan, has said there could be a second referendum on the deal 
new chant for rusha we’ve conquered all the boozerswe’re never gonna stop fanny tits and brexit we’ve had the fucking lot nags head and the strawberry the locals down the roadpour us pints of carling so we fucking neck em all   allez allez allez 
Theresa May's latest Brexit plan not 'workable solution', Guy Verhofstadt says  
If Theresa May sacked her pro Brexit cabinet ministers and went to the country on a #remain ticket she'd get a 100 seat majority.Is that idea insane?Just asking. #FBPE 
Lifelong Tory and member. Backed May throughout the Brexit despite fudge after delay after compromise after surrender. Backstop fudge is last straw. Boris, Gove, Javid, heck just about anyone (no not you Soubry); you have my vote if you challenge#Brexit #TheresaMay #Backstop 
“Completely unacceptable for people who voted Brexit... if it looks like and sounds like a customs union, it is a customs union, some people call it a fudge, it not its conceding what the EU want,” says Bone of backstop 
Brussels losing patience with UK government #Brexit fudges. My thoughts   
EU Withdrawal Bill | To those who have contacted my office asking whether I will back Amendment 19(a) of the #EUWithdrawalBill. I confirm I'll be supporting this.Amendment 19(a) seeks to ensure the British people have a final say on any #Brexit deal. Full response below.   
It's just over a year now since Theresa May said "You can only deliver Brexit, if you believe in Brexit."She campaigned for Remain, has next to no positivity about opportunities outside the EU, and now seems incapable of standing up to the EU while negotiating.She was right.  
5 slides on the #Brexit #Backstop for Northern Ireland/Ireland from @DPhinnemore and me. 1. Why there will be a Backstop in the Withdrawal Agreement.Plus a synopsis of the EU and UK positions on the matter.(Thread 1/6) 
“DD needs to be completely in charge of Brexit...carry on as we are it will be Brexit in Name Only, totally unacceptable.. When May was elected we were given impression Davis, Boris & Fox running it, turned out a cabal of officials and Spads are leading us to No Brexit” says Bone 
The “definitive arrangement” is an FTA or walk away. Always has been. This backstop issue is one the EU has created as a trap and you know that full well.Who starts a deal by talking about what you’ll do if you don’t get a deal? The only answer can ever be: WALK AWAY#Brexit  
Tory MP and Brexiter Peter Bone tells me that the promised statue of the “Brexit Queen” Theresa May in Wellingborough “may never get built if we go along with the backstop because we’ll never get out [of the EU]” 
Nigel Dodds MP, DUP deputy leader: "Theresa May has stuck to her word that no PM could countenance a border in the Irish Sea... our red line has not been breached." #Backstop #Brexit 
Pissed off with these planks trying to hang Brexit on Corbyn. I voted Remain. I'm still voting for Corbyn's Labour.  
Replies from potential guests today are dynamite. Another one... Producer: Can you come and talk Brexit with Iain on the show this afternoon.Potential Guest: No. I am judging a fox hounds contest... 
Newly released UK technical note on data protection for the Brexit negotiations. Try not to spit out your coffee at the last bit.  
Think I was the first lobby journalist to anticipate 1) Rise of UKIP 2) Brexit. Today I feel the conditions are in place for a further very substantial anti-establishment revolt. UKIP may or may not be the vehicle but something is now brewing and awaiting the right outlet. 
Guys, you can’t even organise a festival let alone negotiate Brexit.  
Difficult to see how UK proposal on customs aspects of IE/NI backstop will deliver a workable solution to avoid a hard border & respect integrity of the SM/CU. A backstop that is temporary is not a backstop, unless the definitive arrangement is the same as the backstop. #Brexit 
Brexit Explained  
Gordon Brown has come up with proposals that address some of the fears about free movement that led to #Brexit. All of them can be achieved without quitting EU. 
Brexit will damage the UK. We know this from government’s own impact assessments.We also know that EEA *and* Customs Union is the least damaging Brexit.We also know the EU won’t allow cherry-picking.@SadiqKhan is spot on to say the Commons should back the Lords’ amendments. 
Ooops. A classic own goal from the First Minister. Exports ARE up - because of Brexit vote weakening the pound!   
This is what a real "long game" for Remain looks like:1. Vote for EEA amendment, thereby ensuring Hard Brexit and No Deal are off the table.2. Force a #PeoplesVote on the EEA deal vs Remain.3. Explain that EEA means membership with no say.4. Argue for full Remain, and win. 
But we had a referendum and people voted for an extra £350 million a week for the NHS ....  
#Brexit Investment in Britain’s car industry has already halved since the 2016 Brexit vote, falling to £1.1bn last year, compared to £2.5bn in 2015. via @FT 
Theresa May accused of deceiving Ministers over Brexit  
Dear Prime Minister @10DowningStreet , Re. New customs ‘arrangement’.  This isn’t #Brexit. Time for you to go - now.  
Imagine for a minute being one of those remainiac MPs doing their utmost to sell the country down the river and weaken UK plc negotiations, after all said and done the time to get behind #Brexit was the day after the referendum. 
If the Shindler judgment on 5 July is that expats were unfairly denied their vote, they should be sent ballot papers & the result should be tallied to the referendum totals. Interesting to see what Brexiters would say to the same % the other way round. 
DO something, Prime Minister @theresa_may. Your pathetic inaction re Brexit is paralysing this country. Make decisions & move us forward. 
Do you know your Brexit from your breakfast? Your single market from your customs union? Or are you bored by it all?This Monday from 7pm I'll be taking your questions on Brexit via Facebook Live ahead of some important votes in Parliament. I hope to see you there!  
My open letter to @Keir_Starmer: Forget the fudge & cakeism, it will only deliver hard Brexit on a plate to the Tories. Back the Lords' amendment on remaining in the single market.  
Theresa May has caved into David Davis, a PM with any backbone would have sent him to the backbenches, she bows down to her Cabinet day in and day out, how can we trust her to get a #Brexit deal in the nations interest, we can't, she's only interested in power, RESIGN #ToriesOut 
Conservative blogger, Robert Barnes writes exclusively for Get Britain Out. MPs must put the country ahead of their personal views, and respect the Referendum result. Voting through the Lords' amendments would be an unforgivable betrayal! 
Nick Clegg - Big British companies tell me privately that #brexit is a disaster but they won't speak out publicly... brexit is just so big there comes a point you just have to speak out & he wishes more would. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Michel Barnier: "My first political endeavour was campaigning in the French referendum for the UK to be accepted into the the European Community. That's why I regret Brexit."  
The evidence is out there that Brexit will bring unemployment, higher prices, chaos to business yet Theresa May is more frightened of upsetting David Davis than doing what is ⁦@BestForBritain⁩ Even hardline Brexiteers should worry now 
If David Davis fails to resign now, it will signal to any EU negotiator for whom, miraculously, the penny has not yet dropped, that he is given to empty threats. #Brexit #GoldMedalSelfOwn 
HEALTH: When the columnist wife of a Tory minister writes in a paper betrothed to the government about a referendum on NHS funding, you know we’re in trouble.  
David Davis standing firm on a backstop date shows just what a sell out this negotiation's become. There shouldn't even be a backstop, a pseudo CU, or even a transition. The Gov't have complicated Brexit by trying to replicate the EU, instead of leaving it. 
BREXITEERS AT WAR: A senior brexit-supporting gvt source: "DD claims of victory are simply delusional. He has once again been outmanoeuvred and outwitted by Robbins and his officials. Even Barnier is now expressing sympathy for him. It's beyond a joke now." 
Jenkyns: Let's be more vocal about 'No Deal' Brexit and show EU we won't accept crumbs.    
What’s the point of voting to “take back control” when the political class we entrust subvert it only to take control themselves. Brexit is dead in the water under May and we should be furious. Instead, we have #LoveIsland and #WorldCup2018 
Brexiteers fear a 'Hotel California Brexit’  where we check out but never leave  
So Theresa May has rolled over for David Davis and his demands on the Customs Union, a self titled strong and stable leader is at the mercy of her whole Cabinet, weak, weak, weak, she and her party are dragging us to #Brexit oblivion, will someone fucking stop this #ToriesOut 
It may be politically intolerable but unless you and all your Brexit colleagues get busy and do something about TM & her Remain Cabinet then the intolerable will be our reality.  
Former Conservative minister Stephen Dorrell is joining the March for a #PeoplesVote on June 23rd because he believes it should be up to the people, not just 650 MPs, to decide whether the Brexit deal is one we support.JOIN THE MARCH:  #peoplesvotemarch 
David Davis acknowledges that Sinn Féin is “playing a strong political role” in Brexit negotiations that he “hadn’t foreseen”Damn Right We Are #SpecialStatus 
#OllyRobbins #backstop does not work, his hybrid model does not work, @theresa_may's trajectory towards close alignment with #Brussels is not a real  #Brexit! Every time #No10 sets a direction of travel it is towards what #Remainers want not what the 52% voted for! #BBC #SKY #LBC 
How can 650 MPs say "I respect referendum result as its the will of the people" when its been proved beyond doubt to be flawed, lies deception, subject to financial cheating, & it was advisory-OUR MPs are part of the problem-by supporting it-they condone it-they perpetuate it 
"It remains vital that a legally-binding backstop is agreed to provide certainty that, in all circumstances, a hard border will be avoided." Tánaiste @simoncoveney today issued a statement on the publication of UK proposals in #Brexit negotiations  
Well it's definitely not the ordinary folk of this country. Tories have failed us on Brexit & seem interested only in playing out a pathetic leadership battle, even as our high streets collapse due to Tory economic failure. We deserve so much more than this #ToryBrexitShambles 
Only the #Tories could brag about spending £12,700,000,000 on killing machines when a) we have millions of children living in poverty b) homelessness is at an all-time high c) our #NHS is crumblingd) the 2 biggest threats to Britain are #Brexit & #ClimateChange#ToriesOut 
#TheresaMay and Davis agree to kick the can even further down the road, proposing another period of satus quo after the post-Brexit transition period - all to give them time to work out what they want and overcome #Tory splits 
It has never been truer that, as May once said, “you can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit…”  
The British public entrusted the political class to deliver a prompt and complete Brexit. That was where it went wrong. They want us to remain and that is what we are doing. 
It was Brexit eve, babe,In the think tankAn old man said to meYou're the border one 
The clock is ticking on the Brexit process and what has David Davis been up to?Threatening to resign. Again.We need a serious government.  
Parliament represents the people of Britain. It has the right to question individuals and hold them to account on matters of public interest. Cheating in the referendum is one of those issues. Vote Leave's refusal to answer the summons is the epitome of hypocrisy.  
Brexit is groundhog day on exactly this point... govt fighting over wish list on our side of the table.  
Number 10's Time Limit is a Fudge of a Fudge of a Fudge, Just Like the Rest of Their Brexit Policy  
So now the UK might remain remain in Europe's customs union until the end of 2021 - 5.5 years after the referendum - and possibly longer. Taxi for the Brextremists 
HMRC said technology for Customs Partnership not ready for 5 years. ie after Brexit backstop end date. 
Support #A50Challenge. Stop this Brexit process before we suffer the national disgrace of a European  Court stopping it for us. END  
If the EU General Court learns in the Shindler hearing that the Govt is claiming in the UK Courts that the UK hasn’t made a constitutionally valid decision to leave the EU & doesn’t need to, then if the UK Court doesn’t pull the plug on Brexit, the EU Court might well do it. 9/  
Brexit was never going to be easy, but MY WORD this government has made a completely and utter hash of every single element of the negotiations so far, a dreadful, weak PM who can't manage her divided Party. The project is failing before its barely begun. A dead parrot. 
Effectively the Shindler case now before the EU Court is a rerun of his UK case, except this time on the basis that the referendum is decisive. EU law, including the principle of equality, will be relevant & an EU Court gets to decide whether A50(1) has legal effect.   7/  
Just seen a Beluga take off from Broughton carrying Airbus wings to Toulouse. Logistics contractor tells me components come in from all over Europe. Rumours abound that the operation might move to France - that’s >4000 jobs (not counting UK suppliers)... Brexit. 
"The Brexit secretary has won the power struggle with Theresa May. Which is a terrible look for the prime minister."@peston explains why the PM's loss to David Davis is a double defeat  
The Davis shambles is the last straw. Whether you’re Leave or Remain NO ONE VOTED FOR A CLUSTER**** Brexit that will destroy the economy just to keep Theresa May in No.10. Labour the only route to a #Brexit that doesn’t break the country economically or splinter it socially.  
David Davis and Theresa May on a collision course over Brexit? Not to worry - only the country's future at stake...   
Remarkable to see a relatively junior senator like @nealerichmond absolutely school former Minister & Tory Leader Iain Duncan Smith on #brexit  
WE ARE GOING TO BE BETRAYEDAS I SAID WE ALWAYS WOULDI ACCEPTED NO INVITATIONS TO CELEBRATORY BREXIT PARTIES, DRANK NO CHAMPAGNE.I UNDERSTAND POLITICS A BIT MORE THAN MSM.17.2 MILLION VOTERS SOLD DOWN THE RIVER  
An exclusive image of David Davis arriving in Downing Street to begin Brexit discussions with the Prime Minister. Photo credit Nadine Dorries.  
Theresa May has handled Brexit terribly, and her miserable, statist agenda is failing Britain. Time for the Conservative Party to adopt fresh ideas and strong leadership. @jackpowell82 & @matt_gillow call for the Prime Minister to step down.  
.@waspiglas .@waspi_campaign  As Mrs May reaches her 61st and a half birthday does the #WASPI post-it note indicate she has finally realised the delay to her state pension is not 18 months but 6 years and she will lose £45K she paid in for as will the economy post brexit ?  
Join the new Pro Brexit party, which will be set up by Leave MPs and voters  Demand a GE, and 17.5 million people will vote  them in with a manifesto to leave the EU.  Sorted! 
The little picture - with which our political journalists are obsessed - Davis does not resign after allThe big picture - which our political journalists rarely address - UK govt unprepared, incoherent and out of depth on BrexitAnd NO solution to Irish border problem exists 
#TheresaMay must Sack the #EUWorm @OllyRobbins whose #EU #sellout plan gives up on the opportunities of #Brexit! #OllyRobbins is damaging the @Conservatives #electoral chances and must GO! #BBC #SKY #LBC #UK @ConHome @CCHQPress #Conservatives #Tory #ConservativeParty @theresa_may 
Document still expected to be published this afternoon - after Brexit committee meeting ends 
David Davis is ex SAS He’s trained to survive. He’s also trained to take people out. #Brexit  
left twitter reluctantly supporting brexit because of how terrible FBPE twitter is is the funniest example of overton window movement i’ve ever seen 
LISTEN | The former Brexit minister and self-proclaimed "WTO man" calls the government out on its phoney and treasonous backstop. READ MORE @WestmonsterUK :  
The David Davis resignation rumours are yet further evidence of a botched Tory Brexit.The Lib Dems want to give YOU the final say on Brexit, including the chance to stay in the E.U. Join our campaign to #ExitFromBrexit : 
We hear from a Leave campaigner on why he's now unhappy with how the Government is handling negotiations: 'If it was wrong not to have an EU referendum then it would be wrong not to have a referendum on the terms of the deal'. #peoplesvote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
If we have a second referendum, it will be worded thus:Place your X next to the Box of your choice...YES - I want to Remain in the EUNO - I don't want to Leave the EU. 
#5Things people in markets are talking about right now: - Trump vs. developed world- Emerging-market problems- Brexit infighting- Markets rise- China talks 
“This government is making us look like a joke. It’s embarrassing. People’s jobs and livelihoods are on the line.” @faizashaheen on UK handling of Brexit and how it's seen by other countries. #bbcdp 
We are seeing more people becoming a #RemainerNow but not because they are suddenly all loved up with the EU, but because they realise the Brexit they were promised is impossible & they would now prefer the status quo. Compelling reason for a #PeoplesVote@CCHQPress @mrjamesob 
The UK government has conspired with the #EU to make #Brexit seem as difficult as possible in order to turn people against it. Soon they’ll float the idea of a second referendum, which will be incredibly damaging and divisive. Much more so than now.  
Chat at EU Cult Committee this morning that Brexit talks have included keeping option open of UK rejoining.  We’re all being played here. 
Sigh . So , the BIG plan is to have a hugely advertised referendum where the UK votes to leave; trigger the A50 notification to inform the EU that we’re leaving; & then play who blinks first to scare EU into accepting ... we’re leaving. Blazing saddles brexit. 
Constructive meeting with Law Society discussing all things Brexit All Ireland Lawyers who practice all Ireland law & needs all Ireland protection Brexit is bad 4 lawyers, accountants, architects, businesses, people of all ages & gender - Special Status achievable - go 4 it  
New job for Brexit Secretary? 
Any chance you FBPE types could actually campaign for a second referendum instead of obsessively trolling Labour & letting those who actually caused Brexshit (THE TORIES) off the hook?  
Everything you need to know about the people driving Brexit - and running Theresa May - in one short Tweet   
Thread: I've been thinking of recent discourse that pits cosmopolitan citizens from nowhere against real, authentic, deserving people. This discourse is mainstream in left and right since Brexit vote. What is less known is that it has its origin in anti-Semitic tropes 1/ 
Our economy grew by only 0.1% in the first 3 months of 2018 -- far below the 0.3% growth expected by most analysts, and the worst in 5 years. Can’t recall the Leave campaign stating our growth would be slashed by Brexit. #ExitfromBrexit 
Every single #Brexit headline these days could be replaced with this: “Tories Shocked to Learn Choices Have Consequences; Claim Life Unfair” 
We were promised Brexit would deliver extra money for the NHS; instead it’s caused a recruitment crisis with thousands of vacancies across our Hospitals & surgeries @paulwaugh @Open_Britain @B_PellScholes 
May is now getting desperate. Not only has she done the country great damage with her inept handling of brexit but her final betrayal is going to show that we are stuck to the EU for ever. Even though this will cost her her job and seat. Globalist look after each other. 
So according to Tory MP Mel Stride, discussing latest on Brexit on Daily Politics, the Governments position is that it’s got a position. That’s cleared that up then  
Tory MP Nadine Dorries said this about David Davis and the replies are all you’d hope for   #DavidDavis #Brexit  
These four people support Brexit at any cost  
Can't help thinking that this country would be better off under the leadership of someone who believes in Brexit 
Watch @michaelgove outline how the SNP's continued obsession with a second independence referendum means that they will never focus on the day job Only the @ScotTories will represent rural Scotland  
Theresa May holding more talks with #Brexit Secretary David Davis amid tensions over the UK's Brexit "backstop" plan  
The ERG group have told @theresa_may to sack @OllyRobbins Representations have been made to the chief whip that Robbins’ Irish backstop is unacceptable & has put No10 on a course towards selling out on #Brexit, and his position is no longer tenable  
"Let’s be clear: the ‘backstop’ option is designed to stop Brexit. It is part of the EU elites’ attempt to impose a sort of neocolonial settlement, where the UK might leave in name but remain under their sway", writes Mick Hume.  
 Following this week’s round of #Brexit negotiations, @MichelBarnier will brief the press tomorrow at 2pm (Brussels time) @EU_Commission  You can watch it live here:  
Just in: The UK government is to go ahead and publish a crucial document covering the Irish border after tense talks between Prime Minister Theresa May and Brexit secretary David Davis  
BREAKING: 'Andy McNab to replace David Davis as Brexit secretary' confirms Nadine Dorries. 
David Davis is ex SAS He’s trained to survive. He’s also trained to take people out. #Brexit  
Video from in my office with ⁦@Daily_Express⁩ on #Brexit  
In Brexit Britain, even the pound shops are closing.  
France warns Donald Trump it won't sign a joint G-7 statement unless he backs down on several issues, including EU trade  
Both Farage and Iain Dale have started saying on @lbc that Brexit's not about economics, it's "always" been about sovereignty.That's where they're going now. @mrjamesob 
DR JOHNS: Because of stem cell research we've done, we've achieved a major breakthrough in human longevity.REPORTER: How major?DR JOHNS: This is huge.REPORTER: So some people alive today will still be alive to see Brexit happen?DR JOHNS: Don't be fucking ridiculous. pic.twitter.com/PRcpKquyJt 
We now go live to Theresa May's cabinet as they discuss their latest position on Brexit.  
Our campaign for a #PeoplesVote is on the final #Brexit deal is on the front page of @TheNewEuropean this week, and they are giving away free People's Vote posters too.Check out the front page below, then read their article by @mk1969 here:  
Trade Union representing 140,000 professional workers just became the latest to back a ‘people’s vote’ on Brexit  via @leftfootfwd 
20 million Brexiteers are perfectly clear. We want closed borders. Controlled migration. Sovereign control. Free trade. And the silencing of bureaucrats from the EU. #Brexit 
Spent morning with FINAT, European labelling industry body. 250 business people. 100%pessimism re Brexit. 100% see no plan. Growing anger which must be turned to activism against this hopeless govt and their hard  Brexit. Parliament totally out of touch with real public opinion 
Yes, but will there still be a Brexit for Davis to be Secretary of?  
There are rumours Brexit Secretary and lead negotiator David Davis could resign.Our Political Editor Gary Gibbon on the latest Brexit developments from Westminster.  
While the British media is reduced to reading body language, the rest of the EU waits - still - to read a written proposal from the UK govt.#brexit #backstop 
That's all very nice Nadine but he's the Brexit Secretary - being able to survive on his own faecal matter and possessing the ability to re-purpose a fag packet into a machine gun isn't terribly useful right now.Though ironically enough, it'll come in handy post Brexit.  
.@amcarmichaelMP announces that @LibDems will vote against the Govt's debate timetable for EU Withdrawal Bill in an attempt to ensure proper scrutiny of the Tories’ Brexit plans, and are calling for cross-party support.  
Great. Post-Brexit Britain has now become a Survivalist wank fantasy  
Christian Adams on Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Does it worry us that @NadineDorries seems to believe that survival techniques and being a trained killer are the skills we'll need in Brexit Britain?  
And of course, this once again has nothing whatsoever to do with the fact that Brexit has increased prices, decreased wages, and sucked out investment worth over £300 billion from the UK in one year alone.#FBPE  
The EU and the rest of the world are watching. What a huge national embarrassment. Brexit is and always was going to fail.  
The reason this Corrupt May/Tory Govt don’t work for or care about us is that they are too deeply committed to RW Media Moguls and Big Business. The carnage around Grenfell, Brexit, DWP, NHS, Windrush is because of no care/compassion for anything but MSM, BBC protection & Money.  
Paul Dacre, peddler of rabid nationalism, xenophobia, scapegoating of immigrants, anti-intellectualism, and the anti-democratic toxin of the "Will of the People" - a bottomless well of fascist poison at the heart of the British body politic.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
"How's Brexit going?""Well we've run out ideas so we've just decided to let David Davis go fucking bananas with a gun""What a normal and completely rational series of events" pic.twitter.com/TLX5vF8pou 
cannot take any more brexit news, it's like watching a tortoise crawl slowly toward a cliff edge 
Are we to take it from this tweet that David Davis will try to impose his will on #Brexit by force................& if that doesn't work, he'll start a new career as a male escort?  
Ministers told to stop telling lies about the ease of securing post Brexit trade dealsThere are no deals being negotiated with countries outside the EU and it will take years for any to be agreedDo you hear Leavers. It was all lies and always was!  
JONES BACKS DAVIS: I would be deeply upset if @DavidDavisMP was no longer Brexit Sec. “By the end of 2020 we should be in a position to leave immediately. It should be as short a time period as possible.”  
In an exclusive for the Guardian, Health Secretary, Jeremy Hunt, admitted that the decision to leave the EU had contributed to widespread staff shortages.Brexit is crippling our NHS. Please RT 
We now go live to the cabinet #brexit committee.  
While the Cabinet is in chaos over Brexit their lack of focus on our high streets is leading to mass job losses – @RLong_Bailey 
This Valentine’s Day, take a stand and buy your own chocolate. For you and for teddy bears everywhere. #SetTeddyFree 
Looking like the only way to save Brexit from an endless customs union is for Theresa May to resign, let there be a leadership election and then give Parliament the option of a deal, or no deal. 
...by that logic he's also trained to drink his own piss and eat insects; both will be handy after #Brexit 
Today's @Independent cartoon... #TheresaMay #Brexit #Backstop #railfail 
Brexit is doing some strange things to the Conservative party  
So much of Brexit seems to consist of the Brexit elite suddenly discovering what was in plain view six months ago, this time with the December agreement:  
Yes, Brexit is, the wrong decision, EVERY TIME! What does it say about “Global Britain” when not only is our own government and Number 10 an utter shambles but the opposition is too?! For the love of sanity - just STOP BREXIT! #StopBrexit 
Watching David Davis try to negotiate Brexit has been like watching a naked man juggling gravy. Entertaining in its own sick way, but fundamentally futile from the start 
David Davis is ex SAS He’s trained to survive. He’s also trained to take people out. #Brexit 
Many of the 1.3 million British people living in other EU countries have sought foreign citizenship since the referendum. Now some families will have to pay over £1,000 to the Home Office to renounce their citizenship. Tory Govt’s decision to hike fees is shockingly opportunistic 
DAILY REMINDER:It's not a done deal.Brexiters know in their heart of hearts #Brexit = self-harm.#EUref has been respected by triggering #Article50 & starting Brexit.It's not undemocratic to have another vote now we've got a better idea what it means. We CAN change our minds.  
Great - @OwenSmith_MP and @CarolineLucas support @thomasbrake's amendment giving public FINAL SAY on Brexit including option to stay in E.U. Will @ChukaUmunna @anna_soubry @joannaccherry @catherinewest1 put their money where their mouths are and add their names to amendment 19a? 
Recent elections in Italy were interesting to watch, suggesting a discontent with the path the EU is taking. I have been interviewed by the Italian newspaper @LaVeritaWeb on my commitment to deliver the Brexit the majority voted for.  
Not in any form promised. Putting aside the circle that cannot be squared ( NI border) there is NO version of Brexit promised that can be delivered . It’s no coincidence the ref was won on data theft ,foreign interference & electoral fraud . It’s the only reason it won.  
Tory MP Crispin Blunt on Sky News talking about delivering a #Brexit outcome in keeping with Good Friday Agreement: “were in an impossible position; it’s simply not doable!” 
So many problems in the world; Brexit, Climate change, Injustice, Isis, Palestine, Poverty, Syria,  Yemen etc.Meanwhile in Sheffield, Labour administration support an attempt to send four people to prison for heinous crime of trying to stop trees being felled #SaveSheffTrees 
SERIOUS QUESTION - Are Daily Telegraph readers really interested in Nick Timothy’s views on BREXIT? I must confess I always thought that he was a top of the range Home Office civil servant, rather than a guru of foreign affairs and BREXIT policy! 
.@theresa_may - women paid the price for your party’s austerity policies. Will they now pay the price for your Brexit policies? Supreme Court judgment shows you must act now to defend women’s human rights. #Trustallwomen #NowForNI (2/2) 
Time to dig this out again.We were told by many ministers before the #Brexit referendum that leave meant exactly that.#Leavemeansleave 
As backstop drama reaches climax, must reiterate that shit-show now enveloping and drowning the government was fully predictable and fully predicted. I wrote this on the day it was agreed and stand by every word. Backstop means soft Brexit or no Brexit.  
David Davis has been losing his grip and control over the Brexit negotiations for some time - May sweeping the rug from under him presents an opportunity to resign, claim it's on principle, wash his hands of this mess and attack May's handling of Brexit from the backbenches.... 
I wrote a piece for @thejournal_ie on the #repealthe8th referendum result. It was a movement on the ground that won the Yes vote. The Taoiseach thinks it was 'quiet' largely because he wouldn't listen for years! #repealedthe8th #dubw 
I have spoken to two "proper" Tory Brexiteers so far today and both are quite clear that May is betraying Brexit and hoping against hope that DD or Boris will be able to thwart her in Cabinet committee. 
If Boris Johnson, David Davis and Michael Gove resigned today thus rejecting the May/Robbins Brexit sell out, they would be putting country before party and they would transform Conservative fortunes. I doubt anything will happen though. 
The story of David Davis’ time in office has been a slow diminution of influence over Brexit, especially compared to his former official Olly Robbins. Whether the threats are real or not, this is Davis trying to “take back control”. 
Scotland is still in the EU. BREXIT has not happened. Already the £ has collapsed - 11 cents off par with the Euro at FX stores. Now Strathmore fruit farms face disaster. What will BREXIT actually bring? The Tories sure know how to mess up the economy.  
Surely DD can't back down now. If May persists with Robbins' plan, how can he stay? What does he lose from quitting? Would he want to go down as the Brexit Secretary who didn’t make good on his threats and allowed Robbins’ Remainer Brexit?  
Are you concerned that the Establishment and Big Money are trying to derail Brexit thus overturning our democracy? 
Advice to HMG on Brexit: 1 Take the money off the table until a trade deal is agreed. 2 Implement max fac on our side — invite the EU to reciprocate. 3 If Barnier won’t talk trade, walk away and let him worry about his UK trade surplus. 
We voted to Brexit back in June 2016.Instead we have had two years of interminable dliuting "negotiations" and the agreement of a transition period we never voted for and a "back stop" that keeps us in.The betrayal seems complete. 
May has to choose whether she wants to persist with Robbins’ sellout plan that gives up on the opportunities of Brexit, or back down and agree with David Davis. Difficult to see how both Robbins and DD can stay in the government.  
slowthai’s Circus Tour  FUCK BREXIT, added more dates in the UK + EU  —>  pic.twitter.com/byPJdeilMS 
The EU aren’t: undemocratic  ripping us off bullying us  needing us more then we need them being unreasonable Instead, the EU have been patiently waiting for almost 2 years for the UK to finally tell them what their negotiating position is on Brexit. 
In short: everyone is running out of road as the Brexit exit date, 30 March 2019, looms – And changing prime minister or David Davis resigning would do little to change this, cabinet divisions or the fact that there is no parliamentary majority for any one type of Brexit 
Media in Scotland (some of them anyway) starting to reflect the chaos and damage being caused by a #Brexit the country neither voted for nor wants.   Meanwhile the worst  and weakest Prime Minister in generations claims we are the ones “out of touch”….  
Tory MPs in the ERG have told Theresa May to sack her Remainer Brexit adviser Olly Robbins. Representations made to chief whip:  
Qatar owns more of London than The Queen. If this fact does not make a mockery of #Brexit then what does? 
A major Brexit rebellion is brewing, with a conflict that could hurt the whole government and speculation about a resignation   
Brexiteers need to waken up.Fear of Corbyn means they will cling to May even as she dismantles Brexit!Can't you all see how this works? 
What does all this say about broader Brexit talks:1. The fight over a defined end date is a waste of time - the EU unlikely to accept: it’s not what the UK agreed to in Dec. (and it would defeat the point of a backstop. Indeed, it wouldn’t even be a backstop) 
David Davis wrote this between the referendum and getting his current post. It is fair to say he hadn’t exactly read up on the task before it was given to him:  
The UK political and media establishment never wanted Brexit.Two year on from voting to LEAVE we are still in the EU and May is working with the EU to keep it that way.When the political class subvert the will of the people there are two options.We comply or we arise. 
A short thread. The shit show that is the backstop debate currently taking place in Britain perfectly exemplifies the state of where the UK is at with Brexit: 
There is one gigantic hole opening up in UK politics right now for a new political party. Both Consevative and Labour are not able to govern this country as Brexit has proved with the unwillingness of both to honor the referendum vote. 
It’s Thursday.And we should never forget that this whole #Brexit disaster is the unwanted offspring of a mad design to silence the eurosceptic fruitcakes in the Tory Party. Pathetic.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
“Once in a generation decision” that “the government will implement”There is no soft #Brexit... You’re either pregnant or you’re notRT to show support for @DavidDavisMP taking back control of negotiations from unelected remainer mandarin @OllyRobbins 
Britain is BRILLIANT at car manufacture. We make them for everyone else, but not ourselves, and British people spend £ Billions on cars every year.Brexit gives us the opportunity to re-boot the British car industry and lead the world, as we once did.Buy British, not German.  
Same old nasty @CONservatives. Nothing to do with the EU. The Tories are responsible for this. Brexit or not, it ain’t gonna matter to these folk. Getting a @UKLabour Government will. 
With David Davis reportedly on verge of quitting, @peterkyle comments, saying this shows how badly Brexit negotiations are going  
9mth delay before A50, alignment, CU replication, transition period, extended transition, indefinite backstops.Our political masters kicked Brexit into the long grass & can enjoy their win over the people.This contempt may have damaged trust in Parliament beyond repair. 
People who say ‘time to have a PM who believes in Brexit’ forget that it wouldn’t change the parliamentary arithmetic one bit. In fact, it would probably harden anti-hard Brexit sentiment if May was replaced by Boris, Mogg etc 
Brexit backstop psychodrama latest: PM and DD have just begun a meeting in No10. Am told she is still standing firm. So he has quite a big decision to make over the next hour. 
Given that *statistically*, it's not the Leave generation that will being paying that "financial hit", It is utterly selfish to vote Brexit on that basis.*That* type of Brexiter is literally condemning younger generations to live poor, in the name of values they don't share.  
#Brexit is the slow death of a country, painful to watch. A dying patient denied modern medicine surrounded by witch doctors and charlatans. 
Nearly 4 million UK adults forced to use food banks, figures reveal.That's 1:14 Britons so poor they have to rely on charity to feed themselves. What has Tory austerity done to a once proud and rich nation. And #Brexit will only make it worse.  
Me reading articles which purport to explain Labour's policy on Brexit.  
I'm not a defence expert but my instincts tell me we should be in bed with the Americans and NATO to defend our isles. All we've ever done with Europe is to fight them or rescue them. We're still at war over Brexit.  
Have you noticed how Brexiters and Cobynites blame the handling of Brexit negotiations for the mess we’re in? The problem is not HOW we’re removing the egg from the omelette but the futile, self-defeating, vainglorious venture itself. 
Got in touch with an EU contact in Brussels to get a sense of how the David Davis vs May Brexit ding dong was being viewed. Source sent me this in reply. pic.twitter.com/bC6vu75SEw 
Wake up. They're stitching up our Brexit. I warned that this would happen  
Whilst I share this view by @campbellclaret I'm concerned there's a real risk of complacency on #Remain side about a #PeoplesVote referendum.If we are to secure an #ExitFromBrexit with hopefully a decisive majority we need to start planning now how that campaign will be fought. 
I'm just going to put a thought out there again for folk to consider as today unfolds.Imagine if the Scottish Government had approached independence negotiations with a fraction of the incompetence displayed by the UK Government over Brexit. 
we used to conquer Europebut we dont anymoreour country is collapsing the sterling's on the floorover 50 years of heartbreakBut Southgates on the throneour only exits brexitand it's coming fucking home 
#daviddavis last resigned to fight a by-election on civil liberties where he said giving foreigners ID cards was a slippery slope to a national identity database. He now favours registering non-uk EU citizens and giving them ID cards. How things change. #Brexit 
I love that Lilico is now a Brexit free zone. Another Brexiter who has left the field of play.  
Party unable to agree what Brexit should mean criticises other party unable to agree what Brexit should mean for betraying the true meaning of Brexit.  
Why are we letting unaccountable, unelected remainers run our #Brexit negotiations?@DavidDavisMP is on the verge or resigning after months of being forced out of #Brexit negotiations by senior civil servant, remainer @OllyRobbinsRT if you back David Davis 
Tory MP David Davies David Davies, a prominent Brexit backer, said he isn’t sure the “enormous expense” to keep older people alive is justifiable.  
May be wrong, but have feeling @Jacob_Rees_Mogg has about one week left to decide whether he wants history to remember him as a Tory statesman who saved Britain's democracy, or just another Conservative Party hack who, when it came to the crunch, put party before country.#Brexit 
Public opinion at first did what you’d expect: rally behind #brexit after #Referendum result. But it has then slowly but surely shifted the OTHER way, with a clear majority now saying #brexit a MISTAKE...  
If you come across articles / interviews / people who say, “But @UKLabour...” when it comes to #Brexit (or other things!) ask yourself: But what? @CONservatives got us in this mess. @CONservatives are dragging us through this mess.@CONservatives are to blame for this mess. 
Maybe it's just me, but I suspect David David and JRMogg would find it more acceptable for NI to leave UK than watered down version of Brexit. 
Today feels like a day when one or two Tory political figures will take (or not take) actions which determine how history sees them in perpetuity: hero or coward.#Brexit 
With or without Brexit the single most important thing for workers rights, the environment, the economy, jobs, the NHS, affordable housing, world class education, democracy in everyday life, for communities & individuals is a transformative progressive Labour Govt #ChangeIsComing 
Wow, this current global boom is going great in Brexit Britain isn't it?  
4/ Naturally that translates into the following bilge from the Tories - they just want to trap an impoverished workforce - think of post Brexit UK like a giant Dickensian debtors jail  
David Davis, June 2016: let's play Brexit. How hard can it be? [Two years pass during which civil servants, ambassadors, trade negotiators, business leaders spell out how hard it can be.]Davis, June 2018: I'm not playing any  more. 
In fraudulently representing that they favoured Brexit at the last election, and then preventing it, the elected have carried out a coup d'état against the electors, and created a revolutionary situation.  
1. Other sodding countries won’t lose access to the single market. 2. Other sodding counties won’t lose over 750 EU trade deals with the rest of the world after Brexit.3. Other sodding countries don’t have an Irish border problem caused by Brexit.Get a grip.  
Imagine being so ignorant you didn't know supporting the Tory Party then opposing Brexit were a big part of Peter Stringfellow's public persona ffs  
Olly Robbins’ backstop does not work, his hybrid model does not work, May's trajectory towards close alignment with Brussels is not a real Brexit. Every time No10 sets a direction of travel it is towards what Remainers want, not what the 52% voted for. Can DD save Brexit?  
Will David Davis do a David Cameron and disappear into thin air like those magic Brexit reports? 
‘@andreajenkyns: Let's be more vocal about 'No Deal' Brexit and show EU we won't accept crumbs.“It is time to stand up for Britain and unleash that Great British lion to roar once again!” 
We voted to leave the EU which means all aspects.Leave means leave.#justsaying#Brexit  
Please raise your hand if you voted for Brexit, predicting that the negotiations would be in such a state that the Chief Brexit Negotiator would be on the verge of quitting with just 4 months left of negotiations?Anyone? #PeoplesVote "David Davis" 
Good god @SkyNews was I dreaming a minute ago? One of your newspaper “reviewers” managed to incorporate the fact that Peter Stringfellow was anti- Brexit whilst covering the sad news of his death. Are there no depths to which certain individuals will stoop? 
It was the active involvement of tens of thousands on the ground  in the referendum campaign that was critical to the resounding win, writes Ruth Coppinger  
David Davis is going to do a Brexit style resignation in which he resigns but demands to keep his ministerial salary and limousine, still gets to attend cabinet and expects them always to agree with what he wants. 
The Brexit myth of no-strings frictionless trade -  fantastically clear writing from @ChrisGiles_ 
Can’t believe Tories foolish enough to gauge consequences of selling out Brexit in terms of short-term poll ratings v Corbyn. Brand trashed. 
As rumours swirl about a cabinet resignation, some Brexit consequences a little closer to home. British consumers could lose phonecall and text price cap after Brexit and access to a new EU 5G network unless we stay in the single market. My story here:   
Almost 2 years since North voted to Remain in EU referendum & British Govt on track to get bad deal or no deal. Yet DUP insists that North shouldn’t accept better deal on offer from EU 27 for jobs, farming, peace funding, education, rights & movement of people. #Brexit  
Peter Stringfellow has passed away. In recent months he was a strong vocal critic & campaigner against Brexit. He even took on the #FBPE and #WATON hashtags. As a Remainer I for one will miss his support. #RIPPeter#FBPE #WATON 
This idea that divisions between  European democracies are an ‘opportunity’ for Britain is one of the most short-sighted & dangerous aspects of Brexit. Have these people no history? Have they ever talked to their grandparents about war in Europe?  
That whole #Brexit thing is really working out well for the Brits just like they were promised by the lying sham dirtbag bigots who promulgated it.Nigel Farage/Bannon/Louise Mensch/Aaron Banks/Wigmore/Raheem Kassam used same fear mongering play book to elect Trump in the US.  
The principle of a backstop (though leaving the details to be negotiated) *is* the UK government's Brexit stance, as agreed in December and reaffirmed since. Anyone serious knows that "no deal" defies practical feasibility, economic reality and democratic legitimacy.  
Dear Constituent, thank you for your letter. I accept that Brexit will wreck the economy and lead to mass unemployment, but you must see things from my point of view. If I vote to stop it I’ll be the one who’s unemployed, and that’s just not right.YoursYour MP 
Watch MP show utter contempt for EU citizens who have been deprived of rights by a decision they were not allowed to participate in. It sums up disregard of ordinary people shown by BrexiteersMy experience of @The3Million is that they are scrupulously neutral on Brexit process  
BBC News - Carillion collapse to cost taxpayers £148m. Remind me. Which Government couldn't read the warning signs in their statutory accounts? It isn't the one delivering #Brexit ignoring all the warnings & forecasts because they're all negative is it?  
Stop blaming the EU.  The Brexit idiots have had years (decades) to come up with a viable plan and have failed.  The buck stops with them!  #r4today 
If #Brexit was such a good thing for the UK, the Cabinet would have come up with a plan ages ago and been singing the benefits out loud everyday. Instead they skulk in a corner, unable to agree an approach and unable to explain a single solitary benefit of leaving. It's bollox 
Tory MP Sir Desmond Swayne says Theresa May's "backstop" plan weakens the UK's Brexit stance: "The strength of our position is getting them to blink first by recognising we are prepared to walk away." 
Peter Stringfellow, RIP: metropolitan intellectual types used to despise him but he came out unexpectedly & vocally against Brexit. #PeterStringfellow 
Should David Davis resign as Brexit Secretary if the PM won’t deliver on Brexit? @JuliaHB1 |  
2 years after the referendum and the most basic issues regarding Brexit aren’t resolved or in some cases not even discussed. However you voted you must agree this cannot go on. The politicians are failing us, it has to be resolved by the people. #PeoplesVote 
#Brexit What’s going on with Brexit FFS. Theresa May hasn’t got a clue getting a good deal for .Just get on with it grow a backbone. Theresa May never wanted to leave the EU. Still doesn’t pathetic Prime Minister. Labour in EU out EU in EU out EU in EU who bloody knows.   
EU car manufacturers already in talks about rejecting British-made parts because of Brexit, industry leader reveals  
."The lofty promises that drove a relatively slim majority of voters to choose Brexit in 2016 are nowhere near being fulfilled; in most cases, they NEVER will be." 
My column: How to take a pallet of cuddly toys and Chinese plastic cutlery to Calais after Brexit via @financialtimes 
David Davis resigning would be the death knell of Brexit. Not because he's any use - he's as effective as a paper gas boiler - but because it will be the ultimate signal to the general public that Brexit is in full crisis. 
RIP Peter Stringfellow, 77. The London nightclub owner was a longtime Con supporter until he dithched the party to fight Brexit. Discussing him and Europe on @GMB in a mo 
If Brexit was a thing responsive to logic or evidence it would never have happened. Amazing that, two years on, business is still working this out.  
So let’s stop Brexit, democratically. Will Hutton and I set out the case:  
I wonder if there is a positive correlation between finding Mrs Brown’s Boys funny and voting for Brexit? 
I imagine that I am not alone in thinking, "in my water I feel something big is about to happen re Brexit". 
The Swiss People’s Party (far right) have initiated a referendum to remove Switzerland from the jurisdiction of the European Court of Human Rights. Another move in the Orban/Bannon/far-right type of anti-progressive effort of which Brexit is part. We are facing a big threat. 
FFS- HOW MUCH CLEARER CAN IT BE MADE - How many more people do the government need to hear from before coming to the obvious conclusion that brexit is a very very bad idea? I include Comrade Corbyn in that question.   
Stay tuned for the #MississippiAnalytica court case alleging that British voter data was flagrantly abused in the US by LeaveEU, a blatant contravention of the UK Data Protection Act, indicating that Brexit was not an outcome lawfully achieved.  
Can we not make this a referendum on the Cavs flaws? Yes, they’re far from a complete team and have a lot of issues but this is only about the Warriors. They’re the most talented team ever assembled and everything is easy for them. Nothing to do with the Cavs. 
Tories will deal with the Lords #Brexit amendments on the 12/6 and then move to remove the PM.Tory Brexiteers can't allow this dithering to go on any more.We are heading for #BrexitInNameOnly and that is not what we voted for.We want to be totally free of the EU dictators. 
Brexit: EU car manufacturers already in talks about rejecting British-made parts, industry leader reveals | The Independent  
Based on how Cambridge Analytica used data from Eldon Insurance (illegally) to create datasets for Brexit propaganda, I'd say there's a good chance CA used Spectrum Health data in Trump's success.  
Jeremy would have triggered Article 50 on 24 June 2016 and we'd be Venezuela by now. I never thought I'd say this, but thank god for May's inefficiency. At least it gives us a sporting chance to stop Brexit.  
MPs report that:#Carillion collapsed as a result of “recklessness, hubris and greed” among  directors who put their own financial rewards ahead of all other concerns.It sounds a bit like #brexit !- ironic that MPs don't see the similarity !   
If the Democrats insist on making the 2020 election a referendum on deficit spending I can only conclude that they are not serious about winning.  
Many young people, especially in PNG don't know the history of the Bougainville crises and are not aware of the significance of the #referendum. @pngnri Director Dr Osborne Sanida. #referendumconf 
Please #follow & support this truly #Patriotic #British #MP @andreajenkyns who is standing up for the 17,410,742  who voted for #Brexit! A Real #Tory & A True Defender of #Britain & its People! #BBC #SKY #LBC #UK @ConHome @CCHQPress @Conservatives #Tory #ConservativeParty 
Labor groups organized a veto referendum over Missouri's new 'right to work' law. Republicans are now moving that referendum from November to the August primary date. Last night's special election gives you a sense of why they'd want it out of the way:  
According to the Times, May deceived Pro-Brexit ministers by  showing her backstop proposal to them only hours before it was to be published. Remain ministers saw it days before. The Brexit Cabinet Committee has still to discuss it. Even Barnier has said Davis has been mistreated 
Been obvious from day 1 #Brexit may happen but in no way can it work...certainly not in the country's best interest nor that of its citizens.This #BrexitShambles needs to be stopped. Vital to #StopBrexitSaveBritain to avoid more lasting damage.#Reject #Revoke #Remain #Reform 
Brexit Sitrep:-Agreement needed w/EU27 in 19 wks-June Council written off-Govt too divided to establish policy-Opposition too divided to properly oppose-MPs too scared to act-All too scared to face reality-Anyone worried accused of fear-mongering-Apparently all EU's fault 
Noooooooo. #Russia is ignoring the public referendum and is allowing the capture of 13 #Orca. 13 killer whales will now be enslaved and die early to entertain the masses. So wrong. So wrong. 
"That's not #Brexit!"@piersmorgan exclaims to the F*cking Treacherous B*tch @Anna_Soubry who claims that she respects the #referendum result..? (BOLLOCKS) but backs staying inside the #CustomsUnion & the #SingleMarket!  #AnnaSoubry #BBC #SKY #LBC @LBC #UK 
"it's over, we can't do it. Brexit is over". David Davis 
David Davis may resign as Brexit Secretary causing chaos in the cabinet as Labour MPs revolt against their leader’s Brexit stance. What do you want from the Brexit process now? #DarrenOnLBC 
Last weekend my son had to move to Belgium because his job in Brighton depended on the U.K. being in the EU. The job went so he had to too. Thanks Tories for your wrecking ball #Brexit 
Theresa May accused of deceiving ministers over Brexit 
At dawn on D-Day my dad’s frigate was escorting British landing craft to the invasion beaches. For him (now 96) Brexit is an insult to all those who gave their lives for peace in Europe. Just don’t mention Farage to him. 
with brexit bralph 2 ralph marries america online combining every disney property into one film, we may finally find the answer to this age old question:  
If Britain doesn’t get the Brexit we voted for, it will be proof positive that the whole political system is one diseased, corrupt temple that is fit only for destruction. 
It's the hard right and hard left of the UK policial spectrum that support Brexit because they think the EU stops them doing what they want to do. But here's the thing. Neither side can be sure the other won't get in power.Surely staying is the obvious safety net for both sides. 
Bad News for Russian Orcas: The Russian government’s Federal Service for Supervision of Natural Resources has chosen to ignore the May 3rd public referendum in Vladivostok against the proposed Orca hunt. The agency has approved the capture of 13 Orcas in Sea of Okhotsk for 2018.  
George #Soros Backed Candidates FAILED in California Primary#bilderberg #qanon #breaking #stopoperationsoros #cblive #8thref #orban #pvv #salvini #auspol #plannedparenthood #trump #hannity #brexit #bbcqt 
May has run out of road. She has failed to exploit the wonderful opportunity handed to her by 17:4m voters two years ago.  We need a new leadership that believes in Brexit.  May must go.     
Corbyn's Bailing Out The PM, It's Unforgivable, Chris Leslie MPHe'll never be forgiven by #Remainers 4 his complicity in a Tory #BrexitShambles that'll leave us Poorer, Weaker with Fewer Rights & less Control + a denial of a #FinalSay #Brexit can't work.  
You knew the UK was gonna be the slowest growing G7 or EU28 country following the Brexit vote? Could you point to a single tweet where you or any other Brexit supporter suggested that would happen?  
So finally a bit of realism and sanity on Brexit and slow-witted "thick as mince" narcissistic drivel-monger @DavidDavisMP fucks the fuck off very soon. The idiot is costing the UK billions so he should get a bill too  
'EU never expected ANYONE to leave' and Brexit could be 'impossible' warns analyst   
Paul Dacre, peddler of rabid nationalism, xenophobia, scapegoating of immigrants, anti-intellectualism, and the anti-democratic toxin of the "Will of the People" - a bottomless well of fascist poison at the heart of the British body politic.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
David Davis is close to resigning, Brexit is going to hell in a handcart, this is where Jeremy Corbyn takes the high road and steps in and and sto... Oh bugger. 
It's time for David Davis & Co to put Brexit before party, if he & his Tory Brexiteers are serious about a clean break from any customs union / single market. For Davis & his colleagues the crunch moment has come. It's decision time & 17.4 million Brexiteers are watching. 
If the #FBPE brigade really want to stop Brexit, they should stop slagging off Corbyn and just sit back and watch the Tories implode. Brexit will fall apart because the Tories are a bunch of incompetent buffoons, not because of anything Chuka Umunna or Chris Leslie do. #Newsnight 
There is one aim, one intelligent course: to Stop Brexit. Anything else Is inanity. This is the steady, clear conviction of Remainers, who have the best interests of their country - their home - at heart: & who are working with their heads as well as their hearts. 
If she changes tack on this, Remainer Rebels will lose faith in reassurances on NI, and vote against Government next week.If she does not, what will David Davids, Foreign Sec do?It is either time limited or it is not. Unless this is Quantum Brexit. 
Dear @OwenPaterson The UK decided to leave. The UK asserted there could be no hard border in Ireland. The UK and EU agreed to the backstop. The UK has failed to come up with an alternative. So in what world has the EU attacked the UK? #brexit  
How dare you suggest Remainers come from a wing of Labour when 73% of us believe Brexit is the wrong thing for our country.We're Blairites, Brownites, Corbynites, we're Labourites.Name the benefits of Brexit Paul. In jobs, living standards, public spending. All negative.  
Fuckity fucking bye! If you go and retire abroad after Brexit fucking us, we will fucking well set Liam Needon on you and he will fucking find you.  
Retweeted Conservative Man (@ConsMan01):These four men need to step forward and deliver Brexit@DavidDavisMP @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @BorisJohnson @michaelgove#SaveBrexit 
#CarryOnBrussels giving great insight into work of Sinn Féin MEP Team - in particular the one & only @M_AndersonSF.Also brief cameo for the Sinn Féin MP Team!Sinn Féin is only party challenging Brexit in the corridors of power in Dublin, Belfast, Brussels, Strasbourg, & London.  
The Conservative Party is on the verge of being remembered as the government that folded on Brexit and betrayed the will of the people after winning and keeping power based on “Brexit means Brexit” just think that one over Tory chums you are about to end faith in U.K. democracy 
If true, this article feeds into something Mogg was saying on his Moggcast which is the most deeply concerning aspects of the process are those where May appears to have said one thing and done another which naturally leads one to question her intentions in relation to Brexit.  
NEW: Wolfgang Schauble, president of the Bundestag, says EU would give UK more time if needed. He tells @BBCNewsnight:" If UK would ask for more time, I think the …Europe would be ready to agree on the British demand". Also  "future is always open, let’s hope" for no Brexit 
Brexit has destroyed 3 million British lives, who settled in EU countries...what is even more utterly shocking is, these British citizens were denied a vote in the referendum! 
This is devastating. The North East betrayed by Brexit and no-one to defend them now that Tory MPs representing us in Westminster  
Tomorrow's front page: ● May accused of deceiving ministers over Brexit ● Mary Wilson, widow of the Labour prime minister Harold Wilson, has died at 102 after a stroke#tomorrowspaperstoday 
DCB saying we will simply “cut and paste” trade deals to make a British version. Omg. I really hope he’s not relying on that level of knowledge of bilateral deals for his post-Brexit career. #CarryOnBrussels 
Dacre's sizzling off into retirement, Lawson slinks off to France, Farage denies claiming Brexit is improvement, UKIP implodes, Hannan admits it isn't going well, no trade deals, Davis resigning (again), Trump's our 'special relationship', May's hopeless. EU stands firm. #Brexit 
Any Remoaner #Conservatives MP who votes against their own Government should have the whip removed. RT if you agree.Country before Party@Conservatives#Brexit #PMQs #bbcdp 
BUNGLING BREXITThere has never been a more hideous bigoted shambolic damaging and unnecessary piece of politics in the history of the UKAll being handled by narrow minded power craving foolsScotland don't want it, Ireland don't and the sensible people of England & Wales don't  
THE TIMES: May accused of deceiving ministers over Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
There was never a Brexit deal , as Dave proved , we just never learn. It’s tedious watching this all over again !  
Brexit: the ultimate tent-related pissing lesson. 
Wow. Tory MP Henry Smith just told @BBCRadio4 world tonight that UK cabinet would not support a backstop for Ireland. May signed up to backstop in Dec, six months ago. This is front page of Brexit papers next day. What did Tories think they had signed up for??  
Dacre presumably a big story on the Beeb because his most malign influence has been the impact of his virulent right wing campaigns on their agenda not least re Brexit 
MEMO to David DavisYour CONSTANT threats to RESIGN are wearing a bit THIN now David.Either PUT up or SHUT up !Let's face it - as the responsible Sec of State  your *constructive ambiguity* appoach to the #Brexit negotiations have not done the UK any favours ! 
Significant pro #Brexit commentator who has been saying "everything's fine - bloody Remoaners" now saying, very clearly "hang on, this is a bit of a catastrophe, isn't it?"Today Customs Union, Tomorrow some kind of SM membership, Brexit dead by end of the summer  
Tory ministers this weekJavid called out by Tory MuslimsGrayling cancels train meetingBoris to duck Heathrow voteHammond sells RBS shares at huge lossGove admits capitalism failedDavis refuses Brexit duty, may resignFox dept lacking expertiseMay failed to prep white paper 
Correct me if I’m wrong but this seems like an entirely Remainer panel. Ridiculous. Why should Brexit voters pay for this kind of bias?  
And you have delivered more fudges & twists & turns & deceits - because you want what they are doing, you want Brexit, you are at one with Rees Mogg & May & Gove - you, the leader of the party who should be opposing them: you are selling Labour supporters to the enemy. Betrayal.  
Today PM @Theresa_May met Norwegian PM @Erna_Solberg at Downing Street. They held good discussions including on Brexit and cooperation on security and defence.  
David Davis, the Brexit chief who has taken Britain to the cliff edge, has decided that he doesn't want to be remembered as the person responsible for a peacetime collapse of the British economy... Bailing or being put out to pasture? Either way, good riddance... #BrexitShambles 
Business man on Sky News has written letters but gets no response re Brexit. He thinks they either don't understand or don't care. Personally I think it is both.They absolutely don't fucking understand and they certainly don't fucking care. Party before country see? 
#Brexit cannot mean continued membership of the CU even in a time limited capacity bcse that is not #Brexit. ‘Let’s just get over the line’ is a specious argument bcse it would take a generation to de-couple and untangle. The next 7 days are going to be interesting. 
Peterhead fish processing could be relocated to Poland. Norway ships fish to Scotland for processing inside the EU because processed fish incur high tariffs when exported from Norway to the EU. On Brexit, Norway willl need a new processor inside the EU.  
David Davis seems to be close to resigning. Brexit supports across media saying game is a bogey. Backstop breathing down May’s neck. V v serious warnings from industry. No HMG draft doc before June summit w/EU. Now Dacre going. All that’s solid melts into air...  
Let's say we vote down the EEA amendment and then the Tories and  DUP vote for the withdrawal bill. Hard Brexit.The North and the Midlands are subjected to endless poverty and austerity.The areas the Labour MPs who blocked the EEA serve are then devastated. What then?  
An undertaking to stay in customs union as backstop until Brussels says NI border issue solved is not Brexit. If this is deal May must go. 
prediction: Brexit will get to the verge of collapse then at the last minute a couple of Labour right geniuses will somehow accidentally get us the hardest Brexit by trying to own Corbyn 
Corbyn and May remain silent on Cambridge Analytica. They both know it invalidates Brexit but both their careers are tied to Brexit and they’re not going to let go of it unless they are forced to. Pressure these politicians night and day. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Britain's lorry drivers say their confidence in a well-managed Brexit is collapsing and the Channel tunnel company is warning it is “too late” to avoid serious disruption when the UK leaves the EU next March.- Financial Times 
“failure of leadership to neglect” News for you, @campbellclaret: you don’t get to say what our leader should speak about or when.He was excellent -again- in #PMQs today.What was the subject?#Brexit. Fancy that!Not only is he a TRUE leader, he’s our next @UKLabour PM! 
"I think sometimes a Prime Minister should be intimidating. There's not much point in being a weak floppy thing in the chair, is there?" Can't say the current incumbent is living upto this with a policy of EU appeasement to the point of rendering Brexit betrayed.   
If/When David Davis goes, it could be the beginning of the end for Brexit. Could be, if Labour opposed Brexit. But of course, Corbyn doesn't. So it won't be.#FBPE 
Mrs May's Brexit plan is unfolding tonight. Seems the plan is to keep the UK as close as possible to the EU for as long as possible. Remember "Brexit means Brexit"? Well forget it. Mrs May is liar. We can not have a liar as Prime Minister. She must go now. 
More evident than ever today that Corbyn's Labour is midwife to a Tory hard Brexit. The electorate will never forgive them when it becomes clear (as it already is) that their position means the impoverishment of ordinary voters. 
My piece in the @Telegraph on why we must leave the Customs Union punctually to enjoy the economic benefits of Brexit and free trade  
I’m not having this @jeremycorbyn ‘has always been a Leaver’ defence. No matter what his position has been in the past he must now see what a disaster Brexit is going to be for us all, particularly those he purports to be in politics to assist, the poorest in society. 
Rumours Brexit Secretary and lead negotiator David Davis could resign 
The Brexit rats seem to be jumping ship, biggest first.Hard on the heels of news of Paul Dacre's welcome retirement comes news that David Davis may quit tomorrow.They're all looking for bolt holes now. 
Time for a hard border unless the Irish up their game. This defeats the purpose of Brexit if tolerated.  
Careful @George_Osborne, any more headlines like this and you'll start turning young people in favour of Brexit  
Is it time for Theresa May to step down and allow a Brexiteer to lead Brexit? 
Brexit Britain establishment feels very shaky right now....  
She never really meant to deliver brexit, did she? May is possibly the most dishonest politician we've ever seen. Even worse than Blair. Zero integrity. Zero.  
Dacre was the Godfather of Fleet Street, an immensely powerful editor of the Daily Mail. Catastrophic Brexit was his lash hurrah  
Westminster says it will use the Brexit EU Withdrawal Bill to strip Scotland of 24 core devolved powers, despite the Scottish Parliament voting to reject consent to the Bill. 
Dacre gone, David Davis on his way? Boris Johnson to spend more time with his families? Wonder if this is the beginning of the beginning of the end of Brexit? 
PredictionEvery senior Brexit campaigner will have resigned by the time Brexit finally comes about. Abdicating responsibility to the rest of the plebs whilst they bugger off to foreign lands on top of their piles of cash 
Custom partnership, transitional period and now back stop are all ploys to avoid a proper Brexit in March 2019. Enough.   
Rats leaving the sinking ship as #Brexit starts to founder. The latest is Paul Dacre, resigning as Editor of the odious Daily Fail. Hooray!  
George Osborne, Mark Carney and Amber Rudd to attend exclusive conference bringing together top politicians, leading officials and crony-capitalist business leaders:  How to sabotage Brexit will no doubt be discussed. 
The doctor told me I only have a two per cent chance of having a heart attack this year and said 'two per cent is nothing' and then I reminded him about Brexit. 
Liberation of Daily Mail & the BBC from Paul Dacre is the biggest media event since Brexit & will have major bearing on it. Greatly improves chances of a referendum on the Brexit deal - & defeating Brexit in that referendum 
This is what I’m hearing too, as Alice in Wonderland continues running Brexit policy  
To while away his retirement, Paul Dacre has an estate in West Sussex, a home in Belgravia, a 17,000-acre estate in Scotland and a property in the British Virgin Islands (a tax haven). Paul Dacre likes to pretend #Brexit is a revolt against "the global elite". 
Not to say that the stakes at Dominion are high, but it’s basically a referendum on the Power of Love, no biggie.  
It strikes me that staff at STV ought to be *praying* for an early independence referendum, because the 'threat' of independence may be the one and only thing that wards off a disastrous ITV takeover of STV. 
David Davis could quit as Brexit secretary on Thursday  
If Theresa May truly meant Brexit will be Brexit she would not have made her cabinet of 21 Remainers and only 7 Brexiteers. Nor would she have put 5 toxic Remainers on the UK negotiating team. We just cannot trust her and she must go. 
Just like that despicable belch of beery flatulence, Nigel Farage, claiming that he never said Brexit would improve our nation's circumstances, Dacre is now trying to evade responsibility for his lies and shameful provocations. Soon, they'll all be at it. David Davis next. 
Paul Dacre became Mail editor in 1992, as Maastricht rebellion starting. He overnight turned it into a vitriolic hard right Brexit rag. His proprietor Lord Rothermere is more balanced, so likely it will tilt towards centre & we are now past peak ‘media’ Brexit 
He's responsible for division/hatred/racism/xenophobia, he's demonised/scapegoated migrants/benefit claimants/sick/disabled, ffs this individual and his newspaper have along with the tories sowed the seed that will turn us into a post #Brexit wasteland, good riddance Paul Dacre. 
A writing deadline looms like the wall in Game of Thrones if the wall could run towards you so I must take a short break. But you know what I’d tweet:ToriesBrexitNazis Labour(terms and conditions apply)LibDems - who cares unless #TweetLikeIts2013 trendsTill soon x 
Following on from Paul Dacre's resignation, fellow cabinet member David Davis has just refused to rule out quitting over the Tories Brexit policy. All is not well over on the dark side. 
A comment, from someone who was there, on Brexit minister David Davis's talk at RUSI today  
Paul Dacre’s retirement hugely significant; makes the next Brexit referendum much more winnable. We’re now past peak Brexit in media support. Task now is to stop it politically 
More wisdom from the Archbishop of Canterbury: ‘Europe is not in danger of failing’; Brexit will not ‘derail the European Union or bring about the downfall of Europe’; but ‘Europe is in a fragile phase’. I think Archbishop Welby should be referred to as Archbishop Wally. 
This is key- if Farage, Kaiser were sherpas for Mercer/Stone/Bannon, for instance, then this could be evidence of an extraordinary- historic- intersection of malevolent actors around Brexit & Trump. What ties them together is a common, illiberal interest in advancing kleptocracy.  
Barry Gardiner trying to explain Labour’s Brexit position. #SkyNews 
It's absolutely, but characteristically, pathetic that Dacre is heading for the hills before the reality of the disastrous, impoverishing, enfeebling Brexit he did more than anyone to deliver become undeniable. Also, I'm going to have to rewrite a couple of chapters of my book. 
Following Brexit reminds me of writing Pompeii. It’s 10:30 am, white ash has mysteriously appeared on the summit, and magma has started rising into the conduit of the volcano at a rate of > 0.2 metres per second 
Leavers let Robbins & May delay/ erode down Brexit bit by bit and now we are in a total mess.May is an awful negotiator, gave away £39bn for nothing in return, refused to prepare for no deal (our only leverage) and let the EU dictate the talks. ERG/Mogg it's down to you...  
I wrote this for Brexit Central a month ago, about the PM salami-slicing Brexit away. Seems even more true tonight  
What we should understand is this - an Independence Referendum isn't about @theSNP getting power, nor any other political party.It is about us, the Scottish people, getting power - over our land, our taxes, our jobs, our economy, our future. Our Scotland.#Independence 
Both the Tories and Labour are trying to sell us Brexit unicorns  
The referendum was an instruction by the British people to leave the EU. The EU Withdrawal Bill should be passed without these disreputable Lords amendments which threaten to reverse it, says @BillCashMP  
I accept several million voted for Brexit regardless of consquences...but they didn't clinch the result. Millions of moderate swing voters did that. They were told it would be easy, we'd get £350m for NHS...all lies. They and we deserve the right to reconsider, so #PeoplesVote 
the 160,000+ british who applied for irish passports only when brexit had been voted in; you will receive useless joke passports that play amhrán na bhfiann when opened in reward for your cowardice of only choosing irishness when it becomes beneficial. your move, dastardly briton 
"No resignation....tonight" from David Davis, I'm told.  He's "fighting his corner" on Brexit backstop and demand to have specified end date. The caveat 'tonight' may spook No10 tho.#hotelcaliforniabrexit #checkoutbutneverleave 
I have it many times & I will say it again. The EU Referendum result was a clear rejection of the EU Supranationalism & European political integration. It is extraordinary that politicians & elements of the civil service want to lock us in a supranational European defence union.  
Fear?? Brits abroad have suffered 20%+ cut in income  due to fall in Brexit £Have you?Ignoring Brits abroad as Your Brexit Secretary has done has compounded fear of Brits abroad.Perhaps you should tone down the arrogance?#FBPE 
Somebody told me that David Davis is revolting over the Irish Border. I disagree. He's revolting whatever side of the border he's on. #Brexit #Customs 
Theresa May's had the benefit of the doubt for sometime. The Tory faithful must see she's a Conservative In Name Only, intending to force Brexit In Name Only & hamstring the UK's ability to strike new trade deals.In the interests of the UK leaving the EU: 
Of course, the other annoying thing about the “Corbyn is playing the long game on Brexit” theory (aside from it being delusional) is the inherent superiority woven into it. “Ah, He’s one of us wise Remainers, but he has to pretend otherwise to gull naive Brexiteers” 
Dog whistle rubbish. @The3Million are simply pointing out the implications of Brexit for real people’s lives. Vote Leave said the Vienna Convention would fully protect EU citizens in the U.K. and that turned out to be complete bullshit. So let’s not get into finger pointing eh?  
Intentionally or not, May's policy of constant delay has slowly starved the Brexiteers of oxygen. If the current Brexit proposals had been put to the cabinet all at once even 6 months ago, a mass revolt would have been inevitable. Instead, red lines have been salami-sliced away 
Our political leaders should have the courage to state what they already know to be true: it’s in our country’s best interests to #STOPBREXIT. Especially now that polling confirms that the country agrees: #Brexit is a big mistake. RT @Jon_Danzig's report:  
Nix just blamed "Carole in the Guardian" for everything that has come to pass for Cambridge Analytica. "Carole thought if she attacked Cambridge Analytica...the Guardian could push for a second referendum. And that's exactly what has happened." 
Government warned British cars won't qualify for tariff free trade deals after Brexit. #Leavers we told you before the referendum but you all a shouted back 'It's #ProjectFear, we know what we're voting for' Well it is now #ProjectReality you fools 
The @ScotTories opposed devolution in 1997 and their leader lobbied against further devolution in 2014. They are undoubtedly the anti-devolution party. Brexit must not be used as a smokescreen for rolling back devolution.  
When will the people realise that we are being governed by fraudsters, who have no interest in anyone's well being at all.They are likened in my mind to a fraudulent insurance company, forcing a referendum result that was only for guidance in order to retain their TAX avoidance 
Brexit and proud? Check out some great merchandise over at @WestmonsterUK​!  Wear with pride!  
Channel tunnel operator says it's "too late" to avoid serious disruption if UK leaves EU in March. FTA says none of freight industry's eight #Brexit demands have been addressed by Govt. Commons must vote next week to give the people the chance to stop this chaos. #voteonthedeal 
Dear Mrs May,There was nothing fair or (allegedly) legal about the 2014 Scottish Independence Referendum.It was won by lies, fearmongering, and promises which would never be fulfilled.If anyone's out of touch, it's your party.WE WILL HAVE #IndyRef2 
“We are heading for one of the great political betrayals of modern times. Labour is siding with the unelected, archaic Lords to weaken the largest act of democracy in British history: Brexit. This is the establishment standing against the people.”Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
MPs get ready to vote on #Brexit.  
Brexit's a fantastic farce. Until you remember you're British.  
Good team work by ⁦@theSNP⁩ MPs at #ScottishQuestions today underlining the democratic mandate of @scotparl opposition to #EUWithdrawalBill & exposing the utter weakness of ⁦@DavidMundellDCT⁩ in UK Tory cabinet. #Brexit #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope 
“The Norway model proposed by Leave campaigners”?  No Chuka.  It’s proposed by REMAIN campaigners in a desperate attempt to dilute Brexit. We Leavers simply want to leave, and become an independent country.  End of story.  
There’s no point in the desperate half-measure of trying to save the country from Brexit while still ‘Brexiting’ =  ‘one-quarter-Brexiting’. JUST STOP IT. “Rebel MPs push for change of course on Brexit ahead of Commons showdown - Sky News  
#Labour is playing with fire. It has apparently failed to recognise the strength of feeling within the ranks of Labour voters against the party's support for Brexit - of any kind. Corbyn IS the King with no clothes. Economic and social catastrophe - on the way.  
Theresa May’s reached the tipping point re Brexit due to her endless dithering & my guess is we’re about to see utter turmoil, resignations & a Tory coup to tip her out of No10. 
Excellent column by @AlynSmith MEP: "It is clear now that we have no choice but to stop Brexit"  
Prof. Alan Sked - "The civil service keep on making figures: I’m surprised we don’t hear about the seven plagues of Egypt and the death of the firstborn."These figures were looked into by the Institute of Economic Affairs who said they’re b******s." #Brexit  
"Slowly but surely, Labour is shifting into a position where it must oppose the Brexit deal Theresa May brings back in the autumn. If Labour reject that deal and are joined by other opposition parties and some Tory rebels, it will fail."  
This is also how Brexit happened, and a thousand other horrifying policies.My favourite remains the promise to "ring fence" NHS spending but then having gutted support for old people's homes..... more of them end up in hospital so the NHS bill goes up. Thread.  
Representatives of more than 1.2 million Britons living abroad say they feel like the "forgotten victims of Brexit".Help them raise awareness. Please RT 
WATCH: @Anna_Soubry & @ChukaUmunna slam Labour's amendment, labelling it as 'identical' to the Government's hard Brexit plans.  
Neither Labour nor the Tories have a credible plan for BREXIT. Have the British people ever been so ill served by the two main parties? 
Shocking consequences of Brexit, part 94: 1) a vote enacted to reduce numbers of Romanian and Bulgarian workers reduces numbers of Romanian and Bulgarian workers2) As a result, British fruit literally rots in fields3) It’s not too late to stop shooting ourselves in the face  
Dear #FBPE brigade,Whether in or out of the SM, the final Brexit deal will be rejected by parliament. It's therefore imperative the Tories are given complete ownership of it. If Labour force the Tories into staying in the SM it will give them the perfect excuse to blame Labour. 
NEW: David Davis confirms Cabinet splits over Theresa May's Brexit strategy 
Eat your Brexit cake and go.Stop acting like a spoiled child and accept that you can’t have everything both ways — you won’t pick of the European cherry tree, without bothering to water the soil or tend to its branches. 
I know this is a tech process point but it suggests the man in charge of Brexit process has a different understanding of the situation to Number 10 - and that does matter whichever way you cut it 
Here is the response from my MP in regard to my question “How will Brexit benefit me?” If anyone would like to help me with my reply, pls DM me!  
I don’t give David Davis long, he’s going to bail on Brexit before he sees it through, he will say he’s retiring from politics 
We guess that by pointing out that no deal #Brexit would render 3.6m EU citizens illegal overnight, with very limited #citizensrights, if any at all, we are scaremongering. Are we @andreajenkyns? 
.@andreajenkyns, this question please: what happens with #citizensrights in the event of a no deal Brexit? Genuine question, not "spreading fear" here.Bonus question: Will "automatic grant of all existing rights" (Vote Leave) be delivered? (Answer: not with settled status)  
18/ @Simonhartmp asks who decided his suspension as CEO. @IanCLucas asks about Mark Ettelson, who introduced AIQ to Vote Leave campaign. So there was a connection between CA and referendum. Who introduced CA to Aron Banks? Crickets. Lucas, let me help you, it was Steve Bannon. 
This election is absolutely a “referendum on Trump's racism & authoritarianism.” Understand?  
.@JennyChapman: “It hardly instills confidence in the Government’s approach to Brexit when it’s supposed key negotiator is openly talking about resigning.“David Davis should stop worrying about his own job and start taking action to protect the jobs of the British people.”  
I agree @Andrew_Adonis Not only is Gove a “dangerous Brexit fanatic”, as you say, but he is also a very nasty piece of work who caused incalculable harm as Education Secretary  
.@ukLabour can't be trusted on #BrexitThey keep changing their minds. They:Voted for a ReferendumVoted for Art 50 Then:Their MEPs voted against the negotiations in the #EU ParliamentVoted against the Withdrawal Bill Won’t rule out a second #referendum  
"Let me be crystal clear we did no work for LeaveEU. Do you stand by those words?" asks @Simonhartmp. Nix quotes fromElectoral Commission's report. "I've been totally vindicated". So, why, says @simonhart did Nigel Oakes describe that work as "backbone" of Farage Brexit campaign? 
READ THIS NOW - we’re on the very real edge of being signed up to something that makes Brexit almost pointless, and it’s being done completely in the shadows.  
You may expect it but nothing could be further from the truth.....TM has no intention of delivering Brexit & you Mr Rees-Mogg are aiding & abetting her due to your inaction.  
There are 'Indian' like Arundhati Roy who oppose hanging of terrorists, mock India, call for referendum on Kashmir etc. Then there r ppl who go to TV debates & defend her..& then there r ppl on Twitter who defend those who defend Arundhati on TV.. kya hoga desh ka. #AntiIndiaGang 
Corbyn won #PMQs easily despite Labour’s own lack of a credible Brexit plan. Opposition leader can survive that for now. The PM supposed to be negotiating can’t  
Right. And now down the Brexit nitty gritty. Discussing the invoice that the Observer obtained for the work that Cambridge Analytica did for UKIP/Leave. Nix: "I stand by my statement that we have never worked in politics in the UK" 
NEWS! Young Britons looking forward to Post-Brexit fruit picking apprenticeships  
Daniel Hannan tells Dutch TV that he was surprised EU did not try harder to keep the Brits in after the referendum result. "Our door was open, it is the EU that threw it shut." Only psychopaths lie with more ease than Mr. Hannan.  
J.L. Borges: The Library of Brexit."Somewhere among these infinite shelves must lie Britain's complete plan for leaving the EU. But every volume is random and meaningless. I open a book with trepidation. It reads 'Brexit means Brexit' on every page. This is eternity." 
Both Labour and the Tories are stuck on a political merry-go-round. It's time to admit that a good #Brexit deal is nearly impossible, and get on with getting out.  Me for @prospect_uk 
Weather vane Umnna on Sky news talking Brexit Remain again, why doesn't Kay Burley remind of him of when he was a hard Brexiter barely two years ago....  
This is a good line. Rare to have a memorable line in a Brexit speech  
"'Twas Brexit, and the slithy Gove... " 
“If you harm Britain, you harm all of Europe” says @DavidDavisMP - as his central argument why EU27 will ultimately give us benign Brexit. Not all EU leaders would agree 
Scottish Government report admits Brexit could generate £540 million and 5,000 jobs for fishing industry  
A clear majority of British firms are eager to trade with non-EU countries outside the customs union post-Brexit, according to a new survey of 500 decision-makers  
Anna Soubry made a right arse of herself on Good Morning Britain again. Arguing she respected the result of the referendum, whilst arguing to stay in a Single Market and Customs Union. I know she likes a sherbet or 2 but that time of the morning talking claptrap resign Anna Now. 
Fully support @gordonjohnbrown proposals to ensure that #Immigration is managed. Compatible with membership of #singlemarket and #EuropeanUnion. Pity his government and mine acted too late to stop disastrous #Brexit vote. But not too late to stop Brexit. 
.@DavidDavisMP says UK’s offer of security cooperation is now unconditional. Not what PM signaled in months after Brexit vote - when she seemed to want better trading terms as condition of helping to keep Europe safe. French truculence seems to have made us supplicants (again) 
Corbyn and Starmer, still picking the correct path through Brexit despite clowns & no-marks, who basically want to pretend Leave vote never happened, trying to throw them off track #ChangeIsComing #voteLabour 
#NeverForget84 Khalistan is the only solution to Sikh sufferings around the world. It must be formed on basis of referendum  
DD now has to make a speech when by all accounts he's furious over his own Government's handling of Brexit - What ...a ...mess 
The PM is dragging her feet on Brexit! 
“I've always been clear” on Brexit, says @ChukaUmunna.I say you’re a hypocrite. 
IMO this sums up idiotic argument & attacks on @jeremycorbyn  re LABOUR on Brexit.  
How @theresa_may tripped over her Brexit backstop  
"Cambridge Analytica was the car. And AggregateIQ was the petrol," says Alexander Nix. Um...This graphic possibly more useful re CA & AIQ's relationship in referendum.  
I actually don't think there'd be rioting and would not condone it in any way. But I'd predict mass civil disobedience including a tax strike aimed esp at the BBC poll tax as many Brexit voters would refuse to pay for what they'd view as anti-democratic establishment propaganda.  
'Chronic mismanagement' at Liam Fox's trade department could derail May's Brexit plans  
I swear we could swap our crack Brexit negotiating team with the cast of Love Island and nobody would know.  
Corbyn is a leaver simple as that-sod this playing the long game crap =hes not for stopping brexit at all - hes sided with the tories on this one...  
Encouraging signs govt might accept an environmental amendment to the #WithdrawalBill on Tuesday, following defeat in the Lords. #GreenerUK clear we need an independent #greenwatchdog & environmental principles enshrined in law after Brexit  
Labour writes to Speaker re worries for MPs' and Commons staff safety if 3am vote held on Brexit next week.  
What would like to see from Brexit negotiations? 
Govt to publish backstop paper tomorrow morning- before Brexit committee 
May-Corbyn stance? This is a wilful refusal to acknowledge that Labour, unlike the Tories, is working to defend trade, jobs & rights through a new customs deal - honouring a referendum in which more people voted than in any other ballot in British history.  
A new report says Republicans think Trump's race-baiting attacks on football players & immigrants energize the base.Due to numerous circumstances, this election could escalate into a really ugly referendum on Trump's racism & authoritarianism.My post: 
#LordsQs @SarahLudford asks whether the Government will be advising the public to stock up on vital supplies, given that Whitehall is reportedly planning for the port of Dover to collapse on day 1 of a crash-out no-deal Brexit.  
Thanks to @ChukaUmunna & @Anna_Soubry for really useful and productive meeting, talking Brexit and Northern Ireland @allianceparty @StephenFarryMLA 
"I landed in Gibraltar with a heavy heart. Fifteen months on from my first exploratory visit to see how Brexit was affecting it, I had no good news for the people of this British Overseas Territory."Read more about my visit to Gibraltar:  
At least £1bn of tax revenue - which could go to fund our schools and hospitals - will be lost as HMRC shelve plans to digitalise tax procedures due to #Brexit#BrexitShambles#BrexitReality 
Gordon Brown has said Brexit means Scotland’s place in the Union is not as secure as it should be in a speech which warns of damage of nearly irreparable divisions over EU withdrawal. Gordon finally realising the Union is dying and it is down to the way we are treated by WM 
Brexit is utter madness. It will hit manufacturing of component parts like a sledge hammer hits someone in the face. It is going to be very messy and they might not recover from the blow. Brexit is bad for Britain. Brexit was a vote to destroy manufacturing. #StopBrexit 
Maguire-Evans. Central defences don’t get more hard Brexit than this.  
actually worth remembering the 32 tds who opposed a referendum in the first place. Let all of them lose their seats  
Any business that stays silent now and next Tuesday evening finds UK definitely outside Customs Union and Single Market - need not complain after as too late then. #brexit 
12.8 million people voted for Labour in 2017, and ended the Tory majority. Not ONE of them knew what Labour's position on Brexit was. Now we know they want "IN" we can ask how many of them were CONNED by Labour? I'd say 12.8 million.   
Where are you now on #Brexit?Are you still a Remainer/Leaver or have you changed your mind?Please Retweet 
The plain fact @theresa_may has not understood is that, if we cut all ties with the EU and bomb their capitals, there are some who will spin it as “soft #Brexit” and “a betrayal” because THEIR POLITICAL SURVIVAL DEPENDS on it. So she may as well do the right thing by the economy. 
Tory MP Andrea Jenkyns quit her junior government role in May to "fight for Brexit." Today, she used her new-found freedom to accuse EU citizens' rights group @the3million of "trying to overturn the Brexit vote" on the basis they tweeted a link to my interview with Bob Kerslake.  
The 'threat' of people rioting is Brexit doesn't go ahead is often given as an excuse not to stop Brexit. Can you imagine the scale of the rioting that's going to occur when there's no food in the supermarkets - have these people no foresight? 
.@britishineurope campaigners say 1.2 million people - the population of Birmingham - are being treated like 'hostages' by both sides during the #Brexit negotiations.  And they're right.   @ottocrat @guitarmoog @savlocal @alextaylornews 
Any scheme to try to frustrate Brexit will do, even one condemned during the referendum campaign.  
Did you realise that Great Britain still has Theresa May as PM and still doesn't know what it is going to do about #Brexit?I'll take a stab in the dark and say these two things are not unrelated. 
It’s really quite innovative, they just change the ‘the’ preceding complex concepts like Single Market and Customs Union into an ‘a’ in the hope that voters will shower with them for praise for neither frustrating Brexit nor leaving key components of the EU.  
*Brexit Explained*  
Britons living in EU tell MPs they are forgotten victims of Brexit  
Mr. Corbyn totally and utterly skewered the #Maybot today, 'It's not the Opposition conducting the #Brexit negotiations, neither is it the govt', that one line completely smashed the tory leader today, she can't have long left now, her demise can't come soon enough #PMQS 
I want a second referendum on Brexit.I think that if anybody will deliver that, it will be Corbyn & Starmer. They have been careful not to rule it out.They are the best chance IMO. 
Sorry to have to say this, but I will. If you don’t address this issue in a different manor, if there’s ever a referendum for a united Ireland and it involves the rest of GB, we are sunk. Trying to defend Unionism to, even my Debbie, is hard work!!  
'More delays than Northern rail': Corbyn trashes May's Brexit strategy – video  
For British citizens forced to drop their UK citizenship because of @theresa_may‘s reckless Brexit, the Tory decision to increase citizenship renunciation fees adds insult to injury. #ExitFromBrexit 
My 3-year-old just came home from nursery and said: “why are Remainers still insistent on keeping the UK in the Customs Union post-Brexit? Don’t they see that to get the benefits of leaving we need to leave the protectionist bloc?” Amazing. Ahead of her time. 
When historians write about the sorry chapter of Brexit negotiations the assumption of HMG EU27 unity would crumble at 1st hurdle was the 1st of a series of UK side miscalculations. The 2nd is they all speak English & read our press & know what Brexiteer Ministers said about EU!  
The “internal market” is actually the official legal name for the Single Market, which doesnt technically exist, and for which, before the referendum some Leave Cabinet ministers would argue we weren’t fully in anyway. Thank you. 
Opinion poll shows a 47%/40% majority think the decision to leave the EU was a mistake. 62% think the government is handling #Brexit badly, and only 81% of Leavers still think it was the right decision  #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
12 Conservative MPs sign an amendment calling on Theresa May to abandon her Brexit strategy and keep Britain in the single market  
All UK business who have been quiet (ish) about Brexit essentially have 6 days left to speak out- as the situation about Customs Union and Single Market about to be cast next Tue at Westminster.  Speak now or forever hold your peace and Q at borders.  
Corybn has hit rock bottom on Brexit. An opportunity to defeat the government on EEA membership and he has balked. Can someone tell me what on earth HM opposition are up to? 
Both Tories & Labour peddle the fiction of Single Market rewards without responsibility whilst families are already £900 worse off as a result of #Brexit How much poorer will families become as the Prime Minister & Labour opposition indulge in fantasy politics. #PMQs #Plaid 
There must be no sell-out on Brexit. Government must be prepared to walk away with No Deal. We demand full independence!Buy the shirts: Support Us:  
2 years ago I set this Gold Fish the challenge of creating a Plan for Brexit that delivered positive outcomes and kept the benefits of EU membership. The Gold Fish has managed to get as far as everyone else! It doesn’t matter who’s in charge of Brexit! #goldfishbrexitfail 
What can I say. This SHOULD have been an opportunity for Labour to defeat the Gov OR make the Tories own Hard Brexit. Enough Tories to defeat the Gov here, more than rebelled in December for a meaningful vote. Gotta be honest, Labour are the party on the back foot here.  
The Government has come up with a third idea to solve the irresolvable on customs post-BREXIT. The name they decided on for this was the Customs Regulatory Alignment Programme. Until someone started using the mnemonic. Love it!!!  
When Mumsnet is heading for the bunker, we have a dead canary in the Brexit coal mine.  
Hey @nytimes - So was it "Undiplomatic" when Barack Obama wrote an entire OpEd urging the people of Britain to oppose Brexit? Of does it not count because he was a Democrat? 
New government Ireland Brexit backstop plan looks dead before even published, as @SamCoatesTimes suggests. DUP and Brexiter ERG MPs are vetoing. Whoops 
Voted Tory twice, once for the referendum and once for carrying out the referendum. Both those times saw you elected as my MP but if Tory rebels who stood on Brexit manifestos cause us to stay in the EU I will not vote Tory again. Parliament is trying to con us out of Brexit. 
Leaving Cert English Paper 2 possible question : The impact of Pythagoras on Brexit and the pollination of the daisy 
Barry Gardiner spinning more Brexit lies on Radio 4. Talking about respecting the 52% and will of the people debate. Labour has not moved on one ounce, Labour under Corbyn is hard Brexit.Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Jeremy Corbyn smashed May at #PMQs. Again!May is paralysed. The Tories are paralysed.Everything they touch turns to shit.Brexit. The NHS. Rail. Energy. Welfare. The Economy........The Tories are a disaster for our nation. Wake up people. They are about to implode! 
Poll: polling companies now consistently showing a 7 point swing towards #Remain which would translate into a 55/45 result once don't knows are removed. Do you think this is a sufficient mandate for a #peoplesvote on #Brexit? Please RT far and wide, particularly #Leavers! 
Just caught up with #PMQs.Jeremy Corbyn:"When it comes to Brexit, this Government has delivered more delays and cancellations than Northern Rail."And"It's not the opposition conducting the negotiations, but sadly neither is the government.”Blimey. That’s brutal! 
Theresa May's Brexit train crash. My #PMQs video verdict 
There is nothing on offer but EU membership that would satisfy Labour’s demands from Brexit.  
The UK press reacts to Bernard-Henri Lévy's one-man Brexit play in London and quotes audience members: "He’s a caricature of the French intellectual. Fantastic to see somebody take themselves so seriously.” It's the lol season... :-)  
Brexiteers continue to claim that new trade deals will more than compensate for the inordinate costs and complexity of Brexit.Those claims are false, write @jonlis1 and @f_grovewhite  
No deal is better than a bad deal. I ask the Prime Minister, in what circumstances is she prepared to walk away from the negotiations, saving the British taxpayer billions of pounds. #PMQs #Brexit  
Watch floundering Theresa May refuse THREE TIMES to answer a simple question on Brexit during #PMQs pummelling 
Corbyn treats the privatised railway system as a hopeless shambles, but he wants to plough on with #Brexit which is a already a hugely greater and more destructive screw-up than railway privatisation could ever be. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
By not opposing #Brexit, Mr Corbyn is aiding & abetting the Govt's destruction of the country. Unfortunately JC, whom I believe to be fundamentally a decent bloke, is getting very bad advice from the likes of Seumas Milne, who is to him what Nick Timothy is to Mrs May. #Rasputin 
Theresa May asks Corbyn to rule out a 2nd Referendum.Jeremy Corbyn: "It's not the opposition that are conducting the negotiations. But very sadly, it's not the government either!" Someone please tell Theresa May what #PMQs is all about. 
My #PMQs review: Jeremy Corbyn deftly exposes Theresa May's Brexit paralysis.  
When it comes to Brexit this Government has delivered more delays and more cancellations than Northern Rail. #PMQs 
Theresa May asks Corbyn to rule out a 2nd Referendum.Jeremy Corbyn: "It's not the opposition that are conducting the negotiations. But very sadly, it's not the government either!"Someone please tell Theresa May what #PMQs is all about. 
How ironic that the real Red Tory turns out to be the leader of the Labour Party #brexit 
Yet another very easy victory for Jeremy Corbyn at PMQ's today.Theresa May went into full Maybot mode and just simply withered away under questioning about Brexit and the non existent Brexit white paper.Her government is a decaying corpse and Tory Civil War now beckons. #PMQs 
Powerful and motivating from @AlynSmith‘We’re now almost at the point where we have a collective choice to make. Either kill Brexit, or let it be thrust upon us.’   
Scottish Government report admits Brexit could generate £540 million and 5,000 jobs for fishing industry  
WATCH | "That's not Brexit!" @piersmorgan exclaims as @Anna_Soubry claims that she respects the referendum result but backs staying inside the Customs Union and the Single Market. What planet is she living on? Support us at  
So @ScotTories didn't like being reminded today that they opposed devolution in '97 and that Ruth Davidson lobbied against the Vow.  Seems nothing has changed - a party that is anti-devolution and ignores the @ScotParl on #Brexit. 
Lots of people contacting me about amendment 19a of the EU Withdrawal Bill. Happy to add my name in support of a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. 
Can’t be highlighted enough. We have votes in Parliament to deliver a soft Brexit. MPs need to step up to the plate and put the British people before party politics  
Latest government timetable for Brexit negotiations:29 Mar 2017: invoke Article 5030 Mar 2017- 28 Mar 2019: negotiate position within cabinet29 Mar 2019 - 31 Dec 2020: continue negotiating within cabinet1st Jan 2021 onwards: continuing negotiating within cabinet#PMQs 
Corbyn: Our Brexit policy is to be in a customs union but sign free trade deals.The EU: NoCorbyn: Customs Union. Free trade deals.The EU: Can you hear us? That defeats the whole point of a customs unionCorbyn: Theresa May has no plan.Imagine if he ever held office?#PMQs 
Andrea Jenkyns who quit govt last week so she could speak out on Brexit asked PM to spell out how bad deal would have to be before she walked 
PMQs verdict: Corbyn notches up another solid win on Brexit  
Back at the beginning of Brexit, Labour's idiotic position was to have "access" to the single market rather than membership of it. Today, more than two years later, Labour are STILL talking about "access" rather than membership. Nothing has changed. Absolutely nothing.#FBPE 
“The people of Scotland voted in a *FAIR* referendum to stay in the UK” says Theresa May at PM questions.  It was not!  It was based on lies, smears, scaremongering and a raft of broken vows commencing the day following the Indyref vote!  That alone is valid basis for Indyref2! 
Jeremy Corbyn is right to remind the Prime Minister that it is her government negotiating Brexit, not the Labour Party. Also an important contribution from @lloyd_rm highlighting the tragic suicide rate amongst young people and the ongoing mental health crisis that we face #PMQs 
ATTENTION! There is a CASH REWARD for anyone who finds the Government’s missing Brexit Bill WHITE PAPER. It will be paid in EUROS so that it will retain its VALUE.Last seen somewhere in the vicinity of DAVID DAVIS’S ARSE. 
Time’s ticking… The Tories don’t have a plan for Brexit. But we do.And it puts jobs and the economy first.#PMQs 
The word 'jobs' wasn't on the referendum paper. Freedom, sovereignty; control of our borders & destiny, like a proper country, are more important. A free, unfettered, nimble, 'can do' enterprising nation like the UK will always create more jobs & prosperity than the EU #PMQs 
That #PMQs really showed how Corbyn can profit by focusing narrowly on government's disarray over Brexit. Dreadful performance by PM, worst I can recall. Barely even attempted to answer most questions. 
About the only thing me and JC had in common for the last 45 years was opposition to the EU. He should revert to his principles and back Brexit. A ‘Norwegian style option’ would mean: paying the EU money, obeying its laws, and open borders. No thanks!  
Another zinger from Corbyn: "There have been more Conservative government cancellations and delays on Brexit than on Northern Rail" #PMQs 
Corbyn bullseye: More Con Govt cancellations and delays on Brexit than on Northern rail! #PMQs 
Labour have shattered their promise to respect the referendum result. Only the Conservatives will get the best Brexit deal - delivering on the referendum vote to get control of our money, borders and laws, while building a strong new relationship with Europe.#PMQs 
.@jeremycorbyn “It’s not the Opposition that are conducting the Brexit negotiations - and it’s not the Government either.” Boom!  #PMQs 
Zinger from Corbyn: "It is not the opposition negotiating Brexit... and sadly it is not the government either" #PMQs 
Crystal clear evasive Theresa May's still negotiating Brexit with her Cabinet Ministers, Tory MPs and DUP so is unable to negotiate for the UK with 27 European other countries. Pitiful #PMQs 
Theresa May based a whole general election campaign on what a sweet job she'd do of negotiating Brexit. Corbyn asks for some detail on how that's going and she sneers and ducks the question. How is that acceptable? #PMQs 
Time’s ticking… The Tories don’t have a plan for Brexit. But we do.And it puts jobs and the economy first.#PMQs 
It is nearly two years since the referendum FFS.  
Genuinely flattered to think I will be remembered by some as having been on the right side of history when this sad destructive Brexit chapter is written in the future. Hope my children will read these comments as what I am doing is for their generation & all those who come after  
Now that we know 13 Tory rebels are prepared to vote for continued membership of the EEA, Labour will surely take this opportunity to defeat the Government and vote for the EEA to mitigate the damage Brexit is set to do Britain??? 
Soft Brexit is like shooting yourself in the foot. As in, it's a terrible, terrible idea, unless the alternative is the Hard Brexit of shooting yourself in the head.  
"It's a fudge. It's not terribly clear what @jeremycorbyn is trying to do." @vincecable on Labour's amendment to the EU Withdrawal Bill. Only the Lib Dems are fighting to give YOU the FINAL SAY on Brexit, including the option of staying IN the E.U.  
Over half of recruitment companies could not find the labour even in the "quiet" first months of this year, the Association of Labour Providers says.Come on, Brexiters, get your wellies on. Your Brexit needs you!  
It's worth remembering this from the aftermath of the EU referendum when considering current Labour attacks on Corbyn over Brexit.  
Yes. The referendum is void, the majority are against Brexit, the warning signs are screaming - and government & opposition stagger towards the cliff edge with fingers in ears & eyes closed.  
Chuka, advocate No Brexit. Anything less is a useless fudge: a no-say second-class quasi-membership on the fringes of the best socio-economic organisation in the world. Which we belong to now, have vastly benefited from, and should be a leader in.  
CRAZY: May’s Brexit plan ‘could keep UK tied to Customs Union indefinetly’. No selling out - now is the time to fight for independence! @BorisJohnson @DavidDavisMP @michaelgove 
Just learned that this summer Switzerland will be holding a referendum on monetary reform.  It would effectively abolish fractional reserve banking and replace it with a public money system.   #degrowth 
Cambridge Analytica is under the spotlight again today. The referendum is under a cloud of allegations including overspending, misuse of personal data and suspect partnerships.Restore fairness to our democracy, join our call for a #peoplesvote here:  
Large parts of Britain feel they have no influence at all over the decisions that affect their daily livesA decent reply to the Brexit vote would have been to discuss why this is so - but we are now losing that opportunity  
Only a Labour #Brexit will protect jobs. Read my response to @Keir_Starmer commitment today to proposing tariff-free access to a single market. @unitetheunion 
Every Wednesday on #BBCDP @afneil asks the Labour guest to explain their party’s position on Brexit and the squirming starts, then he turns to the Tory and the squirming gets worse. Every week. No one has a clue. 
Labour’s Brexit ‘policy’ is to trick & wriggle & pretend while waiting for the Tories to trash the country, then - like vultures - to pick over the resulting open landfill site to build their very own favela.  
I’m with Gerard on this one. The political class did not see Brexit coming and has no clue as to the fury it will unleash if it betrays it.  
Scottish Government report admits Brexit could generate £540 million and 5,000 jobs for fishing industry  
If the Referendum result is betrayed it will bring down democracy. It will destroy what little faith there is left. 
Did you know, #DWP staff can overrule a doctor's note declaring you unfit for work? Well they can and, without any medical training either.This is #UniversalCredit. This is #ToryBritain.This is a #HostileEnvironment#benefits #indyref2 #Brexit 
The key issue isn't 'How Brexiteers lost control of Brexit' but 'how hard-right and far-right miscreants got such disproportionate influence in mainstream politics'. There's a clue to that if you look at the source of this sort of 'journalism' 
For 20 years I have been reading Kant's Critique of Pure Reason and I think, after deep immersion, I understand it. Next I intend to start on Labour's Brexit policy. 
The headline on this is "How Brexiteers Lost Control of Brexit"; it could just as well be "How Brexiteers Were Mugged By Reality" 
It’s not too late to stop the pointless & damaging Brexit. Now 47% of Britons want to stay in the EU and 40% to leave  - a record percentage for remain @Labour4EU @labour4europe @euromove 
No, Wes. This is not hard. It is Labour tortuously making it hard - actually: impossible - for itself by a lot of silly double-talk & writhing about trying to fool everyone. The simple, straight, honest & right policy is: Stop Brexit.  
.@ChukaUmunna: history will not be a kind judge of the Labour Party if we go along with the hard Brexit vision of this Prime Minister. 
Ministers told to stop telling lies about the ease of securing post #Brexit trade dealsThere are no deals being negotiated with countries outside the EU and it will take years for any to be agreedDo you hear #Leavers. It was all lies and always was! 
Sobering to think that if you're not on Twitter, you could be forgiven for thinking that Brexit might turn out all right in the end. There's so little in the mainstream media.I swore I'd never go on Twitter; I only joined to try and play my small part in the fight. 
BREAKING: Brits in Europe demand government formally ask EU for their continuing right of free movement post Brexit.  tell Brexit committee that they have been told by their contacts in EU "it is not a red line and is winnable...but needs to be requested by government " 
That is the most ignorant thing you could hear a Tory MP to say. They were told there situation would NOT change if Brexit happened.  
To those that bleat about returning law making to the UK after #Brexit think about this. Your MPs run the UK the way they see fit. They don't give a toss whether you like the rules or not. Let's face it, who wants austerity, inflation and school, police, fire and NHS cuts? 
I would like to add that @iandunt and @mrjamesob have been great. at fighting our corner. But it's true: as an ex journalist I'm shocked that most journalists don't give a toss about what's happening to 1.3mn of their fellow countrymen who don't happen to be in the UK. #Brexit 
BREAKING: Brits in Europe 'we feel we are 'victims" of  Brexit" "We feel forgotten...we really do feel victims in this situation and we are not getting much support from MPs," Michael Harris, chair, Eurocitizens, Spain. 
There is just no opposition, Corbyn is a collaborator and a Brexit enabler. All Remainer’s should ditch him without delay. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
There truly are no depths to which you will not sink are there?It is Brexit and this govt's maliciousness and incompetence that has put the "fear of god" into many EU citizens who have legally made the UK their home.But sure, blame @The3Million 
3/ if you have a problem with the words used by @JORISLUIJENDIJK, please take it up with him. The story of the Ipswich mayor was horrendous and a major failing by the Home Office. It only occurred as the mayor felt it necessary to become British due to Brexit.  
This is right from @siennamarla this morning. The Labour leadership’s position on Brexit has been consistent, some have just chosen not to listen.  
I don't oppose Corbyn's position on this to undermine him, and hate the fact that some others are motivated by that goal. I am so passionate because Labour have in their hands the potential to limit the most damaging effects of #Brexit. They risk letting that chance slip away.  
A beginners guide to Brexit."Soft Brexit" = Remain"Stay in the Customs Union" = Remain"Stay in the Single Market" = Remain"Align in as many areas as possible"= RemainThe lexicon of liars and cowards that won't come out and tell you they want to deny you what you voted for! 
.@VinceCable speaking @open_britain launch of report into how Brexit will damage the UK’s status as a trading nation: time to dispel the myth that we don’t trade and export around the world as part of the EU 
#Brexit means leaving the #SingleMarket #CustomsUnion and #ECJLeave must mean LeavePlease sign and RT petition below #LBCLIVE #skynews #Conservatives #bbcqt #bbcdp #PMQs #Brexit 
REVOLT: David Davis 'is prepared to spark Cabinet rebellion' over May's Brexit indecision."For months Europe have been demanding we give them more detail and now we are going out of way not to give it to them." 
Increasingly it looks like the purpose of Theresa May is to dilute Brexit to the point it is utterly useless, then lose to Corbyn, and that will then finish even her token "Brexit". We are being played. 
Important that EU citizens are protected and feel comfortable post-Brexit, as UK citizens living in the EU should be too. Nevertheless organisations claiming to help when they are spreading fear must be challenged.  
Take up the opportunities offered by Brexit, rather than solely searching for possible downsides. Those who have the flexibility of mind to do so will succeed, and succeed big. It's what we as a nation have always been good at.  
What a difference 2 years makes didn't think EEA was such a shiny proportion during Referendum.  
We don't trust Theresa May to decide our future. Whether you voted to LEAVE or REMAIN we should all fight for a vote on the final deal.If you agree spread this message, we don't have long.#WednesdayWisdom #Brexit #protest 
Fwiw the most important amendment next week isn't EEA, or even customs union, but the one on giving parliament control if it rejects govt's Brexit deal.  
 @Keir_Starmer. I’ve written to you about the Labour front bench position on the Brexit vote next week. I look forward to your reply.  
Labour leadership's defensive formulations against Remain attacks, internal and external, have forced it into a position where it is going to have to oppose final Brexit deal. 
Lack of detail on post-Brexit agricultural policy ‘damaging’ farming.  'Evidence & facts are stubborn things; and whatever may be our wishes, our inclinations, our dreams or the dictates of our passions, they cannot alter the state of facts and evidence.' 
OK so what the bloody hell is Labour's Brexit policy now?  
Do you often pretend to know what you're talking about? Apparently 79% of Brits blag their way through conversations they are completely clueless on. Sky News speaks to @vodkaboris, author of the 'Bluffers Guide to Brexit' on the art of bluffing  
Tory MP Andrea Jenkyns accuses the3million of using language on social media "that would put fear of God" into the vulnerable people it is trying to protect. "Is this helpful? Are you trying to overturn the Brexit vote? she asks. 
Theresa May's Brexit negotiating style in a nutshell:BANK ROBBER: I want a helicopter to the airport and a plane waiting. If you don't. I WILL NOT shoot this hostage. In fact I have no bullets and anyway this is a toy gun...  plus I have arthritis in my trigger finger. 
"allowed"? I'd say "forced". Seriously people, Brexit is being done to the Dutch and not the other way around.  
UK services sector 'losing lifeblood due to Brexit', latest survey shows  
I remember staying up all night watching the results come in from the independence referendum... Afterwards I actually said 'thank god that's over... We can all get on with our lives now'.. How wrong was I, within hours sturgeon started on again... 
Also me in an i8 and r8 and a milk float at a test track - I wont be auditioning for the spare presenting slot on Top Gear...Also @SamuelMarcLowe with Adam Boulton after my #brexitforensics part 2 at 10am on two way trouble for Brexit on Rules of Origin... 
WATCH | @ProfSked blasts HMRC for their "b******s" forecasts claiming a no deal Brexit could cost British business an extra £20bn: "I'm surprised we don't hear about the Plagues of Egypt and the death of the first born." Support us at  
It is time for my Blairite friends to stop lionising Michael Gove. He is a dangerous Brexit fanatic who strikes ‘reformist’ poses largely for effect 
Dear Corbyn-attacking commentators, you might want to point out that the Corbyn/Starmer line is backed by a clear majority of Labour MPs. How many Labour MPs agree with @ChukaUmunna?I oppose Brexit but politics needs to take into account Parliamentary arithmetic next week 
Scottish Government report admits Brexit could generate £540 million and 5,000 jobs for fishing industry - The Telegraph  
Brexit is a disaster already and is likely to get much worseThe fault is 100% the Tories/UKIPI trust Corbyn and Starmer to steer the best route available I don’t trust ToriesI can’t help noting that most Labour rebels have attacked Corbyn on more or less everything since 2015  
'Furious' David Davis hits out at latest Brexit blueprint delay over what he believes are deliberate attempts by Downing Street officials to foil Brexit  
Anyway full story here: But this is just Part 1.Part 2 coming up on All out Politics at 10am including -- a recent UK trade negotiator explaining the warnings, ignored, given to top of Government- and why post Brexit British cars, arent#rulesoforigin 
Labour accused of betraying Brexit voters by pledging to keep Britain tied to the EU, yesterday’s announcement piles scorn on Corbyn for having fought all his political career to leave yet now looks to gain political ‘brownie-points’ with the biggest U-turn ever, no credibility. 
Yesterday's post.  Idée fixe: Theresa May's disastrous Brexit strategy   
It’s the Beeb way with Brexit  
Getting quite excited about Brexit now. The judge-led inquiry is going to be a belter 
Dear journalists Labour have not taken a significant step towards a soft Brexit.Anyone can have access to the SM.Nobody will get membership without accepting FoMNobody will get a better deal than current members You can’t be in a customs union & negotiate your own deals 
'Furious' David Davis hits out at latest Brexit blueprint delay over what he believes are deliberate attempts by Downing Street officials to foil Brexit  
Live now: @BritishInEurope & we are giving evidence at the House of Commons Exiting the EU Committee on #citizensrights for EU citizens in the UK and British in Europe post Brexit: 
The really bizarre is that Labour’s own plans means a Labour-Brexit would fail Labour’s 6 tests. What is all this doing to the nation’s mental health, one wonders ...  
“Voting to support these Lords amendments would undermine the Government’s negotiations and Brexit itself...the Government and the United Kingdom must not be undermined at this critical junction in our history.”  
Unions need to start speaking up for members whose jobs and livelihoods will be hit so hard by the May-Corbyn stance on Brexit  
In our latest report, we expose the realities of going it alone on trade - and it's clear: a trade deal with Donald Trump's America will never make up for the costs of a hard BrexitYou can read our full report here:  
Read and weep. Because our biggest trading partners have no idea what kind of #Brexit the government wants, they are already planning to cease trading with us. We are seriously on the brink on major economic disaster, walking over a cliff, with a media blindfold on.  
Yeah why not play some more political games - I mean, it’s not as if  the national interest is at stake or anything like that ...#brexit #sellout 
The real problem with UK politics is that brexit divides both main parties and their 'leaders' are just trying to keep them from falling apart along leave/remain fault lines.Neither the government or the opposition are attempting to do the right thing by the country. 
Labour and the Tories are leading Britain to a FAKE Brexit, where we stay entangled in a 'Customs Partnership' and mountains of EU red tape and regulations.Vote UKIP to reject Tory/Labour fake Brexit, and enjoy the freedom and prosperity a TRUE Brexit will bring.#LewishamEast 
France is proposing a rule change that would make life a lot harder for Britain's banks after Brexit  
Underlines the fact that independence is about making Scotland a better, kinder, happier country - the antithesis of what #Brexit is doing to Britain...Scots 'more optimistic about future', according to BBC survey - BBC News  
We recommend reading the full article. As we have previously written, there really is no choice now if you're pro-#Brexit. May must go.  
Labour Brexit policy vs Conservative Brexit policy  
About time. May's Government has been happy to sacrifice UK businesses on the altar of #Brexit ideology for months now, I'm surprised industries have resisted fighting back this long.#PeoplesVote #exitfrombrexit 
Fantastic piece. Came pretty clear at Florence that half the Conservative party just don’t read the PM’s Brexit speeches.  
This is scathing stuff from the Freight Transport Association on the government ignoring business to pursue a hard Brexit.  
This is the motor industry corespondent at the @FT. Instead of arguing about what kind of Brexit the referendum vote meant, it’s more than time for straight up honesty about what kind of life Brexit will mean for the many.  
I am sorry to say you are right - nobody knows , which is also true about almost all the other key #Brexit issues that will affect every day life .   Yet there are less than 10 months to go until the extremist Tories have their way…...  
WARNING: Eurosceptic MPs tell May not to back down on upcoming Brexit Bill votes."There are 15 amendments…Collectively these would frustrate, delay and potentially reverse Brexit." 
62 per cent of voters said the government was handling Brexit negotiations badly - this is exactly why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal!  
Labour does not have a new position on Brexit, still less a plan. It has a new tortured verbal convolution to avoid having a position or a plan. 
Good. But given we know the tests are not being met why not use this period to campaign hard against the Brexit she is delivering which we know will not meet those tests?  
Does your neighbour know that Mundell has been going round businesses asking them to drop 'Scotland The Brand' and replacing the Saltire with the Butcher's Apron? We'll after Brexit the UKGOV will be doin away with 'Scotland the Country'#YOUYESYET 
State of this. I’m not considering forming a new party & am going nowhere. I am Labour & its not me supporting a Tory hard Brexit. Stop indulging your own wishful thinking Paul. Perhaps you should go back to selling newspapers rather than writing in them.  
Labour will vote against the Brexit deal if its tests are not met, says @Keir_Starmer, and at the moment it is hard to see how the government will pass those tests. #r4today 
We agree with Jeremy, we need a better deal than EEA membership. That's why @Remain_Labour supporters across the country are campaigning for full membership of the EU, delivered through a #PeoplesVote. Donate below if you can. #Brexit is not inevitable   
It seems we have another case of #Brexit supporters illegally mis-using public money:  
I’m not even close to fed up with middle age men voicing their ‘expert’ views on female anatomy and reproductive rights -  maybe we should hold a referendum in Wetherspoons sort this out once and for all 
BONANZA: Brexit could boost the Scottish seafood industry by £540 million & 5,000 jobs.‘Underlines importance of the UK regaining sovereignty over its own waters and becoming independent,’ say the @sff_uk. 
Stamer confirming on Radio 4 that Labour position on single market is all about avoiding splits in Labour Party. Jeremy Corbyn will go down in history as the enabler of a Tory extreme Brexit. 
Ministers told to ditch 'fallacy' of securing easy Brexit trade deals.'Notion that a raft of new deals can be done swiftly or bring overall benefit to the UK economy has now been exposed as a fantasy,' say MPs.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #b4b 
One thing .@theresa_may and .@jeremycorbyn have in common is their love of having their cake and eating it. Corbyn's latest EU Withdrawal Bill amendment proves he still thinks it's possible to have all the benefits of being in the EU whilst being out. He's kidding nobody. #Brexit 
Another Brexit consequence comes home to roost, right on schedule.  
Scottish Government report admits Brexit could generate £540 million and 5,000 jobs for fishing industry  
I don’t understand this fuss around Labour’s alleged shift on the post Brexit Britain and the  single market; ‘full access to the single market’ seems like a fudge to me; those who have been in EU affairs long enough know that access does not mean membership. #brexit 
At what point are the sane in Labour going to force a leadership challenge. Corbyn is ignoring the wishes of the membership and pushing the Brexit backing policy he personally wants. Are the rest of the party just hoping Labour survives Brexit if the country won't? 
The Opposition is still backing the Government on EU withdrawal.#LewishamEastByElection#LewishamEast #Brexit#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
"There's a real chance that the Brexit we told you to vote for could hit everyone rather hard in the pocket.So give us your money while you still have it. Owning a diamond mine is an expensive gig."  
Any move to soften brexit is welcome, but we know the EU isn’t going to accept such a deal, and it’s so close to EU membership there’s little point anyway. Labour must face facts: anything short of full membership will fail the six tests #peoplesvote #fbpe 
Will @jeremycorbyn support the Biafra referendum movement? They are persecuted by the Nigerian Government, their (Jewish) leader missing, feared dead. In the 60’s their dreams of independence were sold by @UKLabour for access to oil, causing the death of 3mil.But no Jews no News! 
Iain Duncan Smith says that we should be planning for freight delays at Dover after Brexit. But as Maritime UK has said even modest delays could lead to a permanent 20 mile log jam. For context, 20 miles is the distance from Dover to Canterbury.  Tricky to plan for that. #r4today 
Just over a week ago, the HMRC bosses told MPs there were 39 projects out in hold or cancelled because of Brexit but wouldn’t say which Today we reveal the government’s full list Billions lost in tax as Brexit puts dozens of critical projects on ice 
Oh................SNP have been accused of fudging a report on the Brexit boost to fishing after ‘quietly’ launching a paper yesterday showing that Brexit could bring a huge economic boost to the Scottish fishing industry and create up to 5,000 new jobs  
Gloves are off from industry now on Government approach and mishandling of Brexit - after months of warnings, Freight industry say “not a single” of their concerns dealt with and Britain “on road to nowhere”.  
Stop taking us for fools @jeremycorbyn EU won't give us a 'cake and eat it' deal just because you ask more nicely than Theresa May. When you make these claims, you give people false hope that Brexit can work, so they won't face reality until it's too late  
Usual rubbish from IDS on @BBCr4today. Imagine how respected it’d be if,from day one,it challenged the Govt on Brexit & not been so craven? 
Oh. Brexit will annihilate the NHS too? Fancy that? #CambridgeAnalytica #NHS70 #bbcqt 
“We knew the promise of any extra money for the NHS would likely prove to be entirely illusory & that our NHS would suffer badly from the political ideology driving Brexit.”By Dr Charles House #Brexit #CambridgeAnalytica #Ambulance 
“In total, around 139,000 of the 1.2 million NHS employees are foreign nationals – equating to one in eight (12.5 per cent).~62,000 (5.6% of all employees - come from EU countries. 45,000 come from Asia, & 21,000 are from African countries.#NHS #Brexit 
Far from delivering £350million to the NHS, Brexit poses a real risk to the health service, writes Dr Charles House - who also calls for a #PeoplesVote on any Brexit deal 
What is sad, actually rather pathetic too, is #Labour’s myopia over Brexit. They have a MASSIVE opportunity to lead Britain out of this Tory right wing inspired Brexit mess, and they are ignoring it, prefering to help May deliver economic and social catastrophe @ChukaUmunna 
It's clear to me that this poll has been hijacked by bots. I've looked at some of the comments and those acoounts only have a handful of followers and only tweet pro Brexit messages. Please help @Twittersupport 
“What do you do?”“I’m a Barrister.”“Specialise in anything?”“Ships.”<prolonged, slightly awkward pause>“Ah. *Interesting*.”Conversation moves onto easier topics (religion, politics, Brexit)  
"Labour are betraying their own manifesto pledge & betraying millions of Labour voters who backed leaving the EU" Andrew Bridgen"The Norway model is the vassal state, not #Brexit & Labour will need to answer to its many leave voters" @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
The UK is eyeing the "Norway model" after Brexit, which makes Norwegian PM Erna Solberg ask, "why … should you leave the EU if you’re accepting that?"  
Chickens coming home to roost for #Leave but as Faisal later notes UK Govt were warned about #rulesoforigin issues about a month after the referendum by Civil Servants, & in detail by the Japanese memo from Sept 2016 #Brexit #FBPE 
The article is missing key context: EU military staff are *all* secondees from Member States. The UK is asking to be treated exactly like an EU Member State, even after Brexit. It wants to leave, but not leave. #cakeism #brexitmeansbrexit 
Talking on @GMB of Labour’s betrayal of referendum by backing single market which means uncontrolled immigration from EU continues 
Corbyn’s Labour goes for softest Brexit ever!!!!!!!  
MPs know very well that Brexit will cause harm - and in some cases great harm - to their constituents. And yet on 12 June many will place a higher priority on their own careers and party loyalty. Shame on them. #stopbrexit 
“In what universe is it OK to mortgage Wisconsin to the tune of over $4 billion for the Foxconn deal without asking the people of the state of Wisconsin? Hey Gov. Scott Walker, why not have a referendum on Foxconn, what are you afraid of?” 
I wrote this before Labour tabled its new amendment to the Brexit bill... Here's what the new move means 1/~ 
It also has the richest - London - & it is the isolation of the one from the other which explains Brexit  
Brexit poll reveals record number of voters think decision to leave EU is wrong - The Independent  
Biggest midterm turnout for @polkdems since at least 2002.The most Democratic women on the ballot in Polk County history.A candidate running for every seat.The referendum on Donald Trump and his Republican Party is in 154 days. 
Brexit is unnecessary. We have a plan to build a modern Britain | Will Hutton and Andrew Adonis  
California’s race for governor has become a referendum on resistance  
What is most wonderful about this is Trump won this district. Again it is a referendum on his pathetic presidency. Well done, blue!  
Horsefeathers.Disney poisoned the well with the execrable "Last Jedi", and no one was interested in a Han Solo origin story anyway.This is a damning referendum on Kathleen Kennedy, nothing more.  
“A customs union, not the customs union.”“Full access to the Single Market.”“Complete waffle, rather than being honest with the British people and telling them that Brexit is a shit idea that will make everyone poorer.”“A new kind of politics, that is total bollocks.” 
Remain’s advice is ‘stay put’. But the EU has moved on. Reversing Brexit is a meaningless slogan. It assumes we could re-enter the EU on the same terms as before. We can’t. 
1/ So now we hsve the latest announcement on Brexit from Labour They want to stay in the SM and CU, not exactly as announced in their 2016 manifesto, remember the one straddling the Fence.Well it brought seatsand now they have abandoned the working classcCorbyn the liar 
Either way the Brexit deal pretty much has to be put to a vote.If it's a #PeoplesVote, great!If it's a general election... with the chance of a new negotiating team being brought in with 2-3 months before Brexit day... I can't count to that level of crazy.#EUWithdrawalBill 
Let's game this out:Labour supports a Brexit that protects jobs/living standards (ish) but which makes us less sovereign than EU members.If that becomes the deal, people will reject it. If not Labour votes it down#WreckingAmendment 
This is especially true in states like California that use the referendum process to turn citizens into legislators, 
 Globalists fear populism sweeping across Europe!It's the #1 topic on their Bilderberg meeting agenda set for June 10th in Turin, Italy!#WorldEnvironmentDay2018#MBGA#Brexit#WWG1WGA#GlobalistsInPanic#AdjunctProfessr 
If there is one thing the English love, it is a portmanteau. They are absolute fiends for portmanteaux. They can’t help it; when they see two words side by side, they have to squish them together, no matter how ridiculous the outcome. Brexit. Chunnel. PRINKING. 
I so want to see ‘middle aged Love Island’. All talking about Brexit, pensions, stepkids, student debts, nose hair, who’s mowing the lawn... 
I don't know what it is about chloe. Is it the insincerity? Posing as a victim? Maybe just the condescension. But she's doing a splendid job of galvanising opposition to brexit. Many thanks to the TPA funders  #LowRentChloe #goodformorale 
To all the #FBPE using this tweet to berate Corbyn on Brexit, take a long hard fucking look at yourselves. We are talking about people losing their lives here. #FBPE is turning into a toxic movement. And yes, I voted remain. 
It is almost like the Labour frontbench aren't serious about beating the government on Brexit...  
The fact that TFA and TLJ raked it in but Solo will be the first Disney/Star Wars box office loser is a damning referendum on the moviegoing audience. TFA and TLJ suck; Solo was pretty good.  
Corbyn is sabotaging any real attempt to back the Lords EEA amendment...you #Lexiters have lost all credibility & we #Remainers will do our best to ensure neither main party wins the next election.#Brexit harms us & you lot back it. Both are to blame now..had your chance. 
Gordon Brown wants to address the issue that produced Brexit vote and singles out immigration in particular. Well, @OfficeGSBrown, the problem with your intervention? It wasn't immigration that produced Brexit vote: it was *lies about* immigration.  1/ 
We did not vote for #Brexit only for the Establishment to betray us.There is no Soft #Brexit There is no Hard #Brexit There is #Brexit Anything less than being  completely out is not #Brexit  
Brexit and England song should be the Millwall song :"no one likes us, we don't care "If I won the euro millions I'd put some in Millwall. 18 of the happiest months of my life 
1: What about the Brexit Scots don’t want? 2: What about the rape clause Scots don’t want? 3: What about the power grab Scots don’t want? 4: What about the Tories who Scots don’t want? 5: Come to think of it you came third in the election so Scotland doesn’t want you either.  
An important story about European governments advising businesses to avoid using British parts ahead of Brexit is bound to be prominently covered on the BBC website... how puzzling... I have scrolled through three pages of news, past story about salad cream, still can’t find it!  
'Moscow will never return Crimea since #Crimea opted to reunite with Russia in a free referendum' - Putin  
Brexit: Labour amendment seeks 'full access' to EU market: Only obtainable with full membership of the Customs Union and Single Market. But you know that don’t you @UKLabour ? 
More #brexit induced job losses for #Britain : 
Labour: “We want a jobs first Brexit...”“So you’ll support the Lord’s EEA amendment then?”Labour: “A Brexit that gives us the same access as before...”“So, the EEA?”Labour: “The sane frictionless trade as before...”“EEA then?”Labour: “No, we’ll abstain”  
I'm not clever, but as Labour's amendment on access to single market has no prospect of passing, to me its only purpose must be to furnish Labour with pretexf to demand abstention on Lords' EEA amendment, which hitherto stood a v. good chance of passing. Labour gives full Brexit! 
I have the strangest hero list since #brexit: David LammyCarol CadwallaJeremy ClarksonPeter StringfellowKen ClarkeJohn MajorAlastair CampbellFemi Nick Clegg Tracey Ullman Ian HislopDominic GrieveAndrew Adonis Anna SoubryTony BlairAnd now Archbishop of Canterbury  
Yet another poll saying Brexit is wrong, are you listening @theresa_may #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #FBPE 
Britain and #newsnight tonight summarised:Our justice system is a mess#Brexit is an almighty messOur transport system is another almighty mess#Grenfell testifies to everything else being a messConclusion: Britain is in an appalling mess 
“It seems the DUP want special status for north when it comes to marriage equality, language rights and women’s ability to access healthcare but not when it comes to Brexit.” Cllr Patrice Hardy speaking on Newsnight tonight .@MisssPatrice 
Labour has changed its Brexit policy again. It now wants free access to the Single Market through shared institutions. The UK should not be a rule-taker. Apparently this means it will not now vote to stay in the Customs Union.Brexiteers are very happy.Labour Remainers are upset. 
.@JeremyCorbyn is NOT the problem. The @LibDems & @CONservatives are desperate to try and finish him. It’s not going to happen. Brexit belongs entirely to the Tories and we all know who got it to bed with them!  
Many people that voted leave did so on the promise that was the best thing for the NHS and it would deliver much needed funding. Well this (from NHS Consultant) is the reality of what Brexit means for NHS.Voted leave but have #nhslove? Be a #Remainernow 
Don't crash the E Kent economy @CharlieElphicke @DamianCollins @DamianGreen put country before #Brexit dogma @EK_EuropeanMove @Labour4EU 
Corbyn voted against having a referendum in the first place. He campaigned for remain with a sensible remain and reform message and has said that he would vote remain again. Labour’s manifesto six tests are based on the final deal, so I continue to support him. 
I’m not too worried what the Tories or Lib Dems have to say, but factor in the split between Labour remain and Brexit voters, and you see Labour’s problem. Far better to let Brexit destroy itself and the tories with it.  
Exc: DD raging at No10 order to rewrite  Brexit White Paper for a FIFTH time - threatening to go nuclear - as Mrs May’s war committee meet this Thursday to discuss... err... pork pies. Brexit going swimmingly well latest with @tnewtondunn  
Another reason why Labour must support Lords EEA Amendment next Tuesday. UK jobs, trade & manufacturing at risk from Tory Brexit  
“Moral duty for MPs to oppose Brexit? “ Clegg clearly belongs in the same institution as AC Grayling, Alastair Campbell, Lord Adonis, James O’Brien and all the other  remaniac Twitter loons we’ve come to know and detest.  
Remaining in the single market while controlling immigration and remaining in the customs union while striking trade deals with third nations isn't a soft Brexit; it's a fantasy. The Times shouldn't dignify it even with a comment.  
This is fine but Hearts need an absolute bastard in midfield. A Brexit voting, 60 Regal King-size a day smoking, booting cunts into orbit bastard.  
The noise from this machine alone is enough for anybody to support Brexit, vote UKIP and the EDL while funding Britain First.  
Looks like Labour will give up any chance of stopping the Tories Hard Brexit by abstaining on an amendment to the #EUWithdrawalBill that would guarantee our place in the Single Market.An opportunity to save jobs and wages squandered. #shame 
The government was told about this *after* the referendum? You mean no one in government had thought to find this stuff out *before* asking the public to vote on eu membership???And they still envoked A50?The Tories are CRIMINALLY incompetent.  
Concerns for eastern Europeans in Brexit ‘settled status’ plan, says charity. What about the cash-paid cleaners, au pairs, building site workers. What about the children in care? Elderly in care who came to UK after WW2   
Brexit BREAKTHROUGH: Britain to present BRAND NEW divorce plan to Barnier on FRIDAY. Let’s Hope Weak May, doesn’t agree compromises on CU, SM, Fishing etc!  
EU firms advised not to use British parts ahead of Brexit  
Dutch have told EU industry to boycott British parts after Brexit, this is scandalous project fear, will they still expect to sell their cars in Britain?? 
Belgian court summonses Spanish referendum judge for 4th September  
DON'T BE FOOLED - This is not a "softer Brexit" it is just another "cake and eat it Brexit" that Brussels has already dismissed. For starters @UKLabour would not sign up to freedom of movement which wll deprive our youth the right to work and settle in the EU. #StopBrexit 
Pity the Church of England was officially neutral during Referendum campaign. Many devout Anglicans who mainly backed Leave might have listened. Catholic Church openly backed Remain but clearly many leading Catholic Brexiteers weren't listening to its advice sadly.  
Cambridge Analytica whistleblower calls for second referendum as he tells MEPs data scandal 'caused Brexit'  
You're campaign manager for the Taxpayer's Alliance. You helped run Vote Leave - who won Brexit - you ARE the political elite 
Here is the voice of a real Labour person. In N Ireland. A place @jeremycorbyn has spent his entire career saying he fights for. Hard to imagine not being in the Labour Party but his woeful lack of leadership/opposition on Brexit making it harder and harder to stay.  
Very serious for UK firms/jobs. Ppl need to understand that (see my blog last October: ) business running much faster than politics of Brexit. With Brexiters still going on about 'Project Fear', I'm not sure that general public know what's about to hit them  
Viva Brexit! Is it not time to think again and withdraw what is only now an “intention” to leave the EU? The British identity and dignity are not at stake. The future of the younger British generations is at stake. Article 50 notification is revocable!  
"Oh the British are leaving. STOP selling them our goods, STOP!!!,even if our business goes bankrupt as a result!!!" No European exporter would ever say. Except perhaps in ultra-remoaners' bed-wetting fantasies?#Brexit  
It shows how mad and delusional the Conservatives and Lib Dems have become.Labour now holds the Centre ground of British politics and Brexit.Corbyn and Starmer have steered a sensible and unifying middle course between the two extremes that have bitterly divided our Country.  
What’s annoying is that quite a lot of Corbyn’s programme is reasonably sound, but he can’t do any of it if the economy is in the toilet because of Brexit. Its beyond reason. How can I support that? 
I will hopefully be on with @adamboultonSKY tomorrow discussing this. Not EU punishing UK; just a predictable consequence of Brexit.  
Nancyboy Southgate made them do it. Look how uncomfortable Hard Brexit Harry Maguire is with this nonsense. Neil Warnock wouldn't have it, he'd have them hill running  
‘Given the fraudulent way in which Brexit vote was secured and the government  rushing through 15 Lords amendments to the Brexit bill in a 12-hour session in the Commons next week, a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal is now irrefutable’ 
Hey Brexiters, you knew about this consequence of voting to leave the EU, right?You must do, apparently everything was known about Brexit, no dark area.And of course, you were in favour of this too, right?  
So, Labour is going to, once again, waste time on chasing an impossible rainbow, and rollover and let the Tories carry on their disastrous Brexit project. 
Yes! It’s a reasonable person test - could a reasonable person be expected to assume that all options offered by the Government in a referendum had been assessed and deemed to be achievable and non-harmful to the country? Exactly this   
It tells you all you need to know about parlous state of Brexit debate that Tories lampoon Labour’s EU Withdrawal Bill amendment as being too single-markety and LibDems attack it for not being single-markety at all. Both accuse Corbyn of betrayal. Mad is not the word 
1) So...Corbyn was facing a #Brexit crisis -whipping MPs on EEA amendment would expose him once & for all as a LeaverSo his current plan is to create a smokescreen - abstain on EEA amendment to guarantee its failurethen submit a similar one which is guaranteed to fail as well 
A referendum on Scottish independence would be only on the issue of Scotland's sovereignty, not to discuss every single policy Scotland would have. That would be for a Scottish general election. 
Tory MP's voting against Brexit should be deselected and kicked out of parliament. We are either a democracy or not. Either way, their jobs are now redundant. 
If you work in the UK car parts industry, you might want to be asking anyone who argued for #Brexit why they campaigned to trash your livelihood.#PeoplesVote #ExitFromBrexit 
The ICO's report on use of data in the referendum? The Electoral Commission's report into Vote Leave overspending? The Met police's decision on whether to bring charges against ? 
I agree with @Peston Corbyn's enthusiasm for #Brexit is far too bulging to be covered up by such a figleaf. #PeoplesVote #ExitFromBrexit 
This really isn't a Brexit story. It's a direct consequence of the Cameron/May visa cap. Brexit just brings the self-harming idiocy of the policy into sharp relief.  
Actually the idea behind Labour Brexit is wait until half the population has starved for want of cake and the other half are beating the shit out of each other for the remaining bits of cake, then blame the Tories and nationalise all the non-existent cake that’s left.  
Today Corbyn said "we want a better deal than Norway"2 years ago Dan Hannan saying (1:30 in). "We'll get a better deal than Norway"Someone please tell me the difference between Vote Leave messages & Labour #Brexit messages on Single Market? 
Not just the future of Brexit will be determined on the Twelfth but the short and long term future of the Conservative Party.  
Sir Keith Joseph's 1980 secret memo to Margret Thatcher"If we were outside the European Community, it's very unlikely that Nissan would have given the UK serious consideration as a base for this substantial investment".May's Tory Brexit Government amnesia?  
EU informing European  manufacturing and industry to reconsider any UK products and find alternative suppliers since any parts components will be subject to tariff.... that a major bomb before vote tomorrow on brexit bill in parliament  
An engineer popped in today to fix the washing machine. (the tumble dryer bit) I forgot to ask him how he voted in the referendum. Please don’t judge me.  
A dream deal for fishermen after #Brexit would be worth an additional £540 million to #Scotland and create 5,000 jobs, new research suggests. 
#Breaking @UKLabourHave Died tonight!!This is a total sell out of the working class, this is the Final nail in #Labours Coffin.Brexit: Labour amendment seeks 'full access' to EU market -  
Labour need to recognise that staying in the single market and the customs union is the best option to protect jobs and prosperity. A failure to do so will hurt their own voters. Time for leadership and to recognise the cost of a hard Tory Brexit.  
An exasperated Caroline Lucas just blasted Theresa May for "taking the p*ss" with crucial Brexit votes | Evolve Politics  
Time to deliver Brexit and stop remainders plotting against Brexit and the UK ........  
How to get the hard Brexit you want, while pretending not to:1. Abstain on a vote for the UK to stay in the EEA, so ensuring that it is not passed.2. Table your own motion about creating a hybrid, undefined single market that you know no Tory will back & so will fall.Bingo!! 
The risks of Brexit so catastrophic that the reports are locked in a safe, Grenfell families killed by corporate and political stinginess, Windrush citizens treated like dirt - yet Telegraph readers are losing their shit over Salad Cream being renamed Sandwich Cream 
Well done Faisal. You're getting the facts out. The truth about Brexit isn't a pretty sight. Britain is cutting itself off from the largest market on earth. The authors of this madness will eventually be held to account. 
Government was told about all of this rules of origin stuff about a month after the referendum by Civil Servants, and in detail by the Japanese memo from Sept 2016: 
So its official. @UKLabour would now tie us to the Single Market their new #Brexit policy reveals.Seems some of their own MPs are already criticising it.How many #Brexit positions has @jeremycorbyn had now? 
Genuinely don’t think Brexit is nostalgic. It’s not - it’s radical. The ppl who voted for it were told endlessly it was a leap in the dark and could be disastrous but they still decided taking a punt was better than sticking with what we have.  
I respect the call for a People's Vote. The problem is, it reinforces the biggest and most damaging lie of the Brexit campaign: that a referendum is the way major decisions must be taken, and that it wields supreme power over all else.No. It is an opinion poll. AN OPINION POLL. 
This is not hate. This is rules which the UK have decided they want nothing to do with. If you voted for Brexit this is what you voted for. So if you're gonna be angry at anyone you have to be angry at yourself. 
In light of the report by @ScotNational today that Scotlands seafood industry is staring at an £80m Brexit hit , we are bringing the debate to our costal town of Arbroath. Please share and come along. Tickets available on eventbrite. @LesleyRiddoch @DerekBateman2 @thecommongreen 
Brexit would not create any new opportunities, it would merely diminish those that British businesses have already. #StopBrexit 
The Government would argue that this is premature, but the likes of the Dutch are already advising their manufacturers to reduce dependence on UK:“Trade with the UK will become more difficult after Brexit... consider looking for alternatives” 
Geg. Must not be listening. NI women raising their voices for years. Think it’s NI women holding placard behind her. Much of NI media all over this for years. It’s not our fault elements in society/media in GB & ROI only waking up 2 NI in context of Brexit, Tory/DUP deal, #8thRef 
Who’s funeral will be first, May’s or Brexit’s?  
Today's #abortiondebate was an issue concerning the human rights of Northern Irish women and their right to make a choice, remember this, Theresa May, her party and the DUP would gladly kill off all our human rights with their hard #Brexit, these are the kind of ppl in power. 
BBC radio has been in contact to ask if  they can interview me about why I am leaving Brexit Britain. Where to start ...? 
This is what's going on in the real world of #Brexit - our political class need to smell the coffee and fast to avoid a jobs massacre!  
Dutch Government official advice to its business community warns its manufacturers “if a large part of your product consists of parts from the UK” they may lose free trade terms for exports. “After Brexit, parts made in UK no longer count towards this minimum production in EU” 
If you are a business that currently sells parts to the EU - Brexit WILL destroy your businessCountry of Origin rules matter - as part of the EU we matterAs a 3rd country these rules no longer apply.Brexit is a disaster #StopBrexitSaveBritain #FBPE 
The Archbishop of Canterbury, a former oil executive and known globalist, needs to read up on his Reformation and Referendum.  
'The Republic of Ireland has shown the way': As UK politicians held an emergency debate on Northern Ireland's abortion laws, Tracy Brabin MP said the recent referendum result in the Republic shows it is putting women's rights first  
The big Brexit voices are about to lose their minds, saying "The EU is about to punish us". NOOOOThe fewer rules that apply to your product, the cheaper your product will be. If you use parts from a country outside the Single Market, it's more expensive! 
Feel so angry. We have a dictatorship for a government and an opposition that won’t oppose. Both major parties putting their own party interests before what’s best for the country. If you are anti Brexit MP show some bloody backbone for once and rebel 
(The school had advertised the role for 3 months first time round. This lady was the sole applicant.)Take a bow, Brexit. What a totally pointless activity 
If you think the Labour amendment signifies a shift to a soft Brexit ,while they are abstaining on the vote that would actually give us a soft Brexit, I’ve got unicorns for sale.Wake up.. 
Since the first disastrous and misguided vote on Brexit, have your views changed? 
#BrexitForensics one of few examples of  media engaging with #brexit complexity that business is so concerned about. Keep it up @faisalislam 
Jeremy Corbyn unleashes plan to block Theresa May's hard Brexit in major policy shift 
An exasperated Caroline Lucas just blasted Theresa May for “taking the p*ss” with crucial Brexit votes  
For anyone confused by the Labour leadership's new Single Market amendment, this is an accurate take. It's gutless gesture politics that achieves nothing beyond making a hard Brexit more likely. If Labour wants to stay in the EEA, they should vote in favour of staying in the EEA.  
And now there is 'Sports for Brexit!' Please show them a bit of support and follow them!  
Abortion is not “a matter of conscience.” It is a basic healthcare right for women, the denial of which denies women equality. Shame on you, @theresa_may for trading Brexit votes for human rights. #NowForNI 
We are joined by @CarolineLucas who speaks about the announcement from the government that a single day will be allocated next week to debate and vote on ALL the Lords amendments on the Brexit bill.  
Here we go, here we go... @jeremycorbyn, @Keir_Starmer et al are totally in control when it comes to @UKLabour & Brexit. Wisely and slow. They stumble that run fast.JC & KS are on the right path & I trust them 100%.  
Delingpole: The Archbishop of Canterbury Has a Bad Case of Brexit Derangement Syndrome   
So. Labour now opposes Brexit. This may come as a surprise to the millions of Labour voters who instructed that the UK Brexit!   
Britain’s logistics industry has lost patience with the government, warning it was 'too late' to avoid serious disruption to freight transport once Brexit happens in March  
When the history of Brexit is written, a consistent theme will be the complete failure of character and leadership within the UK's political class. Supporting Brexit is one thing. Contorting your positions to avoid opposing it is just pathetic.  
We have got to ditch our addiction to constructive ambiguity on Brexit.  If you want the benefits of the EEA, you have to back being part of the EEA. End of story.  The UK will have far more influence on EEA rules if we are part of it than if we have 'access' through an FTA. 
Brexit:A 100mph car crash with no crumple zones, no brakes, no airbags, no seat belts and a spike where the steering wheel should be.No thanks, I'll stay where I am. 
'Please, please remain': Bernard-Henri Lévy performs one-man Brexit play  
I spent my entire bikini wax explaining rules of origin to my Brexit voting beautician. By the time she’d finished denuding my flaps she was ready to go after Aaron Banks with a sharp implement while singing Ode to Joy. Hearts and minds, FBPE-ers. Hearts and minds.  
If Labour plus the Tory rebels voted to keep us in the EEA/SM we could have a soft Brexit.Corbyn’s refusal to do that is a betrayal of Labour.Their puny amendment is a way to blame the Tories when they fail to get access.If he wants access vote for the fucking SM amendment 
Labour's Withdrawal Bill amendments really only amount to one substantial thing: Corbyn has won an internal tussle to shoot down EEA membership. Corbynistas should realise this is a hardening of Brexit, not a softening. 
Regardless of your views on #Brexit Corbyn was elected on a "new, straightforward kind of politics" platform.This is just d**king about, playing word games and playing both sidesIt may come off, but is this what Corbyn won 2 landslides for? Politics via Xmas cracker riddles?  
Is there anyone who doesn't immediately think of Sammy Wilson? 
Today we have debated motions on equality, pay, neurodiversity, public service, Brexit and many other critical topics. Once again, we see the incredible breadth, expertise and passion of our members. Every one of them is here to stand up for others. Proud to be GS. #oneunion 
Was at a Brexit breakfast event in Glasgow this morning. Among speakers was Shanker Singham, ex Legatum now IEA, who said a UK-EU trade deal would take <2 yrs. V neutral US economist on panel snorted, ‘that’s delusional’. 
Heathrow. The first of many terrible decisions to come which will damage the environment to block the hole that Brexit will create. About time we made decisions for the future not just money. 
As I've said a hundred times before, unless Labour sets out a realistic course it will support if its six tests aren't met its key Brexit policy is just advanced dissembling. 
Jonathan Isaby - "Before 1973, before we joined the EEC, food and medicines and all kinds of things were still crossing the borders every single day."There is absolutely no reason to suggest that this should not happen after #Brexit."  
Repatriating what's rightfully UK share resources comes down to political will & courage to drive Brexit to what can be.Main Problem is political, media & NGO establishment didn't ask; "How do we make most of Brexit" but; "How do we stay closely aligned & not offend the EU".  
Expect Labour will claim this is move to softer Brexit - others won’t be convinced when there was a chance of defeating govt on EEA - 
Really wish @UKLabour would #RespectTheResult of the referendum and commit to fully supporting Britain leaving the single market & customs union. We had these conversations two years ago. Time to commit to a #CleanBrexit & start planning for Britain's post-Brexit future  
For fucks sake do any of these people having any understanding of the EU, Brexit, customs union etc? It’s like watching an episode Jerry Springer where paternity is denied whilst holding the positive dna test. Brexit is outside the internal market dumbos  
Scottish fishing industry and Brexit - Kristen Hopewell, Senior Lecturer in International Political Economy at the University of Edinburgh.  
Steel tariffs would not apply to British steel if Doris & Corbyn hadn't dragged their heels on Brexit.  
We are very close to the #Brexit tipping point as evidence mounts daily to show how the benefits of remaining in the EU far outweigh the disadvantages & threats of leaving ourselves open to having to cosy up to undesirables like Trump.Time to #StopBrexit with a #PeoplesVote 
Labour have had more positions on Brexit than the kama sutra. How can they be taken seriously?  
Labour tables amendments to Brexit legislation to force ministers to secure new single market deal - @Keir_Starmer 
EXCLUSIVE: Labour about to announce major shift towards soft Brexit. Corbyn will table "internal market" amendment to the withdrawal bill, customs bill and trade bill  
This chap heads the original Brexit religion, the Church of England's very genesis lies in the urge to take back control from Europe.  
Corbyn is playing politics here - he is willing to risk a hard Brexit in order to bring down the government & position himself to bring about a Labour inspired Brexit. The PLP must rebel and vote for EEA membership - they must put country before party. #EEA #Brexit  
Oh, and if you think - “forgot about the immediate Brexit implications, the important thing is Labour is winning  the next election”... then I’m sorry, but you’re an idiot. Good luck governing on a left manifesto with a huge hole in the public finances. Good luck. 
Influential Freight Transport Association says that its confidence in @GovUK is :”fast collapsing” - not a single one of its #Brexit requirements has yet been met....FTA - Brexit Britain on the road to nowhere, says FTA  
If the Tories cant win these votes then they will need to expel the rebels, call an election on a clean Brexit with a Leave leader and will command 400 plus seats as Labour are now soft Brexit reneging on their manifesto..Leave would have won 470 seats. 
The Britnats claim #IndyRef2 would drag everyone back to old debates of the past. With Brexit the Tories they want to drag us back to the british Victorian Imperialism while in cahoots with the DUP that want to drag everyone back to 1690. Scotland is a future looking Country. 
Fucking politics. It's becoming clearer and clearer that Brexit is a daft idea. Using a referendum to stop it is a highly risky, highly divisive route. What if the result is leave?     If Brexit is wrong, just bloody kill it! That's what we pay MPs for.  
BREAKING: Irish Voters File Lawsuits Challenging Results of Referendum Legalizing Abortion, Allege Massive Voter Fraud  #savethe8th #ProLifeIreland 
So, this is a pretty big deal. ICO is backing @fairvoteuk's court case to get @Arron_banks's Eldon insurance data. Reason to believe evidence of "influencing the Brexit outcome apparently in violation of British law" is being held in Mississippi.  Hearing 6.30pm BST. Standby...  
In last 24 hours the Tories have- Guillotined debate on the Brexit deal- Given more public money for new nuclear power while cancelling a new renewable energy project- Allowed Murdoch to takeover Sky- Greenlighted Heathrow expansionWho will benefit most from these decisions?  
Jacob Rees-Mogg says the UK isn't tanking due to Brexit, it's an excuse for "poor management"... Poor management which appears to have started soon after the Brexit vote.  
Dear fbpe & Lib Dems You are are constantly saying how Corbyn can 'stop brexit', then you call people who support him deluded and cultist.Sorry but it's not us that are asking for magical unicorns..We're not having 'follow back parties' IT'S YOU! Who a cult now then? 
This is a deeply worrying statement in view of next week’s vote. It’s also not possible to be in the EU customs union and negotiate your own trade deals. If he votes down the customs union amendment we are heading to a hard Brexit.  
New poll from YouGov - 73% of Labour voters think Brexit was a mistake. Is @jeremycorbyn really working for the many, not the few within his own party when it comes to Brexit? If you want a final say on the deal, add your name:  
It's impossible to conceive of a better rebuttal to the line that Corbyn is a man of principle than the torrent of dissembling nonsense that issues from his own office on the subject of Brexit.  
Are all you fisher-folk still happy you voted for Brexit?Still believing there's a huge bonanza coming to you?Still pleased that you kicked out SNP MPs and voted for Tories to fight your corner?If the answer's yes, you deserve all you get.Just sayin'! 
With Oil prices rising, enthusiasm for independence rising, and May trashing democracy to get her way on Brexit - I think we may have a perfect storm brewing. 
Loving this banner in front of the Parliament building  "Testiculi ad Brexitam"  #Brexit #FBPE #BollocksToBrexit @SODEMAction 
Summary:1. Time to march.2. Because now it's the Brexiters who are afraid.3. By the way, I've been writing this sort of guff ever since 24.6.16.4. And I predicted that Remain would win the referendum.5. Talk about insightful and prophetic journalism!6. That's all, folks!  
It is highly unusual for a large business group like the Freight Transport Association to be so openly and brutally critical of the Government, but it is representative of just how shambolic the Brexit process has become. #PeoplesVote 
Poll records new high in number of voters saying Brexit is wrong  
REALITY: Norway's PM asks why bother with Brexit if you accept EEA? Would mean accepting EU domination.The British people voted for full independence. That must now be delivered! 
.@jeremycorbyn says the Norway model would not work for the UK.  There's no time left to fix the government's Brexit deal and so we urge him to back our call for a #peoplesvote The people must decide whether @theresa_may's Brexit deal is good enough! Agree? Please RT  
Mr Brown is at the window..lol (pic)..May in charge of Brexit is like having a vegi run a burger bar.....will only do what she is forced to do!     #fo2eu 
Special Brexit with only the good bits. Theme parks without queues. Meat but without animals dying. Plants but without the rain. Friends but without Ross. 
We MARCH!! On the 23rd of June 2018. Let this date be our tryst with destiny. Let this be the date the true will of the people was shouted accross the land. Bring your friends, bring your families. This is our day to banish #brexit  
Ex-prime minister Gordon Brown tells @bbclaurak Britain could be "paralysed" for years because Westminster parties have not "woken up" to the causes of #Brexit. @officeGSBrown 
Tory Members Turn on May as She Stalls on Brexit, Support Plummets into Negative   
I am ever more convinced that Brexit will be a costly, environmental and social disaster that should never happen. I am disappointed Mr McDonnell @johnmcdonnellMP appears more implacably concerned about a runway than the future of his country. 
Expanding Heathrow because ordinary folk don't enjoy Granite Brexit holidays to Skegness and Margate these days. Yes, I am going to Benidorm this summer before any spastics point that out. I'm ex-forces, deserve my holiday. Done my time at Skegness for many years. 
It riles me when Brexiters claim that #Brexit has been poorly handled.It was always going to be an unmitigated disaster whoever held the reins.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
You and your remainiacs are the only one’s taking the P and treating the British people with contempt.  You all had your votes in Parliament and you all had your vote in th  referendum like the rest of us...  
NEWS! Heathrow’s third runway to be ready just as visitors stop coming to Brexit Britain  
Whilst being away in the studio the increased distance I have had from the noise of brexit has permitted me to see with even greater clarity that it has been a cynical manipulation of public opinion right from the start, not to serve society but to oppress it.  #Stopbrexit #FBPE 
Meanwhile, according to former PM neither Labour or Tories really get it - big dangers Brown says of failing to listen to what referendum really was about - I ll give you a clue, not the intricacies of Brussels processology   
My piece for @BritishGQ on the one year anniversary of the election, with a nod to my piece later this week for @TheNewEuropean on the second anniversary of the referendum. So much time. So little done   
Good to see that our own referendum to #RepealTheEighth has clearly reignited a similar conversation in Northern Ireland as seen with House of Commons debate today. Also very familiar  issues -women having to travel, illegal use of abortion pill, decriminalisation #trustallwomen 
A third separate bid to challenge the 8th amendment referendum result has just come before the High Court. Will send updated story shortly. Two of the cases are critical of the Referendum Commission's input. @IrishTimes 
Friends, here is my latest article, in which I reflect on the abortion referendum in Ireland last week. As a person of Irish heritage on both sides of my family, I found the events there particularly dispiriting. Is there a way forward for Ireland?  
A total of 192 amendments were made during the #EUWithdrawalBill's Report Stage in the @UKHouseofLords and the Bill is returning to the Commons next week. Looking for an impartial summary of the amendments? Read our brand new briefing #EUWBill #Brexit 
Conservative MP @davidmorrisml: Tory rebels who vote against government on Brexit should lose the party whip. “We need to get on with it, we were given a mandate to move forward by the public.”  
*breaking** Right in the middle of a brexit protest outside parliament.... The eu flags of @SODEMAction  well done. All u Va n hear is "stop brexit"  
LAB voter split in latest YouGov Brexit Tracker.  
Red Brexit. This country is in a bad, bad place.  
Wylie: 'The UK PMO is implicated in Vote Leave cheating: 2 PM advisors worked w AIQ. They know what happened & want to stall public inquiry til Brexit is secured''I don't believe Brexit would've happened were it not for Cambridge Analytica'@Byline_Media 
Hard (let alone no deal) Brexit will need the biggest admin & infrastructure changes undertaken in British peacetime history. That our train system is reduced to chaos by introducing a timetable change that had been planned for months doesn't exactly inspire confidence.  
As the #Brexit negotiations descend into increasing chaos, & as the Gov't continue to make a mess of the process, it simply won’t do for 650 MPs to determine the fate of 65m people. It should be the people who decide whether the Brexit deal on offer is good enough. #PeoplesVote 
More and more momentum is building behind the @peoplesvote_uk campaign, as increasing numbers of organisations, trade unions and other representative bodies add their support to calls for the British people to be given a say on the final #Brexit deal. #PeoplesVote 
#Brexit Britain on the road to nowhere. Read more: #Freight #Logistics #Customs #Industry 
"Brexit first, Afd rising in Germany to be the second party in the country, right-wing winning in Austria, Salvini’s rise to power in Italy, Orban’s reelection and now Slovenia. EU is crumbling on itself and every day fewer people believe in it."  
Politicians and figures from every party agree - the people should have a say on the final Brexit deal, and we should send a message to Westminster by marching on June 23rd to demand it! SIGN UP to March for a #PeoplesVote at  
Very ill advised display of mock outrage from @DAJCameron in response to @ScotParl statement by @FergusEwingMSP -a Tory criticising anyone else for lack of #Brexit information is hypocritical in the extreme given @GOVUK chaos 
The UK’s application to join the $1.7 trillion Government Procurement Agreement has been sent to Parties. This is a milestone in our @WTO Brexit transition, & is a key step in our work to remain within the deal in our own right as we leave the EU @LiamFox 
.@EU_Commission issued a #brexit preparedness notice on “rules of origin”. What to do as UK input into products becomes “non EU content”? This affects EU27 businesses who benefit from EU preferential trade deals which will no longer apply to UK. 
"It's no wonder so many people are turning against Brexit, as the government's reckless handling of the process gets worse by the day." 
Interesting from @ProspectUnion in backing a vote on the terms of any brexit. Scotland is opposed to brexit, good to see momentum in England building.  
Scottish Sheep Farmers need to read this. It’s vital you understand your options. Brexit or Independence  
Very British, but not in a brexit way.  
Continentals who think Brexit was a hostile act on the EU, think again. Hungary, Poland, Austria, Italy, (latest Slovenia) are all tearing the EU apart from the inside.At least, Britain decided to simply leave.#Brexit  
BBCRadio4 just broadcast a brief pro EU interview and the apologised for the lack of a Brexiteer to reply. The next item was a long interview with Rees-Mogg with no apology. The BBC bias is orchestrated and a pure disgrace. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Today at their conference, members of @ProspectUnion have backed a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.As new facts come to light about the complexity & costs of Brexit, more & more people are calling for a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
Blink-and-you’ll-miss-itBrexit was never about parliamentary sovereignty or the will of the people. It is about executive power — to cram all the Lord's amendments for the withdrawal bill into 12 hours in the Commons surely seals the deal.By @IanDunt 
Corbyn has tweeted on Grayling, Trump, and Guatemala in the last couple of hours. Not a word on Brexit amendments. Not one... 
Fantastic session to get our Brexit and Scottish Trade inquiry started. Lots of important issues and lots of things to be resolved. Thanks to all our academic and expert colleagues for giving evidence.  
This feels very significant. 141,000 people are members of @ProspectUnion. Hope other trade unions will soon also back a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal:  
Who are anti-Brexit group Best for Britain?  
*Later that night*"How was work?""Fine. Had another idiot trying to tell me about Brexit, and how I'm an idiot""What did you do?""Told her she was a genius and I'd vote for her as PM""Ha. Bet that shut her up""Yep. She was straight on Twitter""Ha""Ha" 
Prospect is politically neutral, but our message is clear: #Brexit is too important to get wrong (4/4) Read more here:  
“I was a remainer. I don't think you can possibly be in an unelected house and vote against the will of the people. It seems to me to be wrong."-Andrew Lloyd Webber, criticizing his peers' amendments in the House of Lords.Time the rest of the Lords woke up to reality?#Brexit  
The Logic of Brexit by @GuitarMoog (As a one pager!) 
Testified before the European Parliament on Facebook, Cambridge Analytica and how Brexit could be tainted by systemic data crimes, fraud and illegal money. Now it's up to the EU to ask some tough questions to the UK Government about what happened during the Referendum.  
BREXIT: Poll records new high in number of voters saying Brexit is wrong /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Disagreement with Britain's decision to quit the EU has reached its highest point since the referendum, according to a new poll  
"It’s always good to remind Sadiq Khan that Brexit is more popular in London than he is"  
Brexit wrong moves to record 7% in latest YouGov Brexit trackerBrexit right 40%-3Brexit wrong 47%+3 
We now have our best chance to Stop Brexit. Don't waste it. Be on the March for a People's Vote in London on 23 June 2018. Leeds for Europe will be there with thousands & thousands of others. But we know that no one will listen if we don't make some noise!  
"A referendum on abortion in Northern Ireland would be divisive, expensive, and wholly unnecessary... Don’t ask the people of Northern Ireland to beg for human rights."#NowForNI 
May lost her mandate for Hard Brexit in last years GE, and now people can see the damage it brings she's lost her mandate for any Brexit.She pushes on, no longer able to cry 'will of the people' she has reverted to Pound shop dictatorship.#PeoplesVote 
Blink-and-you'll-miss-it Commons vote shows Brexit govt's contempt for parliament  
I'm glad to be here myself to present substantial evidence in the Mississippi court -  @andywigmore told me all about everything denied in this case in an on the record interview for my research! #eldoninsurance #brexit #AI @carolecadwalla @ACMCU @SMPAGWU @Uni_of_Essex 
Ms Lucas, we're talking about the same government whose experts say that *no scenario* can avoid Brexit hurting the country, but they're doing it anyway. We've moved past science. The future will run on dreams. 
On June 23, we will march to Parliament Square to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal. Join us for the #PeoplesVote March! 
In case it isn't quite clear I would like to remind people that no Brexit is not the equivalent of the Fuego Volcano eruption in Guatemala which is actually killing People and destroying Towns and Villages.If you think both events are comparable then you are beneath contempt.  
Northern Ireland's biggest pharma firm has made a video for its clients explaining what it's doing about Brexit (mainly investing loads of money in Dundalk)  
Spotted in #Tooting Bravo! If you think #Brexit isn’t a done deal (it’s far from it) PLEASE come to the #PeoplesVote March on 23rd June #StopBrexit #tootingbroadway #SW17 RT  
This is very good news from the European Court of Justice, clearing up some legal dubiety and giving folk legal certainty. Just as the UK government and Brexit are trying to take it away.  
Big day for Lab MPs in Leave seats next Tue @CarolineFlintMP . Are they really ready to grasp possiblity of a new post-Brexit social democratic paradigm or just talking a good game? 
Difficult to understand?I start with the PM's letter to every family in the land advising us to vote remain. £9 million not part of the funding agreement. Not very sporting.Perhaps the fountain of pre referendum nonsense from the Chancellor & Treasury?  
Hear next Brexit sub committee meeting has just gone in the diary for this Thursday lunchtime 
Sadiq Khan urges MPs to be "brave" and vote with the Lords on Brexit.If he spent as much time fighting the surge in violent crime under his administration as he does trying to block Brexit, London wouldn't be such – to borrow a phrase – a shithole. #TuesdayThoughts pic.twitter.com/tIlIQQuLg7 
We don’t want a referendum. No one is calling for a referendum.  
Oh. And the chief strategist of Vote Leave? Here he is saying, Brexit's a disaster. But apparently, that's the committee's fault...  
If Labour whip to vote against the EEA/SM option they are making a hard Brexit happen and they won’t be forgiven.My money is on a world of pain for Corbyn. He will be blamed for it but I think a lot of Labour MPs will break the whip. Sadly not enough. 
May aims to bully her MP's and silence Parliament over the protection of our human rights, our workers rights, our environmental and consumer safeguards, our economic futures.Brexit is a coup, a power grab, its intent to dispossess ordinary people and dismantle our way of life.  
MPs to demand Dominic Cummings give evidence on fake news used to swing the #Brexit vote. 
Passing the EU Withdrawal Bill without anti-Brexit amendments from the Lords would send a strong message to Brussels.Remember: There are some in the EU who seem to think that if they help Remain influences in the UK delay the Brexit process they might bounce us into rethinking. 
Poll records new high in number of voters saying Brexit is wrong  
Attached my June #Brexit tracker. The 10-poll moving average stands at -3.54% for "wrong to leave" which is the largest margin for "wrong to leave" since August 2016. The monthly average for May is -3.64%.  
The EU is fighting fires left, right and centre. Brexit, Hungary, Poland, Italy, Germany (AfD), Greece, Spain, Sweden and now...Austria. But it's not dealing with any of their issues: National sovereignty, rule of law, migration crisis. It's doomed! 
@ForBritainParty policy regarding the EU is quite & clear. We should cease being a member of the EU without further delay. Meaning we should of left straight after the referendum employing WTO tariffs then let the EU come to us to broker a trade deal. 
The brexit that does ‘least damage’. How has UK reached a point where it’s discussing how to do the least harm from a self-inflicted policy manipulated by offshore tax avoiding billionaires & forced through by Tory demagogues when maj think it’s wrong? Supine MPs. #peoplesvote 
Brexit ‘white paper shelved as business leaders lose faith in Brexit preparations’#Brexitshambles#ExitFromBrexit #PeoplesVote 
In the last 24 hours, @campbellclaret has tweeted about Brexit, Jeremy Corbyn, jogging & Boris Johnson. But does he ever wake up and think of the hundreds of thousands of Iraqis who aren’t alive b’cos of his Govt’s lies that has plunged the region into chaos & extremism? 
Is the date in your diary? The march for a #PeoplesVote on 23 June marks the second anniversary of the Brexit referendum  
The case for Scottish independence now has at least two lengthy prospectuses outlining their respective cases.Brexit STILL has nothing. There's barely enough time to write one now, never mind enact it.  
Record number of voters think Brexit is wrong  
How badly do your want our government to deliver on the Brexit that we voted for?Badly enough to retweet this for me? Thank you.  
Only ten months left and the government still has no roadmap for Brexit. It's time the public took over the wheel. Agree? Tell your MP here: Please RT 
Regardless of your position on Brexit, sovereign parliament must be able to debate and give full scrutiny to the #Brexit Bill. If you disagree then you are handing control to the Tories, not just on this, but on everything. Take Back Control - My Arse  
Huge round of applause from #itt2018 delegates as @Andrew_Adonis declares “#Brexit is the single biggest self-inflicted wound the UK has committed since the Second World War - and the younger generation won’t put up with it”  
Here at @SebDance's event with @The3Million raising critical concerns for EU nationals in the UK and UK citizens in the EU that have not been resolved ahead of #Brexit!  
So Chancellor Phil has done his magic beans trick and lost £2bn on our RBS stake. Thin Controller Grayling has fucked up the railways. Brexit and NHS England are both fucked and the Tories are ahead in the polls? We're a shower of muppets.... 
Are you not seeing what is happening in #Europe right now? How on earth can you really believe that people are beginning to change there minds? I thought politicians were meant to be intelligent. Clearly not. Keep living in your dream word chuka.#Brexit #LabourLies 
People shared incredibly personal stories during the Irish referendum campaign. We are in awe of @TFMRIRE. Don't make more people like @MrsEtoB & @Ashashleigh have to explain themselves in order to get healthcare access for others. Westminster, legislate! No referendum. #NowForNI 
Those Twitter cheerleaders for Theresa May and her disastrous handling of Brexit need to reflect on what CONSERVATIVE voters think of her performance. This is a PM in freefall.  
I signed up to @SocDems after the referendum. A complete first for me but I like what they stand for & they were a massive & positive presence during the campaign around Galway City. 
We have just helped @Together4yes  in their referendum canvassing. We had things thrown at us,were harassed,spat on. Unlike in Ireland a ref is not needed to change the law in NI. Don't make us go through an unnecessary and damaging process Westminster, legislate to #DecrimNI 
HaHaHa - John Lamont (Berwickshire, Roxburgh and Selkirk) "claims" he spoke to many companies in the past week and none are concerned with BREXIT. They didn't even mention it. They said they can just adjust, its what business does. He wants to know what WTO rules are.  
Spanish special prosecutor Grinda, who works with authorities in Italy, France and Germany, says his team gets “zero” cooperation from the British regarding Russian organized crime.Putin wants #Brexit. Join the dots. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
We don't need a referendum to change NI abortion law! Don't make us canvass and beg people to give us human rights. Don't force us to continue to travel away from support networks for healthcare while a drawn out process unfolds. Legislate now @UKParliament to #DecrimNI #NowForNI 
The NHS is at real risk of being consumed by Brexit.We are at serious risk of losing the following, from the handy Brexit acronym: Budget  Research  Employment  X-border healthcare  Innovation  Trials 
“Polls show a clear majority for remain.”Richard, did you miss the outcome of the referendum? You can’t do it over until you get an outcome that you like. 
When #StellaCreasy or any other #Remainer tells you that ‘nobody talked about leaving the #singlemarket prior to the #referendum’ it’s a straight up #lie. Here are the leaders of the #Leave and #Remain sides explicitly saying just that:  #BBC #SKY #LBC #UK 
NEWS! DUP demands same post-Brexit laws as rest of UK, apart from all the abortion and gay rights stuff  
Hannan now saying on Dutch TV that once the EU knew the result of the referendum he expected them to come back with a better offer. Accuses EU of 'slamming the door'. You couldn't make this stuff up. @guyverhofstadt 
Back in the midst of Brexit discussions I was told car manufacturers were explaining their needs to Gov.They were asked how much more warehouse storage they would need not to run out of parts.Their response ‘first we would need to actually build a warehouse’No clue on JIT.. 
You got a big shock the day after the referendum didn't you when you got a result no one expected? Never been able to live it downWell we're certainly not going to let dangerous pro-EU anti-democratic, well funded wreckers like yourself (and the Lords) scupper Leaving the EU now  
What I want to see on June 12th......apart from an instant victory in the #A50challenge...EVERY MP who is opposed to #Brexit, no matter what party they are in, should move to just in front of the Speaker, and shout him down for as long as it takes for May's attempted coup... 
#BreakingNews: The Commons digital, cultural & media select committee has requested an early vote by MPs on an order requiring former 'vote leave' director Dominic Cummings to give evidence to its enquiry about EU referendum campaign spending & the misuse of personal data#FBPE pic.twitter.com/asKD0xgi7G 
Some thoughts beyond Brexit.  
15 Amendments, taking 15 mins per vote, leaves MPs with just over 8hrs to debate: the EEA, Customs Union, human rights, legal issues, Henry VIII powers, meaningful votes, child refugees, Brexit scrutiny, Good Friday Agreement, EU agencies, Exit date AND environmental standards. 
They are "bollocks," but, just for the record, @thatginamiller no longer supports Labour. In common with many others who stuck loyally by the party for years, she has given up on it on account of its bonkers position on Brexit.  
Does anyone understand the anger of leave voters?Are they angry because people are trying to "prevent" #Brexit or are they angry people anyway?I have come across some and they are really angry.#PeoplesVote 
This loser @nofactschloe seems to have a problem with strong outspoken Brexit-supporting women on Twitter. He’s even pretending to be one of them. Mummy issues, methinks. Bless. 
Truth usually prevails, sooner or later. But we need it to be sooner, rather than later. Please widely share and RT @Jon_Danzig’s latest report: ‘The #EUReferendum was divisive, not decisive.’ Because #Brexit divides us. Link:  
Calais Port deputy CEO Benoit Rochet: “We know there is Brexit but we don’t know exactly what Brexit means”Tory MP Nicky Morgan: “You are not alone” 
Polling analysis published by @prospect_uk suggests that if people were given a referendum now, the majority would back remaining in the EU. That’s why the @LibDems are fighting to give the people the final say on the deal and an offer an #ExitfromBrexit 
This is a fundamental issue of human rights. It’s not impossible. It’s perfectly possible. No referendum required. It depends on what the PM believes to be more important- human rights or the mad pursuit of a political agenda  so fragile it’s dependent on the DUP. #TheNorthIsNext 
The impact of Brexit is already taking its toll: uncertainty, stress, loss, pain, confusion, hate, depression, helplessness... For generations to come, we will be paying the price for this right-wing project, in terms of both the economy & society.Time to #StopBrexit @emmyzen 
FFS this has got to stop. Give the people the right to vote on whether or not they want these people in their country. You can always refuse to honour the result like you did with brexit. Tell us why are these people here? 
“EU To Spend €365 Billion On Common Agricultural Policy – Good luck Remoaner MPs if you think people will vote for that.” A devastating #Brexit piece from the team this morning:  
On Tuesday MPs will decide whether to accept the 15 amendments made to the EU #WithdrawalBill by House of Lords. Here’s an overview of all the amendments and how peers voted. #Brexit  
'Shameful' #TheresaMay is trying to 'railroad' Hard #Brexit into law in one day  
Whitehall’s Brexit pessimism is holding Britain back in the negotiations  
The deliberate lack of time to debate the Brexit Bill speaks volumes. It shows that May has decided that it must pass unamended, will pass unamended, and there is nothing Parliament can do about it.The whole thing is as rigged as a Russian election. 
"If a hard Brexit might lead to food and fuel shortages in Scotland then the people of Scotland have a right to know." 
German think tanker Ulrike Guérot, urging Britain to “stop acting like a spoiled child” and give up on Brexit altogether, accidentally makes the perfect case for Brexit – to get out of the remote and unaccountable EU institutions and restore hard-won British democratic values:  
The pressure is building for an #EEA-based #Brexit - the EFTA countries are clearly on board. Labour MPs must now be whipped to back the EEA amendment on Tuesday, and it’s crunch time for May. She must now stand up to her Brextremists, and see them off.   
Neither Corbyn nor Starmer have tweeted one word about the Brexit amendments vote on June 12..Not one word.... 
Fact: a vote for Labour in #LewishamEast is a vote for Brexit and no newly elected MP is going to change Corbyn  
Business leaders from Glaxo, Tesco BAE an BT who met T May yesterday said to be "starting to disengage" with Government on Brexit says @FT because decision-making has stalled. It's a shambles and they're beginning to realise it. 
What madness is this?  Not content with screwing up Brexit, hasn’t May learned anything from her election disaster?  People don’t want to pay more tax - for the NHS or anything else.  The tax burden is already crippling and too high. May has to go.  
A strong & positive case for Free trade, economic freedom & an immigration policy that would support our economy post Brexit.  
Undemocratic. Criminal. 'Shameful' Theresa May is trying to 'railroad' Hard Brexit into law in one day.The Tories are making a mockery of our democracy. 
The only advantage I can see to #Brexit is that at least we could give up decimal and could move to a Babylonian base 60. 10 is rubbish! Only divisible by 2 and 5. 60 is brilliant! Divisible by 2,3,4,5,6,10,12,15,20,30.  
Red white and blue Brexit?Sounds more like a swastika Brexit to me. Denied medical treatment because of where they were born - that is not the act of a civilized nation, it is an act of a fascist nation.This needs to be stopped by whatever means necessary.  
Tory Hard-Brexit clowns are trying to railroad through the EU Withdrawal Bill in half a day. 15 ammendments need to be debated and voted on - the due process. After delaying for Months the Tories are trying to rush everything through at once. This isn't democracy! #BrexitShambles 
Ultimately this is as much about parliamentary sovereignty as it is Brexit. The Tories are riding roughshod over parliament and the @UKLabour party are allowing them to do it. 
Christopher Wylie, the Cambridge Analytica whistleblower, is supporting our calls for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.He acknowledges that its misuse of personal data was central to the result of the EU referendum.  
How about us for a forgotten community? My children 19 & 21 didn't get to vote in the referendum which is now dashing their dreams, despite being British (and they are not criminals). #Votesforlife 
Number thinking Brexit a mistake at record high according to @YouGov 
It's somewhat depressing to realise that #Brexit would be dead in a week if TV interviewers just asked MPs the same question over & over:"Yes, we had the vote.  But do you personally believe Brexit is good for the country and will you stake your reputation on it?" 
ON THIS DAY 1975: The UK’s first Referendum on their place in Europe (EEC back then).Fascinating when compared to 2016:- the Scottish Islands voted against- Lincolnshire, Herefordshire and East Sussex were pro-European hot-beds...  
I note 2 things @BBCr4today1. £2bn loss RBS share sale - why can't taxpayers have been given the shares?2. The usual editorial omission of  May's contempt of Parl, stifling debate on #Brexit amendments; the most important issue in a lifetime.#FinalSay#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Cambridge Analytica whistleblower calls for second referendum as he tells MEPs data scandal 'caused Brexit' in fascinating session at EuroparlInfo Commisr says social media platforms must take responsibility for content, as publishers do#Brexitgate 
Waving Brexit through?  Those behind these efforts to stop a decision made by 17.4 million people are profoundly dishonest.  
Rather than trashing climate change targets by expanding #Heathrow and building the massively expensive & largely pointless HS2, perhaps the government could make sure our trains run on time and that current flights are not grounded by Brexit. Is that too much to ask?#r4today 
In fact if politicians really did thwart Brexit then our role inside EU and the wrath of Brexit voters would dominate politics permanently.  
#Brexit: Time is running out, #business warns May, as #investment falls: 
'Shameful' Theresa May is trying to 'railroad' Hard Brexit into law in one day.MPs will be asked to overturn all 15 defeats inflicted on Mrs May's flagship Brexit Bill in just one marathon session next Tuesday, June 12A matter of ‘party first’?? #EU 
"Chronic mismanagement" and "lack of expertise" at Liam Fox's trade department could derail May's Brexit plans.  
Wylie: “I don't believe the Brexit result was won fairly or legitimately. If this happened in Nigeria or Zimbabwe, the EU would demand a re-run of the vote. Perhaps we should hold the UK to the same standard." #peoplesvote #fbpe 
Only 17 massive new problems with Brexit discovered today  
BREXIT: Tory Remoaners think they have the numbers to defeat the government in Parliament. Independence must be delivered no matter what it takes. If required, boot out the saboteurs and call an election!  
This dogged determination to respect the referendum vote is like a   dog chasing a frisbee over a cliff. It isn't going to end well 
“So, if Brexit is starting to look like a mistake (and, well, that’s exactly what it looks like), it’s not too late to rethink your decision.” @ulrikeguerot 
One of the biggest regrets of my life is trusting and voting for Corbyn. If we had elected Owen Smith as Labour leader, we might not be in this #Brexit mess now. We'd probably have a functioning opposition as well.  
Hey @MariaMillerUK we are so glad you are going to be debating our rights to bodily autonomy but we don’t want a referendum. We have just helped out @Together4yes but it isn’t necessary to change our laws. We shouldn’t have to beg strangers for rights by telling intimate stories 
#Putin: #Crimea gained independence through the free will of the Crimeans expressed in an open referendum…Decision to hold it was made by the Crimean parliament, which was elected in strict accordance with the Constitution and the laws of Ukraine before any such events.  
#TuesdayThoughtsWe stand on the cusp of one of the most dangerous political moments in my lifetime. This isn't abt #Brexit - it's abt POWER. Where do we want it to reside? In the hands of a N°10 Cabal, or in Parliament? Whether you voted #Leave/#Remain, join @SODEMAction protest 
The effects of brexit are really starting to hit my fart joke business. I used to have three people working for me but I've just let one go. 
Hey Labour. You know the way you shout 'Tuition fees' at the Lib Dems and expect nobody to ever vote Lib Dem again? If you abstain or enable Tory Brexit you're history. This is your last chance, do the right thing, #StopBrexit 
READ | Just short of the Referendum's two year anniversary we're set to get a harsh reminder, it's not us running the show, but the globalist establishment. What an appalling situation.Support us at  
Only 4 in 10 Brits are saying #Brexit is the right decision for the country. For @UKLabour voters it is fewer than 3 in 10. Public opinion has changed decisively, it is essential that Labour Party policy does as well. #PeoplesVote 
Why do brextremists call soft Brexit betrayal? In the referendum Farage wanted to be like Norway; Johnson promised a deal as good as we have now. That’s Soft Brexit! If they wanted something harder they should have said so and let us vote on that basis.  
Mayor #SadiqKhan should be cutting crime, not opposing Brexit. Read my comments on @kippercentral 
This is the most ridiculous EU-blaming I've yet seen.The British politician @DanielJHannan is surprised that after the #Brexit referendum the EU did not try to keep the British in the EU. "Our door was open, but the EU has closed it."YOU closed it, Dan, not the EU. Own it.  
Parliament is allowing less time to debate all 15 amendments to the epoch changing #brexit bills than it allowed to hear tributes to the death of a politician who has been out of power 2 decades.  
Latest @YouGov @thetimes poll. In hindsight #Brexit right 40 (-3); wrong 47 (+3). Fwork 28-29.5.17. Record wrong lead - previous high was 6 pts in Jan.  
RIGHT SAID MAYGOTTA DO THIS BREXIT SINGLE MARKET’S GONNA HAVE TO GOTRIED TO SHIFT IT, COULDN’T EVEN LIFT IT- WE WOZ GETTIN NOWHERE AND SO WE ‘AD A CUPPA TEARIGHT SAID MAYLEAVE THE CUSTOMS UNION... 
Brexit seems to be a bad rush-job that just makes a mess.Kinda like Bernard Cribbins’ “Right Said Fred” song from the 60s.“We woz gettin nowhere...” 
Ireland now has the largest Ro-Ro ferry in the world to access the #EU and bypass the #Brexit shambles. Maybe Scotland should be thinking of doing the same. And guarantee Scottish exports get to their markets without additional tariffs. #YES #Indyref2 
Brexit: Theresa May under fire over plans to overturn all 15 Lords defeats on EU withdrawal bill in single day  As the unelected Lords no longer represent the people of the UK they should not even have a voice as nobody voted for them. 
If Cameron & Clegg hadn’t foolishly cancelled 3rd Heathrow runway Gordon Brown & I announced in 2009, it would now be open, British trade would be far greater, & billions generated & saved compared to proceeding now. And this lot are about to wreck our trade with Brexit too! 
Christopher Wylie tells MEPs - #CambridgeAnalytica may have dissolved but the EU will feel its impact for a generation. #Brexit wouldn't have happened if it wasn't for CA... the brexit result wasn't won fairly or legitimately & shockingly UK law has no remedy.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
‘White paper shelved as business leaders lose faith in Brexit preparations’: Who can have faith in this incompetent, failing government? An effective opposition would have torn them apart by now.  
Just landed back in UK and very pleased to see Commons will get the chance to vote down Lords wrecking ammendments to EU withdrawal Bill next Tuesday. After more than 60 hours debate we all know the issues. Let's uphold the referendum and get on with it. It's been 2 years! 
Is June 23rd in your diary? It’s time to march. Because now it’s the Brexiters who are afraid. Good piece from Polly Toynbee on why your voice on stopping or softening Brexit matters. I’ll be there. #PeoplesVote 
9/ plus... Lab needs to reopen idea of a cross party body to complete the Brexit process. Nominated by front benches, not Commons Cttee 
LETS BE CLEAR -Liam Fox and Boris Johnson were both in faviour of the EU Customs Union & Single Market before being promoted in the Tory party and THEY CHANGED THEIR MINDS - these are the same people denying you a right to change yours. BREXIT IS GOOD FOR THEM JUST NOT US 
On every chance to be open & consultative about Brexit, the biggest decision taken by the most slender of majorities against a backlash of lies & misinformation, PM May has chosen secrecy & defiance, adopting a wilful “my way or the highway”.This, then, is the road to Brexit. 
Why Britain's foreign policy must diverge from the EU after Brexit | @GawainTowler 
Fury as 'shameful' Theresa May tries to 'railroad' Hard Brexit into law in just one day  
bbc news saying on day Brexit there will probably be slight delays at UK ports - UK Govt should ask the port authorities about possible problems - okay - so bbc news is now a comedy show - had me laughing out loud 
Theresa May is in deep trouble. Can’t table own White Paper on post-Brexit regulatory alignment; will lose Customs Union vote 1/~ 
How is asking the people to choose one of three systems--subject to a confirmation referendum several years from now--a blank cheque?  
My view is a hard Brexit will shrink the economy so weaken the £ and thus inevitably migration falls as labour demand drops and pay and conditions are less attractive. Not to mention EU citizens feel less welcome with no long term residential or job security in UK postBrexit.  
Map of the world according to #Brexit headbangers.  
Irish Pro-Life Leader: Our Hearts Are Broken But We Will Fight On, No Referendum Will Ever Make Abortion Right  
Bank of England has pumped more then half a trillion pounds£600 000 000 000in market stimulus measures (fancy words for saying they print money out of thin air) to safe the UK from Brexit crash.Despite the UK still in the EU.I will let that news sink with you & @jeremycorbyn 
#PeterBone #MP - "If we have a #nodeal situation, we don’t have to pay the £39billion & we make our own laws in our own country judged by our own judges & we can have our own #immigration policy. That is a very big plus for not having a deal.” #Brexit  #BBC 
Pledge your vote for the #ProportionalRepresentation referendum! The official campaign starts July 1. Mail-in ballots will be accepted from Oct. 22 to Nov. 30. Let's win this! #bcpoli #PR4BC 
Waiting for #BrexitTheresa May:  Well? Shall we go to the June EU summit with a plan?Her Cabinet:  Yes, let’s go.(They do not move)With apologies to Beckett. 
A #video during the #referendum campaign, still very relevant today; #European #citizens imploring #Britain to make a stand & vote to #leave the anti-democratic #EU. Perhaps one day #Europe will be Free from the #Corrupt EU!  #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome #Tory 
Could somebody from the @LibDems @LewishamLibDems please confirm that it is party policy/tactics to send members/activists door to door telling people that if #Brexit is allowed to continue, the #IRA will start bombing families in the UK again? #IlliberalAutocrats #ProjectFear2 
Oh hello "technology". Meet "implementation".See also: crude AI fantasies of Innovation Bro's at DH; magic electronic Brexit borders; and much much more.  
Brexit: a stinking well of ignorance - sustaining the "ultra" case for a hard Brexit, of which Open Europe's latest report is an example. The lies, inexactitudes and distortions only survive because proponents are able to manage the debate...  #Brexinfo. 
As #WiGov, I will work to pass a constitutional amendment requiring the state to fully-fund 2/3 of every WI School District budget & end the practice of paying for basic needs via referendum. Our children are our greatest commodity & their education is their greatest currency. # 
After a debate on whether governor should have role in education, @WillisGov tells @JamesSmithSC and @PhilNobleSC: "If you want to run education, run for secretary of education."It's superintendent. And a referendum proposal could make it a cabinet position. #SCGovDebate 
“The British politician @DanielJHannan is surprised that after the Brexit referendum the European Union did not bother to keep the British in the EU. "The door was open to us, but the EU has slammed the door."”This is not true 1/  
First Ian Duncan Smith tells us that if we don't like Brexit we should leave. Now it's Digby telling us we had "best leave"Would love to see how this country fared after the departure of 80% of the women between 18-24 years old. #timetogo@Andrew_Adonis @nick_clegg 
Sir Nick Clegg writes that pro-European MPs have a moral duty to resist Brexit. I doubt whether he would have been writing the same sort of nonsense had Scotland won its independence as a result of the Scottish referendum. For liberals any kind of independence is fine save ours. 
We are proud to back @OwenSmith_MP as the man who can save Labour, deliver us from Brexit and take our country back to the 21st century. #CorbynOut #Remainers4Owen 
just checking how brexit is going*opens door to reveal outbreak of norovirus in an unlicensed clown abattoir*oh 
In which "democracy" does a military jeep mow down protesters?Get a grip & see the hysterically bad atrocities India is committing. In your name. With democracy as a cover. #Kashmir needs a permanent solution. #Referendum  
The country tells Theresa May to bloody get on with her bloody Brexit plans, decisions that should’ve been made a year ago would be canny for a start  
12 hours to determine the fate of the country. This is more coup than democracy. It is time for Parliament to assert its sovereignty against an executive that has far exceeded its rightful powers. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Labour would oppose this, were it not for the fact that the Tory PM’s subversion of Parliament serves the Labour leader’s *personal* agenda.Once again: Brexit is a Tory misadventure but right now, make no mistake, it is Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour that’s making it happen.  
Glib nonsense, devoid of analysis or even simple knowledge  , presented with that patronising confidence that reeks of  arrogant entitlement  - living proof that #Brexit is a con perpetrated by a few wealthy right wing ideologues at the expense of the rest of us…  
Wouldn't 'democrats' accept a referendum result in which everyone knew the rules before it was held Caroline? Or would 'democrats' try to stop the will of the people in the largest popular vote ever held in the UK for their own vested interests?  
Recent history tells us that Labour will whip it's MP's to abstain or support the Gov on 12th June.A call out to all decent MP's of whichever colour. You know Brexit is bad for the country. Please just do the right thing and stop brexit.#FBPE 
A week after we #repealedthe8th #thenorthisnext. It would be a sort of cosmic karma if #AbortionRights rights triggered the end of this government. I stand with @stellacreasy -  A woman who tweets about both abortion & #Brexit needs to stand well back from her timeline.  
#TheresaMay wants #commons to overturn all 15 Lords amendments on EU #brexit bill in single day, after debating them for only about 40 mins each!   
There can be no democratic choice against European treaties.The United Kingdom belongs to the European Union.A Federal EU#Brexit  
#brexit Worth watching the whole thing (43 seconds). Interesting how many times the two interviewers try (unsuccessfully) to stop what he's saying from being heard.  
Whether May stays or goes, #Brexit is collapsing into a shambolic (but very dangerous) horror-show presided over by fantasists.It's destroying the Tory party (no tears for them) but it will destroy Labour too if it takes it on.The only way out of this mess is a #PeoplesVote. 
Long overdue.LePage vetoed 5 separate bills to expand Medicaid by the legislature, and has spent the last 6 months ignoring the referendum to do so in violation of the state constitution.  
For all those saying Corbyn can stop brexit, Corbyn can do this or that....There will now be 1 day to decide our fate because May wants total control of sending us down the river & without Tory rebels, she will get exactly that. All this is down to the Tories..not Labour. 
Oppose Brexit or fail a generation.It really is that simple.  
Astonishing. Having promised White Paper on #Brexit & Customs...No10 now say they’re delaying until after June EU Council meeting! In absence of a Govt plan, it’s clear Parliament has to take control next week. If Ministers have no plan, their ‘whip’ surely has no credibility  
We see through your facade Caroline. You are just miffed because you cant play games with the #Brexit bill.Stop lying, Brexit has been debated for over 60 hours already.  
Is public opinion on #brexit on the move? Latest @yougov survey for @thetimes finds 40% say UK right to vote to leave EU; 47% say wrong. 7-point gap is widest yet. A sampling wobble or a real change? Next YouGov poll worth watching out for.  
Theresa May has granted one day for parliament to debate 200 Brexit-related amendments: that's 432 seconds per issue.There are 650 MPs.So MPs get 0.6 seconds each.If you're a leaver who approves of this, you're not democrat. 
Exhibiting on the continent ? Maybe have a band and want to perform in euroland ? .. well don’t fear - thanks to brexit this is the basic cost of a carnet .... you’ll need one of these to go with your goods ..... this is the starting price  
The UK is not a country, it is a union of countries and as such to deny the 62% democratic vote of Scotland to remain in the EU & further deny our democracy by shutting us out of negotiations gives us every right to challenge said Brexit & indeed the union itself as its unequal. 
Friend on Tinder has just come across the line "looking to leave the single market before the UK does" and irrespective of stance on Brexit we can all agree that is pretty great 
The idea that we can leave the EU is nonsense. We can give up our membership and influence in the EU, but it will still be there, the economic superpower on our doorstep, having a massive influence on us, without us having any say in it. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
‘MPs furious at bid to ‘railroad’ Parliament despite concerns’ - what?! The EU withdrawal bill has already been debated for 64 hours in the Commons.These people want to drag it out for as long as possible in the hopes they’ll drag out a few more Tory rebels and thwart Brexit.  
Nobody voted for any of this. A spat in the Tories has ruined the country. ANY brexit is damaging. #stopbrexit “We’ve repeatedly raised the same issues, such as need for frictionless trade...but it is now a Gordian knot that we can’t help untie,” 
There are numerous amendments to the bill which can't be debated in 12 hours. Take back control they said.Bring back sovereignty they said.The Tories have destroyed our democracy. They are pushing through a hard Brexit & riding over democracy. Disgusting.  
Growth has RATE & DIRECTION. UK growth is consumption led, fuelling private debt (relative to disposable income). Investment follows expectations of growth opportunities. Expectations low & deficit obsession makes it worse. As does financialization & Brexit. New diagnosis needed.  
Does anything else sum up Brexit quite as well as @DanielJHannan praising Switzerland and suggesting they are prosperous because they’re not subject to the common fisheries Policy?  
May is set to overturn all 15 Lords #EUwithdrawalbill defeats in one day. She chose the date of the @A50Challenge hearing in High Court: 12 June. Seems desperate to push Brexit through before the cry to stop the shambles comes to a head. #ShotgunBrexit #DemocracyInDanger 
For those who missed @BHL tonight:1. Europe died first in Auschwitz and then Sarajevo and will die again if the UK leaves. 2. The tools of democracy are being used to undermine democracy.3. Brexit is the consecration of Putin and Trump in Europe and the triumph of stupidity. 
Issues Theresa May thinks are worth 48 mins debate time each:Northern IrelandEnvironment lawEEABrexit DayEU agenciesReuniting famillesThe mandateA meaningful voteHenryVIII powersRole of EU lawsCustoms unionCitizens rightsHuman RightsLegal challengesCommittee rules 
No 2 EU CourtsJulia Hartley-Brewer:“I want to get rid of the European Arrest Warrant because I don’t want Brits being taken abroad to countries in the EU who have a less than shaky grasp of basic principles of justice - call me old-fashioned"#Brexit #EU 
People, let’s be clear: Absent Cabinet agreement on customs union, customs partnership, maxfac, Irish border etc, There is No #Brexit blueprint  via @financialtimes 
“Brexit is now a Gordian knit that cannot be untied” as UK Government concedes there will be no White Paper published before the June EUCO. If UK strategy is now to try and run the clock down to October and do a deal 5 Min to midnight, that strategy is very, very risky.  
When we voted to Leave the #EU we knew what we voted for.#Brexit means #Brexit Please support this petition by signing and retweeting.Government must deliver the will of the British people.Out means Out! 
Labour must back the amendment to stay in the Single Market next week or be seen as accomplice to Tory hard Brexit which would devastate the country.We're not in the negotiations, we're HM loyal opposition, acting in the national interest. This is it. 
Remember when Theresa May took the highly unusual step of sitting in on the Lords' debates in order to intimidate them into bending to her personal plan for Brexit?And now we have her attempting to railroad the Commons.Never lecture us on "democracy" again.@LBC #newsnight 
Putin refused to comment about the referendum that seeks to make him a President for life, à la Xi Jinping. #Russia 
No one chose Samira? I blame Brexit #LoveIsland 
Clarity on Brexit plan now urgent, business bosses tell Theresa May  
In allowing remain to use every dirty trick in the book in an attempt to overturn the brexit result, May has created a precedent in that from now on any vote which fails to please anyone may be attacked in an attempt to thwart it. The results of a vote should be cast in stone !!! 
Agree completely. She is not fit for purpose. Management skills are appalling and as for brexit, if you look at the history its difficult not to believe that it was never her intention to leave the EU.  
Love Island would be much better if they put some normal blokes in it. Imagine one of these birds having to couple up with 25 stone Keith from Sheffield with a Brexit tattoo 
We need an Election in Britain before hard #Brexit destroys everything.  
#Brexit is not democracy in action. The process of #Brexit has been one huge monstrous abuse of democracy. If this country had anything about it #Brexit would be stopped now, and the criminals who have so perverted our democracy would be prosecuted. #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Often it is levelled at me, due to my criticism of the oppostions response to Brexit, that I should back off 'cos Labour have a plan.My response. I hope they have, but mine and other remainers protest will ensure that they do. Assuming they want our votes, of course.#FBPE 
Wee Iceland has an FTA with China. Icelanders pay nothing to trade with the Chinese and follow no Chinese law.To trade in the EU single market, you have to pay an access fee!EU is a cartel, a protectionist racket. EU is NOT a free trade area.#Brexit  
Islamicat has made sure follow proper Pusslimic tradition and gotten daughter married to first cousin. For some reason though, first born look little bit weird. Islamicat blame #Brexit obviously  
This is what the UK faces if we don't #StopBrexit: "There is no #Brexit dividend, rather the prospect of dismal economic growth and tax rises." True patriots are united in the fight to stop the UK making a huge mistake. 
There were weeks of debate in the HoC last time. Enough of your hot air, procrastination, obstructing and working against #Brexit and the majority decision of the referendum.Resign. 
I hope.. Labour MPs will support implementing #Brexit.It is important to remember these are not Tory Bills any more than they'd be Labour Bills if we were in Govt and fulfilling our promise to the implement the decision made on the June 23, 2016 - Labour MP Frank Field  
I'll keep on saying it, the script Theresa May would like to follow is that laid out by Goebbels after a Nazi referendum victory in 1933. If she had the power she'd obliterate all democracy on #Brexit.  
Fury as 'shameful' Theresa May tries to 'railroad' Hard Brexit into law in just one day 
UK, Opinium poll:Should there be a second EU membership referendum?Yes: 43%No: 57%Fieldwork: May 2018Sample size: unreleased 
Panicked about post-Brexit passport queues? We got you...   
Britain is being left “dangerously vulnerable” by the government’s lack of preparations Lord Adonis says - this is why we need a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal  
Full on govt contempt for everything Brexit-related except their own internal disagreements at the moment. #EUWithdrawalBill 
How dare she !!..This has gone too far now !!.. It shows a total contempt for democracy !!..She has now assumed the role of a dictator !!..The Tories AND BREXIT MUST GO !! #FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
SNP, as they have fought relentlessly against Brexit & the Tory party. They have mitigated Tory austerity while having their budget slashed by Westminster, they value our Nation & all its inhabitants. They offer progressive internationalist policies designed for our betterment. 
Thank u @GregHands Trade Minister @EssexChambers & Essex MPs for an engaging discussion on post Brexit trade opportunities for small business in Essex. A good dialogue showing that our county & Entrepreneurs continue to prove that #TheOnlyWayIsEssex #EssexInternationalTradeForum 
Why, don’t you know #FBPE stands for Full Brexit, Prompt Exit   
Brexit bill: Date set for crunch votes in the Commons - A crunch time for MPs who know Brexit is bad for the country   
Hello @ABridgen, I'm one of @The3Million EU citizens you referred to in the Houses today. For many like me wishing to stay in the UK is not a vote of confidence in post #Brexit Britain. It is my love for Britain & my British family that keeps me here. Don't misrepresent us.  
Strong and brave women of #Pakistan will achieve democracyAt a time when we are saying one nation, one flag, one homeland, and one country,The PML-N victory in the elections will be a referendum [vote in favour of] a new Pakistan.”  
I despair at the destruction of democracy that has occurred since the referendum in the name of the ‘will’ of 17/65ths of the people. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "It is a fallacy that countries will unilaterally decide to stop selling you their goods. The idea that food will not get through at Dover is entirely wrong." #Brexit  
Bulldozing through Brexit in one day in the Commons is an insult to democracy. This is arguably the most important piece of legislation for a lifetime, it should be scrunitised properly and not forced through quickly because May has no authority and knows she can't get it passed. 
Any MP who doesn’t yet realise that #Brexit is a coup d’etat against parliament really hasn’t been paying attention... or maybe is just dim  
Fight the British people? Er. No. Fight the dictators using the advisory referendum to carry out their own agenda whilst using the British people as an excuse.  
Govnt Chief Whip talking about Parliament passing the EU Withdrawal Bill in a form that reflects the 2017 Tory manifesto. The Tories lost seats and lost their majority in the 2017 General Election. The Govnt lost its mandate for hard Brexit on June 8th 2017.  
Let’s hope this backfires badly with the Lib Dems, SNP, Greens, Labour & Tory rebels voting together & getting the kind of momentum together that the whips can’t stop... #Brexit #BrexitSubvertsDemocracy 
Great to see that on top of @CharlesTannock & RCorbettMEP Im now being followed by @catherinemep & @SebDance From what I’ve seen these are the 4 of MEPs talking the most sense on #Brexit & what we must do to fight it. Please all spread #remainernow messages here & in Brussels! 
An Evening with @Feorlean in @ChristinaSNP constituency of #Hamilton on #Brexit Mike Russell MSP is doing such a good job representing Scotland, his speech was very good, he is so knowledgeable about his brief, could listen to him all night, a great appointment by @NicolaSturgeon 
As #Parliament returns,  #TheresaMay is no nearer to knowing what to do about #Brexit , the #CustomsUnion or anything else... @InFactsOrg 
Whenever i watch any #bbcnews outlet lately I'm having to listen to the views of the Tax Payers Alliance, they don't speak for the ordinary tax payer, they're a lobby group for the #Brexit elite, who funds them? That question is never asked, #Newsnight #bbcdp, i mute them now. 
Well who’d of thought taking back control meant abusing Parliamentary democracy once again.And from a minority Government too.One day.One!Then a 3 month holiday.Brexit Britain. Where democracy died.#StopBrexit#FBPE 
Worth noting that the June 12th day of Brexit votes, rebellions, possible defeats etc... occurs on exactly the same day as the historic Trump-Kim Jong Un summit in Singapore 
What say you on this tweet? I’d argue that the Lords, an unelected body of people, paid for by the taxpayer, is doing everything it can to frustrate the #Brexit process. After all @Andrew_Adonis the nation did vote clearly for this. We’ve not had a chance to vote for you. Ever. 
Saturday 23rd June is the day to demand a vote on the final Brexit deal! Join the #PeoplesVote March with thousands of others: 
Take note @jeremycorbyn You can save Britain from Hard Brexit madness...if you do, it will be the greatest service any Labour leader has done for the British people since Clement Attlee oversaw the foundation of the NHS. Back the SM &CU.  
@BBC used to be my trusted news source. They will never be forgiven for their negligence over brexit. 
An anti-Brexit campaigner accuses a Leave supporter of lying during this tetchy LBC debate  
We need to get on with Brexit. On the Lords Withdrawal Bill Amendments, the offer of 12 hours debate on top of 64 hours in Committee is an extremely generous offer. It’s time for us to back the PM and send a strong message to the EU. 
It’s suits Labour’s “creative ambiguity” over #Brexit to drag out consideration of Lords amendments to the EU Withdrawal Bill. But we’ve already had over 60 hours of debate on this and we shouldn’t be complicit in Labour’s politically motivated delaying tactics. 
Peter Bone MP - "If we have a no deal situation, we don’t have to pay the £39billion and we make our own laws in our own country judged by our own judges......and we can have our own immigration policy. That is a very big plus for not having a deal.” #Brexit  
From @IanDunt, the simplicity of #Brexit Every Remainer has always known thisTruth be told 75% of Leave Leaders know it as wellBut our TV media has utterly failed to articulate itAnd 90% of Leave voters don't know it OR won't accept itProsperity or Control, not both  
Dave Brown on DUP leader threatening to withdraw support for Theresa May on Brexit customs plans - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Glad we are cracking on with sorting Lords Brexit Amendments! Lets have the debate, plenty of time to discuss, and get it done. We need to back the PM, send a message to the EU, and deliver what people in Mansfield voted for! 
Irish Pro-Life Leader: Our Hearts Are Broken But We Will Fight On, No Referendum Will Ever Make Abortion Right  #SaveThe8th #ProLifeIreland 
Brexit is unnecessary. We have a plan to build a modern Britain | Will Hutton and Andrew Adonis  
Theresa May plans to overturn all 15 Lords defeats on EU withdrawal bill in a single day. It is clear that what she really wants is to follow the script laid out by Goebbels after a Nazi referendum victory in 1933.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
We are almost two years on from the 2016 Referendum. If Brexit was a sound proposition for the future of the UK, all four nations, wouldn't Brexiteers be making those points. Wouldn't they be stressing the advantages daily. I see no such points being made, ever. 
#Labour MPs' fear of #Brexit voters could be unfounded, study says  
The Leader ofthe Opposion has said NOTHING. The Shadow Brexit Secretary, DITTO. Where are the checks and balances? 
Problems just keep piling up for Theresa May - N.I. abortion rights, Chris Grayling and the failing privatised railways, Brexit bill on June 12th. The gov't is paralysed by its desperation to cling to power and some Tory MPs smell blood. #ToriesOut #JC4PM 
perhaps Oliver thinks we voted to end democracy in 2014. We did not. the UK, Scotland and Dumfries are all very different places than they were in 2014. We voted to give this marriage one last chance but the UK came home drunk and threw up their Brexit all over the carpet.#Enough 
Oh I am feeling very down about Brexit today.  I have never given up hope that we might not leave but reading that May wants to push the Eu withdrawal bill amendments in one day makes me so angry and at the same time so despondent.  How dare she 
I literally lose sleep worrying about Brexit. I’d really love to hear from any of the 17m people who used to be similarly affected by our EU membership who might have advice about stress-related insomnia. Thanks in advance, Myrtle. 
Surprised that May's extraordinary decision to ram through all 15 Lords amendments to Brexit bill in just one sitting day is not a bigger news story. Hasn't featured on @BBCNews on R4. Is no-one making a fuss? @JPonpolitics @GuardianHeather @faisalislam @MichaelLCrick @bbclaurak 
EU withdrawal bill has already been debated for 64 hours in the Commons, plus god knows how long in the Lords, and Labour now want days more time to debate and delay Brexit #getonwithit 
Coming to a cinema near you: the government's no-deal Brexit scenario.  
I disagree as someone who lives in Spain and the U.K.  Something  which your Brexit will compromise. Brexit is toxic, narrow minded and built on deceit and intolerance. 
I would not let these people run me a bath, let alone the most complex negotiation in modern history. My article for the @Independent on the “Doomsday Brexit” scenario predicting shortages of medicines, food and fuel within 2 weeks of leaving the EU   
Pressure increases on Jeremy Corbyn as Sadiq Khan urges Labour MPs to be brave on Brexit  
Brexit is not the “will of the people” only of some. You use the phrase (as does the government) to push through an agenda. Brexit is toxic 
Thanks to @CommonsCMS @DamianCollins for publishing my new evidence on #brexit #leave.eu #eldoninsurance and US insurance industry #AI at #OleMiss ahead of my testimony tomorrow in Mississippi court case! @Uni_of_Essex @ACMCU @SMPAGWU #CambridgeAnalytica  
Matteo Salvini:"Italy & Sicily cannot be EU’s refugee camp.The good times for illegal is over – get ready to pack your bags.I think it’s better to spend money in countries of origin.If there are NGOs that want to work for free, that’s fine”#Brexit #EU 
Has Sadiq Khan forgotten that the 1.5m Londoners who backed Brexit outnumber the 1.3m who elected him?  
Ministers have spent months delaying Brexit votes because they fear defeat. Now they want to railroad through crucial legislation & limit proper debate & scrutiny. May should stop treating Parliament with contempt.Dictator May is at it again. 
The Tories have hardly passed a piece of legislation for 12 months - but now Parliament is expected to ram the #Brexit Bill through in just 12 hours. Pathetic and puerile. 
Brexit in a graph  
Cambridge Analytica whistleblower @chrisinsilico tells European Parliament's #Facebook hearing: " I do not believe Brexit would have happened were it not for CA’s involvement""CA may have dissolved, but the EU and its citizens will feel its effects for a generation." 
Newly published (@IrishTimes) tape recordings of interviews with Seán Lemass, Irish Taoiseach from 1959-1966, offer a fascinating insight into the UK’s relationship with Europe. He essentially predicted Brexit. I also include a clipping on Communists in Co. Roscommon, as is funny  
UKIP supporter convicted for sending abusive messages and death threats to anti Brexit MPs.I hope this will send a message to Brexit supporters that this behaviour is unacceptable towards  our representatives and also to members of the public #StopBrexit 
Full letter from Treasury minister saying U.K. “aims to keep VAT processes as close to possible as they are now” post Brexit & U.K. supports the post 2021 Digital VAT proposals... seems as a hint that U.K. will end up part of EU VAT area... despite Leave promises on fuel VAT etc  
And then there's this astonishing piece - showing the heroes of Brexit. I won't identify the artist because I don't want them trolled. Carswell seems to be having a stroke.  
These 170 questions from @Keir_Starmer show the extensive benefits EU membership brings and the rights, protections and prosperity we enjoy.With May's contempt for the progressive Lords amendments surely Labour must now resist Tory Brexit at every turn. 
Here they are: All of the issues that @theresa_may thinks can be debated and agreed upon in a single day... Please retweet and make sure everyone knows what the @Conservatives are trying to do (bypass fair democratic process by pushing through #Brexit regardless).  
Absolute disgrace and contempt for Parliament - Government giving just one day to consider over 200 amendments to the #Brexit Bill - so much for “taking back control” - more like taking the... @Open_Britain @peoplesvote_uk 
Said this before and I’ll say it again - many will only accept that #Brexit was a bad idea when it bites them *personally* on the arse. Likewise Scottish "No" voters. And the teeth are getting sharper and closer. 
Watch out for Dictator May trying to subvert democracy next week by failing to allow enough time for Parliament to debate #Brexit amendments. We must not allow the @Conservatives to get away with what amounts to pure contempt for the democratic process. 
Only 5% of Labour MPs voted to leave the EU, compared with 52% of the broader electorate... This self-styled people’s party is about as far from the people as an organisation can get:  #Brexit 
The Brexit transition period ends just before 2021.We know that by 2021, the UK population will be one that voted to Remain in 2016.So the current plan is to do Brexit at a time where we know the UK voted against it.That seems sustainable... 
British MPs from London write an open letter, warning that Brexit could "tear the fabric of London apart" and call for another voteYet every single one voted for the EU Referendum BillAnd we wonder why voters are cynical  
Peter Bone MP:Say 'thanks very much, we tried very hard but we can’t reach a deal.We’ll go our own way.'That would cause EU to change its attitude!#EU sell £70bn more goods to us than we do to them.They need a trade deal MORE than we do.#WTO#Brexit 
NEW: May accused of trying to 'rig Parliament' with new move to 'railroad' a hard Brexit through the Commons. 
Hello Theresa May..are you F***ing kidding, you're actually going to override our democratic process to deliver a version of brexit that nobody voted for?PM under fire over plans to overturn all 15 Lords defeats on EU withdrawal bill in single day  
Love Island starts tonight, but if we wanted to watch a bunch of desperate people stranded on an island arguing with each other, we’d just watch the Brexit negotiations. 
Theresa May is trying to ram through Brexit in the House of Commons - forcing MPs to scrutinise 200 Lords amendments to the EU Bill in just one sitting. This will mean hardly any debate on each issue.As usual, she’s manipulating parliamentary sovereignty to get her own way. 
How come "the vow" is ancient history but it's too soon to revisit the referendum even though they were two days apart?  
#EUWithdrawalBill’s back. Like everything else Brexit, the govt favours bullish obstinacy over consultative. This time, Parliament, inc @UKLabour,m front bench, must put up a proper fight. 
All the promises made during the Brexit campaign about 'bringing control back to our sovereign parliament' are proving to be complete gibberish. 12 hours of debate on subjects of this magnitude is, frankly, a piss take.  
.@ChukaUmunna – Outrageous for Government to schedule just one day to crucial Brexit debate  
*THREAD*1.Just phoned my Tory MP's office as I wanted to know why he hadn't replied to any of my emails about Brexit. His assistant informed me that "he didn't reply to any Brexit-related correspondence (200+ per day) as there was nothing he could say cos it's all up in the air" 
#Brexit: Theresa May under fire over plans to overturn all 15 Lords defeats on EU withdrawal bill in single day.'This shows total contempt of parliament....this piece of legislation will have huge consequences for the future of our country'  
Trying to hide any Brexit fallout and contempt for Parliament? Also the day Trump thinks he's meeting Kim Jong-un  
Democrats are rightly leery of making 2018 a referendum on impeachment. But how about it being a partial referendum on the question: "Is the president above the law?" Republicans who back Trump are now essentially arguing the answer is yes. Democrats are arguing the answer is no. 
Panic in the breast of the Conservative party as its hold over Brexit weakens daily. Not a single credible poll has put Leave in lead for 9 months. Country now demanding people's vote. To keep up the pressure, please join London march 23rd June and Westminster vigil 12 June.  
Democrats are resisting the will of American voters. Sounds exactly like Remainers with Brexit in the UK.  
The government’s own analysis of a "no deal" Brexit warns of food, fuel and medicine shortages within two weeks. But that’s not even the half of it.Here are 8 more reasons crashing out of the EU would be catastrophic. 
Parliament has been kicking its heels since Xmas with backbench business. Now Government wants to ram through 15 Brexit amendments in 12 hours? Disgraceful. And frit.  
The awesome majesty of the Mother of Parliaments. Bootstrapping Brexit legislation through in one day. UK democracy is a joke. But I'm not laughing. #kakistocracy #bananamonarchy 
This is the contempt that @theresa_may's @Conservatives have for Parliament and the future of our nation: all 15 amendments of the #EUWithdrawalBuill debated on & voted on in 12 hrs?Less than 1 hour per amendment.Impossible to enact properly!How is this being allowed?#Brexit  
The House of Commons will vote next week on the Lords' Brexit-bashing amendments. They MUST vote them down.To protect Brexit, to protect democratic accountability, and to protect Britain's future, we urge you to write to your MP using our template below. 
EU Withdrawal Bill back in Commons next week.Govt whip: “I look forward to working with you to deliver back to the House of Lords the EU Withdrawal Bill in a way that reflects both the referendum result and the Conservative Party manifesto we all stood on last year.”  
Leave voters had a number of legitimate concerns but almost all of them will be easier to tackle within the European Union than outside of it. MUST-READ: "Brexit is unnecessary. We have a plan to build a modern Britain"  
See You Next Tuesday For Brexit Vote Night:  
Richard Leonard claims he will win supporters of Independence over to the Labour party1 His party is controlled from London 2 His party is in a civil war between Corbynites & Blairites3 His party is pro trident 4 His party appear to support a hard Brexit Nae chance Leonard 
The 1.5m Londoners who backed Brexit outnumber the 1.3m who wanted Khan as mayor, points out Brendan O'Neill:  
Britain will refuse to pay Brexit 'divorce bill' if EU doesn't back down over Northern Ireland, David Davis warns  
Breaking: Chief whip tells Tory MPs to prepare for big Brexit vote on Lords amendments to EU withdrawal bill on June 12 
Marvellous #Brexit poster from @EffinBirds 
 @ashtenRD has questioned @RuthDavidsonMSP's commitment to devolution after reports of her fury at the prospect of further devolution to Scotland during the 2014 independence referendum. More recently, Davidson lent her support to the UK Government’s power grab on Holyrood.  
Open Europe's new 'middle way' on Brexit has all the same flaws as the govt's position. It's a waste of time.  
BOOK OF THE DAY June 4thFREE on KU:Rated 4/4 by OBC!#Political #Thriller #BREXIT #Ireland@SteveColemanJr 
With all the excitement about the referendum and #NowForNI you'd be forgiven for forgetting that currently nothing has changed. @AbortionSupport is still here, taking calls and funding abortions.  
Tory MP says Germany should pay up their Second World War bills before we dish out £40bn for Brexit divorce.     
The Brexit that was sold to the British people during the 2016 referendum, with all the benefits and none of the perceived downsides of EU membership, is not deliverable. That is becoming clearer every day.  
Brexit is brokenLeavers are moaningFarage has spoken His the last wordPraise for the whingingPraise for the moaningBrexit is brokenDead, that's the word 
.@LiamFox: "It is time for our country to raise its level of ambition, take pride in our achievements and help shape our global future, joining the PM and the Government in delivering a Brexit that works for everyone — in Britain and beyond"  
It is creepy, the way the mainstream media largely ignores the approaching crisis of Brexit. Day after day, there is near-silence.It's like watching Pompeii continue about its daily life while the volcanic ash cloud descends upon it. 
Elephant produces document with more detail than government Brexit white paper  
Considering NI voted Remain and polls suggest now is even more Remain and there is no NI Assembly currently to have this key debate and no alternative NI view in Commons then her right to unilaterally determine Brexit policy for NI via DUP confidence&supply to HMG is questionable  
Lots of sensible ideas on the kind of Brexit deal we should seek in this paper by @HenryNewman - both sides should take a look, pause, and ponder 
This is likely to be a big month for Brexit. Here's a quick recap of where everything stands  
Let's stop Brexit, march for a Peoples Vote on 23rd June, 12PM Pall Mall. Just turn up, bring the family or organise a group, but BE THERE!More details here  #StopBrexit2018 #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
New poll finds the British public now wants a soft Brexit  
This is an excellent article and includes some great ideas of what is needed to address some of the reasons why many people felt they needed to vote leave. But as it states, brexit is not the answer & it’s ok for the public to change its mind.#remainernow 
Sadiq Khan has thrown his support behind the Lib Dem amendments to the EU Withdrawal Bill that give the final say on the Brexit deal to the people, including the option of staying IN the E.U. Will @jeremycorbyn step up or go along with the Tories? 
Brexiteer chloe westley @LowTaxChloe gives BRILLIANT reason why Britain MUST prepare for NO DEAL Brexit  
The EU referendum had two options - Remain and Leave, and secured a democratic mandate for one of them: Leave. Does anyone remember seeing or voting for a third option called Compromise?#Brexit  
Pessimism about #Brexit shown as strongest among business leaders of UK’s most productive companies, according to BofE survey.  It's not #ProjectFear , for them it is day to day investment decisions which means they take their money out of the UK & place in other countries. #FBPE 
I will never forgive anyone, politician, campaigner or journalist, who has helped create this #Brexit disaster They have irreparably damaged this country, put my business at risk & already cost me a fortune, stripped me & my family of our rights & opportunities.#StopBrexit 
Removing EU Freedom of Movement was always going to affect ordinary people while barely touching the rich.It would be restoring a privilege to the rich and powerful. So why is @JeremyCorbyn supporting it!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
A study of Twitter data on #Brexit and #USElection found that bots have an effect on the tweeting activity of humans dependent on  whether bots provide information consistent with humans’ prior opinions.  
“#Brexiteers are now running away from the consequences as fast as they can. The tragedy for our country is that, in one way or another, we are stuck with having to deal with them.” @ChrisGreyBrexit in @PoliticsMeans. #Brexit #BrexitReality #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May's promise to publish 'ambitious and precise' plans for Brexit this month is likely to be broken  
@Femi_Sorry correctly points out that @isaby is a liar if he says that a No Deal Brexit will not put up barriers to trade that are likely to cause extreme distress.   The idea that 45 years of trade rules, practice & systems can be seamlessly replaced  
So that's your #Brexit vote, folks. Subject to an 'unprecedented' official inquiry - "the biggest data protection investigation ever" How can we possibly say this was a fair vote? And that's not including the allegations of overspending, co-ordination and destroying evidence  
Let's have a quick recap then, Brexit achievements so far:• Blue passports (made in France,     could have had them anyway).• Cake but you can't eat it.•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Minister warns no-deal Brexit must not lead to ‘six mile queues at Dover’.But who's he warning? Dover? Brexiters? Lorry drivers? The EU? Fellow Tories? The AA?These people need to get real, and quickly. The time for dancing around the subject is over.  
Even Remainer Labour MP admits MORE Brits would vote to LEAVE in second referendum  
#Brexit Doomsday Brexit report from Whitehall officials. What a load of rubbish. We’ve heard it all before from idiot Gideon Osborne. In the EU referendum none of it come true. All bollocks trying to derail Brexit. Shut up we’re leaving the EU. Your boring 17 million to death.  
At present there isn’t a functioning prime minister, my leader is sitting it out on Brexit, & the BBC has re-elected Jeremy Thorpe leader of the Lib Dems. Thank God the country’s in such good shape 
% of Britons who view [X] Brexit scenario to be acceptable:Full EEA membership: 46%EEA w/ restrictions: 57%Regulatory alignment: 36%Canada plus: 44%Canada minus: 40%WTO: 37%via @OpiniumResearch Report:  
Government sources reveal Brexit could lead to a shortage of food, petrol and medicine, or as the hundreds of thousands who visit food banks every week call it: 'Monday'. 
This speaks volumes: - Highest Brexit-backing areas, average level of national pride is 72%.- Highest Remain-backing areas, average level of national pride is 40%.I'm not saying that if you're a patriot you want national sovereignty...the facts are. 
Very pleased to say I'll be taking over as AFP bureau chief in The Hague in September. Will miss Brussels, and Brexit, but what can you do 
The EU "shall negotiate and conclude an agreement with that State" - Article 50 on EU obligations re a member state's withdrawal.By saying he won't negotiate with Britain, M Barnier is violating EU law.But then when has EU always followed its own laws?#Brexit  
The House of Lords has abused its position of power by defying the will of the British people and frustrating Brexit. RT if you think it's had its day! Support us at  
In recent months Number 10 press office has said that there won’t be ‘Mad Max’ after Brexit, and now that there won’t be ‘Armageddon’. Maybe they could tell what there will be?  
From the party that most definitely does not want to talk about Brexit, single market membership or freedom of movement.  
25% of UK youth considering leaving the UK because of Brexit creating a huge brain drain.#PeoplesVote#FinalSayForAll#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
An overlooked point in the Brexit negotiations has always been that threatening a no deal scenario is severely undermined by the absence of domestic infrastructure designed to cope with its effects. 
Panicked about post-Brexit passport queues? We got you...   
Former Swiss Finance Minister: “The #Brexit vote wasn’t direct democracy – it was drivel ... All possible consequences, risks and strategies in the event of a yes or no outcome weren't discussed beforehand in a thorough manner.” 
WATCH | One of our best performing videos during the referendum campaign, still very relevant today; European citizens imploring Britain to make a stand and vote to leave the anti-democratic EU.Perhaps one day they'll get their chance too!   
Civil servants, with a remit of preparing for a 'no deal' scenario, who have wasted two years trying to undermine Brexit, should be held to account for gross negligence. 
BREAKING BREXIT NEWS. Mount Fueugo volcano in Guatemala has erupted violently. Remain campaigners have been able to establish, beyond any doubt, that Brexit is directly responsible.  
Dear Brexit trolls: stop being so insecure. A journalist is asking how @BritishInEurope in the EU 27 are affected by #Brexit. This is not a Leave or Remain issue: it’s about real people’s lives. Mark is reporting on a hugely overlooked group most of whom had no vote in 2016  
The British referendum in 2016 on leaving the EU was a lesson in how not to carry out direct democracy, former Swiss Finance Minister Kaspar Villiger tells . 
Brexit: There is no leadership, no intellectual engagement, no realism and no basic sense of patriotic responsibility. It is criminal negligence  
A very important point regarding Brexit and the residency rights for non-British wives of British soldiers.via @kasiamikus 
Caller Angela says she's a nationalist. "The DUP seems to be the only party that have good moral values. I have been disgusted by the referendum results south of the border." 
U.K. SAID TO BE READY TO PUBLISH BREXIT PLAN FOR IRISH BORDER: BBG 
Say what you like about @LibDems, but they’re the only party that would put up with someone like me mouthing off about Brexit. 
No Deal is better than a bad deal.Govt must walk away now.#Brexit must mean #BrexitPlease sign and RT petition below #BGT #skypapers #bbcdp#Conservatives #eu @TheSun 
After being told, countless times, to leave the country if I didn’t like Brexit, I’ve decided to do just that, so in Sept I’m moving to Denmark, & will be working at the excellent @AarhusUni. It’s a bitter-sweet feeling. My fight to #StopBrexit will continue - from within the EU 
European officials have told the government that they will not ask the EU’s trading partners to allow Britain to benefit from current trade deals with key countries such as Japan or South Korea until Theresa May signs the final legal text of a Brexit deal  
Remainiacs call Brexit voters "uneducated".I was at University for 6 years. I must have missed the module entitled "Why the countries of Europe should be merged into a country called Europe ruled by one unelected, arrogant elite for the benefit of themselves and their cronies". 
But there will be winners - remember this article by the brave @carolecadwalla ? 'The great British #brexit robbery: how our democracy was hijacked'  
This is also hardly that surprising and given Tories current position on Brexit powers seems quite true to form.  
Leaked #Whitehall warning that no-deal #Brexit could cause food, fuel and medicine shortage branded 'Project Fear on Speed' by Jacob Rees-Mogg  
Brexit Britain: Winston Churchill's grandson calls ex-Ukip leader Nigel Farage an ‘absolute twat’  
Leading supporter of the #PeoplesVote campaign, @BenPBradshaw, replies to @SadiqKhan's comments to say it's right to say MPs should act in the best interests of their constituents and the country on Brexit Bill amendments  
It is as if the EU Referendum never took place.  
The continued preparedness of the Dutchfor Brexit is like a top-level governmental subtweet to the UK.  
Best solution: deprive voters over 70 of their vote. It's the future of the young which will be destroyed by Brexit. And yes - I'm over 70 but I'd willingly give up my vote if I thought that all the daft forgetful old fools who voted for Brexit were too. 
A couple of our group attended a march at the weekend. They said it was packed and a handful of football thugs waving the Union flag which was upside down were there singing God save the Queen. #brexit has changed everything.  
Listen back: As the results of the Irish referendum settle, attention has turned to abortion in Northern Ireland. @stellacreasy tells us why she wants an emergency debate   
Germany doesn't half have some nerve when it comes to the so-called 'Brexit bill'! Support us at  
‘Britain will have just a few weeks to agree 40 bilateral trade deals before Brexit.’“Please give us a trade deal!”“We want...”“We’ll give you ANYTHING YOU WANT! Where do we sign?!”Taking back control.  
It transpires that Nigel Farage is nothing more than a shock jock. A dated, reactionary radio presenter with a gift for self-promotion. He has no answers to the problems created by his beloved Brexit.He just wanted to be famous for something.Now he’s milking it with a tour  
The UK already ranks very near the top of the world for sovereignty. And above the USA, France, Japan. Even if we went from our current 88% to 91% (the max) - SO WHAT? It has no practical benefit and is not worth Brexit's colossal cost  @acgrayling 
How often should there be a referendum on EU membership?A - every 40 years B - every 3 yearsC - until you get the answer you want and then never again. 
"How do you know? Can you see into the future?""Yes I can"Conservative MP @PeterBoneUK says he is certain there won't be empty supermarket shelves after Brexit #VictoriaLIVE 
No, Chloe, I want them to have a vote on the actual deal rather than the false prospectus they were convinced by before the referendum in 2016. As the promises made then unravel and the mandate is invalidated, democracy demands a #PeoplesVote 
Brexit could destroy Scotland's shipbuilding industry according to @GMB_union, as UK companies could be locked out of a vital EU defence fund. Shipbuilding is vital for Scottish manufacturing and supports thousands of jobs. Please RT #GMB18 
Project Fear’s laughable doomsday report is trying to scare Britain away from a successful no-deal Brexit:  
Interesting piece in CityAM today over lingering doubts over City’s role post Brexit. I cannot make up my mind if M Barnier is continuing to brief against the U.K. or if it’s pathological City ‘REMAINERS’ doing so or a combination of both. Whoever it is, it’s duplicitous! 
Brexiters already OK with tanking the economy, university system, British industry and NHS. Fine with no more Good Friday Agreement or creation of a United Ireland. Just saying I'm not confident they'll care if Brexit means every diabetic dies and all planes drop from the sky. 
Senior Scottish Tory about Ruth Davidson urging David Cameron to drop the Vow circa September 2014: "ancient history"Senior Scottish Tories about length of time since Independence Referendum in September 2014: "TOO SOON", "STILL FEELS LIKE YESTERDAY" 
 The agenda for this week’s round of #Brexit negotiations @EU_Commission is now available on our site: 1) Withdrawal Agreement, 2) Ireland/Northern Ireland, 3) framework for future relationship   
The reality of a "no deal" Brexit was revealed by the "independent" analysis of the Civil Service. Now shocking new photos have been leaked showing what "experts" believe will happen to us after Brexit.#Brexit #BrexitDoomsday #BrexitReality 
That will be the same MPs who voted for the 2015 Referendum Act and then endorsed the decision by voting overwhelmingly for Article 50 and have twice voted to reject amendments to remain in the Single Market and Customs Union. 
It makes no sense for European security that Britain should be shut out of the Galileo satellite project.  Of the all problems provoked by Brexit, none are more significant than the need for a close, collaborative and productive relationship over security. #ExitfromBrexit 
I don’t see Corbyn as Labour: no one who champions a cause as right wing as Brexit could possibly be Labour   
How many times did you hear the accusation “Too many unanswered questions” during IndyRef1 via the MSM.    How many times have you heard the same question via the MSM in relation to #Brexit      Now, ask yourself why that is 
A man in a top hat who lives in the past and a proven liar assure us that they know what they are doing and that everyone is out of step except them……..   Tine to be very worried indeed .  #Brexit  
Winston Churchill's grandson calls ex-Ukip leader Nigel Farage an ‘absolute twat’  
We are being treated with UTTER CONTEMPT by May & Corbyn. Neither have a Brexit PLANNeither will they (or can they?) tell us the BENEFITS of BrexitThey close down any debateThey ignore advice of their own Civil ServantsThey allow the media to control the narrative 1/2 
The leak is revealing. There is still a strand of thinking in the civil service that wishes to stop Brexit & is busy inventing difficulties that don't exist. They seem to want to help those on the continent that think they can reverse Brexit & keep our money flowing into the EU. 
Waving Brexit through is the easy path - but it is a dangerous and unpatriotic one. My @thetimes Thunderer column on the moral duty of MPs to resist Brexit  
RESULT: another EU country's electorate (Slovenia) vote for a party (25%) that wants nation state control not EU over immigration, & in 2nd place an anti elite partyWatch the EU elite losers on 9% stop the winners govern aka #brexit, Italy, #Catalonia 
Brexit delusions about Ireland exploded 
It's difficult to believe 2 years on the civil service are still writing & leaking absurdly pessimistic scenarios about Brexit. Ministers have offered clear directions that they should work up the best way of leaving without a deal. I'm told by Ministers that's what they're doing 
Before the referendum every politician was for it. Democracy was flourishing because they all knew the result would be remain. When leave was the result. democracy went out the window to be replaced by treason  and every effort was made to have another referendum. 
I’m afraid Arlene Foster’s comments on “no difference for Northern Ireland” re BREXIT need some serious catching up to do in other areas. Armed Forces Covenant, same sex marriage, equality and abortion. Get with the programme; equality cuts both ways.  
:: Abortion in Northern Ireland ::We don't need a referendum: Northern Ireland does not need a referendum like Ireland - this is not a constitutional issue but a repeal of legislation. 
If anyone has referendum posters they want recycled, give me a shout.  I have allotmenteers, beekeepers and self-builders all crying out for them! 
Could I also ask why your paying industries to move out of Scotland? Is this part of the post brexit strategy for Scotland? @DavidMundellDCT 
During the referendum, and since, Ultra Remainers have lied saying UK would be excluded from Erasmus scheme. Now the whole world is to be invited (as long as they pay). #Brexit #Remainerlies 
Never has a govt failed the British people so badly. A govt that has laid the seeds of social division that will take a generation to heal. A govt that has made the UK a global laughing stock. A govt that is leading us to economic ruin and global irrelevance....#Brexit 
"The ultimate truth about Brexit is that through a series of accidents a protest movement with wholly unrealistic and disastrous policies unexpectedly and unwillingly became a government set upon delivering them."  
Outrage as Sadiq Khan calls on MPs to ACCEPT Lords Brexit plan and STAY in customs union  
Why are people still using the phrase, “Project Fear”? Because they know that Brexit is dead, and at the funeral and for the rest of their own lives, they want to say that Brexit would have been great if it hadn’t been for lack of political will and/or EU27 obstruction. 
A test of the Electoral Commission’s impartiality whose Chairman said he “regret[s] the result of the referendum”.  
When you are in a hole, stop digging -- something @theresa_may & Co. have apparently not yet learned. Time to admit #Brexit is a terrible mistake and revoke Article 50 #StopBrexit 
We have simultaneously to launch a great programme of economic, political and social reform to address Brexit Britain’s wounds and to stay in the EU - which covers our backs better than we knew. Saving Britain with Andrew Adonis out this week  
Still believe Englands Brexit isn't about stopping independence?Haven't you noticed the drive of British Nationalism and indoctrination via increased Royal exposure, Food Branding, TV programmes, Slogans and Flags everywhere?They are ramming "Britain" down your throat!Why? 
The main argument Brexiters now have for #Brexit is that we have made the decision & so must plough on with it. Everyone sometimes makes bad decisions, but when successful people realise they've made a mistake they change course, failures carry on regardless.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Interesting take on the rights #British people could lose if we #Brexit ... via @BIUK_Politics 
Ben Wallace Tory mp and security minister on lbc just now “ we will continue to function as normal if we leave “ - but he said beforehand he didn’t have any knowledge about brexit ... another one who shouldn’t comment if he has no answers to back up his claims 
Funny to think that, until fairly recently, Andrew Adonis had never given a speech about Europe. This is the referendum effect: making people passionate about causes they never spoken much about before. 
Go Lord Adonis! - the first person I have heard, brave enough to say scrap Brexit altogether on #BBCR4Today 
Lord Adonis's fanatical hatred of Brexit can be summed up as 'I know what people want better than they do'. His arrogance and his contempt for democracy are breathtaking. 
Government prepares for Brexit. No, not OUR government, silly!  
EU headache: - UK: #Brexit - Greece: bankrupt - Austria: anti-migrant gov't - Hungary: anti-migrant gov't - Italy: anti-migrant gov't, banks insolvent - Poland: anti-migrant gov't, judicial reform - Spain: independence Catalonia, banks insolvent, looming new elections  
Dear Labour Remainers, you are the majority of Labour members, if you want to stop #Brexit you have to put the maximum pressure on the party leadership. If Labour does not change course, Brexit will be inevitable. This is your moment! Seize it!#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Current EU negotiating position on our Brexit deal.  
I just woke up is Brexit still here? 
 Calling all Brits living elsewhere in the EU. I’d like to hear from you. Reply to this tweet with a video describing your #Brexit concerns.record in portrait tell me your name, age, home country & occupation tell me what your concern is!@BritishInEurope 
Amazing that @BBCr4today - where I’m waiting to talk about Brexit, Northern Rail & austerity - is using its prime time to debate Jeremy Thorpe, long dead!! 
When @stellacreasy or any other Remainer tells you that ‘nobody talked about leaving the single market prior to the referendum’ it’s a straight up lie. Here are the leaders of the Leave and Remain sides explicitly saying just that:  
I'm so bored of @BBCr4today's daily mixture of hard right pro Brexit politics and showbiz 
Millions voted for the first time in the referendum because they thought their vote would mean something. And you want to turn around to those forgotten communities and tell them that they were too stupid to make a decision? How dare you. Their taxes pay for your salary.  
Are there any @UKLabour MPs who still believe in a ‘jobs first’ Brexit? Are there any @UKLabour MPs who still believe ordinary people will be better off after Brexit?Just curious 
David Davis just said a key Brexit promise wasn't a promise .... Leavers, you were lied to...  
The government is muzzling business so that people won’t know how dire the threats posed by Brexit are. Jobs, bankruptcies, less money for NHS & schools - all for what?  
Who is this delusional man  Referendum kara lo Ram Mandir pe.. even most MLAs & MPs of Congress, SP, JDS will vote for it!  
Something very odd happened over the weekend.We got a brief glimpse of what happens when the Beeb drops its anti-Trump and anti-Brexit barrage for a minute.And has a laugh at Corbo instead.Your loony lefty Twitter lynch mob are still having a meltdown over it.  
This debate on the Brexit 'Doomsday scenario' got very heated when @Femi_Sorry accused @Isaby of lying.  
In supporting Brexit, Labour is letting down the people who need its support the most.   
Yes how dare @Channel4News interview someone you disagree with! Next time they shouldn't invite anyone to speak from a pro brexit perspective.  
We already know that a No Deal Brexit would be disastrous, but it is getting likelier by the day as the government fails to find any arrangement that would prevent a hard border with Ireland while leaving the Single Market. #GMB 
I could understand if Theresa May said: "I don’t agree with Brexit but people voted for it so I’ll try to make it work"…but to pretend that it will be a great success, to suppress her own reports on the consequences, is just irresponsible. #PeoplesVote 
Here’s Tom, he voted leave but has now looked at many of the realities of Brexit & has decided it’s not worth it. In this blog he sets out many of the reasons he has come to this conclusion. Respect to Tom. #remainernow #peoplesvote 
Summary:1. We don’t need Brexit, which people only voted for because of the LIES on the side of a bus.2. I have a cunning plan to build a modern, fairer Britain.3. It involves a lot more spending, borrowing and taxation.4. What could possibly go wrong?5. That's all, folks!  
Things that still bother me about Brexit include:If prices go up poverty will increase.If British exports subject to tariffs unemployment will riseBusinesses that rely on EU staff and/or customers will decline or closeLosing freedom of movement in both directions is tragic 
We don’t need Brexit. I have a plan to build a modern, fairer Britain | Will Hutton - the guardian  
More and more #Labour Party members are contacting us about supporting the @Remain_Labour & @Labour4EU motion in their local party. If you would like to pass a Pro-EU motion or have done already, please let us know. #Brexit is not inevitable. 
Hard Brexit-backing MP Anne-Marie Trevelyan tells #r4today that if there is no UK-EU trade deal “the EU won’t be seeing that £40bn [divorce bill]”. That’s the opposite of what her colleague, the Brexit minister @SuellaBraverman, said last week. #BrexitShambles 
#Brexit is an “Appalling Failure” says former #Tory party Chair Chris Patten @ProSyn 
As the Conservatives bring chaos with Brexit, it’s time for @UKLabour to step up. The clock is ticking on a destructive, self-sabotaging Brexit.  
Ian Blackford constantly tells us that nobody voted for Brexit to make themselves poorer.So why would people vote for independence for exactly that outcome?  
With the UK having a predominantly service-based economy, new @Econs4FreeTrade research is further evidence that the single market is not the right option for the UK after Brexit  
"The government is asking businesses to sign Non Disclosure Agreements when they talk to them about the outcomes of Brexit" ASK YOURSELF WHY THEY WOULD DO THIS? AND JUST EXACTLY HOW THEY CAN ENSURE THEY DO KEEP QUIET...  
Parliament has the opportunity to reject the Tories’ shambolic and reckless handling of Brexit and preserve our prosperity for the next generation  – if MPs are brave.  
it was always the plan to shrink the welfare state  - - brexit is just another tory tool to do so = BREXIT IS FOR THE RICH  
Brexit lorry park failure is 'emblematic of a Government that seems incapable of taking its own policies seriously'  
Britain hints at staying in European VAT area after Brexit  via @financialtimes 
Hi @LowTaxChloe I’m so glad to see your twitter profile calls for more democracy. I assume this means you support a fully democratic #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal?  
I’m on Today at 8.30 about my anti-Brexit book with Will Hutton, out this week. I strongly endorse today’s BBC ‘Englishness’ survey showing huge support for devolution from Westminster to local authorities & Mayors. ‘Change Britain, don’t Brexit’ is the big theme of the book! 
Whitehall’s “Doomsday Brexit” scenario predicted shortages of medicines, food and fuel within two weeks of leaving the EU... What’s the worst thing that could happen to you after Brexit? Avocado shortage? Prosecco rationed? @JuliaHB1 |  
More Labour MPs coming out in support of democracy.2 years is easily past the sell-by date of such a narrow vote, especially as the Tory Brexit is nothing like the Brexit sold by Leave campaigners.The only way to sort it out is a #PeoplesVoteLondon, 23rd June - march with us. 
Wow Nicky Campbell is actually talking about Brexit on BBC radio5 this morning, and actually questioning the feasibility of it.Wonder what brought that on   
You mean before the BBC starting taking Bribes !! Sorry gifts of money from the undemocratic EU? Remember the BBC has not had one program since our referendum in support of 17.4+million leave voters. Think about that fact tweeters.  
This Brexit is a dead end. Let’s build a modern Britain instead says @williamnhutton. Sign me up Will! 
Yes he was at the launch of my anti-Brexit book last Monday, enjoying every minute. He left with an inscribed copy (‘For David, we are all in this together. Regards, Andrew’). Order here if you want to read what he is reading:  
We don’t need Brexit. I have a plan to build a modern, fairer Britain | Will Hutton  
Do not Go Gentle into that Brexit Blight,Remainers Rage should burn and rave till end of day,Rage , Rage against this, stand up to it & fight.If you can support SODEM.  They are there every day when Parliament is sitting.  #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Are you worried about government’s secret doomsday plans for shortages of food, fuel and medicine after Brexit?This is the week to make your plan to join us in London on 23rd June to march for #PeoplesVotePls tell your friends and RT @peoplesvote_uk 
BREXITUK Government's grovelling attempt to buy a friendly, friction-free & costly trade deal was doomed from the start. This has been confirmed by EU Chief Negotiator, Michel Barnier,  when he recently declared: “We don’t want to negotiate. We don’t want to compromise".  
Many prominent politicians want Tsai Ing-wen to permit a referendum on independence—something that would provoke a dire response from China  
Exhibit A on why the referendum question may be in serious trouble. Even the ardent pro-PR side can’t figure things out! #bcpoli 
"Had there been a referendum in Karachi, Sindh or Hyderabad they would almost certainly have voted to remain within India". Why did Nehru accept such a biased #June3rdPlan of India's partition? 
Christine Marsh vowed to run for office after watching @dougducey and the GOP Legislature muscle through universal voucher-style program. Parents put that program on ice, pending ‘18 referendum. That movement inspired many Az teachers to run for office.  
Brexit will power Britain’s prosperity and it’s already working with 600,000 new jobs  
Irish Pro-Life Group On Referendum: “Most Tragic Day In Irish History”  
The Remoaners have failed to persuade the many & now, one has to conclude, that #Brexit will indeed bring about many opportunities, it will create a surge in investment, jobs & infrastructure, a reduction in unemployment & social advances, primarily in France & Germany.#FBPE 
History that it's easy to forget: @MikeSmythNews points out former #BCLiberals premier Christy Clark also promised a referendum on #proportionalrepresentation. But, alas, she pulled a #JustinTrudeau. @fairvotebc #BCpoli #BCNDP 
What if I told you that the EU has 40 agencies which perform governmental responsibilities, such as chemical safety testing, medicines approvals, human rights monitoring, and that Brexit means that rather than sharing that cost among 28 countries, it'll be the UK tax-payer alone? 
Seventy years ago today, Newfoundland held a referendum on joining the Canadian confederation. Remaining independent with Responsible Government won the plurality with almost 45% of the vote, with confederation receiving 41%.  
Conscience supports Catholics who votes Yes in recent referendum..Conscience takes priority over church teaching, says Catholic Catechism  via @IrishTimes 
So far the SNP have published 1,000 pages (White Paper and Growth Commission report) on how an independent Scotland might work.I've yet to see even ONE page on the unionist plan for Brexit.#WhereIsPlanB 
Correct. Cameron never said that. Here’s the May 9th speech on the importance of the EU to peace: Boris Johnson immediately characterised the speech as a claim that Brexit would trigger WW3... and a new Euromyth was born.  
"Brexit is a step back to an imagined past that never existed."Magisterial essay by Will Hutton and Andrew Adonis.  
I've read enough of his strange, furiously & utterly non-sequitur 'arguments' at this stage. Like Giles Fraser, Brexit appears to have driven him steaming off the rails into some dystopian Wonderland. ~ But that first tweet you cited reminded me of this:  
Nothing serious will happen before June . It is already too late. Let’s hope for October but the risks are increasing of a « no deal » without any transition period and Hard Brexit next March. Is the British Government keep waiting for the last minute crisis to be serious? Risky!  
Why is no one talking about the Brexit threat to LGBT rights? | Jonathan Cooper  
Indeed, but I think it goers even further than that for Trump and the Brexit Ultras who promote the same approach. It’s not about what I win, but about you losing, and being seen to have been screwed by me, even if that means I get less.  
Great thread. This is a strategy also used by Putin (and historically by Russia), and promoted by the Brexit Ultras.The belief not only that win-win is impossible, but that your opposite number losing and being seen to lose is far more important than you actually winning.  
No facts, no arguments, just a mindless chant. If brexit is a religion, it's a singularly creepy one.  
My view on Brexit is I voted against it but it's not the end of the world and we'll be okay I have no doubt - feel free to block me for such radical thinking and I don't give a fuck if you do 
"Once in a generation they said" whilst conveniently ignoring every lie spun by Better Tofuckinggether. If you think unionists are shiteing themselves just now, just wait till the referendum is actually happening. Their lies won't work this time, they have nothing & they know it. 
The real project fear was the torrent of hate and lies poured out by the tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press against the EU, immigrants, refugees, 1.5m Turks, Muslim, an EU army, an EU superstate, German domination etc.. #Brexit is built on hate and lies.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
International Trade Secretary Liam Fox comes out fighting for Brexit and says the country has been backed by investors  
#MockDavidDavisIt's 2020 & David Davis sends a message from his post-Brexit bunker, explaining why he thinks no deal was actually a success.Outside, a marauding mob of Greggs workers kill and eat some former call centre operators before using their bones to make a raft  
Soapbox columnGene KerriganThe reaction to the Repeal Referendum result is bizarre  
. @Femi_Sorry fighting the good brexit fight AND nailing the subjunctive / singular partitive article before proceeding plural adjective   
Curious that @Channel4News, that jointly exposed Alexander Nix and the Cambridge Analytica scandal, would choose to give her a platform. Here she is embedded in the #AIQ/#SCL/#CambridgeAnalytica code breach: 
COMMENT OF THE DAY: In hindsight, Brexit seems so simple...  
We need to build a fairer society & that society could be an.....Independent Scotland!The time has come to break Westminster chains!In an Indy Scotland one would be for sure...we would get the government WE voted for.#YouYesYet#YEStoINDY#indyref2#Referendum#Independence 
It's only when you experience what it is to feel normal again that you realise how much fucking energy that referendum sucked out of you and fucked with your juju. 
Northern Ireland police "pause"  sale of stations amid fears of hard border after Brexit  
Dear Brexit voters...Do you just like the idea or the sound of Brexit, or did you actually want to achieve something for this country? More control, a better NHS, a better standard of living? 
Knock knock! Who's there? Armageddon. Armageddon who? Armageddon fed up with Brexit.  
Brexit is a stupid fucking idea, voted for by stupid fucking people for stupid fucking reasons 
4/. So when @LowTaxChloe corrects her signal errors and you put your back into making damn sure she does I shall pay attention to your opinions.I expect some character here.She sold a fairy tale that food would be 17% cheaper from Brexit.Both of you.Correct itIt matters 
12 European countries (EEC12/EU12) formed the Single Market in 1987, and another 3 joined the EU in 1995. In the attached, I compare the evolution of GDP per capita for those who joined with those who stayed out (EFTA countries). Notice the timing of the growth divergence #brexit  
Well, yes we are a more liberal country, but it’s also a bit more nuanced. We did vote to restrict the rights of citizenship of children born in Ireland to non Irish parents, in 2004 - a referendum I think we all forget, but we shouldn’t - and that result should be repealed. 
I am now thoroughly pissed off with this tweet Allie.Truth mattersChloe’s lies matterIn your considered view was @Lowtaxchloe right on wrong in her view, for instance that food would become 17% cheaper through Brexit?Yes or no?Food security’s a national security issue 
Right #FBPE, it's time to turn up the pressure on a #PeoplesVote so we can stop #Brexit. Let's make history and save our country from the clutches of these self serving Tory maniacs who are tearing britain apart. Write to your MP. March. Rally. Speak out. Together we can do this! 
Democrats have the most powerful argument imaginable in the first referendum on the president since his election: Republicans support Trump’s claim to absolute power; Democrats do not. Which party should we have control Congress?  
Are you listening @jeremycorbyn?'If you're sick of Brexit you should get shot of Brexit', David Miliband @dmiliband#peoplesvote 
She's an un-elected, unconnected, unknowledgeable,  jingoistic bluffer who is full of her own bravado. Perfect brexit spokesperson 
The contradictions, convulsions, contractions and just the cons of Brexit.It's madness, stop it we want to get off!  
I respect that voters wanted to give Cameron a good kicking.I respect that voters wanted to give the NHS extra cash.That's all.No one, not even the Brexeratti themselves, had any idea what Brexit meant, nor do they even now.How can I respect that?I cannot respect a fuck up. 
What interests me is who Chloe actually represents. The TPA is closely linked to Brexit Central / Legatum. Who funds them and what is their agenda? 
An army of Soros backed EU remainers are going to go door to door in order to try and overturn the Brexit referendum. 
The government is under pressure to release papers outlining a "Doomsday Brexit" scenario in which the UK would run short of medicines, food and fuel within two weeks of leaving the EU. Is this project fear or a frightening reality? #IanOnLBC 
If the EU and ECB are worried about Italian debt, their plans for shutting off the Eurozone from the City after Brexit will only increase it. Europe needs access to the world’s largest financial hub. It needs London to buy European sovereign debt. Barnier doesn’t seem to see this 
I’m positive that Brexit is bad for the UK. I am positive that we were better at the centre of the EU. I am positive that Farage is right on one thing that the UK will not gain economically from leaving the EU. 
Season 1 of Brexit is going to end with an off the cliffhanger 
Watch, listen and learn If our government is preparing for a no deal #Brexit scenario, but keeping things quiet for strategic reasons, then good on them. If they’re not making adequate preparations, and we end up with #BRINO, then god help them. 
Corbyn's back to talking about anything but Brexit. Today's Brexit avoiding subject is a boxer.  
Be it Brexit or child grooming and rape, the simple fact of the matter is nothing can be done until people stop being so apathetic and frightened. We have to stand up and face the elites who are damaging our country in their own interests. Until then we continue to lose. 
The EU AND U.K. are fast approaching the latest round of Brexit talks, and one man will be speaking for the 27 remaining countries: Europe's chief negotiator, Michel Barnier. We spoke to him exclusively. (via @HBO) 
International Trade Secretary Liam Fox comes out fighting for Brexit and says the country has been backed by investors  
Project Fear was wrong.They made predictions about how businesses would react to the vote (i.e. belief that Brexit was coming). They were wrong.But there's a difference between *that* and the effect of Brexit itself. Have a watch 
Welcome world – and the UK! #EuropeanUnion’s next student exchange programme set to be opened to any country in the world in 2021, paving the way for UK’s post-#Brexit participation. @EUErasmusPlus @erasmusplusUK 
OK everyone - @LowTaxChloe loves this country. She believes in post #Brexit #Britain and works hard to help make our country as best as it can be. Sadly, she has had a string of hateful messages today.RT this and show Chloe your support with a follow. She’s a real patriot. 
BREXIT Day 1  The dead rise from their graves Day 2  Cats will be sleeping with dogs Day 3  Sunderland will win the FA CupDay 15  The Highlander remake is the biggest film of the year Day 28 - Jar Jar a Star Wars story wins the Palme d'Or at Cannes 
There is not majority support for a 2nd #EURef Latest Opinium (May 2018):Britain SHOULD have a second referendum 37%Britain should NOT have a second referendum 49%The highest level of support for a 2nd vote was recorded in July 2017 (41%) 
Anti-immigrant party wins Slovenian elections as populist wave washes over Europe  RED: EU-critical gov'tORANGE: mild EU-critical gov't ('no more migrants')YELLOW: not in the EU + BrexitGREEN: latest attacksBLUE: elections this yearBLACK: bankrupt  
The Swiss Nsvy one of the most effective in the World. Costs nothing. Never lost a ship. 
Our Brexit future...  
I'm Dutch and I endorse #Italexit because we can be united only in freedom, sovereignty and rule of law. #Brexit #EU#EUisTheProblem 
So much for Brexit taking back control of our borders. Turns out, according to evidence seen by @faisalislam at Sky News, that the plan is if necessary to drop all customs checks and throw open the borders.How could any government and party preside over this and survive? 
New 'Doomsday Brexit Scenarios' where Britain will run out of food and medicine are rubbish made to try and resurrect Project Fear. Nobody believes them. Read my comments on @BreitbartLondon No deal is better than a bad deal! #TrueBrexit 
Wrecking the Bill, as Tory dissidents still seem intent on doing, would be tantamount to crippling the Government’s ability to deliver Brexit. The Prime Minister’s pressing task is to guide the process back onto the right track, says the @Telegraph 
We’ve gone from ‘Brexit will make U.K. a tour de force in the world - yay’ to ‘Yes, we will be worse off with Brexit, but we will pretend to be entirely sovereign in everything we do - and we can choose what flavour of Johnny Foreigner we have. So, Yay’What a time to be alive!  
Alexa! Find me a metaphor for the UK after Brexit.  
Can we stop the back slapping and warm regards for Arlene just because she Tweeted about the GAA?Systemic oppression of Queer people Refusal to allow women control over their own wombs  Catastrophic incompetence over RHIHolding UK hostage over a hard Brexit 
Worth occasionally reminding ourselves that Brexit is a disaster and the people leading it have deliberately blindfolded themselves while charging to the cliff's edge.  
Govt's own assessments on why No Deal Brexit is Armageddon. Port of Dover collapses on day 1, within couple of days Cornwall & Scotland run out of food, in 2 wks hospitals run out of medicine. IT IS CRIMINAL THAT THESE REPORTS ARE NOT BEING MADE PUBLIC!    
Appears Geneva airport is further down the Brexit planning road than Downing Street.  
It's at least interesting that when it comes to trade & #Brexit talks the DUP won't countenance any difference whatsoever between the UK & Northern Ireland but when it comes to women's rights to their bodies the DUP think they know best. Religion & nationalism is a volatile mix. 
The Government has denied claims that a no-deal Brexit could leave Britain with severe shortages of food, fuel and medical supplies within a few days of leaving Europe. 
May I suggest that a more assertive approach - like telling them that Brexit is as doomed as a tormented soul in Dante’s Hell, or that you’ll haunt their every sleeping and waking moment if they don’t listen to you - is more effective than slightly sardonic pathos? Just IMHO  
This shld be the True Voice of Labour...not the complicit fudge which'll help the Tories deliver a #Brexit that can only leave us Poorer, Weaker with Fewer Rights & less Control. It's not bloody working out as promised so #Reject #Revoke #Remain & #Reform.#FinalSay #PeoplesVote 
And look, Tory pro-Brexit folks: if #Brexit is being done badly because May and Hammond are Remain people, why not oust them?You can muster the MPs necessary to force a contest. Members voted 3/4 for Brexit, so will pick a Leaver.How about it then? Stop whingeing. Own it. 
'If you're sick of Brexit, you should get shot of Brexit', David Miliband says  
Tim Sebastian tells Daniel Hannan that 'he was a senior member of the Vote Leave campaign.....remember that when the criminal investigation begins. #BeLeave #VeteransForBritain #fiddle 
Maybe traditional factors are reassetting themselves, but the economy was strong and the international environment relatively placid when the generic ballot favored Dems by double digits. It was a values election not long ago. But now it’s binary, not a referendum on Trump. 
If Brexit was a pen we'd take it back to the pen shop but the pen shop would be closed because it was run by con men selling crap pencils and someone would say 'you paid for the pen you've got to stick with it' and we'd be like 'but it's a crap pencil'. And then it would rain. 
A no-deal Brexit could lead to immediate food and medicines shortages according to a new DExEU study. The government must now publish the document for the public to see. Agree? Please RT 
Brian Adcock’s Brexit Doomsday cartoon – political cartoon gallery in Putney  pic.twitter.com/7pBD8stKBq 
I actually believe YES Scotland should canvass on a blank slate. Independence is about having ALL decisions made by the people of Scotland, instead of outcomes like UK governments & a EU referendum determined by our much bigger neighbour. 
It’s not enough for the corrupt elections watchdog @ElectoralCommUK that they were exposed as pro-EU and having no credibility.Now they’ve been humiliated by MPs for anticipating that Brexit would be reversed.Idiots.  
Arlene Foster says any deal that treats Northern Ireland differently to the rest of the UK is her party's "only red line" in Brexit negotiations  
The EU’s Brexit tax power grab.The case for Remain gets weaker by the day as more facts come out about the EU.   
Like all Snake Oil Salesman, Daniel sounds convincing but from start to finish it's all lies....... 
The SNP told the Scottish people that the Independence vote was a once in a generation vote. The remainers told us that the EU referendum was a once in a generation vote. What do they both have in common? They both lost and now want another vote and to keep voting until they.... 
Mrs May's #BREXIT COOK BOOK  a new Diet for a new Britain chicken chlorivan beef d'horme innovative jam and  lashings of Gruel @theresa_may 
He was often described as a leading intellectual of vote leave, i shall leave that there.... 
Germany has the largest trade surplus in the world: $287 billion in 2017, more than 8% of its GDP.US and Britain by contrast have the largest trade deficits.Why do you think US is slapping tariffs on the EU?Why should Britain bear the brunt by staying in EU customs?#Brexit  
Trump’s Right Hand Man in Europe Rick Grenell Wants To:‘Empower’ European Anti-EstablishmentConservativesAwesome pick for Germany Ambassador Start take OUT:Merkel White Flag Mac RunTeresa MAY not BREXITHUNGARY, ITALY lead Populists.  
'If you're sick of Brexit you should get shot of Brexit', David Miliband says  
So why would the PSNI Assistant Chief Constable need to keep on to police stations which are currently closed in border areas as a precaution for Brexit? Government assures everybody that there will be no hard border... PSNI making its own calculations 
*drum roll please*Time for the FFS weekly Brexit Awards!! Huge congrats to this week’s winners @nigelmp, @BorisJohnson, @DavidDavisMP, Lord Lawson & @Jacob_Rees_Mogg All the winners have hugely contributed to the mess that is #Brexit, what would we do without them   
Oops Chloe.  We are still waiting for your comprehensive apology for misleading the nation on the myth that food would be 17% cheaper after Brexit...PORKIE.Yet here you are with more misdirection.WW3?  Cameron never said that 
Police Service of N. Ireland pause sale of 3 police stations (Warrenpoint, Castlederg & Aughnacloy) on Irish border, as Brexit “precautionary step” because it “has not yet received details regarding potential border arrangement” wants to “continue to keep our communities safe”  
If you are sick of Brexit...... the answer isn’t “just get on with it” as it will just get worse.The answer is to ditch the failed project and take a fresh view. 
Dear Twitter friendsAs it is obvious that #Brexit is going to be a total fucking catastrophe, I am considering buying a small Scottish Island and living out the rest of my days there.So 2 questions:1. Would you care to join me?2. Do you have a small Scottish island for sale? 
Britain must toughen up in the face of the EU’s relentless bullying:  #Brexit 
London mayor urges MPs to back peers' changes to Brexit bill  
Venn diagram of people who wang on about a blitz spirit that they never had to endure & people who'll be having a full on meltdown on day one if this shit govt's fuckup brexit means they run out of hovis in tesco. 
Devastating from Germany’s Brexit coordinator, but not surprising. EU could not have been clearer that UK needs to give concrete and credible answers on Irish border. Three weeks to go and our government’s still deciding which colour unicorn will be supervising the customs  
Nicola Jennings on Brexit 'armageddon' – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
About Brexit here's my question: if referendums could never be reversed Brexit itself would be illegit since people voted to join the EU to begin with. So is there a criterium for how long you must wait before voting again? What? Would the wideness of the margin be a factor? 
.@JuliaHB1 here is a summary of the consequences of NoDeal Brexit from someone who voted Leave and knows what he is talking about..Suggest you read it too. Then write 20 lines  on ‘I promise not to talk rubbish about how WTO trading terms is fine’ before ever teeeting again. 
Support the #LeftAgainstBrexit tour. Labour must stop the UK becoming an impoverished, isolated, inward-looking, insecure, divided nation drifting into the past with #Brexit #PeoplesVote on the Deal> … <@guardian @UKLabour 
Leaked plans outline a no-deal "Doomsday Brexit" scenario. @clivebull asks, could this actually happen? 
DUP leader threatens to withdraw support for Theresa May on Brexit customs plans Arlene says NI must be treated the same as the rest of UK - it's her red line - but only when she says so & not on abortion or gay marriage. 
A 7-year-old could see these are false choices. We can have both and we do have both...at least we have until Brexit screws everything up.  
BREXIT BLOCK: Army of Remainers will go DOOR-TO-DOOR in bid to overturn EU exit If they come to my door, they’ll have it promptly slammed in their face.  
Now it's clear Brexit is impossible to deliver in any form that'll be acceptable to anyone, might I humbly suggest the Brexiters call it off? They can then go back to the drawing board for 10 or so years then try again. But this time however COME UP WITH A WORKING FUCKING PLAN! 
The dire warning, labelled the Doomsday Brexit scenario, was drawn up by officials in David Davis’s Department for Exiting the EU. 
It’s high time the Welsh governing class got behind Wales’ Brexit: Wales voted 53% to Leave on a 72% turnout. More voters in Wales backed Brexit than voted ‘Yes’ in the devolution referenda of 1997 and 2011, says @MattSmithWales 
Strangely, he's well connected, here he is with an interesting character at the Vote Leave HQ on referendum night..... pic.twitter.com/Y5auYw8ipe 
Police Service of Northern Ireland confirms reports it has "paused the disposal of three stations in border areas" (Warrenpoint, Castlederg and Aughnacloy) until it knows what the arrangements will be after Brexit. 
Release the Catalans from Spanish prisons. Let the exiles come home. Mediated dialogue to deescalate the Catalan-Spanish conflict. A binding referendum for Catalan independence.#SundayMorning 
Nigel Farage makes positive statements about brexit, no one bats an eyelid and assumes that he's talking rubbish.Nigel Farage makes a negative comment, the whole nation's having a breakdown, let's back out immidiately. What he say's is gospel truth .Confirmation bias. 
Stand up to Germany! MP @DKShrewsbury says stop Merkel or face a ‘UNITED STATES OF EUROPE’ #brexit #betteroffout 
Oh, Chloe?!You don’t remember this?Or the fact that it took Theresa May NINE MONTHS to write a letter of INTENT to leave the EU?By which time it was clear that the Brexit can was going to be kicked a LONG way down the road.2 years and still no plan Some Brexit!  
Normally, a president’s base slumbers in midterm elections.From a strategic standpoint, Bannon is making a play, from his European outpost, to thwart that trend by depicting this November as a referendum on Trump and impeachment. 
Every #Brexit scenario is a bad one....only the Brexit Taliban whose ideology trumps reason are still mouthing their delusions on twitter. On June the 23rd we need to show the Brexiters that we are the majority and we are taking back control to save our country. #FinalSay 
We now go live to Brexit  
Brexit is an attack on the very fabric of our country.If we want future generations to benefit from a liberal democracy, then we cannot stop.We cannot allow our country to fall to the exremists.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
If you spend forty years inside a treaty system governing everything from agriculture, fishing, aerospace, manufacturing and customs then yes, you need alternative arrangements if you leave that system. Why is that so hard to grasp?#Brexit 
Leave means Leave!Sign and RT petition here#Brexit must mean #Brexit #Brexit #bbcqt #marr @LowTaxChloe #FBPE 
So far today I've done the ironing, sorted six hanging baskets, planted a shed-load of pelargoniums and eaten my own weight in chocolate fudge-brownie ice cream. Post-referendum life is good. 
We have 299 days left till Brexit day. A day to celebrate.But Theresa May wants to add a further 1096 days for transition.Not what we voted for.If this is allowed to go ahead it will be a total sellout.Its still People versus Parliament.The People won before & can win again 
We've mistaken Brexit for the cause. Really, it's just the most visible symptom of a totalitarian coup at the heart of British democracy.  
Red Lines NOT for Crossing!'Arlene Foster:Our only red line is we're not treated any different from rest of UK, are no trade barriers between NI & our biggest market which is Great Britain.... or we simply will not be able to support them.'#Brexit #EU 
David Davis's Brexit dept says the cheapest possible Brexit deal will cost £615m per week.That's £88 per household per month. A 13% tax increase if you're on average income.The Leave Department says this.It's not Project Fear. It's Project Hide It From Our Supporters.  
Dumfries voted no in the 2014 referendum but that didn't stop the town coming together to show support for indy 
I voted no but would have no hesitation on voting yes now. Tories Brexit disaster will drive Indyref2 and has sickened many no voters 
Northern Ireland must have same status as UK after Brexit, says DUP leader Arlene Foster  
German #Brexit coordinator does not expect very much from June #EUCO.  Just  increases the chances of crash as there are too many difficult issues on which no progress has been made. 
Doesn’t matter how many times you say it mate. Doesn’t make it true. Didn’t you read your free book by @IanDunt Brexit What The Hell Happens Now?Waging a propaganda war against the people & lying to them isn’t democracy it’s misconduct in public office. #brexitdoomsday 
“Plans for Doomsday no-deal Brexit” in Sunday Times today... and why ditching Brexit is only route out of the mess.  
Post Brexit we can deport ‘travellers’ who attack our youngster back to Ireland. @leovaradker they’re yours, we don’t want them. 
The future the Tories have planned for our children, despite Scots sensibly voting against BrexitThe UK isn't a Union, it's a massive sink hole dragging Scotland in  
Wells Fargo eyes both Paris and Dublin as post-Brexit hubs  
Listen to Chris. We’re approaching either the end of brexit or brexit forever, your choice. I’m writing this week’s @ScotNational column on things we can do to stop it before it is too late. 
On that ‘Brexit Doomsday’ prediction, the point is *not* that the UK can’t survive outside the EU. Of course it can. The point is that the process to reach a good position outside the EU is complex and fraught with risk - and our failure to understand this is idiotic. 1/3 
Leave & Gove backer & hedgefund manager Crispin Odey wants someone to lead the #Tory Party who would lead #Brexit as Elizabeth I would have done. Elizabeth I! #Brexit is led by fantasists whose view of the future is that it should be more like the distant past. 
Shouldn’t be surprising in a nation of mega farms but the ignorance in so much Uk Brexit discourse of how agricultural production works is so striking. Idea that can simply ‘increase supply’ overnight by 30% from a standing start is ludicrous  
Arlene Foster threatens to withdraw support for Tories if NI Brexit policy IS NOT the same as the rest of the UK.Arlene Foster threatens to withdraw support for Tories if NI Abortion policy IS the same as the rest of the UK.Coalition of Creationist Chaos. 
Excellent article in Sunday Telegraph by Edward Malnick on Priti Patel MP and her disappointment that the Tories are no longer the party of meritocracy & how Brexit has totally consumed & sucked the intellectual blood from the Government - I concur 100% 
Steve Bannon, frightening racist traitor to American values, tells Fareed Akaria that November is a referendum on Trump. A compelling reason to vote and throw out the Trump apologists and protectors in the majority 
.@JeremyCorbyn went to Northern Ireland with a warning from his own sister party that Labour’s approach to Brexit was only going to lead to a disastrous hard border. He disregarded his spokesperson and talked up his desire for a united Ireland. How deeply irresponsible 
Her Majesties Government produces a handy guide to the opportunities of leaving the EU called #BREXIT AND SURVIVE  
Wells Fargo eyes both Paris and Dublin as post-Brexit hubs  
Again Pete, you are an ardent Brexiteer who can point out the folly of Brexit better than any Remainer!Surely Brexit is just not worth it. 
Former Cabinet Minister Priti Patel accused the Prime Minister and Chancellor Philip Hammond of “negativity”, adding that the Government needed to articulate a “better vision for the future” after Brexit  
After Brexit it maybe legal to hang then   
The easiest way to tell Brexit is going to end in widespread disorder, one way or another, is to watch how the government treats the police. Right now, after years of stick, the carrot is out. Which is how you know the batons are going to be called upon. Not long to wait, folks. 
1. Could food, medicines and petrol run out in the event of a no deal scenario? The short answer is yes, absolutely. It only takes a small disruption to sophisticated supply chains for things to grind to a halt. (#Brexit thread). 
BREXIT: HOW THINGS STAND (THREAD) 1/ Don’t get excited/alarmed by stories of no petrol/food next March. No British govt, incl Mrs May’s or even Mr Gove’s, would allow this to happen; they would reach emergency agreement with EU to roll over status quo for as long as nec ... 
OK, you lot spreading stories of doom about Brexit, there's some good news, too:When the petrol runs out, at least the roads will be lovely and quiet to cycle on! 
Brexit will power Britain's prosperity and it's already working with 600,000 new jobs - @LiamFox  
Brexit: Leaked Whitehall advice warns of food, fuel and medication shortages.Fears growing of “Doomsday Brexit” from Government’s own planning.So give the people a say, with the option to stay.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Twitter is so peaceful since the referendum finished 
Farage will leave Britain if #Brexit is a disaster. Like any cheap con-man Farage will cut and run if he's found out, and leave everyone else struggling with the mess he's created.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
#brexit David Miliband has pledged to campaign vigorously, against Brexit. Anyone listening to this halfwit. From the man ran away to . Earns £425,000 a year running a charity. Couldn’t beat his pathetic brother to become Labour leader. We voted we’re leaving OK.   
When in years to come the Brexit inquiry opens, all the MPs who voted to trigger Art 50 without asking a question about preparations will have some explaining to do.  
TOTAL CHAOS: 'Dover will collapse on day one, medicines will run out within two weeks' /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
No, Brexit a hard right Tory project, initiated/advanced by Tory govts. Labour only a fraction of culpability (see chapter ‘How Mr Farage became leader of the Conservative party’ in my anti-Brexit book with Will Hutton). Jeremy even opposed it in Cameron’s disastrous referendum  
A unanimous result! 100% who voted on our Brexitometer in Cardiff city centre thought Brexit is going very badly. Plenty of support for a rethink and a #peoplesvote cc @SDoughtyMP @JoStevensLabour @KevinBrennanMP @AnnaMcMorrin @WalesForEurope 
EU MUST PAY: How nations are counting cost of Brexit as UK departure forces HUGE changes  
Asking Remainers to "get behind" Brexit is as pointless as asking them to "get behind" shooting their family's legs off, because that's what it feels like to us. Get it? 
People who are describing the forthcoming Brexit disaster as exaggeration and  cite the Y2K bug as an example clearly know nothing about the thousands  of hours IT professionals spent behind the scenes fixing it. 
"It wisnae me! Westminster austerity, immigration curbs, Brexit – it’s all other folk’s fault! If that is the case, why has the rest of the UK not suffered as much? Why is Scotland’s growth rate set to be little more than half that of the UK overall?"   
Brexit to destroy Scottish Shipbuilding too. So that's farming, fishing, the financial sector, airlines, further education, research, the NHS and now shipbuilding.Maybe we'll be quicker making a list of things that WON'T be destroyed by Brexit?  
Sun Tells May: Stand Up to ‘Plot to Destroy Brexit’, Walk Away With No Deal – Or Stand Aside for PM Who Will  
Have we ever had a referendum on the terms of Brexit?Have the British People ever been presented with an EU departure treaty and been allowed to decide whether it's good enough, for themselves? No?Then this is not a second referendum.#PeoplesVote. 
Important thread on Doomsday Brexit by @faisalislam.Ministers have imposed gagging clauses on some businesses.They’re banned from talking about preparations for the disastrous impact of Brexit.Nobody voted for this shambles. #StopBrexit. 
They are aware that they have lost the argument in  favour of BREXIT, and the tide has turned against this project in the country. They need to face the reality, which is that BREXIT is done, screwed, toast. Their inept handling of BREXIT has ensured this. #STOPBREXIT. 
DUP leader threatens to withdraw support for Theresa May on Brexit customs plans  
Brexit doesn't work as promised. A #PeoplesVote is needed to decide if we want to carry on with it or if we want to send it back. 
The dividend we will reap from not paying into the EU budget would provide a useful stimulus to economic growth, one of the many benefits of #Brexit. We must not be bullied, and must leave the EU as fast as possible, with no deal if that is necessary.  
Theresa May needs to get out of the Brexit-fudging echo chamber of her status quo colleagues, and show real leadership to deliver the #Brexit people so clearly voted for.  
And be these juggling fiends no more believ'd,That palter with us in a double sense,That keep the word of promise to our ear,And break it to our hope.- Macbeth, Act 5 Scene 8#ShakespeareSunday #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
If Brexit is so bloody great, then why are the Brexiteers afraid of a #PeoplesVote? Could it be because they would have a pretty dire manifesto & they know they couldn't fool the people twice?If they are so confident, then they'd accept the challenge. @jeremycorbyn @The_TUC 
There is no way of arguing that Britain should keep the Elgin Marbles that is actually good. It is amusing to see all the innovative ways people are making that case, which bodes well for Britain's post brexit future as a jam-based economy, but nah. 
Brexit, 2016-2018  
Please help this letter to go viral. IDS must be held to account for these remarks. @Harryslaststand @albawhitewolf @mikegalsworthy @Femi_Sorry @acgrayling @mrjamesob @JamesMelville @nickreeves9876 @spaceangel1964 @eyejosh @brexit_sham @dontbrexitfixit 
The socio-economic prospects of those who entered the labour force in the late 2000s were completely unraveled by the financial crisis. Many have not fully recovered. The collective result of the Trump/Brexit era will be worse — by a factor of ten. 
Germany’s Brexit coordinator speaks:  
I keep hearing that the problem with BREXIT is all these remainers running it down, but surely if it was such a good idea, David Davis would throw back glowing reports of our prospects and be readily showing evidence of what a good state we'll be in? 
If Brexit was a team.  
Merkel’s Brexit tsar on June summit: “not many are expecting very much now”... “odds still unclear” whether whole deal can then be pushed through in October  
Army of remainers, backed by George Soros, will go door-to-door in bid to overturn Brexit  
Things have changed. Brexit is shaping up to mean less money for the NHS, more insecure borders, the UK as a rule taker on the periphery of Europe, with collapsed trade and lower living standards.We need a #PeoplesVote on the terms of the deal, not on false promises, to decide. 
And if you’re thinking “what’s the worst that could happen if the US pulls out of NAFTA and/or continues this trade war w EU/CAN/MEX?” consider potential scenarios UK govt is preparing for in case of “no deal” Brexit.  
What to expect from June #EUCO regarding #brexit ? My personal impression: Not many are expecting very much now. If this is so, October would then have to solve ALL problems (withdrawal, NI, governance, future …) in one go. Odds still unclear. 
“If you’re sick of Brexit, ditch Brexit.”Good to see @DMiliband talking real sense on why we need to #StopBrexit and #Remain in the EU. 
"Laziness is at the heart of Brexit. Lazy ignorance on the part of conceited MPs who do not know the first thing about the EU"  
Supporting Labour at present is effectively accepting Corbyn’s incompetent leadership, McDonnell, Momentum, anti-Semitism, Marxism, Bullying, Intimidation, Brexit and so on. No thanks. 
The government has no intention of a "no deal" Brexit (aka actually leaving the EU). They are simply ramping up the propaganda to scare people into accepting whatever deal they negotiate, however bad it is. No deal is and always has been the best deal. 
If we have a referendum on the final deal, voters should have to pass a multiple choice theory test before being allowed to vote, just so we know they know what they’re voting for, e.g.What is Erasmus?A) A pop music duoB) A study programmeC) A thing for rubbing out pencil  
Replace May with Gove to sort out Brexit, Tory donor urgesLIKE REPLACING COLD DOGSHIT WITH HOT DOGSHIT   
Brexit might be looking bad right now but don't despair - arch-Brexiteer Digby Jones possesses a vague hope that an entirely unspecified benefit may pop up after everyone who actually voted for it has been dead for years.  
1) The #Brexit Telly Analogya Leaver described Brexit as a Sky subscription-we can opt in or out of packages (sky sports/free movement of people)But Brexit isn't like Sky, it's like Virgin Cable, you are in or out of TV/phone/ADSLPull up a chair... 
Still, off record, our #brexitforensics reports established that, quietly, *nuclear companies activated plans to reposition nuclear materials as contingency against No Deal*pharma cos stockpiling drugs on diff sides of post Brexit borders* auto companies moving supply chains 
Government under pressure to publish warnings of 'Doomsday Brexit'  
... so you may ask, why you havent heard more about this if it was such a serious risk of major disruption... well this is where the story about the Brexit business gagging clauses come in.. they are very real, I have one in my possession:  
That referendum was introduced by Micheál McDowell as Min for Justice. It was racist in intent, and anti-woman in that it used maternity hospital overcrowding as a pretext for its "need". I think it's necessary to examine that referendum very closely with a view to repealing it. 
Remember: if we get the People to stop Brexit, then we have to be better than the ****s who made Brexit happen then ran away from responsibility.It's on us to make sure the country works for decent Brexit voters as well as everyone else. Status quo is not an option.  
Spot on.Politicians seem to find it particularly difficult to talk about trade-offs. So it's a Brexit "that works for all", "that's good for everyone", "for jobs".Unless that happens the discussion will never get real.  
If Article 50 wasn't the correct way and 'bad' then the only alternative was to repeal the 1972 european communities act ?? Inline with the referendum ballot she's pretending to adhere to, she makes no sense as per usual.  
BREXIT WARNING! Little green men from Mars will move into Westminster the day after we leave, Owen Jones will join the Conservatives and Elvis Presley will return from the dead as the UK's water and air supply is cut off by the EU.  
Lots of Leavers saying the “doomsday Brexit” story must be wrong because all non-EU countries are fine.Most of those countries are in regional trade blocks, all have international agreements in place, and none of them are cancelling all these agreements with no back-up plan. 
on this No Deal “doomsday scenario”..In March I did 2 #brexitforensics stories - one re unusual gagging clauses injected into consultations with business, & 2. “throw open the borders” plan for No Deal Brexit, referred to in memo leaked to S. Times today 
Quote of the day. Beautiful summary of the mess of Brexit. It’s a loss of sovereignty over our business rules. This in an article by Dominic Lawson, no less.  
Brexit 2016: “We can strike free trade deals! Bold and entrepreneurial Britain!”Brexit 2018: “ We’ll eat wild rabbits”  
Grow your own food in case of a no deal Brexit scenario, stop being lazy  
Tommy Robinson goes to prison for attempting to warn us of the dangers of Islam but Soros and his grovelling remoan traitors are allowed to do anything to prejudice the security and future of this country. We demand the result of the referendum be respected or face a civil war. 
UPDATE II Niall was asked about his tweet about the referendum tweet he did on Ireland and he said He knows there are many young girls who look upto him AND HE WANTED TO MAKE SURE THEY KNOW HE'S BY THEIR SIDE ! 
Because Brexit was so much fun first time around... @henningwehn @HaveIgotnews 
Dutch news reporting on possible food shortages in Britain after a 'no deal Brexit'. Our beloved neighbors to the west need to get their act together. This real-life Monty Python episode needs to stop. #Brexit  
Yeah, they tried the whole #ProjectFear thing during the referendum and British people saw through it. Still waiting for WW3 and those 500,000 job losses.  
To the Brexiters whining and whinging about the EU treating the UK badly, I would say - you wanted #Brexit, we warned you that the EU held all the best bargaining chips and would look after its own. So suck it up and get over it! #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Scotland did not vote for "doomsday" #Brexit We need out ASAP!  
We would like to reassure our followers that we are working hard to ensure the continued supply of tripe in the event of Doomsday Brexit. #Relax 
Getting a good deal in a negotiation depends on how credible your threat to walk is. The credibility of your threat to walk depends on how much better your status quo is to the deal on offer. UK status quo is "Doomsday Brexit" Good luck. 
to be anti BREXIT is not to be pro EU, it is to be anti duplicitous charlatans leading us out with no preparation, no impact reports and no ability to in any way express what is going to happen in anything other than vague shrugs and supercilious grins. 
Starting to wonder whether this Brexit wheeze is such a good idea tbh  
Mad Max: Furry RoadGovernment cat waking up from a two-week post brexit nap to discover Whitehall has been turned into a dystopian landscape in this Doomsday Brexit scenario#Brexit #DoomsdayBrexit 
Lloyd's of London relocates staff from the City to Brussels by #Brexit day.Once the dam starts leaking it won't be long before a trickle becomes a torrent. #Brextemists this is your doing. You are damaging the UK. 
Some men buy a sports car when they're facing a midlife crisis. Others get a tattoo. This clown decided to destroy his country.#Brexit  
Leaked Whitehall memo suggests cheese rolling will stop after Brexit. Due to shortage of cheese  
I've changed my mind on Brexit. I used to believe I'd accept the result come what may. I still accept the result, but I want those who seek to overturn it removed from this country, to one where they remain part of their beloved EU and who tolerate their anti-democratic stance. 
Brexit will power Britain and it's already working with 600,000 new jobs  
Not too late for us to bale out though....let’s rescue Scotland and make our country an economic oasis in the UK Brexit desert (that we didn’t vote for anyway)  
In response to the ‘Doomsday Brexit’ story many Brexiters talking up WTO option as if it’s all fine so here is a fact NOT ONE COUNTRY IN THE WORLD TRADES ON WTO RULES ONLY.even Mauritania has an EU fishing agreement. 
Surprise surprise Nick Gibb doesn't recognise the doomsday scenario of a no deal on #Brexit as reported in today's Sunday Times. He quickly gets off the topic & returns to the land of unicorns.#StopBrexit #FBPE #marr #Ridge 
Over 250k people have seen Nigel Farage try to rewrite history on Brexit. Will you Retweet this so even more know that the Brexit that Nigel promised isn't being delivered?  
Why is @LordCFalconer leading @LBC news with his defence of Brexit come what may? Get the doctor on there FAST!!! 
Replace Theresa May with Michael Gove to sort out Brexit, Tory donor urges MY GOODNESS ! - THAT REALLY WOULD BE *BETWEEN THE DEVIL & THE DUP " 
Out of London people don't want another referendum/say on final deal .@SophyRidgeSky ? Lancaster thought differently yesterday. Consistent with surveys being done around the country #PeoplesVote 
The British are no longer happy to be a colony of Brussels:  #Brexit 
Charlie Falconer saying on @LBC that in his view democracy ended on 23 June 2016. ‘I’m in favour of respecting democracy,’ his mantra on all Brexit questions. But a people’s vote on the Brexit deal is ... respecting democracy 
"Why should only 650 people, just because they happen to be in Westminster, decide what Brexit will look like?"WATCH: @stellacreasy on #Marr today on why she's joined 18 MPs in London in backing a #PeoplesVote this weekend. Please RT: 
Quick poll on how you see yourself.With Brexit taking forever and the same Arguments repeated on both sides of the debate.How do you see yourselfTweet and tweet and bloody tweet for a goodSampleThis is from a Brexit context 
Stop being so negative with this talk of "Doomsday Brexit"!Let's be positive about Brexit! Here's the best possible Brexit scenario. 
Our medicines/chemicals are approved via the European Medicines/Chemicals Agencies1.3 Millions of our citizens have their right of residence via EU citizenshipOur radioactive treatments are supplied via Euratom.1/3 of our food is from the EU"Doomsday Brexit" 
Am a female politician who has been on telly this morning talking about brexit being a nightmare and abortion being something women have a right to choose. See you all in three days when I get my timeline back… 
Soros and his cronies are now intending to visit every house in the summer and hopefully overturn the brexit vote. What an insult to our people this bowel movement is. This conduct should be declared illegal. We voted to leave and that's that. Defend the decision. 
Everything about the Brexit case is wrong - from trade to culture. Britain is a profoundly European country - we’ve been intertwined for centuries. Here’s an extract from Saving Britain out this week.      An island nation, but never alone | Will Hutton  
Worse, every man , woman & child will die of the plague within three months of Brexit.We never believed this bullshit before what makes 'em think we will believe it now?Ok fair play, Londoners will, but they believe anything.  
People calling the ‘Doomsday Brexit’ remoaner rubbish will get the shock of their lives when Brexit happens. If I didn’t have to live in the smoking remains I’d be laughing my head off and tweeting I told you so every ten minutes.. 
Oh and as well as three anti Brexit stories in  the first 17 pages the Mail on Sunday’s comment piece is  “ Keep calm and Ignore  those Brexit zealots”.Not that they sound like Remain zealots obviously! 
Live to No Deal Brexit...  
As "Doomsday Brexit" moves from Project Fear to Project Reality, we must demand that our politicians allow the will of the people to be heard. Pls RT & tag your MP.#BrexitDoomsday #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote @LBC @campbellclaret @OFOCBrexit @W_A_T_O_N @StopBrexitMarch #Marr  
Mail on Sunday is a disgrace Three rabid anti Brexit stories in the first 17 pages . 
But...but .... we will have BLUE PASSPORTS!!!! "Doomsday Brexit"  
Summary:1. The #RepealTheEighth referendum is nothing like the Brexit referendum.2. After all, Our Referendum delivered the correct result, i.e. the result that I personally wanted.3. Whereas the Brexit referendum didn't.4. Talk about undemocratic!5. That's all, folks!  
You are a liar @sajidjavid. You know full well the catastrophe "No Deal #Brexit" brings.. Your shameless denials are a absolute disgrace.  
The lead from today's Sunday Times is worth a read for anyone looking for reasons to be optimistic re Brexit. (Trigger warning: there aren't any)  
RISIBLE: David Miliband, who fled the country after being mugged off by his brother to take a highly paid job in the charity sector, calls for people to ditch Brexit.How about we ditch David instead? 
WATCH | Stella Creasy agrees "nobody disputes the referendum", but voted against Article 50 on the grounds it was "a bad way of doing this". It's one thing being a Remainer in 2018, quite another to be so contemptuous of the electorate, you don't even bother to make sense. #Marr pic.twitter.com/RPeDwxUDHg 
Sajid Javid: the Cabinet is having 'serious and robust debate' on #Brexit.Translation: 'We're fighting like ferrets in a sack and don't have a Scooby-Doo how this omnishambles is going to end.' #marr 
Would you support a people’s vote on Brexit? Alastair Campbell is live. #CampbellOnLBC 
David Miliband has pledged to campaign vigorously against Brexit if Theresa May is forced to hold a referendum on the terms for leaving the European Union  
The debate about Brexit is a huge distraction but Brexit opens the door to a neoliberal economic model which will make debate about issues like NHS funding superfluous. The NHS will be privatised, public spending on welfare cut, taxes for rich reduced. So Brexit must be stopped  
The very BEST deal for #Brexit is no deal. We should offer zero tariffs to the EU, a soft border with Ireland if reciprocated, and that is IT! No £39bn bribe to the corrupt EU, and no residing in ANY of its institutions 
To debate all these issues - terrorism, immigration - with the Home Sec without reference to Brexit is a failure of the @Bbc culture on the most important issue facing the UK. Mindblowing that it took @sajidjavid briefly to mention it ‘when we leave the EU.’ And that’s it?????? 
Stella Creasy - No one can look at #brexit right now & say it's going well.. no one talked about a £40bn divorce bill.. no one talked about leaving the SM the way the Gov wants 2.. the public should have a say now they know what leaving actually entails. #PeoplesVote#FBPE #marr pic.twitter.com/znHUUly4Jm 
* Brexit will be a huge success!* It will be probably be a success!* We never said ‘success’.* At least we’re taking back control.* Look, most people will survive.* Don’t forget, there’s protein in the rat’s eyeballs too. 
Two years, two years, and nobody can agree what this #redwhiteandblue Brexit should look like. Meanwhile, IDS says all we need is imagination & courage. Say stop to this parboiled Idea. It's self-sabotage on the grandest scale. Come on @UKLabour. It's time to #SayStop. 
Well done John, I voted No in indref, as I wanted to stay in EU and that was guaranteed via a NO vote.How foolish I was.I am now a YES voter and embarrassed that I didn't have the faith in Scotland to vote YES the 1st time.Opinions have changed since brexit. Vote YES! 
Britain is less prepared for Brexit than all the countries nearest to it. I guess their governments are no match for our religion  
BREXIT BLOCK: Army of TREACHEROUS Remainers will go DOOR-TO-DOOR in bid to overturn EU exit  
.@sajidjavid saying nothing that hasn’t been said by his predecessors. If he is not challenged on impact of Brexit on fight v terror TV may have things thrown at it. #marr 
Andrew Lloyd Webber refers casually to 'the will of the people' as if it is a fact that #Brexit is desired.It might possibly have been on 23/6/16.But it is highly questionable that Brexit is the will of the people now.So give the people a #PeoplesVote.#marr 
“... and the fire from the altar was hurled on the Earth, and there came peals of thunder and lightning and earthquakes. Then a trumpet in the West announceth a border who spaketh for the first time and said: I told you this Brexit thing was a disaster but would you listen?”  
It’s high time the Welsh governing class got behind Wales’ Brexit: Wales voted 53% to Leave on a 72% turnout. More voters in Wales backed Brexit than voted ‘Yes’ in the devolution referenda of 1997 and 2011, writes @MattSmithWales 
Those Brexit impact scenarios in full.  
Civil servant leaks 'doomsday Brexit scenario' dubbed Project Fear 2 | Replace May with Gove to sort out Brexit, Tory donor urges | Election watchdog rebuked for £829,000 budget for European elections | Chancellor says Brexit could bring huge opportunities  
This is precisely why I have fought so hard for so long to see the Brexit impact studies. They are stiil secret and I continue with various FoI requestsSeveral thousand impartial heads really are better than those of a dozen extreme Brexiteers  
I'm off to get papers and coffee in my Stop Brexit t-shirt. If you want to heckle me, feel free. Good luck with that...boy are you going to get it! 
#brexit bimbo on #Marr :Remember the Millennium bug scare?Actually those of us in IT do remember very well the meticulous planning, checks and double checks to ensure that Fear would not become realityNow where is the meticulous planning for #brexit ?  
Here's how #Brexit will raise the cost of the full English #breakfast : 
My cartoon in @thesundaytimes this morning. #TradeWar #Trump #Brexit 
GET RID: Theresa May should be replaced by Michael Gove for the sake of Brexit, says a Tory donor.Crispin Odey: "I don’t think May can carry Brexit through any more...She should have joined the civil service, rather than becoming a politician." 
Well done @RupaHuq. The more MPs that show the courage and good judgement to demand a right to reconsider #Brexit, the more likely #Parliament is to do its job and act for the good of the country. @Conservatives @UKLabour @LibDems 
What can you do? At the very least, write to your MP and add your voice to those trying to stop Brexit. Join the march on 23 June. Join a grass roots movement eg @BestForBritain. 
The biggest problem we have is not the die-hard supporters of Brexit; our biggest problem is the overwhelming majority of people who just don’t care, or don’t believe they can make a difference. Apathy and disengagement will ruin us.  
Proceeding with Brexit is like having an addiction to gambling. Instead of counting your losses & admitting you made a mistake, you keep going back to try to make it better. Britain needs help. 
Sorry, Kate Hoey. As of yet, Leavers can provide no answer to the NI border question, and no Brexit scenario which does not seriously damage the UK economy. To continue on a course which will demonstrably harm the UK is not patriotism. The only traitor here is you.#FBPE 
I'm not a "Corbynista", I just voted for a bloke who has interest in social justice in this "fuck you, I'm alright" society we live in.I'm anti #Brexit- but the EU is not a panacea for all ills either. Above all-The #Tories are the real enemyThe #Tories are the real enemy 
Whitehall leaks on Brexit domesday tell us more about Whitehall mindset than Brexit. If you are a civil servant who presumes human social and economic affairs need to be organised by bureaucratic fiat, you cannot conceive how things might work without such fiat 
I'm one of the 45% who voted YES and since the referendum was won by lying to the voters, cheating on an industrial scale, bullying our old & vulnerable and interference by outside agencies I'm sure you'll pardon me if I say hell will freeze over before I accept the result. 
The whole #Brexit position is descending into farce. This nonsense about preparing for 'No Deal' must stop immediately. The explosive leaks prove that extreme Brexiters will countenance any disaster as long as we Leave. That is NOT what Brits voted for!  
US REMOANERS ARE NOT CHASING A SOFT BREXIT !!...We are determined to stop your disastrous Brexit COMPLETELY you pompous misguided idiot !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
It's telling that everyone is tweeting that Doomsday story without thinking hold on a minute, if that is a known risk won't the UK government be thinking of how to mitigate it? Or just not do brexit. Instead everyone just accepts they're hapless. 
#Brexit: UK 'has two weeks' to submit border plans  
Our survey. Almost two-thirds of Tory members don't have confidence in  the Government’s handling of Brexit.  
"It wisnae me! Westminster austerity, immigration curbs, Brexit – it’s all other folk’s fault! If that is the case, why has the rest of the UK not suffered as much? Why is Scotland’s growth rate set to be little more than half that of the UK overall?"   
The economy? From the potential fallout of Brexit making it harder for required workers to get to Scotland?Oh dear I'm beginning to think Paul doesn't know how countries work  
The @BBCNews breathlessly reporting @sajidjavid hype this morning. Wonder if @AndrewMarr9 will press him on just how Brexit helps our security co-operation v terrorism 
BREXITPriti Patel has claimed that the Conservatives are abandoning their role as the party of meritocracy & Tory Remainers have “sucked the intellectual lifeblood” out of the party. Ms Patel said they should be ashamed of their “relentless negativity” about Brexit. pic.twitter.com/7X8xEhlSxJ 
BREXITIn 2006, 54% of our exports went to the EU. That has now fallen to 44%, as markets elsewhere expand faster. One of the main benefits of being outside the EU Customs Union, will be having an independent trade policy for the first time in more than 40 years.  
There's a brilliant satirical sketch along these lines, just waiting to be written.Involving your metropolitan elite, Brexit voters and economic migrants.But it'd never get broadcast.So what's the bleedin' point?#IKnowMyPlace 
Nah... I'm fine over here thanks. We have our issues (Brexit, the right wing) but at least I don't worry my child is going to get shot up at school 
"One official said the scenarios are... locked in a safe."This is the Brexit a number of Tory MPs are demanding. Why should we, the people, be kept like children from the truth?  
Gammonati Brexit Tory Pimms Quaffing Tupperware Teereza Mugabe’s Doomsdayers as  Bongos Bingo crowd erupts into oh!!! Jeremy Corbyn chant in Liverpool  
Let's read that again.Food, petrol and medicines would run out.Once more: food, petrol and medicines would run out.This is not an anti-Brexit campaign. This is the government's own report.Food. Petrol. Medicines.Bright side: we'll still have water and oxygen.  
Is it time for me to take over the Brexit negotiations? #sorted 
Extraordinary story leaked to @ShippersUnbound showing plans for No Deal Brexit suggest the UK would be hit by food, medicine & fuel shortages  
Cancel Brexit  
Donald Trump’s trade war leaves the secretary of state for international trade and his post-Brexit trade policy in a sorry state by Riddell in The Guardian.What post-Brexit trade policy?#StopBrexit 
DID YOU KNOW?: Before joining the European Union, Britain had NO food, NO petroleum, and NO medicine!Why didn’t we think of this before voting for Brexit!?   
Britain would be hit with shortages of medicine, fuel and food within a fortnight if the UK tries to leave the European Union without a deal, according to a Doomsday Brexit scenario drawn up by senior civil servants for David Davis  
"The public can't understand what's going on with Brexit as nothing of what they're hearing about now had anything to do with the referendum campaign."  
Consistently the best sourced political coverage in the country. His editor/proprietor’s decision to give the paper’s backing to Brexit notwithstanding.  
Tupperware Teereza Mugabe’s Doomsday No Deal Brexit Tory Pimms Quaffing NHS Smashing Summer Garden Partying Gang Banging Homelessness Epidemicking Foodbank Licking Oity Toity Gammonati the Port of Dover would collapse?!? No! No! Get Corbyn Truth and Social justice for all!!!  
If Brexit was a construction contract the entire design team would have been sacked by now & litigation would be under way for damages. 
All you need to know about Crispin Odey :-a] Odey’s fund made £220 million out of the Brexit vote and, b] Odey doesn't like the new EU rules to tighten regulations on hedge funds.Hey Brexiters, still believe these parasites have your best interests at heart?  
Brexit madness.If Brexit was a bus, then with this slow motion ‘car crash’ clearly ahead, the driver would be taking the necessary action to avoid a collision.That action needs to be taken now.Stop the bus, stop Brexit, let’s all get off, please.  
So now we know exactly what a no-deal Brexit would mean. Lack of food, medicine and fuel within a fortnight and possible collapse of Port of Dover on day one. Any takers? 
Replace May with Gove. Ah yes...this one...“I think the right response in a democracy to assertions made by experts is to say 'show us the evidence, show us the facts.”[Michael Gove] #Brexit #CambridgeAnalytica #marr  
‘YOU ONLY FUND 3%!’ EU’s Brexit blackmail MOCKED as UK scientist says Britain will THRIVE  
French defence minister Florence Parly stresses that, despite Brexit, France and UK are close allies and will continue to operate closely together in Asia-Pacific, including in response to challenges to maritime freedoms #SLD18 @IISS_org 
David Miliband vows to 'campaign more effectively' if PM holds vote on Brexit terms  
The Sunday Times headlines a Doomsday no deal Brexit scenario. Clearly the Great Scare has some way to run. Indeed, we can expect it to intensify on the near future. 
To Progress, Labour First, or any other moderate ‘faction’ that is anti-Corbyn:If you keep trying to push @jeremycorbyn out, we will push back. We ARE the many. Leave Brexit alone and focus on us; CHANGE! We all need to get behind Jeremy now to begin the real work!#JC4PM 
Given that #projectfear didn’t work during the referendum, it’s hardly likely to work now. Just get us out .. deal or no deal - preferably the latter. 
There was no urban-rural divide in the Irish referendum  
If #Brexit is not abandoned - I will find myself completely unable to understand anything anymore. ONE GOOD REASON! Is not an unfair demand. Jeremy Corbyn MUST declare why he supports #Brexit. ONE GOOD REASON! That's all... 
*Brexit Explained* video via > @Huw_Powell  
If anyone is disgusted by nigel lawson's attitude to plough on with #brexit AND seek EU citizenship in France...... THIS will cheer you up!   
1979: Contraceptives legalized1993: Homosexual acts decriminalized1996: Divorce legalized2015: Same-sex marriage legalized2018: Referendum paves way for legalized abortionIreland's four decades of social change:  
Agree totally. Eddie Mabo was a great man, and Mabo Day should be a public holiday. 25 years ago. Reconciliation Week, Uluru Statement, Referendum, Aboriginal voice in Parliament, a treaty. All good. Patrick Dodson and Mick Dodson leading the way. Phil.  
I think it’s fair to say that even most EU experts know more about the disadvantages of Brexit now than they did in 2016. I certainly do. There were whole areas I hadn’t even thought about. #PeoplesVote #FinalSayForAll 
“The case for a second Brexit referendum.We now know much more about the disadvantages of leaving the EU that we did first time around”:  
Brexit promises in 2016: “No downsides, only considerable upsides”Brexit reality in 2018: “Food, petrol and medicines would run out.”Nobody voted to take these kinds of risks. We need to #StopBrexit and #Remain in the EU. 
Today is the 26th anniversary of the historic Mabo decision. Last year Mabo family members and campaigners of the 1967 referendum gathered to celebrate #NRW2018 #dontkeephistoryamystery. Hear their story:  
Ahhh That makes total sense!!!The government's experts say every possible Brexit hurts the country, so the way to make Brexit work is to find a man who doesn't believe in experts. Problem Solved!!  "Replace May with Gove" 
Yup- the Brexit disaster is just masking a ton of other disasters.First step to fixing this country is to drop the dead weight of Brexit... it’s going nowhere.  
What new hell is this?Replace May with Gove to sort out #Brexit, urges Tory donor Crispin Odey.The same Crispin Odey who made £220m on the night of the referendum by shorting the pound?Yes, that's the one.   
Dear Leave voters,The proposed vote on the final deal is to allow you to ratify Brexit. It isn’t there for me, I have always believed that Brexit is wrong; the vote is to allow you to confirm your view once Brexit has been defined. Those who oppose it are trying to sideline you. 
Paul O’Connell was here today shouting at me “Did you scare Brexit today? Did you put the fear of God into Brexit today?!” and I was saying “I didn’t really have to Paulie, cos Brexit scares the crap out of itself most days”. “Right enough, border” says Paul, “take it handy so” 
I recently went to the Netherlands to stay with my girlfried. I forget my meds and my EU card had expired. I couldn't afford to pay for an inhaler I need. Without NHS & post Brexit, god help us all. 
David Davis:"It's not going to be a Mad Max dystopia."Dominic Cummings:"There are things you can do to mitigate the train wreck."Nigel Farage:"I never promised Brexit would be a huge success."Sunday Times:"Hold my beer."#Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday #FBPE pic.twitter.com/U50n8gEt8c 
At last someone has actually reported what would happen on Day One Of a No Deal. We can’t walk away.We will take what we are given.We’ve been saying this since the referendum.  
Perhaps @DExEUgov could ask @GovNetherlands to do a Brexit Impact Scan for the UK?  
Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it.Brexit is dead. Get over it. 
David Miliband: I would join any campaign against any Brexit deal  
Long assumed this is the point of Brexit. Crash a country, buy up assets cheap.  
Brexit is in its death throws.... The brexitears, just like Chemical Ali in Bagdad, still believing to the last that it will happen and the UK will be 'restored' with no ill consequences... #fbpe 
Parliament is massively culpable over Brexit. Most MPs voted for a referendum without bothering to ask elementary questions like why and how and what will the consequences be.Yet now they say only they can decide the outcome and not a #PeoplesVote . Stupid, arrogant, negligent. 
Tory leadership pantomime in the news again as weak PM clings on to power by playing her cabinet ministers off against each other over Brexit. Tories ruling in the interests of the Conservative Party not in the interests of the country, Michael Gove PM? Really?   
#BrexitDoomsday Project Fear got nowhere close to how bad Brexit is shaping up.Time to behave like a statesman, @jeremycorbyn and #StopBrexit by supporting a #PeoplesVote, that way you can respect the will of the people who will be voting on facts this time. @UKLabour 
Absolutely right. If Brexit has exposed anything, it is a total poverty of talent and integrity in British politics. Leadership, non-existent. Chronic incompetence. Policy-making based on catchphrases rather than evidence and honest debate. Appalling, really.  
A case concerning the UK Government's manipulation of the franchise that excluded thousands from voting at the #EUReferendum is to be heard in the General Court of the European Union on 5 July. If successful it could force the referendum result to be overturned.  
As I’ve been saying, June is the cut off point for much relating to Brexit. Suddenly it’s dawned elsewhere. All major businesses will take action bases on what happens this month. October and March 19 don’t really matter.  
If I were a prominent political Remainer or an EU politico, I'd see Brexit as a golden opportunity to restore citizens' confidence in institutions. Imagine if, instead of so many of them giving into their rage at being defied, they'd taken the high ground. 
PollWho can best lead, represent, inspire, unite & grow the Brexit/freedom movement to Brexit & beyond?Please retweet for large sample. 
As @CommonsHealth has pointed out, walk-away no deal hard Brexit would have serious consequences. Why risk everyday essential medical supplies not being on the shelves? We still need to see the evidence of actual vs fantasy contingency planning  
Since the last Scottish referendum, we've seen:- English votes for English laws- Trident 'malfunction'- Westminster power grab- EU referendum- Scottish GDP to fall, largely due to planned cuts in immigration- Threat to trades like Scotch whisky and other foods1/2 
That was then, this is now. #ScotlandisNow the awakening has arrived. The lies have been uncovered. #ScotRef 62% said no to Brexit and we meant it.  
There is something sickening about rich Brexiteers who are denying Brits including our youngsters their future EU FOM rights but happy to secure it for themselves or their families. Remember @SteveBakerHW claimed EU citizens rights unaffected by Brexit & protected by Vienna CLT!  
"Replace May with Gove to sort out Brexit", Tory donor urges. Sounds like a choice between Scylla and Charybdis.  
Brexit  
Doomsday: A No Deal Brexit Play in 20 Days  Day 1: Port of Dover collapses Days 2ff: supermarkets in Scotland and Cornwall run out of food Day 14: hospitals run out of medicine Day 20: no more petrol  
EU confirms that the AEO scheme will no longer apply to U.K. based customs agents post-brexit ... You’ll need an EU based agent to import into the EU causing further carnage at Dover.  
Another one spreading misinformation & lies. .@UKLabour’s position over #Brexit has NOT been to “have our cake and eat it” & they have made it quite clear what they expect.Brexit belongs entirely to the @CONservatives; from the beginning to the end. 
Tomorrow’s Sunday Times leads with secret UK Govt report that plans for a ‘doomsday scenario’ if there is a No Deal outcome to the Brexit talks.The port of Dover would collapse on day one. Food and medicine runs out in weeks.And nutcases like Ian Duncan Smith say it’ll be fine!  
From tomorrow’s @thesundaytimes - secret government analysis of the #Brexit effect: “The port of Dover will collapse on day one. The supermarkets in Cornwall & Scotland will run out of food within a couple of days... at the end of week two we would be running out of petrol.”  
This is where these UK Brexit fanatics are taking us, Scotland. If you haven’t started properly considering the constitutional options open to us, now is the time to be thinking them over.  
Any time @UKLabour want to step in & stop this Brexit wrecking ball, that’d be grand. Change policy, Labour. Back a #PeoplesVoteBack Remain. Articulate why. It’s not hard.That other way, madness lies. 
BREAKING: Priti Patel tells Britain to cheer up about Brexit (A story in two parts)  
Brexit is great and a leap of freedom. We love Brexit and our United Kingdom  Do you  
Gordon Brown thinks 23 months is enough time to reconsider the issue of EU membership and have another referendum. But, to revisit the issue of Scottish independence after almost 4 years is completely undemocratic. 
The Times: "Britain would be hit with shortages of medicine, fuel and food within a fortnight if the UK tries to leave the European Union without a deal, according to a Doomsday Brexit scenario drawn up by senior civil servants for David Davis."  
Revealed: plans for Doomsday no-deal Brexit #TomorrowsPapersToday 
37% (not enough for a public sector strike) of a rigged electorate in an advisory referendum missold as mandatory for a catch-all 4 word slogan, narrowly won by electoral chicanery and a torrent of #Brexit billionaire press hate & lies.Not a mandate!#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Two years on & less than a year to go; this is still a scarily accurate depiction of #Brexit  
Hedge Fund Managers trade on volatility and uncertainty in financial markets. Is it a coincidence they often support Brexit & wish the destruction of € and return to national EU currencies. What huge trading opportunities would this provide for fortunes to be made I wonder?  
If freedom of movement is stripped from us, the Brexit elite won't suffer, they'll be tucked up nicely in their French chateaus.It will be ordinary people who are denied the right to live, work, study, retire where they choose.Do one Lawson, we resist. 
Replace May with Gove to sort out Brexit, Tory donor urges  
Are you entirely baffled by @jeremycorbyn's aversion to a #peoplesvote on Brexit? Find it odd that a man who claims to be a voice for the people won't fight to give them a voice on the final deal?Me too. So I wrote him this letter: 
If a former Swiss President, who is an expert at these things, thinks that our poor attempt at running a referendum was stupid then you have to question how the whole thing was done and ask yourself was the result truly democratic and was it based facts or fiction. #StopBrexit 
I worked with the Dutch government on a project. Decent, pragmatic professionals. They serve their people and businesses well. #brexit #PeoplesVote 
Boris' dad has said the Brexit referendum should be held again if there is evidence there was Russian interference in the vote.  
Finland took independence when Russia was in revolution - Baltic countries when Communism was falling - the lesson is strike at the 'central state' when it divided and weak - Westminster can't deal with Brexit never mind fighting a second referendum now - call it #indiref2 
We joined #FBPE because we believe in the strength of common endeavour. We achieve more together than we do alone, and we have.Despite the majority of the establishment citing Brexit as inevitable and a media campaign of mistruths, Brexit is an 'if'Truth is in the ascendancy.  
Ganley's going to lose his mind when he realises his taxes paid for the referendum. 
Nigel Farage has denied he ever said Brexit would be good fot the uk.It’s my belief that Brexit won’t happen for the simple reason that EVERY single person who promoted it knows it’s damaging for the uk.ALL of them.Hannan Lilico Farage etcAll the MPs.Remind them#StopBrexit 
Nothing to do with Corbyn.#Brexit is an absolute certainty simply because:1. Maths:DUP+Tory MPs>all other MPs2. Next general election is 2022.3. Brexit was in Tory manifesto & no Tory can 'rebel' on it.I don't like it; but there's sod all anyone can do.  
The one that’ll be repaid by 2026? The Irish have caused no grief on #Brexit - it was the Brexiteers who sold the British people a pup & have failed to lay out a clear plan 
Tony Benn correctly identified the nature of the #EU in 1996.#Brexit  
David Miliband: I would join any campaign against any Brexit dealThe former foreign secretary says there should be a #PeoplesVote 
On top of the 1.6 million trucks using eurotunnel ( which has NO infrastructure for customs ) ... and those in favour of brexit claim it’ll work ? - don’t even mention the cars .. school holidays ... nightmare !  
If it wasn’t for Tommy Robinson Child rape would have gone Unnoticed He deserves a Knighthood 
They have indeed been at the forefront and they say your Brexit will wreck workers rights, pay and conditions. Perhaps you should listen to them.  
People still hanging onto the hope that there's a good Brexit deal out there... Even though it's already been concluded that every possible Brexit scenario leaves us worse off... 
A thread by a former civil servant - which says the current civil service is woefully derelict in its Brexit duty, or ministers are, or both  
Labour MP Chuka Umunna has called again for a People's Vote on a final Brexit deal after an influential global body warned of continuing "high uncertainties" over its outcome.  
Another Brexiter indulging in corrosive populist language. Treachery, like saboteur, enemies of the people etc. Our politics has been debased by Brexit.  
Dear @DavidDavisMP, you have gone very quiet. Is it possible that #Brexit is falling apart and is not deliverable after all? If this is the case, please do the right thing for Britain and come out and say so. It is time power spoke truth to the people over #Brexit. 
Brexit died two years ago. Tories have been dragging a corpse around since, then Labour surrendered and together they created a zombie situation. This is what happens when you don’t assess risk threat and consequences.  
David Miliband: I would join any campaign against any Brexit deal.‘Former foreign secretary says there should be a second vote on Brexit.’He’s out of touch. He has to understand that today’s Labour believes in pursuing policies to make the poor poorer. 
According to @LiamFox, "the beauty of a referendum is that every voter has an equal voice & every vote has equal weight".The ugliness of First Past the Post is that voters have unequal voices and some votes are worth many times more than others.#MakeElectionsBeautiful 
Democracy means the right to oppose whatever vote, decision, or majority—no duty at all to submit and collaborate if you don't agree with.It's up to Brexiteers alone to implement Brexit—Whatever it means.Remainers have full right to disrupt and block Brexit—that's democracy.  
You sold the complex as the simple. You cheered on the undeliverable. Now the wheels are coming off #Brexit, you blameshift.  
Your party offered a second referendum at the last General Election and they were decisively and overwhelming rejected.  
Hi JuliaYou’ve blocked me, but if you had not you would be able to see that huge numbers of leave voters have now changed their minds as #Brexit clearly wont match up to anything like you & others promised.Ps. A key features of a democracy is the ability to change your mind.  
Wales voted 53% to Leave on a 72% turnout. More voters in Wales backed Brexit than voted ‘Yes’ in the devolution referenda of 1997 and 2011. @MattSmithWales right to argue Welsh Labour's contempt for Wales’ 854,572 Leave voters is particularly inexcusable. 
I'll be doing detailed explainers on all the B.C. referendum electoral systems in the weeks to come, but to start here's a short primer on all three of them  
UK has EU membership with a lot of opt-outs but now wants #brexit with a lot of opt-ins. It does not make sense at all. 
... here’s a link to one I prepared earlier... pretty impressive bit of preparedness really from the Dutch. You answer a load of questions on the website, it provides a personalised assessment of Brexit impact...  
Government* offers personalised 11 page “Brexit impact scan” for millions of small businesses covering issues such as customs, plant, medicine imports, UK passport holder rights for changes from 29.3.2019*Dutch Government, that is.  
Nice Italian guy at work, barely speaks English, says to me and Bulgarian dude recently returned here to make some money, "Italy finish. Italy finish". "European Union destroy Europe" replies Bulgarian. I say "We need Brexit for *everyone*" and they heartily agree. 
“The government is trying to weaken our environmental standards after Brexit - risking our wildlife, beaches, and the air we breathe”.A watchdog with no teeth is no replacement for EU legislation.Please sign:   
That will of the people wasn't at one fixed point. It was a twenty year campaign against all the odds - fought for and won. Voting for another referendum is a vote to nullify that. Just how self-entitled are you? 
Imagine, if just for one week, the papers/ media didn’t mention Brexit once & instead discussed in more detail all the myriad of other ways this govt is annihilating the country at the moment. Maybe then people might start to see that Brexit is all just a big old con. #marr 
.@Telegraph cartoon - You'll find a better deal almost anywhere.#junkfood #Junker #TheresaMay #Brexit  
Not sure if it isn’t more extraordinary that the Brexit Secretary sat through an entire session at Hay with @Andrew_Adonis and @williamnhutton   on their new highly Brexit-sceptical book, or that the ex Europe minister assessed that “he knows it’s over”  
The most Orwellian of #Brexit threads  
.I should be shockedSo should you..........But it is just MORE evidence of the Brexit-fueled incompetence that we ALL know will ruin Britain & wreck the peace in NI.I'm not even mildly surprised by this news.Are you?. 
Theresa May is the most clueless PM we have ever had. May has had 2 years to plan for Brexit, get the exit strategy sorted, plan for no deal & to get her new policies on issues ready. May has failed on all counts providing no leadership, no vision & no plan!            #fo2eu 
2-0 HAHA YOU GUYS CAN SHAKEW SHAKEW BACK HOME AND EAT YOUR GARRY 'ND JELLOF #THREELIONS #ENGLAND #BREXIT #GODSAVEOURQUEEN 
You walk around hospitals and you see extremely old ladies on trollies waiting endlessly for X-rays or whatever,and,without anyone to fight for them,they stare up at you imploringly.I challenge anyone who backs Brexit to visit their local NHS hospital and tell me this is worth it 
Let's say I respect the referendum vote. Fine. Now, two years later the government is making a complete dog's Brexit of it. The lies are exposed and it is clear Brexit cannot be delivered in any form acceptable to anyone. Does this still mean people can never change their mind? 
Will be discussing this tomorrow 10am @lbc still looking for any government minister to come on. Even the ones I haven’t heard of. Anyone. Anyone who can defend the govt Brexit ‘strategy’ (six)  
Didn't you know there was a distant water fleet (lost during cod wars as Norway & Iceland 'took back control') & a distinct home water fleet which was massacred by EU distant water fleet pillaging British waters? An EU fleet that should go same way as Hull & Grimsby post-Brexit  
How absolutely dare you @KateHoeyMP call my @LibDems colleague @catherinemep - or any other diligent, sensible MEP or MP who opposes your crazy #Brexit - a traitor? They have more patriotism in their little fingers than you & your dogmatic, cultish set of Brexiteers combined  
We are having a tiny break in Paris before the rigours of these coming weeks. Looking back at the UK from this side of the channel makes me realise how tiny and vulnerable we are and what lies were told to make enough to win that damnable vote. Give us another referendum now. 
Fantastic response to our inaugural #PeoplesVote street stalls in Cowbridge and Penarth this morning. Well done & thank you to all our volunteers.Just look at that Brexitometer - it’s very clear that the public think #Brexit is a disaster & want a #FinalSayforAll.#StopBrexit 
Only a fascist or an ignorant fool thinks a referendum vote can override the core democratic right to oppose.#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
as a Cumbrian in England i wish you all the best in your quest for Independence if you are successful in a second referendum.Seems to me that the Scots were deceived regarding promise of staying within the EU.Bit like the whole of the UK in the EU referendum. 
Can we (Brexit supporters) find a lawyer to mount a legal challenge to the government for not taking us cleanly or fully out of the EU as was voted for in the referendum? Why is this always one-sided against Brexit?  
Margaret Thatcher, quoting Attlee, said a referendum was a device used by “dictators and demagogues”. And #Brexit has proven that warning entirely accurate. Brexiters rant about the "Will of the People" very much as Goebbels did after a Nazi referendum victory.#StopBrexit 
I would join any campaign against any Brexit deal. Miliband supports a #PeoplesVote on Brexit  - "what people voted for is not going to happen". 
One of the leading Brexit rats is leaving the sinking HMS Great Britain as she slowly goes down. He knows that Brexit will damage the economy and he is going to watch the whole show from the safety of the EU while the rest of us drown. Save HMS Great Britain and #StopBrexit 
I've seen at least 40 NO to YES voters on my timeline in the last 10 days alone. It's exactly the type of report that the electorate should be provided with prior to referendums like Brexit to use a huge example.  
Jeremy Corbyn faces mounting pressure to back a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit after a raft of Labour MPs signed a letter calling for a vote on the final dealJoin them in supporting @peoplesvote_uk, and by RSVPing to march on June 23 at  
Of course and that is why it makes me so angry Corbyn backs Brexit. A Labour leader backs the most blatantly inhumane right wing policy of my lifetime.  
Your "side" failed get buy-in. It failed to win hearts and minds. Now it's abjectly failing to implement brexit. So when you deliver chaos instead of the promised sunlit uplands, don't be surprised if people are pissed off. They want to live in a democracy not a failed state.  
So have I got this right - the last remaining advantage of #Brexit is that we’ll be in control of our own poverty? 
David Miliband: I would join any campaign against any Brexit deal  
Stop referring to Remainers as "pro-European". Like the vast majority of Leavers, I'm pro-Europe. I've lived and worked in Europe, travelled most of it and throughly love it.Remainers are 'pro-EU' which is nothing like pro-European and is arguably quite the opposite. #Brexit  
Results from Lancaster’s brexitometer. Looks like folk want a say on the sort of deal we get. They are also not convinced that brexit will deliver what was promised. @CatSmithMP @GuardianDigital @BBCLancashire @peoplesvote_uk 
The referendum wasn't on the terms of a future relationship. The proposal was to leave the EU - and unless you want things to get ugly I suggest you respect that.  
If you object to Labour Party policy on Brexit then should not have stood as an MP, and if this is your opinion barely a year later then you must resign. For how can you honourably hold this contrary position to both your Party, and electorate? 
In a single tweet, this serving Labour MP:- Mocks the phrase “will of the people”- Declares herself “proud” to be trying to derail the largest numerical mandate in British political history- Tells all #Brexit voters they are thick, and didn’t know what we were voting for.  
Why I’m at the #FBPEparty I rejected the notion of ‘retain’. I knew I wholly opposed Brexit but I thought I was just one tweeter. LonelyThen I found like minded people. What a grassroots army we are. Diverse, demented at times but deeply dedicated. #stopbrexit  
Pressure is mounting on Jeremy Corbyn to back a second EU referendum  
Fantastic afternoon engaging with our fellow #Lancaster residents on #Brexit. Whether we agree or not, having the conversation is always a good thing.  Thank you to everyone who took part in the discussion and entered their choices on the #Brexitometer. @peoplesvote_uk @euromove 
It is time for the Government, and all MPs, to stand up and defend our democracy from the global plot trying to derail Brexit, says @TheSun 
Irish government says EU Brexit group must receive written plans from May government to resolve the Northern Ireland border issue in the next 2 weeks. Fair enough, they’ve already had 2 years!  
In just 3 weeks, we'll be marching for a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal. Keen to join us? RSVP here:  
"The greatest achievement of the #EU is that it has brought peace to a continent that was historically at war... The greatest threat #Brexit poses is bringing conflict to our continent, for example what is happening on the #Irishborder"#EUsupergirl at #EYE2018 #StopBrexit 
Was effectively called a liar today by a Remoaner for saying this ...." If Remain had won the referendum (which I truly expected would happen)then I would have accepted that mandate.  I would have seen a second referendum as irrelevant.I'm a democrat " 
The Left used to detest the transfer of power from the people to Brussels. Now, Labour MPs and left-wing groups are pressuring Jeremy Corbyn into backing another referendum to keep power in the hands of foreign bureaucrats. Sad! Support us at  
Brexit, memorably described by Mark Carney, in Private Eye  
#JeremyCorbyn risks being the last member of the #Labour party that is supporting Brexit, his slogan #forthemany not the few is quickly becoming as hollow as #takebackcontrol  
Its worth remembering that everytime Lord Digby Jones is wheeled out as one of the very few "voices of industry" in favour of #brexit......he was never actually in Industry. He was a Lawyer, then joined CBI as a administrateor & spokesperson when he couldnt get higher in law. 
Dear Julie Harpy-SewerI'm a voter - I voted #Remain, you did not. It is my democratic right to try and stop Brexit. It is not in the best interests of our country. That's democracy.  
Some people could barely speak they were so angry. They angrily wrote postcards to their MP and just wanted to know what could be done to stop Brexit. Disaster, catastrophe, shambles, ridiculous, lies, con, madness - these were the words we heard over an over again. 
#quote "An IN or OUT referendum. When The British People speak, their voice will be RESPECTED, not ignored. If we vote to leave, then we will LEAVE."  
And what do you call supporting Brexit at all and any cost when the vast majority of the people you are meant to represent voted remain?  
Made a new Brexit-related meme, comrades.  Feel free to nick it.  
Hello fellow party goers! I’m a half French, half Irish, Brexit hating Mum. Astounded & frightened by this country and its “leaders” ()#FBPE has kept me sane, thank you all. See you on the 23rd! #FBPEParty 
Now that is the big question. Normally when a gov messes up, you change PM, do U-Turn, move on. But June 2016 referendum is still actualité not yet histoire. In a funny way might it suit May and Corbyn for a new referendum to either confirm or say Brexit is a mistake?  
Brexit is rubbish.But I can do better than that; let's be in no doubt, Brexit is the biggest con against ordinary people since the ruling classes persuaded them it was patriotic to die unnecessarily in their wars.#StopBrexit#ABTV#FBPE 
Just back from doing a successful stall. The most notable thing for me was the increased anger people suddenly feel about Brexit -how it is going - how it‘s been handled. The anger was much more palpable than I have come across, previously. 
BREXIT SHOCK: Italy to lead European FIGHTBACK against EU's attempt to punish Britain  
Marple think Brexit is a very bad idea, lots of people wrote postcards to their MP this morning asking for a #PeoplesVote 
"I never promised Brexit would be a good thing! You must be thinking of my friend, Mr, uh, Figel Narage"  
If the Govt attempts to take UK out of the EU without a deal approved by Parl as some are threatening, would be subject to further court challenge. 'Govt Brexit stance riddled with legal confusion' by the excellent QC @HelenMountfield  via @prospect_uk 
Ireland gives Britain two weeks to produce Brexit border proposals  
Until 2016, I hadn't really got the hang of Twitter & had less than 100 Followers. Following the referendum, I picked up more connections via #StopBrexit and related hashtags, getting to about 1,000 Followers, but then came along #FBPE & I found myself part of a huge movement 1/3 pic.twitter.com/aKRsePhbnw 
Brexit will cost UK £72 billion in lost annual economic activity by 2021. That’s over £500 million lost per week@Peston @AdamBoultonSky @BBCSarahSmith @Faisalislam Are you malking enough effort to tell the Britsh people what's happening to their country? 
“Becoming German”Where I am currently with my integration in Germany, and my route towards a German passport#BrexitBlog post: 
EU's Barnier in astonishing attack on Brexit: 'We do NOT want to negotiate with UK!'  
Leaked emails reveal former UN chief Kofi Annan secretly lobbying Michel Barnier to meet with hardline anti-Brexit campaigners  
Dumfries and Galloway bored stiff with talk of 2nd Referendum. (The gathering is on the left. Those who keep blabbering they want another are on the right.)  
And this is what decades of tabloid “immigrants strain our NHS” false narrative gets us. Wasteful sound & fury... leading to populist policy marching down a dead end. Meanwhile, the Brexit impact on NHS finances & staffing is critical. #ListenToExperts 
David Cameron:"It will be YOUR decision whether to remain in #EU... or whether we #LeaveYOUR decision.Nobody else’s.Not politicians’.Not Parliament’s.Not lobby groups’.Not mine.Just YOU.YOU, the British people, WILL decide.... And it will be the FINAL decision."#Brexit 
Fellow Remainers why are we not properly promoting the June 11-12 protests outside Parliament? We are a campaigning movement not a bloody talking shop. Making our protests as large as possible is a vital part of our campaigning. Please do the necessary!#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
Fellow Remainers, this petition calling for retention of freedom of movement has only 4.8k signatures. We are sending the message that we don't care a toss about FOM. Please help put that right! #StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit 
Brexit is a bad decision, plain & simple.Polls show a majority of the public now consistently think Brexit was the wrong choice.So don’t let anyone guilt-trip you into silence.If you think Brexit is rubbish, say so. You’re in good company. You are the UK majority.  
Brexit will cost Britain £72 billion in lost annual economic activity by 2021. That’s over £500 million lost per week. Remain in the EU and let’s spend £500 million a week on the NHS. Put that on a bus.  
This is very, very worrying from the Sun, stoking up idea of a ‘global plot’ against Brexit. Kind of rhetoric that can have terrible real world consequences  
“It falls to Theresa May to drag us out of this swamp. We don’t envy her, but she needs now to make a decision.Mrs May cannot kick the can any ­further down the road. She must be realistic, assertive and brave...or make way for someone who can” #Brexit 
"Nobody in Scotland wants to talk about independence any more, especially not in the Borders. Scotland doesn't want a second referendum!"  
Make no mistake any trade deal with America post Brexit will mean the #NHS will be on the table and traded away by Theresa May  for a reduction in tariffs . 
Theresa May is bungling these Brexit negotiations, so it's vital the public have the FINAL SAY on the Brexit deal. Do you agree? Join our campaign today: 
More than any man alive, Nigel Farage sold Brexit to the British people.He convinced millions that the EU was to blame for their problems.Now he says he never promised leaving the EU would be a success or that it would help us.Help me expose this lie. Retweet the evidence.  
Digby Jones likes to pontificate on Brexit, as if he knows anything about it.  I met Jones when he was a Trade Minister.  A more pompous fool you could not hope to meet.  He lectures all and sundry on business, yet he has never run a business.  
Brexit Plan Update:We now need a Minister for No Deal, after all we already have Ministers for:No TrainsNo NHSNo HousesandNo Police#FBPE 
If you're sick of Brexit, ditch Brexit. @DMiliband at #hayfestival2018 
I am fuming...... 3 posts this morning on Facebook from soon-to-be ex-friends moaning about the fact that @BGT (Britain's Got Talent) allows 'foreigners' to enter. Racism runs deep in the British psyche & since Brexit has been unleashed. #StopBrexit #StampOutRacism @hopenothate 
The Dutch government has created a Brexit Impact Scan tool for companies to assess the potential impact of Brexit on their business. It’s part of a special website full of advice about Brexit.  
The Logic of Brexit.Leave a Free Trade Area to trade more freelyLeave trade agreements to get new trade agreementsWeaken influence to become strongerTurn inward to be more globalOpt out by opting inWelcome people by being hostile1/ 
This woman gets better with each viewing ... Scotland ignored in Brexit by UK Gov is indeed true.  
Pressure grows on Labour leaders to back second 'People's Vote' on Brexit deal  
Irish bishop calls 'yes' voters on abortion referendum to come to confession  #Catholic 
EU's Barnier in astonishing attack on Brexit: 'We do NOT want to negotiate with UK!'  
Just crossed the Irish border on the Greencastle - Greenore ferry. Will the customs post be in a dinghy after Brexit?  
I don't think they'll be laughing. They'll still be paying the bills! There's an excellent book 'The Blunders of Government' (Crewe/King) they all should have read. Brexit is a text book study repeating same old mistakes. We never learn. 
In summary Mcleish told us that brexit was the greatest act of self harm to befall the uk, unparralled.But given the choice henry prefers acts of self harm to acts of scottish preservation. A sheep in wolfs clothing. 
Solidarity’s office once again vandalised by anti-abortion graffiti. You know, they can keep their crap graffiti, I’ll console myself with last weeks referendum result  #LastStingOfADyingWasp #RepealedThe8th 
Repeatedly saying you WANT @UKLabour to STOP Brexit does not answer the very simple question: HOW? They are not in power. They are not “negotiating”. They do not have a majority. It is not rocket science! 
#Brexit 2 years onRemainers STILL denounce referendum result promised binding by Cameron, now somehow “unfair” or “illegal”UK Govt openly mocked by belligerent & stupid #EU bureaucrats with No intention of making any progress or keeping relations cordial 
ARTICLE 50 WAS TRIGGERED ILLEGALLyCheck out @A50challenge as to why Pledge and shout about this case it can #stopbrexit maybe, but it will definitely protect the constitution #fbpe #brexit #savetheuk 
Great to hear @NosheenaMobarik confirm to @ScotTories Convention that we will not be giving in to EU demands for access to our fishing waters post-Brexit as a prerequisite for any trade deal  
 On this day in 1946, Italians decided to end up the monarchy through a referendum. For the 1st time ever in Italy’s history, women had right to vote too.#FestadellaRepubblica 
Brexit is a cult.You have to have faith that things will be better in the after-brexit-life.You have to have faith in the cult leaders.You have to believe that sacrificing your children will appease the lord of free trade 
Some of my relatives came to dinner last night and there was a big argument about me and Brexit and one of them shouted at me what is it you actually want and I shouted back “Status quo ante, Auntie!” 
Studies found that fear of immigrants & foreigners is linked to support for Brexit. Right-wing Authoritarians, Social Dominants and Collective Narcissists - all display prejudice & xenophobia + are emboldenned by the 'hostile environment'. Inc. FLA, DFLA, EDL #StandUpToRacism 
David Davis reveals his plan for the Irish Border post Brexit.  
No it won’t be Corbyn’s fault.  It will be you and your likes fault with your constant attacks.  Try attacking the Tories for a change who are ploughing through with Hard Brexit. 
Jamie Oliver blamed Brexit, not overpriced, average food, for the demise of his Barbecoa restaurant chain.FYI Jamie. We haven't left yet mate. 
I opposed the decision to hold an advisory yes or no  EU referendum.  It was always clear to me that complex issues of our future relationship with Europe would not be resolved by a simple vote.  Parliament must now take back control and allow a People’s Vote on the leave terms.  
Our investigation has revealed the outrageous rates some operators are charging consumers to use their phones abroad→ We're calling on the government to use new post-Brexit trade deals to scrap mobile roaming feesTry our data roaming cost quiz ↓ 
BIG NEWS !!!On July 5th, an EU court is set to hear the case of British citizens living for over 15 years in the EU27 who were denied a vote in the ref. If successful, the case could ultimately force the referendum to be held again.#FBPE #Brexit  
Brexit isn’t dying, it’s already dead. 
I'd make pockets in dresses compulsory. All dresses and skirts. If we need a referendum so be it. 'In particular, the State recognises that by giving her pockets within her dress, the State gives to women a support without which the common good cannot be achieved.  
Sammy Wilson is a colleague on the #Brexit Committee, a great guy and a fellow Brexiter. I support his comments that it is time we got tough with Brussels and showed some mettle. 
A true classic of its genre:2016: Make Parliament sovereign again!2018: Beware the tyranny of Parliament!”Also:“Don’t be dictated to by the unelected” says unelected lord.Also: Brexit would be great if it weren’t for those pesky Remoaners.  
DUP urges May to ditch "half-cooked ideas" and put her foot down with Brussels | Former UN chief Kofi Annan secretly lobbying Barnier on behalf of anti-Brexit campaigners | Jean-Claude Juncker apologises for Italy insults  
"MPs are signing this letter because their constituents are becoming more and more worried about the future. Brexit threatens to be the biggest act of economic self harm in history."  
Hi Julia,In a democracy, being part of the 48% doesn’t deny me the *right* to continue to speak out.When Brexit is so clearly damaging to Britain’s place in the word and its prosperity - and clearly not what people voted for - I have a *responsibility* to speak out.  
Soaring food prices, business confidence at all time low, economy/growth in reverse, countless job losses.. Yes, #Brexit is indeed.. SH*T!!  
Brexit supporters: it is time to desert your sinking ship, or go down with it. There is plenty of room on our lifeboat and you are more than welcome to join us in backing Remain. 
“The euro is principally a political project...for greater integration. So anything that harms the euro is a threat to the European project, which is why a eurozone crisis might lead to a more pragmatic approach from the EU in the Brexit talks.”  
I’m looking forward  to the return of True British Culture post Brexit such as:Bernard ManningSpam Bad teethRainy holidays on stony beachesDomestic violence Nylon sheetsIzal loo rollWarm bitterIRA bombingsServants knowing their place SemolinaDog poo on pavement 
Dear @IDuncanSmithMP, like @Andrew_Adonis I oppose the catastrophe of Brexit. I was born in Liverpool, as were my parents and all 4 grandparents. I run a business. I’ve paid income tax since 1981. Should I also 'learn to live with Brexit or find somewhere else to live'? 
MPs and peers will be sent a roadmap next week detailing how they could stop #Brexit by the George Soros-backed Best for Britain group, which has amassed £2.3m in donations to spend on a nationwide lobbying effort to persuade parliament to change its mind. 
I have been running a business for 20 years.  Brexit is wrong in so many ways - in economic, business and political terms but the worst aspect is the removal of rights from every one of us whether we are British or one of the 3 Million #FBPEparty#stopbrext #FinalSayForAll 
Dr Chris Leigh - "EU research programmes only fund around three percent of UK research and development activity. "So the impact of any significant change in our scientific relationship with the EU would in reality be very small." #Brexit  
Ireland gives Britain two weeks to produce Brexit border proposals  
There are so many ‘No side are being silenced after the referendum’ pieces doing the rounds it’s hard to accept that they are actually being silenced  
Did Brexiters & Leave voters really think through the consequences of winning (‘winning’ aka cheating) a referendum? No. Events & practicalities now show what the consequences of a Brexit are. Short answer: ‘very bad indeed.’ So a second vote, on the facts, is RIGHT & ESSENTIAL. 
People think that @theresa_may is making a mess of Brexit. They miss the central point that she WANTS to make a mess of Brexit. And then Remain. 
We can get a great BREXIT deal for free.1. Offer zero tariffs to EU if reciprocated.2. Offer a soft Irish border IF EU accepts it. Otherwise, hard border.3. Save £40bn of British taxes and make Britain great again. 
Fresh air: j’adore!!The Appalling Failure of Brexit by Chris Patten @ProSyn 
Hey @LiamFox I am standing in for @Nigel_Farage @lbc tomorrow. Really keen to have a minister on to bang the drum for Brexit, trade deals and the spesh relaysh with US. you around Doc? 
Remoaners complain about foreign interference in the referendum (not proven), yet happy to take Soros money to try and stay in the EU. The hypocrisy is astonishing. 
Let #LewishamEast be the place where Labour voters tell Corbyn loudly and clearly that they don’t want their lives trashed by Brexit. 
We're rebranding as @UK4EUnet because the 48%+ is now more like 60% & it's time to move on from a stolen referendum.  As we cant change our handle we've set up a new one & are posting on both for a short while before closing the 48%+. Join us on facebook @  
Will June be the end of May? Leadership challenges & Brexit votes could sink PM within weeks   
There is no plot to stop Brexit, there is just a democratic nation coming to the realisation that it shat the bed. #fbpe 
When the tories or labour start tweeting about stopping brexit, I will RT them. In the meantime I give you.... the LibDems who are not just Pro EU, but anti brexit  
We haven't got an independent trade policy Ed. We're stuck in the EU and your mates are trying to keep us inside the protectionist Customs Union which means we would have our trade policy set by a foreign power. This really is Brexit 101#brexit #Libdems #trading #steeltariffs 
“The social care system is at breaking point and Brexit is only going to make it worse.” 
Jean-Claude Juncker says he tries to put himself in other people's shoes during negotiations but when it comes to Brexit the British don't even know if they are wearing boots or sandals.  
Two short and not v sweet extracts from the Times First from @SamCoatesTimes then Robert Lea. Brexit..... the Dignitas option.What the hell is this government thinking?  
Brexit supporters I beg you - watch this short clip and try to unlearn the misinformation you’ve been fed by people with an agenda which attacks everything that’s good for you. This is the reality. Eurosceptic press & politicians have sold you massive lies to benefit themselves.  
Hi Julia, I'm one of the 48m who wasn't fooled into voting for the Brexit catastrophe. You're not.  AS - As you well know the EU ref was only narrowly won by industrial scale cheating. That's NOT democracy that's criminality.  
One man keeps the Brexit nightmare going. Just one man. If there were a PeoplesVote on Brexit now, the nightmare would end.That one man is Jeremy Corbyn. 
Farage: ‘I never promised Brexit would be a success.’Except when it comes to enriching still further his mates  
18 more MPs throw their weight behind a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Pressure mounts on Corbyn to back new Brexit referendum as London's Labour MPs back 'People's Vote' - The Independent  
Hey @POTUS I’m standing in for your pal @Nigel_Farage on his @LBC radio show tomorrow. I know you don’t sleep much so if you’re up 5am your time give me a call to talk trade, Brexit and special relationships. Can’t get a government minister to come on would you believe??!! 
Brexitons. No one is "secretly plotting" to undermine your beautiful Brexit. Millions of people are openly and honestly doing everything they can, with all their heart, to protect their jobs, their values, and their friends.Understand this, or be obliviated. 
Stop Brexit: REMAIN is the option for me in the #PeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk. Join us on 23 June in London. 
June is the month People Power derails Brexit. June 11th & 23rd are the key dates. Such is the Governments mess, in negotiations, that a "no deal" looks to be the only deal available. That is unacceptable. Campaign to Remain vociferously & often. 
The #EU is the best protection racket in history: A) Pay us £13 billion annually and we'll help you police the criminals we're sending in.B) Don't pay us and we'll still send them, we'll just laugh when they kill you. #Brexit #NoDeal 
I had a nice reply to one of my tweets saying that I should forgive the public for voting #Brexit because the were fed misinformation. This is true, but I'm still amazed that they could follow the lead of spivs like Farage, Johnson, Gove, Rees-Mogg etc. 
Train crash interview by @LiamFox on R4. He just said 1) he not on the committee looking at customs. Which is bit fucking odd for someone supposed to be responsible for trade! 2) he waiting for many reports before giving answers. So how hell he knew that Brexit was good for UK?! 
Social care underfundedNHS over stretchedTrains in meltdown Banks malfunctioningPeople deported without cause Buildings clad in flammable material Housing shortage Brexit negotiations chaotic#shambles #Government 
‘Don’t let the Tories trample over Wales’...says the party who willingly gave away our powers so the Tories could ‘trample over Wales’. #Brexit #LabourFailAgain 
Oi @ChukaUmunna As one of @georgesoros new puppets, please can you remind yourself and him and all the other paid for anti-democrats exactly what #DavidCameron said when he gave the country a referendum.  
Hi Julia, I’m a voter - one of the 48% who voted against Brexit. You’re not.PS - stop trying to go through with something that didn't inform the public properly and was badly thought out. 
‘this referendum was never only about abortion. It was Ireland agreeing that our bodies were our own business. It was Ireland confirming that women were fully equal citizens. It was Ireland setting us women and girls free’ Beautiful piece by @roisiningle 
Stephen Kinnock has been exposed for trying to undermine Brexit from behind closed doors. These are the stories the mainstream media aren’t reporting on.   … 
Yesterday my timeline was full of angry remainers anxious over objectives of the #stopBrexit#peoplesvote March. Today is another day. Every! group wants the option to Remain.Soft Brexit is Brexit. We aren’t .March on 23rd of June with me and make that known.  
Hi Seb, I’m a voter - one of the 52% who voted for Brexit. You’re not.PS - stop trying to block the result of a democratic vote.  
I didn't want a referendum on independence but I got one. As far as I'm concerned the majority of Scots didn't want or ask for a referendum.We got a referendum forced upon us .We voted NO! What part of NO do these selfish bas*tards not understand? 
The #Brexit con artist @Nigel_Farage decides that his lies no longer stack up so decides to make another one.#FBPE#PeoplesVote 
What an absolute failure @theresa_may is. We are supposed to becoming less entangled with & less subordinate to #EU not more entangled & more subordinate. NO DEAL is BETTER THAN A BAD DEAL #BREXIT 
Big news: the Shindler case - UK expats denied a vote in the EU referendum - will be heard in the Luxembourg court on 5 July. Yet another reason why the referendum is void. As all anti-Brexit ‘traitors’ tirelessly point out, Brexit is every kind of mess imaginable. 
We're all watching David Davis completely wet the bed with Brexit. Meanwhile, Femi just dismantled a large part of why all this is happening.  
Why are hard Brexit organisations like Legatum Institute defined as 'charities' and given tax breaks?'Here we have a New Zealander with acquired Maltese citizenship and a fortune made in Russia, creating a Mayfair...  
Legatum Institute 'crossed line' on #Brexit, Charity Commission finds'Here we have New Zealander with acquired Maltese citizenship and fortune made in Russia, creating Mayfair think-tank that abused charity rules to help win argument for hard Brexit.' 
Pressure mounts on Corbyn to back new Brexit referendum as London's Labour MPs back 'People's Vote' #peoplesvote 
#A50challenge goes to court 12 June. The legal case is the required process for A50 notification was not followed, so the trigger is invalid. That is the *what*Then there's the *why*: Why didn't Gov't let Parliament make the decision? Because Brexit is a power grab. #StopBrexit 
Looking at the news about the issues with Northern Rail  - no trains / on an emergency timetable - “ chaos “ on the network .. I was thinking to myself ..This will be brexit out of the customs union  - no one can prepare for this - if you can’t prepare a new timetable ..... 
How Ireland Beat Dark AdsShady tactics failed to pay off in a divisive abortion referendum. 
All the funds we raise go towards campaigning to #StopBrexit. Not soft Brexit, not Brexit In Name Only, just #StopBrexit. All organisation and promotion is done by our fabulous volunteers (and you!). Please give generously. 
UK4EU supports Remainers from left, right and centre who put stopping brexit before any party.  Whether you vote @theSNP @Plaid_Cymru @TheGreenParty @Renew_Britain @libdems @allianceparty @SDLPlive or local indies, lets stop the CONLAB Brexit coalition.  
Can’t wait to get stuck into that delicious American food. Tasty Brexit.  
Nigel Farage has insisted since the EU referendum that 'A Norwegian type deal was not what the British people voted for'...  It's not like he ever mentioned Norway before the Brexit vote. #Sarcasm 
Brexit: the Irish game plays out - the government seems to have run out of options for the Irish border and has rejected the only option that would work. Despite the intervention of the idiot Singham, we're on the countdown to a hard Brexit ...  #Brexinfo. 
"All four Democratic candidates for Florida governor support voting rights restoration. The two Republican contenders have been largely silent on the issue." With the referendum needing to clear 60%, a lot will depend on the extent to which this asymmetry can persist. 
We're rebranding as @UK4EUnet because the 48%+ is now more like 60% and it's time to move on from a stolen referendum.  As we cant change our handle we're setting up a new one and posting on both for a short while before closing this account.  
Sorry, but the EU is democratic, and this is your Brexit dividend.  
Roadmap to #StopBrexit to be sent to MPs and peers.The public now say Brexit is the wrong choice and a majority want to #Remain in the EU.Demand MPs give the people a say - with an option to stay.Hold a #PeoplesVote for all with an #OptionToRemain. 
More @UKLabour MPs back new Brexit referendum.Another 18 MPs back call for a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal to protect jobs.We need a #FinalSayForAll to #StopBrexit and #Remain in the EU. 
Went to listen to Henry Mcliesh discuss  brexit , this evening in inverness.Be under no illusions. This man is still a britnat , pedalling information that has been discredited on umpteen occassions. still clinging to the union for dear life. 
17.4m people voted to Leave the EU.The Government must deliver the will of the peopleLeave won!#Brexit must mean #BrexitPlease sign and RT my petition100000 signatures needed for debate in Parliament#SaturdayMotivation #LBCLIVE #Conservatives 
This is a fascinating story about tech and Ireland's abortion referendum. How social media & bots can disrupt democratic discourse, and how that can be combated, in @foreignpolicy 
The Brextremists are looking after their own and considering giving special status to places that voted to Leave that would see them escape the effects of their hard Brexit while  the rest of the country suffers for their stupidity. The brexit madness must end. #StopBrexit 
This is where you do have a serious complaint against the BBC in particular.They have massively over-promoted political stupidity, vanity and bone idle ignorance.They treat Brexit like a funfair instead of trying to analyse and interrogate. 
Dear Mr Duncan Smith @IDuncanSmithMP As a constituent of yours I am outraged that you told Lord Adonis @Andrew_Adonis that he should 'learn to live with Brexit or find somewhere else to live' Leavers never mentioned plan to oust Remainers from the UK in the referendum  
In five years no-one will admit they ever voted for Brexit.  
If @theresa_may had half a brain, she would have made the #Brexit negotiations ‘cross-party’ and invited other parties in to sit at the table.As it is, she has really cemented the fact that Brexit belongs entirely to the @CONservatives and has done so from the outset. 
Ontario is on the cusp of fielding the same referendum on white nationalism and religious theatrics that America did almost two years ago. And it looks like we're marching right into that abyss with our eyes open.Whatever the outcome, there are  dark days ahead.#ONpoli 
This is the reality of Brexit:  
They’re peddling such a bad political strategy, both for the Labour Party and for the “stop Brexit” movement, that their only objective must surely be to attempt to drive a wedge in Labour and undermine the leadership to weaken it 
Nigel Farage: "I never said it would be a beneficial thing for us to leave".That's it. The end. The admission of defeat. Brexit has been conceded to be a failure before it's even begun by its chief cheerleader.Just cancel it quickly before we do any more damage. 
COMMENT OF THE DAY: Let that be a warning to all 16m of you. #Brexit  
The Labour party is turning on the Brexit Corbynistas and their plans for hard Brexit that will damage the economy, destory British jobs and hit people on lo incomes hardest. It's time @UKLabour changed its tune and stopped propping up a failed Tory Brexit policy. #StopBrexit 
Anna Soubry the fanatically pro-Remain Tory MP says that the Legatum Institute should lose its charitable status for publishing a report on Brexit and Free Trade which she calls pro-Brexit. Why? Surely think tanks can express their own views? We are supposed to be a free country. 
Left-wingers to tour Britain in campaign to convince Jeremy Corbyn to block Brexit  
To Corbyn supporters who are following the Lexit ideology cos ‘respecting the referendum’ ..I came across this today. What say you? @UKLabour 
Is it just me who thinks “The will of the people” is going to be the parachute deployed by politicians and right wing press to absolve themselves when it all goes Ally’s Army after #Brexit ? 
Hey folks, I know I've been pretty much focused on Graham Linehan this past day, but it's just some absolutely infuriating distortion of the truth less than a week after the referendum, and I find it very hard to let that slide. TERFs actively tried to hinder the repeal efforts.  
If this MP was so confident that we will leave why does he rant and rave and call people 'pathetic losers'? If he was truly confident he would say nothing and wait for it's inevitability.He knows the people are turning against Brexit and a #PeoplesVote will reveal that. 
Oh my god. Our representatives once again being bullied to put party before nation, constituents and their own judgement.Brexit is a coup. It must be stopped.#FinalSayForAll#PeoplesVote#StopBrexit 
Next time Irish premier Varadkar cause grief on Brexit we should ask him to repay £3.2bn loan from 2010 when Ireland was in trouble again 
179k of you have indicated on FB that they’re interested/going to protest against Trump in London. Great! Now look closer to home and let’s get as many to sign this to ensure it gets a debate in Parliament. It would help us EU citizens, but also expose another big fat Brexit lie.  
Brexit will make the UK 'infinitely more vulnerable' to trade wars, Labour warns  
Just when you think the Tories’ Brexit policy is the oddest and self contradictory thing, you then see the Corbynista position - that Brexit cannot be opposed because improving the lives of the poor is more important. And they can’t see that Brexit makes that harder.  
Tory plan for Brexit:1. Argue with each other 2. Theresa May says something so vague it's meaningless 3. Tories hear from that what they want to hear 4. Someone tries to put Theresa May's words into an actual plan 5. They realise it's crazy and unworkable 6. Repeat 
MUST-READ: Yet more MPs call for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
Just to be very clear...on 23rd June I shall be protesting with the #StopBrexit column. Not limping along hoping for some soft Brexit scraps, nor demanding anything less than a #PeoplesVote with an option to #Remain.I haven't spent 2 years of my lie to settle for appeasement! 
All-round idiot Digby Jones hopes there'll be a Brexit benefit in "100 years time"  
A surprising claim, for which there is no evidence whatsoever. Every serious economic analysis of Brexit shows that the North of England will be worse of, under any form that Brexit takes.  
How could anyone support the Tories, knowing they’re working to destroy one of the UK’s treasures? And how could anyone think a Corbyn Brexit won’t also spell doom for it? #nhs #brexit 
If it was an "aspiration", why was the figure only £350m a week?£350m on the side of the coach was used to sell #Brexit.They lied.One third of people believed them and voted accordingly. 
This is very clearly now an attempt to stop #Brexit. Read the article, read the quote. They clearly ask for the people’s vote to be a choice between the PM’s deal, OR (wait for it) “the deal we ALREADY HAVE” - in other words NOT leaving the EU. Outrageous!  
Telling the voters there'd be mass unemployment, a deep recession, a house price crash and soaring interest rates didn't stop Brexit so a £2.5m advertising push won't make any difference. 
Our government have their heads buried in the sand if they think 17.4 million voters will keep quiet if @theresa_may fails to deliver #brexit.The pot is simmering nicely.  
The open letter to Corbyn, signed by 18 MPs in total, warns that a bad Brexit deal risks tearing the capital apart & concludes the public must vote on it themselves, a move that goes directly against  Labour policy  Corbyn pressure rightly increases  
Pressure mounts on Corbyn to back new Brexit referendum as London's Labour MPs back 'People's Vote'#FBPE  
Success of Brexit dependent on a good free trade deal with a country that just slapped a 25% tariff on our steel.I think I've actually dented my forehead with all the facepalming I'm doing these days. 
Our front 3 scored 89 goals in all competitions with a Brexit midfield behind them. Imagine how many they’ll score with Fabinho, Keita and potentially Fekir behind them. 
Schools are broke. The NHS is broke. Social care is broke. Meanwhile a few look set to make a mint whilst distracting the rest from the fact that the country will remain....broke.#Brexit #CambridgeAnalytica 
“It is essential that there is a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal” | am one of 18 London MPs who are co-signatories of this letter calling for a @peoplesvote_uk #PeoplesVote 
Iain Duncan Smith demands the horse called Remain bolt after he has locked the free movement stable door #brexit  
Well, at least #visadown will give us a taste of what life's like after brexit, when our money is worthless, and we'll have to pay for beer with either potatoes or sexual favours. 
I'm the British people, i voted to remain. Every poll since August 2017 has been for remain. The British people don't want to leave anymore and it looks like brexit is going to fail anyway so lets just stay..... X 
Left-wing Euroscepticism never found it's expression during Britain's Brexit referendumIt looks a bit like this  
"Pressure mounts on Corbyn to back new Brexit referendum" says Indie, referring to 15 MPs including Umunna, Creasy, Siddiq, Hodge, Streeting etc.  No, really? So Corbyn should unilaterally roll back party policy? It's not about Brexit, it's the same bunch of neo-lib saboteurs. 
.What a great Christmas present we could give ourselves & our children & their children & ....."It is theoretically possible for a referendum to be held within 17 working days of parliament legislating for one, meaning it could be held in December.". 
Trump. Brexit. 5Star. Marine Le Pen. Something, to coin a phrase, is happening here.But what’s not happening, says Princeton professor & populism scholar Jan Muller, is the will of “the People.” Unless we’re talking swamp people... @gzeromediaFull ep:  
Brexit has opened up huge divisions in British society. It's great to see that at least one MP is showing the leadership skills needed to heal them.  
@nfergus just convinced me that Brexit was probably the right decision. Not something I thought I would be changing my mind about but I suppose that’s how reason is supposed to work. Watch this, it’s worth your time  
After much study, I’ve come to the conclusion Brexit isn’t going to work. Actually I lie. It took about 5 mins two years ago to work that out. Are we taking bets yet as to when this cluster fuck of a government will admit it? 
.@LaylaMoran: "Liam Fox has been completely spineless. He talked up the US trade deal but we now need to carefully consider whether Brexit is the right decision for the UK and give the people the final say" 
I am marching 23rd June to #stopbrexit. I don’t care how. By legal challenge, by parliamentary vote or by people’s vote. But we are all uniting with one aim. Stopping Brexit and taking back control. We can only do this together as one #remain voice. See you there  
I now believe that Brexiters want Brexit stopped. Farage said he wanted a second vote & now says this.  Knowing that Parliament will vote for a CU, @DanielJHannan & @BorisJohnson both said we'd be better off remaining in the EU. #whowillhavethegutstoendthismadness 
I voted remain and I would vote leave if there was another referendum. 1, because I don’t think remainers should be given the opportunity to rob Leavers of their Brexit just two years after they won and 2, because the EU has acted appallingly and couldn’t vote to remain again. 
Good news on post-Brexit Irish border! David Davis has been visited by a pair of skilled cartographers, who have promised to create a costly but exquisite border, so fine, so delicate, that it can only be perceived by the most gifted and intelligent ministers... 
++BREAKING++Legatum brexit scandal.The charity commission was so shocked by the obvious untruthful aspects of the “institute” #brexit report it requested it be removed from its website. This is pretty much unprecedented at this level. D  
Pressure mounts on Corbyn to back new Brexit referendum as London's Labour MPs back 'People's Vote'  
London MPs: 'It is essential that there is a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal'  
Apparently, @georgesoros is spending most of his US$ 18 Billion meant for “philanthropy” on cleaning his rotten & well deserved image…ALL OVER the press@BBCNews @globeandmail @CNN @nytimes @washingtonpost @Reuters @AFP @AP #Brexit #Soros @Nigel_Farage @EU_Commission @StateDept 
via @EmekaGift on Facebook #Biafra"If Nigeria refuse R call for Referendum...I am planning to present a bill to #IPOB leadership asking them to extend Biafra heroes day celebration to 3 days, meaning we shall shutdown the whole of Biafra land for 3 days.. worth 40 billion Naira" 
Well after Dr Fox's ill fated trip across the pond, now we know that the so called 'special UK/US relationship' is a myth. Just as it was in 1939 until Pear Harbour! So post Brexit we'll get "Nix-nowt-nada-buckshee-sweet FA!" There's still time to press the rewind button? 
This is the problem with the government’s Brexit red lines on Ireland. It can’t be done. It’s like saying that you want a shape which must be 1. Square2. Not square3. Not a shape 
If the BBC is often accused of anti-Brexit bias, it stands as a model of reason compared with the New York Times, says @KJTorrance 
Working with EU officials against Brexit is, as you must know, working FOR UK interests.  
"Nearly six years after Mark Thompson’s arrival, all sense of balance seems to have disappeared from @nytimes' coverage of the United Kingdom — and of Brexit in particular," writes @KJTorrance 
Goodness this guy is good...try opening your eyes, ears, minds & hearts #Brexiters...stop believing the BS those backing this flawed #Brexit feed you. Seek FACTS & separate from the FICTION this #BrexitShambles is based on.Back a #PeoplesVote a #FinalSay + a #StopBrexit option 
UK dopo la Brexit: we fucked upUSA: hold my beerUSA dopo Trump: we fucked up big timeItaly: hold my wineItaly: maronna che cazzo abbiamo fatto 
Hey @PhilipHammondUK I’m standing in for @Nigel_Farage @LBC Sunday morning. Keen to discuss impact of Brexit on economy. You around? 
Are you referring to the rigged referendum which was based on lying to the people, manipulated by Cambridge Analytica and then with such a small majority that a trade u ion vote on strike action would have been dismissed.  That!  
BREXIT BACKLASH: UK scientists will REFUSE to co-operate with EU after shock Horizon snub  
US trade tariffs: May disappointed at 'unjustified' move. The simple answer Mrs May is to just get on with a Hard Brexit then this won’t affect us   
8 months ago, 2.286.217 people voted in #Catalonia's independence referendum facing the brutality of Spain occupation forces. We won. We won't forget.  
In Tesco.The cashier card machines have gone down.They're only accepting cash.Desperate shoppers are trying to pay with their first born kids. Welcome to Brexit Britain.#Visa 
Fight until Brexit is just a distant memory.  
If it's good enough for Northern Ireland then it's good enough for Scotland!!!Northern Ireland could get dual UK/EU status in a radical new proposal to break the Brexit deadlock 
Roadmap to avoid Brexit to be sent to MPs and peers Our friends at @BestforBritain have really got their act together, & they have a plan! May must be very jealous. Great work @EloiseTodd#PeoplesVote 
Brexit Central bedwetters getting upset about God knows what, but the crucial point here is that my book is on Guy Verhofstadt's desk  
Man one week away from denying he ever campaigned for Brexit  
South Down MP Chris Hazzard joined with Border Communities Against Brexit at their demonstration in London this morning .@ChrisHazzardSF 
Brexit update:Boohoo. It's all the fault of the people that told us it wasn't going to work. 
If it was your brother/sister/child jumping off a bridge would you rather I walked on by and said “Oh well, that’s their decision” or would you rather I stayed and urged them not to jump? #Brexit is mad,  I will do what I can to stop it.  
Renewing my EHIC card for holiday this summer.Realised this is last time I can do this unless we get Brexit cancelled.It's a small benefit, but obvious, simple and useful. And removed for no sensible reason.Just brings home the madness and brainlessness of Brexit#StopBrexit 
This is just embarrassing. If you really want to engage young people, maybe oppose Brexit instead putting on a shit festival and booking a load of bands that were briefly famous whilst most of the target demographic were in primary school? 
Hi Digby  I’m elected. You’re not.PS - if we’re to be a modern economy we’ll have to adhere to European standards on a range of things.Your Brexit simply removes any British input over those regulations.  
Barclays boss admits #Brexit worries reducing  their lending in the UK.  This will hit business borrowers, productivity and jobs. This lack of confidence now widespread and likely to increase as Brexit negotiations stall 
Thoughts on the arguments for and against another Referendum. My latest Brexit Blog post:  
We need to leave the customs union to honour the Brexit vote, says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Roadmap to avoid Brexit to be sent to MPs and peers  
Lord Lawson, the chairman of Vote Leave obviously can't live with Brexit either.  
David Davis' latest Brexit plan didn't even last 24 hours. Because it's shit.  pic.twitter.com/nqkFxdnNnp 
Project Fear is back, and with a vengeance. Theresa May's Government must be more positive and firm about Brexit, and not fan the flames of the naysayers. 
David Davis reveals the model for his proposed ten mile "buffer zone" between Northern Ireland and the Republic after Brexit.  
Brexit is proof that our greatest ally is in fact the UK people, not the UK government. Just as we won our independence those many years ago, the people of the UK are now fighting for just the same.Just as we dumped tea into the Boston Harbor, may they forever dump the EU. 
Because Brexit was so much fun first time around... @HaveIGotNews @henningwehn 
Excellent piece by Leader of the Labour MEPs Richard Corbett on what the Tories in the European Parliament really want and why a hard Brexit would be even more damaging than we realise  @labour4europe @Labour4EU @euromove #Brexit  
"I can tell you this. Brexit will not happen." Bernard-Henri Lévy.They're still saying this. 2 years later. And still claiming to have the moral high ground.Fuck all the way off. 
**NEED YOUR HELP**Our friends at @WestmonsterUK are using their scarce resources trying to "EXPOSE 'SABOTEURS' PLOTTING TO STOP BREXIT". Let's save them the trouble: RT or Tweet them with #BrexitSaboteur@Labour4EU @Labour4EU @EUflagmafia @mrjamesob 
Here is what the #EU is currently facing: #Brexit, Euroscetpic Government in Austria and Italy, Poland and Hungary refusing to be pushed around by Brussels.  Coming apart at the seams. 
Alive! Post Referendum Editorial ... "We're at war"  
Almost 2 years since the referendum vote, under a year until we 'leave', and this lot still have no clue - not one - about how to get that which they've promised would be 'easy'. How can you be that useless and still be in a job? It is genuinely astounding  
More evidence - as if any were needed - that the Government has not got the first clue how to honour their irreconcilable promises to both deliver a hard Brexit and retain an open border in Ireland.  
We voted for #BrexitSign and RT this.#Democracy must be seen to be carried out.Out means Out!#LBCLIVE #skynews #Conservatives #bbcqt #bbcdp 
Our latest Government #Brexit Update was published today and can be accessed here: Check it out for the latest on Government Business Supports and recent Government Engagement on #Brexit.  
Ten MPs from across the political spectrum have signed our letter calling for a #peoplesvote because they believe the government's Brexit deal will harm their local communities.Please RT and send your thanks 
The DUP has taken almost a day to respond to the suggestion of a post-Brexit 'border buffer zone' in NI. Their response, in the name of arch-Brexiteer Sammy Wilson but issued by the party press office, is unusually critical of the Government they are sustaining in office.  
I didn’t plan to campaign against Brexit. I don’t enjoy it. And there are thousands of other things I’d rather be doing.But I refuse to give in to liars and cheats who promise us a new Jerusalem but don’t know their arse from their elbows.This is the fight of my generation.  
brexit: the prequel  
Your daily reminder that Soft Brexit is a myth. We are more than ten times as large as Norway, with an atomic arsenal and a permanent seat on the UN security council. It's inconceivable that we would accept EU rules without having a say on them. The options are No Deal or Remain. 
#Brexit means problems, hassles, costs and lost opportunities for Britain’s creative talent:  
It’s a very serious problem that the Labour leader is backing the Conservatives’ chaotic Brexit, in opposition to the views of his backbenchers and party members.  And @theresamay has, rather rudely, still not extended thanks to @jeremycorbyn for his support on #Brexit 
Rather than flying kites in the Brexiteer press, it'd be great to see @DavidDavisMP & the UK Govt actually bring formal #brexit proposals to @MichelBarnier and the EU negotiating team, the clock is ticking 
"It is 8 months today since the self-determination referendum in Catalonia. And today the government that sent the police against the citizens exerting their right to vote has been ousted. We go ahead. We have a republican mandate we must fulfill." @karnamikko @peerlux 
Often it is levelled at me that leaving the EU is not just about money but about principle.I have principles too. The main ones at play here: I don't want to hurt my fellow citizens and I don't want hurt my country for my own ideology.Brexit is not a noble cause.#FBPE 
Threatened by tariffs & trade war, to which skirts does Liam Fox run? Brussels. Why? Because the EU is a big player with muscle. We’re still part of that - & a big player in it. Outside it we’re small, & already dwindling further just on the threat of Brexit. 
The June 23rd #PeoplesVote March isn't just for people who voted Remain. This is for everyone who voted for something in 2016 and the government hasn't delivered. This is for everyone who thinks it would be nationally irresponsible to accept just ANY Brexit deal. 
A cross-party group of MPs have signed an open letter calling for a final vote on any Brexit deal with an option to remain in the EU  
Bring back Britannia to feature on brand new Brexit coin  
There is so much sense in this by Chris Patten, last British governor of Hong Kong, former EU commissioner for external affairs and Chancellor of the University of Oxford, in a world of #brexit nonsense, everyone should read it   
In a week's time, Ontario will know whether it has a progressive government and @AndreaHorwath as Premier or has followed the lemmings' path of Brexit & Donald Trump and voted for Doug Ford and his "regressive" conservatives. Vote wisely on June 7th b/c it matters. #OntarioVotes 
"This is a huge decision for our country, perhaps the biggest we will make in our lifetime, and it will be the final decision" - David Cameron, 10 November 2015. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Will June be the end of @theresa_may? Leadership challenges & #Brexit votes could sink PM within weeks  
More PAIN for Greece as Germany gets TOUGHGreece owes Germany €248 BillionEckhardt Rehberg:“With IMF insisting on large-scale debt relief for Greece - a 3-digit number [Billions] - I have a problem"Or does Greece have a problem with euro!#Brexit #EU 
ah great, here we go again with the referendum chat! THERE  DOES  NOT  NEED  TO  BE  A  REFERENDUM  IN  NORTHERN  IRELAND  @All4Choice 
Farage also said that it would only take 48 hours to do a post-Brexit deal with Trump. Not looking that great in the light of trade war...  
Worried by David Davis’s blatant bid to be fool of the week, Barry Gardiner tries to play catch up by continuing to back #Brexit despite concluding it’ll make UK ‘infinitely more vulnerable’ to trade wars. 
I'm still filling the gaps for the National Museum in relation to the 8th Campaign - I'd love to collect a boarding pass, ticket or something similar from someone who came home to vote in the referendum - anybody know anyone who could give me something to represent them? 
EU don't know what free trade is.They erect huge tariff barriers to protect inefficient EU producers,& make the poorest EU cosumers pay excessive prices for basics like food and clothing.After #Brexit the poorest consumers in the UK will be a lot better off.#HappyDays 
‘Hero of the show’ even has Dimbleby laughing with her Scotland versus Brexit remarkBy @wrightismight#bbcqt 
John Sheridan: "I'm sorry but I don't intend to live in No-Man's Land.We [in the border region] are quite happy living & working together.#Brexit could take away our physical freedom & it could take our mental freedom.+It literally has the ability to put us out of business."  
Remoaners trying to weaken the UK's hand in Brexit negotiations should hang their heads in shame!Agree? Support Westmonster:  
Don’t let Farage rewrite history. Don’t be indifferent to the wrecking ball that is Brexit. With eyes open, it’s time now to #ThinkAgain, get behind a #PeoplesVote & come out on the streets to be heard on June 23rd. 
Strangest line in this absurd article: "we should be treated like any other EU country". Brexit, it seems, does not mean Brexit.  
In fact since we're all doing unpopular opinions lately, here's one: brexit is the fault of the people who voted for it. Not the 2010 Lib Dems, not 2001 Tony Blair, not Margaret bloody Thatcher. Take some bloody responsibility. 
I think if are now honest & practical, we’ve run out of time to negotiate a sensible deal. We should now postpone the exit date by 12 months to give the U.K. & our EU. partners a fair chance to arrive at the right solution for the greater good & benefit of everyone. #brexit  
WATCH: This week, Nigel Farage claimed he never said Brexit would be a 'success'. Brexit's going so badly, he's trying to rewrite history. Don't let him get away with it - please RT this so everybody knows this isn’t the Brexit promised. #PeoplesVote 
Bless.I'm not an "extreme Brexiteer".I am just a Brexiteer who recognises that both Remain and Leave campaigners agreed before the Referendum that voting to Leave the EU meant voting to Leave the Single Market, Customs Union and all connected Courts such as the ECJ and ECHR.  
2 chaps on @LBC discussing Trump's tariffs:Remainer: '[says lots of intelligent stuff about trade] Trump doesn't care about UK. We are going to be so vulnerable after Brexit.'Brexiter: 'Trump is right. Why are we siding with EU? We should leave now! Brexit is great!' 
"The government is asking businesses to sign Non Disclosure Agreements when they talk to them about the outcomes of Brexit". Part of our chat with @SebDance 
What a shame to break bread with those who have Kurdish blood on their hands. This is normalized by the so called pro Kurdistan party KDP with Turkish soldiers. South #Kurdistan is officially sold by the clans, congrats on the referendum.  
finally, the brexit dividend  
Brexit: Why do some UK citizens fear for their future rights?  
Great coverage of @WalesForEurope’s cross party & pivotal letter calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal.  
“As the stark reality of Brexit sinks in, members of Britain’s cabinet & leading Brexiteers have increasingly turned on one another and attempted to cast blame on everyone but themselves..” Its because Emperor Brexit is stark naked, Chris. He has no clothes!  
I have seen JC supporters over the last few days repeatedly say that #FBPE is a one issue "Party" & that we are obsessed with #brexit and with destroying JC. So I want to address this in 2 ways - This is my personal answer .............1/n 
Summary:1. Here's how Brexit will affect each ingredient of the full English breakfast:2. It won't.3. This article is pure clickbait.4. As well as yet another risible Remainer scare story from the Indy.5. Which isn't worth the paper it's not printed on.6. That's all, folks!  
My letter to Iain Duncan Smith asking him to retract his remark that I should learn to live with Brexit or ‘live elsewhere’  
Surely these events are a reason for Brexit? Being in the EU hasn't spared the UK these tariffs, in fact, by virtue of membership, we've been hit. Brexiteers could argue outside the EU we might not have been.  
Great to welcome group of @YoungLiberalsUK to the #EYE event in Strasbourg. Still fighting #Brexit, still proud Europeans!  
Irish pro-lifers organize 40 days of public penance over abortion referendum  
“David Davis mocked for 'fantastical' Brexit plans for Northern Ireland 'buffer zone' : Tory Brexit gets more ludicrous as each day passes  
Last month we reported that the price of cod could rise by 18% as a result of Brexit. Get the word out for #nationalfishandchipday. Please RT 
The independence vote in the north-eastern region of #Catalonia shook Spain's democracy to the core. Tune into BBC World News this weekend to join @BBCNiallOG who reported on the referendum and has gone back to ask what lies ahead | @BBCOurWorld  
Brexit will destroy the traditional Tory party - and Ruth Davidson can't save it.  
EU negotiators to offer every Brit the chance to remain an EU citizen after Brexit Oh Yes Please  
With new trade sanctions imposed on UK, Liam Fox & Boris J now v quiet about our future deals with US post #Brexit. They have always been delusional about “special” relationship and latest Trump action proves why we should stay with EU #FBPE 
I want a peoples vote on Brexit but it must include an option to remain. The current peoples vote campaign by Anna @Anna_Soubry and @ChukaUmunna does not ensure an option to remain. We must change this to include this option do you support remaining in EU being and option? 
Fascinating. British trade with Ireland worth more than it’s trade with India, Japan, New Zealand and Australia PUT TOGETHER. And trade with just county Cork worth about same as entire trade with South America. But Brexit, embrace the commonwealth, new markets etc.  
“Oi! Leave it out mate. I don’t give a Donald Duck about bloody Brexit. It’s all a bunch of porkies.”#NationalFishAndChipsDay 
Holland about to recruit 900 new customs officers & 150 veterinary officials to cope with border controls after Brexit, senior Dutch official tells  me. ‘It’s mad of course - but we aren’t hanging around. The UK needs 5,000 more but hasn’t even started recruiting’ 
Breaking: Theresa May meets Gemma Collins to discuss Brexit.  
If you’re not really, really concerned about how brexit will work in NI, you’re just not paying attention.  
British 'saboteurs' are working with EU officials to try and stop Brexit!  
Following the historic referendum in the Republic of Ireland last week, we're calling on @theresa_may to support Northern Irish women's abortion rights.With us? Sign and share the petition now  
Mark Kleinman reports that top FTSE chief execs Tesco, Glaxo, BT, GSK, Aston Martin & CBI/IoD will be in Downing Street on Monday for a Brexit summit amid concern over progress & investment plans 
Sky Sources: Executives at some of Britain’s biggest companies including BT Group, Glaxosmithkline and Tesco will hold talks with Theresa May next week after warnings from their European counterparts that time is running out to secure post-Brexit trade arrangements 
Exclusive: Theresa May summons FTSE-100 chiefs from BT, GSK, Tesco, Balfour Beatty for Brexit talks on Monday following European industrialists' warning that time to secure customs deal is "running out".  
*Only* 49% of Londoners think people should have a vote on Brexit dealReveals how misleading the post-referendum coverage has beenLondon is not Remain Central People often forget that 40% of Londoners voted for #Brexit  
.@MaajidNawaz on why Donald Trump's new 25% tariffs make succeeding after Brexit unachievable.  
The United States “is offering the UK a worse open skies deal” than we have now as part of the EU. #airlines face big difficulties if we go ahead with #Brexit via @raconteur 
But Blair, England voted to LEAVE the EU. I thought you believed in the finality of a democratic referendum vote.   
'If you were in any doubt about the disaster of post-Brexit trade deals, Trump’s tariffs should bring you back to reality'  
First Brexit.Now this.  
Why did nobody else think of David Davis's wizard idea: that N. Ireland could be simultaneously inside and outside the EU?He's either been reading too much quantum physics or someone's put something in his coffee. #Brexit #bbcnews 
If by 'delusional views' you mean the great opportunities that comes with Brexit, then yes! And I'll be discussing the UK's healthcare service too   
We campaign for the decriminalisation of abortion. We do not need a referendum on this issue, Westminster already has the power to act and has been urged to by CEDAW. It's time to #decrimNI #abortionrightsnai 
Please retweet - if we want to get a chance to halt Brexit this needs to be really big. I will be there.  
Nigel Farage is so scared of being blamed for the Brexit disaster that he's trying to rewrite history.Don't let him.#FBPE 
The Tories say Northern Ireland can stay in the EU and the UKScotland has to do what England says and go down with England's sinking Brexit shipOr does it? 
Trump declares “war on WTO”That WTO. You know the one that the brexiteers believe will solve all their post #brexit problems.That Trump. You know the one that will give UK a “great deal”.Your fantasy unicorn land doesn’t exist.   
Today is the final day to take down our referendum posters! If you see any #Together4Yes posters, can you please let your local group know - links to local groups here  
London voted 59% to Remain. Only 49% of Londoners back a second referendum. The entire Continuity Remain campaign has been aimed at London and yet they still can’t keep all their 2016 voters onside.  
This could prove important. Left against Brexit, including gen sec of transport union & former member of Momentum steering committee, urge Corbyn to shift on Brexit .  
Obama: UK would be at the back of a trade deal queue if it chooses Brexit.Brexit: BOOO! LIAR! BOOOO!Trump: *starts actual trade war with UK and EU* Oh, and I want the NHS and your entire farming industry too.Brexit: WE LOVE YOU!Wake up, people, before it’s too late. 
It was a privilege and honor to spend the month of May volunteering with Together For Yes. The referendum was won by the work of hundreds of people all over Ireland. It was won by a women led grassroots movement. What is that, you say? Have a look here   
And another thing...every penny 'saved' in eight years of grinding and unnecessary austerity has already been pissed agianst the Brexit wall. It's all been for nothing. Time for revenge is near. We need to throw out the current political order and go for something new. Challenge!  
Great quote from Chris Leslie: “If there was an award for coming up with unnecessarily complicated and convoluted solutions to self-inflicted problems, David Davis would win it every year.” #Brexit #FBPE 
So to clarify Nigel Lawson is getting criticised at the moment for having his main residence in France after campaigning for leaving the EU in the referendum. Yet Scots living elsewhere in the world can happily support Scottish independence without any fear of criticism.  
As you contemplate today's bizarre buffer border Brexit news I recommend to you an old border saying from Tyrone. In Irish it goes "Is minic a bhain duine slat a sgiúrfadh é féin". And, in English, people say: "A person often cut a stick to thrash himself, David Davis" 
Brexit is really NOT “the biggest problem for a lot of people” & this is what MPs are failing to recognise.The working-class, the poorest, most vulnerable in society are suffering NOW & NOT because of Brexit.In or out their lives will only be bettered if we’ve a Labour Gvnt.  
Isn’t it brilliant that the govt triggered #Art50 so quickly, back in the days when Brexit meant Brexit & everything could so easily be fixed with a splash of red, white & blue?   
Brexit is a Tory class war against the working people of our country. Time to say no to Brexit. National speakers tour across all the media today  
We need to LEAVE the customs union to honour the Brexit vote - EFT Adviser @Jacob_Rees_Mogg  
Yeah. #Brexit really shook the establishment, didn’t it.  
#EU Article 13 could 'destroy the internet as we know it': What is it, why is it controversial and what will it mean for memes?  #EU #Brexit  
Expert after expert have told us that Brexit will hit the pockets of hardworking people up and down the country. The Tories are gambling with their future. At the very least, they should be transparent and publish their estimates of the economic impact immediately #ExitfromBrexit 
Delighted new Italian PM Conte Government is in place &new Finance Minister wont be undermining Eurozone stability. With Brexit negotiations going on the last thing EU27 or  needs is a major € & financial markets crisis. Only Brextremists want EU instability& its destruction 
Redundant. Nothing will shift until either a) @CONservatives make a move or b) we’ve seen the deal.Why would Labour commit political suicide?Brexit belongs entirely to the Tories.The path @jeremycorbyn & @Keir_Starmer have taken is absolutely correct & they must keep on it. 
Farage joins other hard Brexit ideologues Cummings & Hannan in getting his excuses in early. The man has no shame. But he’s right about one thing: the only sensible way through the Brexit mess is to have a People’s Vote once we know the terms of the deal.  
Whatever the EU and the UK might say, the issue of citizens' rights after #Brexit really isn't solved yet.  
You only have to look at the architects of Brexit, people like Johnson and Gove, and its cheerleaders like Rees-Mogg to know it's right wing ideology will be detrimental to Labour people, our rights and our living standards.It's high time we opposed.  
Good quote:  "If the government still cannot decide what Brexit means, how can they pretend they have a meaningful mandate at all?"  
Frustrated by the slow progress on hard brexit, Mr Gammon decided to start The Gammon Party  
"Women in Northern Ireland don't want a referendum."The criminalisation of women is absolutely an area Westminster has an obligation to act on, across all countries of the UK." #NowForNI 
Welcome to June 2018. Almost 2 years after a referendum in which we were promised the world *and* that we could keep the world firmly outside our island door.Our place in that world looks much diminished today.How To Lose Friends & Influence Nothing ( Or, Brexit). 
The World has gone seemingly mad because Brexit & Trump has forced evil out into the open. We can now see the faces of the masters of it and their useful idiot slaves. 
Today is the 1st of JuneOn the 23rd of June I will be in London attending a #StopBrexit march with many many others. I will be wearing my Stop Brexit t shirt and will proudly carry my union flag next to my EU flag. I hope you can join me on this massive #StopBrexit march. 
I am beginning to get an ever-so-slight, incy-wincy feeling that #Brexit may not be the greatest idea. Retweet if you are beginning to get it too. 
Retweet if you think this lemming on a spoon would be better as negotiating #Brexit than Theresa May's government  
Price of fish and chips will rocket after Brexit. Well done everyone. #NationalFishandChipDay 
Full stop missing. Should read: ‘Let’s drop the pretence. Brexit can be stopped’  
I'm looking forward to post Brexit fish and chip day. When what fish there are will cost %18 more thanks to all those lovely tariffs and there won't be any chips because all the spuds have rotted in the fields.#nationalfishandchipday 
It is 1 June 2018. Nearly two years after EU referendum. A mere 10 months away from the UK’s departure from the EU. And the Govt is still floating ideas of what Brexit MIGHT look like. It’s not way to run a country. It’s a pretty good way to ruin a country. 
NEWS! UK Brexit paper proposes ‘magic’ Irish border staffed by fairies  
All this talk of an amazing trade deal with the US post Brexit proving to be nonsense as Trump slaps on tarrifs and then tweets 'FREE TRADE!'. Boris Johnson and Liam Fox constant Trump flattery literally made no difference then.... 
You don't appear to have mellowed with time or in the face of overwhelming evidence any form of #Brexit can only leave us Poorer, Weaker with Fewer Rights & less Control. And the ppl you ref to = 26.5% i.e 37% voters & only 51.8% of those voting.#FinalSay 
Brexit Syndrome is placing an intolerable burden on our already overstretched mental health services.It has driven poor David Davis to propose a 10 mile buffer zone either side of the Irish border - like the demilitarised zone between North and South Korea 
Nigel Farage has now claimed that he said that #Brexit would never be a "success" - complete not true - he used to say that he thought it would be amazing. This is not good enough and further rationale for a #PeoplesVote at the end of the process @peoplesvote_uk 
Business leaders & think tanks are criticising Theresa May’s failure to secure more detailed agreement inside her own party on the preferred trading relationship with the EU before triggering Article 50 last spring. I concur. Brexit has been a steaming mess since the beginning. 
#FarageOnLBC doesn't care that you'll be poorer. “After Brexit whether for good or ill, we will be self-governing. That’s the point. I never said it would be a beneficial thing to leave and everyone would be better off, just that we would be self-governing." #brexit #FBPE 
Let the #EU Nightmare begin!Italian Anti-EU alliance is BORN as PM SWORN in today.Crisis averted by moving anti-euro economist Paolo Savona from Economy to EU Affairs!Now have a eurosceptic Govt in eurozone’s 3rd biggest economy!#Itexit #Brexit #Leave 
Pls RT our @britishineurope appeal to @theresa_may:"Write to the member states, write to @MichelBarnier & say we would like #UKinEU27 to have continuing free movement. We think it is a deal that can be done if she just makes the request." #Brexit 
A @BBCNews correspondent stupidly says despite the ‘special relationship’ #tariffs are placed by the #US on #UK steel.Doesn’t he realise because we are in the #EU #SingleMarket the #US are unable to separate out the UK?That’s another reason why we need #Brexit. 
If Labour leadership really wants to protect the many not the few then it urgently needs to oppose  the Government’s #Brexit shambles & champion a #PeoplesVote on the final deal 
Katya, your BBC tweet might give the wrong impression.  Spanish unemployment: 17.2%. Youth unemployment: 38.6%. Official Eurostat figures 2017. Just saying.Original fact-based #Brexit research & news:  
“Let’s have a referendum every 5 years until I get the answer I want”Kwasi Kwarteng slams the Remoaners and SNP on #bbcqt for their inability to accept referendum results.  Hear hear.  
German EuroMEP wants to 'march into Rome', to teach their brave anti-EU forces a lesson.A true Brussels Bastard.Viva Italia Libera!Viva Brexit! 
"‘MaxFac’ has the best chance of making the most of the opportunities created by Brexit...agreeing to keep customs arrangements as streamlined as possible. What’s more, the systems and technologies for MaxFac already exist and are being applied elsewhere."  
About 32,000 people work in the UK steel industry.How would Corbyn's "Brexit for jobs" policy defend them against Trump's trade war? 
Border controls post-Brexit will be 'tiresome, not serious,' says Leave campaign leader/French resident Nigel Lawson, ie., a wealthy ex-pats sitting on his arse. What about those of us who cross 60 borders a year for work? Pathetic bloody hypocrite.  
Mural of Savita Halappanavar, the focal point for supporters of a Yes vote in the referendum, has been removed for preservation  
We've been quiet for too long. The fightback starts now. We are The Left Against Brexit. This summer, join us for a nationwide tour — with inspiring speakers, and an in depth discussion about how we can stop Brexit 
I know it's a cliche to say people who don't want Bielsa because he doesn't know the league etc are also heavy into brexit BUT ITS TRUE 
To try and shift @JeremyCorbyn now over #Brexit is absolutely stupid & nonsensical. He is not in power & he is not “negotiating”. Labour are absolutely right to not make a move until we see ‘the deal’. Our position couldn’t be any clearer & @Keir_Starmer should hold firm! 
Theresa May's incompetent government has now revealed - to the Sun newspaper not to UK  parliament or voters -  their latest hairbrain Brexit scheme to solve the NI border problem.Make it 10-miles wide!Who are the people still prepared to vote for this bunch of clueless clowns?  
Exit from #Lexit? “There is nothing about Brexit that will make life better for the working class... It was a rightwing brainchild won on a deceitful programme of dog-whistle racism and the big lie that the NHS would get £350m a week.”  
The hilarious Twitter account of the Irish Border should be required reading for all Brexit officials.  
Brexit ministers’ favourite ‘think tank’ (you know, the ones who think there’s a tech fix to the Irish border question) today slammed by Charity Commission for having “clearly crossed a line” - latest by @PeterKGeoghegan 
Utter madness. It will drive Canada and Mexico much closer to EU and put a wedge in against those Brexitedrs who champion CANZUK as the economic & Anglosphere future post Brexit for UK. Canada which is bilingual English & French if it has to choose will opt for bigger EU27 market  
We’re delighted to announce the launch of the Left Against Brexit tour - coming to a town or City bear you this summer with @zoesqwilliams @garyyounge @julie4nw @AnnPettifor and many more. See you there!  
And today’s runner up in the Blue Peter Imagine Brexit Competition...  
So, to summarise, the only difference between you and the Tories is that Labour backs a customs union that doesn't exist and cannot exist, except in your head.In other words, Labour's Brexit is exactly the same as the Tories'.  
The Italian Leave campaign will put Juncker's jibes on the side of a bus when their referendum comes. #Quitaly 
Someone needs to tell Barry Gardiner and Labour that being part of a customs union isn’t a magic wand that solves all Brexit problems. Labour’s Brexit position is slightly less crap than Tories’ position, but it is still a crap position, fraught with unsolvable problems. #r4today 
If you want to know how to deal with the fallout from Brexit - just watch what the arch-Brexiteers are doing:Rees-Mogg - moves £44m to a Russian bankRedwood - advises clients to stop investing in UKLawson - applies for EU citizenshipFarage - buys house in France 
Brexit is like Shrek: messy, complicated and bad-tempered | Anand Menon  
Legatum Institute criticised by Charity Commission and ordered to remove its report on Brexit from its website.  It failed to reflect the potential negative aspects of Brexit, thus failing in its requirement of impartiality. via @financialtimes 
Great to see #LeftAgainstBrexit launch today! The more @UKLabour supporters with the courage to stand against #Brexit the more likely we are to change party policy. Look forward to all working together! @julie4nw @Manuel_TSSA @michael_chessum 
Barry Gardiner on @BBCr4today 1/6/18 has just said we'll be infinitely weaker outside the EU in a trade war with the US & that Trump's actions demonstrate that a special trade deal with the USA will be not on the table post Brexit. 
The disgraced ex Defence Secretary Liam Fox told us #Brexit trade deals would be easy, well all his brown nosing of Mr. Trump and the USA has proved what most of us knew, Trump is a ruthless businesseman and Fox is a numpty who should be nowhere near any trade talks #bbcnews #GMB 
Already over 30,000 views for our new video. You can do better than that! Expose the Remoaner plot to stop Brexit. Retweet!   
It's official. Even Farage accepts that Brexit is going to make us poorer. The sunlit uplands are officially dead.Who voted to be worse off? Most Leave voters voted in good faith for a better life. They were lied to.Demand a #PeoplesVote so we can return mis-sold goods. 
“Once again a major European democracy has seen the results of a legitimate vote dismissed...because the EU can’t countenance dissent. It’s hard not to conclude that those who voted Leave in our own referendum so as to ‘take back control’ had a point.”  
I get very annoyed when I hear people say we’re not up for a referendum on independence. If you’re not ready now, you will be by next March when we are still in the @EU & when the deal (or no deal) will be known...it will not be pretty for the UK. Time to break free...prepare now 
Today is the final day for referendum posters to be up, they all have to be removed by today. If you see any stray #Together4Yes posters please let your local group know otherwise there will be fines, and we don’t want that!  
Fascinating to hear British inventor of ‘Alexa’ on @BBCr4today William ?Bowe: says Alexa inspired by science fiction & that UK is world leader in engineering and research, ahead of US in engineering entrepreneurs, but is short of engineers. Must be key focus for Brexit Britain 
Today I pay my respects to the people who informed others and those who voted YES in the 1967 referendum. So I can now live where I want, love and marry who I want, be my son’s guardian, work for equal pay and vote. Thank you #ReconciliationWeek2018 #nitv #DontKeepHistoryAMystery 
To understand what "Global Britain" will be like post #Brexit, see Liam Fox's pathetic grovelling to the US when faced with trade tariffs. Within the Single Market and Customs Union we're part of one of the world's most powerful trading blocs. Outside it we're simply expendable. 
I am proud to support the #LeftAgainstBrexit tour. Labour needs to look at the bigger picture and understand how #Brexit will damage our communities. Come together and help us #StopBrexit >  <@guardian @UKLabour 
“Nigel Farage said today: “After Brexit whether for good or ill, we will be self-governing. That’s the point. I never said it would be a beneficial thing to leave and everyone would be better off, just that we would be self-governing." So now you know 
Go @julie4nw @CarolineLucas None of this soft Brexit, making the best of it, will of the people BS. We have to stop this runaway train. The country will thank us in the end. @BremainInSpain 
Leftwingers launch campaign to shift Labour position on Brexit  
Yesterdays men will not destroy our country for tomorrow. Forget about Brexit and save Britain. Brexit is like the Poll Tax: a bitter and twisted plot to oppress the people. It will not work. Britain is better than this. #FBPE 
“Pulling out of Brexit, not Europe, is now the bold offer we need to make if we are to win an election and begin to properly rebuild prosperity at home.”  
Brexit is led by resentful exceptionalists who can’t bear being in a club on equal terms with France, Italy, Belgium; those delusions of grandeur are behind their cakeist conviction that the EU will change itself to give the UK a special deal. Brexit eats itself. 
Welsh politicians defy Jeremy Corbyn and call for new Brexit referendum Labour voices are getting braver & louder. We need many more of them. #PeoplesVote 
This morning on @BBC6Breakfast me @Damonalbarn chat new @gorillaz, Brexit, The Brits and Zoolander (Part 1 at 7.40am) @BBC6Music 
Just think about this, IF @theresa_may had done the job we elected her to do and delivered on the vote to leave the #EU #Brexit would have already happened and we very likely would be immune to steel tariffs from @realDonaldTrump and the #USA 
"BARNIER LAYS DOWN THE (EU) LAW" - UK to submit to ECJ law for 8 years after #Brexit. When will someone like @Jacob_Rees_Mogg stand up? Full #Brexit analysis:  
#tariffs are in the news, but main barriers to international trade are regulatory & technical standards. On services, there are no tariffs. EU is a global standard-setter. It's madness for the UK, a services economy, to walk away from the EU regulation-setting tables.#Brexit 
"WHAT’S €373 BILLION BETWEEN... ER... FRIENDS?" New EU budget which PM wants to pay towards. No coverage by BBC. For the #Brexit story read:  
MEPs are elected.Digby Jones isn't elected.Moaning is democratic.Telling people not to have views isn't.And UK Govt figures show the cheapest Brexit is = to a 13% tax rise for those on average incomes  
We don't need a referendum to change the law here, both Stormont and Westminster have the power to act. Write to your MP asking them to support a change in abortion law. #NowForNI #abortionrightsnai #nornironnext 
Good to hear about Tory Brexit campaign chairman Lord Lawson applying for French residency. One less Tory in Britain should be welcomed, despite his blatant hypocrisy. 
So disaster-brexit political think-tank Legatum did break the law. But after a wrist-slap they still get taxpayer support as a "charity".  Those rules, that the rest of us follow, they just don't apply to brexit, do they?  
As former Brexit minister Lord Bridges said, Brexit is ‘a gang plank into thin air’  
Liam Fox turns down opportunity to be interviewed by @BBCr4today about #trump #TradeWar This is a disaster for #brexit The last wild claim of #brexiters has been put to rest #brexitisdead 
So after Brexit it will be more difficult to trade with the EU. Trump is taking the US down a protectionist route so who will we have frictionless trade with? Jersey? The Isle of White? Luton?Come on Rees-Mogg tell us who apart from your Russian chums we can 'trade' with? 
Senior garda at centre of two internal investigations over his behaviour regarding referendum 
It’s been a curiously depressing two years, and now that we’ve all been exposed to the realities of Brexit, we should be given a chance to vote again #PeoplesVote 
Hundreds of TV channels that are licensed in the UK will have to seek licensing elsewhere in the EU after Brexit if they want to keep broadcasting. The gov has asked for broadcasting to be included in a free trade deal, but that has never happened before.  
Not exactly a surprise: Legatum’s clear advocacy of a particular Brexit position (whatever its merits) always looked far too political for a charity. What is concerning is that the Charity Commission took so long to act: delayed regulation is useless regulation.  
300 DAYS to Brexit Day.Still time for MPs to torpedo the idea of continuing and growing EU authority over UK Defence — currently being promoted by DExEU’s Technical Note on External Security.  
Foolish move by Modi to make the Kairana by-poll a personal referendum. Even more foolish to project the result onto the 2019 elections. 1. People make different choices during local and National elections.  2. EVMs malfunction due to heat, but only in favour of one party. 
Your #Brexit is the same @Keir_StarmerSame borrowing: £20bn now to £80bn in 2033Same abandoning Northern IrelandSame failure to help EU citizens in UK & Brits in EU27Same lies to the electorateSame failed ideologyand you are a QC!You are such a disappointment#PeoplesVote 
Welsh Labour politicians break ranks from Jeremy Corbyn to call for new Brexit referendum - The Independent  
Barclays is tightening its lending criteria to a UK economy that is lagging behind the rest of the world.Chief executive Jes Staley says Brexit uncertainty was helping to stunt economic growth and that was something the bank could not ignore.  
It’s not so long ago that we were being told that a free trade deal with the US would be the easiest ever done. We would be at the front of the queue. Times change. And that’s another reason why we need a #peoplesvote on the future of Brexit.  
What Ireland’s abortion referendum means for Latin America. @JMVivancoHRW for @hrw on why Latin American countries should abandon cruel abortion policies.  
After leaving day, when the economy starts turning to ashes, when food  starts going bare on the shelves, when EU citizens are being literally rounded up and put into "welcome centers", any utterance of Brexit being a mistake will be met with far greater hostility than this. 
Left-wingers to tour Britain in campaign to convince Jeremy Corbyn to block Brexit - The Independent - and @Labour4EU will be with them working to #StopBrexit and save jobs. 
Why oh why? didn't the Welsh people listen to the warnings from @LeanneWood & Plaid Cymru of the trading disasters associated with brexit. Unfortunately the  clorinated chickens have now come home to roost, POTUS has slapped Steel & Aluminum with vindictive eye watering Tariffs !  
‘Referendum means we’re LEAVING’ Brexiteer makes BRILLIANT point to Dimbleby on BBC QT  
Without #Brexit #UK would become weak #EU province, #Canada pulled into #USA orbit, #Australia & #NZ into #China orbit. Fortunately, #Canzuk will now emerge as globally stabilizing middle power alliance of 135m, bigger than , on doorstep of   #PacificRim #IndoPacific 
Brexit secretary plans to give Northern Ireland joint UK, EU status: The Sun  
Attorney General David Eby recommended three proportional representation systems for voters to choose from in the electoral reform referendum this fall. #bcpoli 
Legatum’s dirty tricksThink tank abused charity status to push its Brexit politics 
This week on planet BrexitAbortion rights for NI could derail the DUP May coalition.USA tariffs embarrasses the Brexiters.God help us If the NI border buffer zone is the best Brexit can offer.We all wait for the Brexit white paper.Worse to come. #FBPE 
Pledge your vote for the #ProportionalRepresentation referendum! The official campaign starts July 1. Mail-in ballots will be accepted from Oct. 22 to Nov. 30. Let's win this! #bcpoli #PR4BC 
They, the UK, meddled in our electionThe mayor of London has outright hostility for TrumpTeresa May is seemingly stalling BrexitBrexit which the voters choseMay also dissed Trump at firstSeems maybe the elite globalists controlling UK were out to rig the US election 
“The tone of many #Brexiters is similar to that of a drunk at the latter stages of inebriation. The hangover is going to be very nasty indeed.” @ChrisGreyBrexit in @PoliticsMeans. #Brexit #Government #BrexitReality #BrexitFacts #EU 
So basically, despite being all for Brexit, he wants to maintain freedom of movement and the rights of an EU citizen for himself...while denying those very things to the 48% of us who voted to remain in the EU.Sodding hypocrite.And so very Tory.  
Twitter: let’s just try to enjoy the game tonight without constantly comparing 2 players that starred in a league decades apart. Not every shot and pass must serve as a referendum on a given player’s greatness. These incessant Kevin Love vs. Jack Sikma comparisons MUST stop… 
Theresa May demands EU stop using sound-bites after months of saying 'Brexit means Brexit'   
‘Hard Brexit charity’ broke rules and must remove publication  #Stopbrexit 
I don't know how long you've been down there but I can tell you that Scotland has been very divided between nationalists and Union supporters since before the 2014 independence referendum. With that and having an SNP government at Holyrood for 11 years, things are bad! 
Same here we dont know any Remainers who accept Brexit, they are all still fighting hard to #StopBrexit 
Angry, that some people, who are on the EU payroll! want to pervert UK democracy. We waited 40yrs for a referendum, Parliament finally let us decide & 1.4 million more people voted leave. Had Gov & Remain not lied about fake consequences, that would have been higher 
The BS is getting thick! First Tommy's visit with his family to confirm his safety is cancelled and now the petition of over 500,000 is rejected! Seems the UK government is pushing the British people to the breaking point! #Brexit #FreeTommy 
I've finally found that one elusive brexit benefit.We would be able to send Didi back!  
The proposed referendum to make the North Shore a separate country seems to lack ambition, when one considers that its proponent is already on another planet  
Jordan now. Brexit...Trump...Italy....Iran.... Brazil....etc etc We may look back at the end of it all and think damn the signs were all there!  
If Labour doesn't offer a credible policy to stop Brexit, Remainers have both the right and a duty to vote for a party that does. If Juggling Jeremy wants to lose the next election by an even bigger margin, he has only to continue on his current, profoundly mistaken course.  
You know I would like to be able to see #Brexit and #Scotref from the Tories point of view. Unfortunately I am incapable of getting my head that far up my ar*e! 
The vote should be redone because it was advisory, based on falsehoods, was backed by only 26.5 of the Ppl 37% voters 51.8% of those voting..had no mandate post GE2017, we'll be losing Rights & the economy will be damaged, plus we now know the reality of #Brexit.#FinalSay. 
Ironically, Westminster are about to learn why the EU is so useful to the UK, when they slap the same tariff on the import of US steel to Europe. #Scotref #Indyref2 #Brexit. 
Only a matter of time before the standard line and only defence against a series of #Brexit clusterf****  will be that remainers couldn't be bothered to make it work. 
post brexit , the Greek equivalent of Bono , Geldof and Ure will be having concerts for England and its New West Midlands formerly known as Wales.Gammon Aid. 
You might like to consult with Prof Vernon Bogdanor, @Keir_Starmer.  A Customs Union on its own is not the answer. It needs to be accompanied by the Single Market, and at that point, we might as well Remain. Labour's Brexit as the promised land? No thanks.  
Well this bodes well for our glorious post-Brexit future.... #brexit #tariffs #UnitedStates #Trump 
Populists who led the #Brexit movement in the UK are first to desert the sinking ship.  Now you know what these leaders are worth.  
Very important thread here. No matter outcome of referendum we all have work to do on this issue.  #bcpoli #pr4bc  
Looking forward to relying on those easy, wonderful post-Brexit trade deals with our very special best buddy, the good ol' US of A!Nothing like that protectionist, self-interested EU, with all those taxes & rules we helped put in place.Steel yourselves everyone!#FBPE #Brexit 
SPECIAL! @EzraLevant presents an in-depth interview with @GerardBattenMEP,  the new leader of UKIP, about #TommyRobinson, grooming gangs, #Brexit & more  
Libya Constitution Drafting Assembly renews calls for holding a referendum before elections  
